Renaissance Revival et Dæ-mon-ology
Olivia Wright-Lane
(Hoo; ser derz translat3r) 
Renaissance Revival et Dæ-mon-ology
Olivia Wright-Lane
(Hoo; ser derz translat3r) 

Wright-Lane, O.





A note from the



 translator
GœnYe Up 2? 3 Publishing House Rushin’ DerZ-Neu YæOldBattleAxe  “Encyclopædiæ”, 2023 Re-revised edition

- 1) This work notably went for the first time ever into Russian from English circa 1995/6, but, today, no copies of it existed in English, and that statement includes having looked in the cracks, crevices, and between the lines. This translation isn’t yet perfected, mostly because it isn’t finished, but, it’s better to have the info incomplete than not at all, IOO’nion, so we warn you; forsake truth to your own pair-ill. 2) There is no plain admission of the supernatural, spirits, nor angels in this book, however, there is very much a reason for the veil guarding this information away from the remnants of truth in history. Who were the whitches? Dead people burned or do they yet live? Why did Jefferson say the “reign of the witches” was over when the “Federalist” party / “Washing-ton” were no longer in power? Things happened, and why they happened, as opposed to the boring “history” we are taught as though it were not completely wrong; or that it isn’t inherently wrong to lie to anyone, much less to children, about the nature of things, is tended to neatly, leaving one free to connect the remaining pieces for themselves and their own truth. “Kids” comes from the “He” “Brew” (Man-whitch) word “Kedoshim,” and where Hebrew is likely just a slightly modified version of the Aramaic spoken and written by “Jesus,” who was also a “sorcerer” who raised the dead (Like Joan of Arc, Jehanne D’Arc) that is one word still kept correct and sacred; and it means the “holy ones.” We owe them, so, buckle up, because this perspective could shift how an average person views the realms above, and below. Hoping to remain,

Yours in Truth and in Service,  		Olivia Wright - Lane


ISBN 5 - 86004 - 021 - 0	1995. — You shouldn’t worry too much about that ISBN, unless of course you speak Russian; or perhaps you started trying to learn, only to realize it’s the same language as English almost, simply with different letters substituted, but the words are the same. Test it out for yourself. Put your keyboard into Russian mode, and then type a random Ænglische sentence. Translate it from Russian to English on the Great Googley moogley Translator.. If we be a lyne read ye nay an hard tru word beyarnd..]

D E M ABOUT N ABOUT L ABOUT GUI I IN THE EDS OF OHU AM REVIVED ALSO I 




Lorem ipsum dolor sit amet, ligula suspendisse nulla pretium, rhoncus tempor fermentum.



Prologue



2023 — Moscow, Rushia 
(or Huston, Tex. or Washing-towne, D.C…“lynch”-burg; Buffaloe Bayou; Sion, whatever they’re calling it these days; it was first very likably much different -C. Ser)








And with t about r and to and, z and t r and and in and in highway and e in with in about I eat t in about r h e with t in e in about p r about - sy, the N ye is connected with demonology and vedovsky process - mi, explained blossoming of these is shown y at the end of XV - on - to the chala of the 17th centuries by the actors following f. Long vre-mya it was treated to joint stock company result usual umstven-ache backwardness and insufficient intellectual progress in uk an adhan of N y y period*. Others saw prichi-ny in economic, social political and du - the hovny crisis of society which captured Western Ev-to a rop without going, however, into details. The N aiboly often meets a statement that inflating of a demo - a nomaniya (and consequently, and development of its base, nauch-ache demonology) was the reply of the lichesky church besieged kato-to progressive ideas of thinkers of Renaissance and guman a-ism whose "to ritik and to amn I am a N and to and m of N e N e about with t and in l I e t... about t in with I to about y r e l and g and o z N about y m and with t and k and i mythologies" **. However still researchers did not manage to explain with deep arguments why in light Renaissance from it I rk about vyra-zhenny interest in the person and N auk am, during an era, bo-leu a front line, according to them, than the Middle Ages, was issued the system of vedovsky processes and there was a bulk antivedovsky and demonological tr and to that that century. 
Demonic representations (whether national, scientific) - the phenomenon very complex, incorporated everything mnogoob-razy societies of cultural tradition. Reflected in pamphlets, materials of some processes, the people - Nye demonology is alloy ustoychi- 

Whether such point of view dominated especially in popular - a teratura of XIX - the beginnings of the 20th century, see we will press.: To antorovich Ya.A. Sred - nevekiovy processes about witches. M, 1990; M.A. Orlov. And storiya sno- 
Highway <** y the person with a devil. M, 1991, etc. 
V.M. Boguslavsky. Scepticism of the Renaissance and Reformation.// 
Culture of Renaissance and Reformation. L., 1981, page 22 - 23 
howl dokhristian sky, pagan tradition, mainly, in the field of ideas of the good and evil, otcha-st zn akharstvo, etc., and some representations, it is reproached eaten thanks to vliyan iyu to N and zhn oh, hristi-ansky tradition. P osledny generally mention the moments defining f un ktsion irovan iye demoniche-with to about y with t r uk t Ur y (r about l B about e with t in e N of N about about p r about and z in about l e N and I, strength of demons, a devil, witches, etc. - all these pozi-tion are taken from area scientific Christian demono-to a logiya). Highway estn the adtsaty century really became that century, N and which the splash in national interest to demonic when "the N y to zhi z-by a social and political crisis, disintegration traditsion in N ykh public relations and moral principles is called had, rapid growth irratsion an alizm found the you - Russian iye in a demonomaniye of masses" *. P erelomny time always induces people to address irrational mu as they do not see an exit in a possibility of use of their means which are available for N of itsial-ache secular, or klerikaln oh ideologies. And here, to and to p r and in and l oh, in with e a gda in with t and e t in about p r about with about with about about t of N about highway e N and and a medieval and new, humanistic element in formation of demonology and development demonoma-N of AI. And investigators, izuchayushch iye Renaissance and izn achaln about convinced of its progressiveness on srav-to a neniye with the Middle Ages, usually prove that the Renaissance is not guilty in hunting of N and witches and that the demo - a nologiya is not a product Renaissance svobodo-a mysliya"", but is one of results of crisis of the Middle Ages, whose existence chronologists - chesk coincided with the beginning of a new stage in development of cultural, culture of the Renaissance ***. However, prini-May this thesis, it is hardly possible to be content with it to and to un and in e r with and l N y m about Kommersant I with N e N and e m. 
D e y with t in and t e l N oh, of m about N about and N of N about about in about r and t about to r and z and s e c e r to in and to and to about r and N and z and c and and (in m e N highway e y with t e p e N and about to r and z and - se its theoretical ideology), about a contradiction of its practical activities to Christian moral values, however in itself to rizis, religious 


A.H. Gorfunkel. "A hammer of witches" - the Middle Ages of a .ila of Vozrozh-a deniye? / / To an ultur of the Renaissance and society. M, 1986. page 169. 
** In the same place, lake 162, 170. 
*** In the same place, page 165. 
wars, etc. * can hardly be p ri vya Zahn y only to	to the Middle Ages. To rizis in church body of an ization 
the N of an acha of N aya since the 10th century, and all efforts to Leung Iyqiev, Grigory VII, And N of N ok en Tia I I I - l and to r and t to about in r e in m e in N of N y e p about r e z st. in t and t and m and N e p e r e about r about l and negative (from the point of view of Christian doctrines z) trends in this area is observed perman en by ton oh. However for all that that witchcraft, magicians I, highways abash were known to all general stvo, I vlen and y, similar to a demonomaniya of XVI-XVII ve-k, equally and so extensive antivedovsky literatu-ry, was not. And it when the belief in razl chn ykh representatives of evil spirit was if is not deeper, then is more organic, than in Renaissance. Otsutst-in about in and l and t and p with and ho l about and h e with to and I and t of m about with f e r and, to about t about r and I p about z in about - poured tserk vi and to the state, and also parts of society to issue accurate ideological (demonology) and practical (vedovsky processes) the system of fight against these I vlen and I mi. Conditions, podtolkn uvshy oprede-lenny (by the way, not so and big) a part of the people in embraces of a devil, were created thanks to efforts and the most Catholic tserk vi, and to influence ideolo-Giya Vozrozhdeniya, and participation in it of some deyate-leu P ef ormation whose religiozn aya the intolerance horo-sho is known. The role social economic and polity-chesky f actors is also enormous here. People, Zahn and - mavshiyesya vedovsky p cancer ti to oh were probably not satisfied what the alny church in the field of spiritual needs could provide to them ofitsi-; equally they were not content and with the Renaissance ideology and culture which on the whole was alien to them not only because carried, glavn ym in the way, the city - sky harak rubbed and, most likely, was it simply not - is known **, but also because Renaissance anthropo - destroy centrism in a root is scarlet privychn uyu for people of the Middle Ages the system of world order, disproving the main is put by iya all them mirosozertsa-ny. N esmotrya on the fact that these people instead of God put a Satan and all ceremonialism of satanic rites and a sabbath yavlya- 

, * In the same place, page 169. 
It is unlikely after all it is possible to agree entirely go the following Statement of S.M. Stam: "Renaissance humanity. was ideology 
Early bourgeois, that is anti-feudal, and it means - national", 1 
/ ^там S M. Humanity and church reformational ideology / zyxwvutsrqp 
Culture of Renaissance and Reformation. L., 1981. page 35. 
las peculiar zerk aln ym it is reflected iy, the parody, about t r and c and N and e m, those m of N e m e N e e, p e r e in about r and h and in and the N and I with and about those m y upside down did not occur - the person remained in the subordinated situation in ramk ah systems, vozglav-lyaemy only not B an ogham, and a Satan. People, zn joint stock company omy with ideology guman a-ism (the speech here dolzhn and to go, to - N e h N about e, about about r about and N and x) and with about z N and t e l N about and N and l and z and r about in and in - their highway it vozmozhn ye consequences, oshch ushch avsh and x N and myself all its vl I am a N and e, especially, if on mentality they wasps - tavatsya by people of the Middle Ages, could not satisfy transfer of the prices a Torah of all system is visible iya the world from B of RSA on the person. So to Arti N aln aya ref an ormation of bases mi-r about p about N and m and N and I am a N e and z e N about in y and in and l and h e l about in e to and and z m about - a rolled psychological track as in rezulta-those to it became N eyasn ymiy including many moral imperatives, which it rukovodstvoval-sya earlier and which in privychn oh to it a medieval system were everything uvya Zahn y with B an ogham. "In the fight for secular human culture" * (as if wounds to a sha it were not human), during which deystvi-telno occurred historically pozitivn y shift in the field of N auk about the person, especially natural, ide-alogians guman and a zma made this, at first sight, N ezametn y transfer of joint stock company of the prices of t, imevsh y far I go - shchy consequences. If before on AI a table is lingering - tiya human life decided harmonious, teolo- and h e with to and r and z r and about t and N of N about y with and about those m about y, on t e r by N e m to about that r about y with l at and l about B about e with t in e N of N about e N and h and l oh, that t e p e r e t about t with t e r - e N ub and r and l with I, and c e N of t r and l N about e m e about that z and N and m and l of the h e l about in e to. Haraktern oh, odn Acre that the ideology of the Renaissance could not offer society uniform, otvechav-Shuya to interests and inquiries of everything, the moral system of values; very quickly this ideology approached already the human crisis, the N who found vyrazhe-n and e, v h and with t of N about with t and, in t in about r h e with t in e to U.Sh e to with p and r and, M.S e r in and N - Teso, B.P ask Alya. P ri N of c and p An tropotsen a trizm, razru-highway aya all traditsion the N uyu a system mirovozzren iya, ob-ektivno promoted release of all cheloveche-sky potency irrespective of them harak a Terra though, without - it is conditional, in the track Tats theorists guman a-ism appealed to luchsh to it in the person, at the same time trying to create also the known system moral regu- 

In the same place, page 30. 
lyator. However as N alichy this system and e e r and about t and with t and v and l and s c e l and to about m in z and v and s and m about with t about t of the h e l about in e - 
it could not work. P the stop of the last at the center pushed into the background that oprede-lyalo (let and in the theory) spiritual and moral life of medieval society - B ozhestvenny. The N yn e is a B ozhestvenny spiritual would be put into dependence from and about l about gi h e with to about go about r and N and z in m and, h e in l about in e to and, h t about p r I am m about p r about t and - vorechit to christian teaching. Here it is possible even to speak about the known f the Renaissance ormalizm, i.e. about its address owing to action of it f the actor to outer side it is shown iya at his An by Alize and raskry-Tia, more precisely, to manifestation to joint stock company to that even if it also is result internal, sincere p r about c of the EU with and. And m e N of N about e t and m, n and N and highway in z of l I d, about Kommersant I with N I e t with I partly the interest of revivalists in all vnesh-to them, f to izichesky manifestations zhi zn and and activity of the h e l about in e to and and and N and l and z and r and about that with e t and h e with k and m and p about N I am t and I am m and in the annex to the person abstract, not concrete - to Nome. That is why it seems to us possible to say that the similar outlook which was not leaving me-hundred to the lyator standing out of and above the person moral regu-, a moral psychological support and, it is rather yes - its consequences, psychological conditions, that zhi-the teysky atmosphere that it was created as a result of times - twisting of society and impact of Cart-birth ideology on it, in own way promoted N an epriyatiya, narya-du with of itsialno-church, and these views, for - stavly to address the world of powers of darkness. Though, konech-but, action of it f the actor does not follow preuvelichi-in and t. 
Speaking about the place of Catholic church in business sozda-a niya it is also studied iya a demonic pantheon, and also fight against N by it, it is necessary to notice that it ideo-to logs prin is adlezhit by the leading role in creation of the system of demonic forces. If to look at that, to joint stock company with them lines national demonology zhi-allocates tel of the other world, to Arti N and this, on the one hand, will not be new and traditional, and with another - is surprisingly poor vizualn ymiy images and is poorly developed (especially in England). It is possible sk the Azat that the Church itself partly is a creator of that siste-we against which fought. P odavlyayushchy pain - the shinstvo of demonological treatises belongs 
pe 
R At church authors that is quite justified also 
because since XI I I centuries sorcery gradually nachi-aches to be treated to joint stock company religious crime and consequently, the church reads out the duty bo-rotsya from N and m of N about only in the 16th century in works tserkov-the N ykh writers appears in details painted hierarchy of demonic legions and their leaders (see N an aprimer the composition And ogan N and Weier "About the pseudo-monarchy of demons"), only then appear podrob-ny and colourful is described iya by highway abash and (M. Delrio, P. de Lang to p). A question of why the church so revno-stno addressed fight against witchcraft and magic of names - N about in e that in r e m I, about the h e N with l about e N Z and N about with I N and with t r and N and c y the compositions I rk and e to Arti N y activity angrily - mean demons, explaining them with intrigues everything, nachi-to N aya from radik the ulit and to it tea stikhiyn ymiy disasters, to and t about l and h e with k and e and p r about t e with t and N of t with to and e p and with and t e l and m e in N highway e in with e-go, N and N ash a look, also m e N of N about in e t about y about l and with t and i and m e N of N of t and to both m and means against humanistic outlook would think of need of N apryamy about r about t with I. Authors of many the track of Tats, creating them, whether often ime-in view of more public peace and an order in the state, than direct polemic with but - sitel of new ideology. P aradoksalno, but the fact - opposing at the same time and traditional the people - ny beliefs and customs, these writers kept in the is produced iya numerous folklore m about t and in y, with in I z and N of N y e with t e in m of N y m and s and l and m and, with y r and in t e in m with and - my a positive role in maintaining cultures - an inheritance leg. However abundance of similar compositions go in about r and t, k about N e h N about e, and about t about m, h t about with and m and c e r to about in in l and - tse some representatives tried to answer so them in the way with N and the questions raised before it the crisis situation which developed in society. Sde-lat it so, to joint stock company she wanted, it did not turn out; objyas-thread all failures and failures, proceeding only from tra-ditsionny a game of a tseption of the good and evil, it was not possible any more therefore the demonic subject to the middle of the 17th century an ear - dit in political and cultural zhi zn and most the European states of N and zadn y the plan. 
And nteresno and the relation of figures of Vozrozhde-of N iya to a witchcraft problem. It was most razn ym - from p ri I ti I (with izvestn ymiy reservations) to provozglashe-N iya it I vlen and I an invention ignorant and pre-stupny tserkovn ik. At the same time, some izvest-ny figures of humanistic culture gave Solid - 

8
ny it is given to a question of fight against sorcery. Here it is possible to call names and and N and B of Aden which published in 1580 "Demonomaniya of witches", the English king James I with his "Demonology" (the truth nearly at zhi zn and on - invited "the most educated fool"). Spraved-livo doubting in razlichn ykh to it to retn ykh the moments magical p cancer ti to and (flights to highway abash), all of them - trusted in kozn and a devil and it deya to N and I. 




P redlagayemy us to N and hectare aims before at everything - go pozn joint stock company to omit the reader from a darkness the track of a tatami which N and and about l e e p about l of N about and about r and g and n and l N about r and with to r y in and yu t of of l and in N y e plots and p it I ti I demonology of the XVI-XVII centuries, and not in her "scientist" varian those, but more likely in on - native, to be exact - to joint stock company were perceived the ideas coldov-stvo in razl chn ykh social groups of euro of that time - peysky society. And Menno therefore here not vklyuche-ny the translations of texts and x classical demonologi-chesky the track of Tats, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, "M an uraveynik" And an oganna of N Itera or the mentioned composition And ogan N and Weier. P redstavlenny the track Tats, dialogues, pamfle-you, letters give the chance to recreate to artin at on - N iman iya an image of the witch, a devil, B of RSA, demons, An - gel (with rare exception) at average, national level. It is promoted also by social composition of authors of these works - from the monk and svya-shch en to N and to and to the professional writer. H and concealing these compositions, it is possible to track easily dynes amik at treason - ny uk an adhan of N y x pon yat - from p ri zn An and I guilts of witches, their equalities with demons (And oann Trittemy) to otritsan iya their joint stock company tivn oh roles (J. Gifford) and full of N e in and N of N about with t and (F. f about N of Highway p e e, S.S and r and N about B e r e r and j), about t of categorical condemnation of one and all - monichesky forces to sympathetically positive otno-a sheniye to inkuba and succubuses (L. - M. Sinistrari). Ha - r and to t e r N oh, of h t about and z m e N e N and e p about z and ts and y with about in r e m e the N of N and to about in p ro - proceeds, glavn ym in the way, in the same environment, church that once again speaks about complexity of a task and impossibility of removal of categorical judgments on the matter. P ok azateln oh, that already to N of an achal of the 17th century in a number of the countries there is peculiar time - maintaining pon yat "witch" and "devil" when the world of subjects - 

9
ny forces it is investigated in a separation from p cancer ti to uyushch and x ve-a dovstvo. As a result, a diet an alistichesky 17th century f a joint stock company-tichesk Zac Ryvayet to vedovst-vu and demonology in the European N auchn ykh circles uga-sat this problem, and interest. So proceeded till 1830 when appeared "P an isma about sorcery" Walter Scott, laid the foundation for a new era in AI of this cultural istori-e with to about go I in l e in N and I is studied h. 

M L. Timofeev 
PART ONE 
"All earth 
it is full of demons... 
To * pr.t 1.14 KYUVICH 
, ovich 
! fiv of the H 
> r And gorevich 
Highway and D S VI of the H 
> with! si 1eich rorn h ') r with in and h 
i. i p) V P of H ii, i £ And Ch 


M AND N ABOUT VEE 1 
SHOUT H ABOUT T ^ P P AND H 


LU H of DrchVI of the H 
and M L I Yu VEE of the H 
about vi h 
"YUVI OF THE H 
ikgorovich 
f I S About VEE of the H 
Wa 1eryevich adsvich cheevn h \. 1skseevich about r about vi h 
Ioann Trittemy 
THE TRACK THE TAT ABOUT SILLY WOMEN OF N Y X LIU DIAKH 
AND ABOUT TO OLDUN AH 
Ioann Trittemiya, 
head of abbey Saint Yakov 
at Gvrbipol, is once eye of the abbot shpangeimsky 
the treatise about wicked men 
and about sorcerers 

(The III question to Maximilian I, 
to the emperor Roman) 
Question pervyy1: zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJ why angry people, bad and silly women - 
ny in relation to belief, to joint stock company of an ova that wives shch and N y, koto-ry we in a popular speech call witches, can pove-levat spiteful spirits when people good and re-vnostneyshy adherents of Christian belief not mo-gutnut neither kind spirits to operate, nor eternally angry? 
P to a rezhda with what to answer this question, I will tell so: 
about all deya and I x divine greatness am observed by N in
the invariable harmony of a sort and order of beauty, and this nekolebimost is reached corresponding raspolozhe-niy all steps and gradation. And bo without I correspond - a shchy order nothing stays in this world. P ri such order free will 2, which the Creator all - 
chesky gave to people, not isp3ytyvayet oppressions from - 
hundred-bones of the power to which let will remain less in 
that order which was apprehended from the master of the creations by the first person. That is why N ik that from kind decent smertn ykh, guided sobstven-ny zhelan iy, is equal also to N ikto from angry people, ostav-lenny N and an arbitrariness of destiny only because of them ho-a teniye, thanks to the Lord merciful is not a sinner. P in an odobny way we are excited just zhelan iy and kind spirits if podtver-zhday the works the pious faith in Christ which we carry in the heart. That is similar - mu, to joint stock company the following to good will makes good people equal on spirit to angels, and the perversity of angry people does them by similar to demons. That is why plo-the hy and spoiled people, than .portitsya more because of sob-stvenny spiteful zhelan and I, especially become on mood similar to angry demons. In turn, close friendship results from similarity simpa-tiya, and gradually results from it also mutual dove-ry. And z trust of the lowest to the highest the power, or N astoyashch aya, or feigned f alshivy is born. And so, at vicious people whose power seems to the similar power of demons it is result of them neoby- 
tea perversity. To an ogd ikh4 aspirations begin on - 
in a dobny way and sk to azhatsya, they or reject, whether - 
bo overcome the insidiousness of demons which is found them, or there are and mi, to joint stock company also they. Because - Mona among themselves are not equal slyness or Mind at all, but other in comparison with another much prevoskho-dit it cunning, speed a mouse a flax iya and nepraved- 

15 
nost of the passions. So, for example, those from their N, to - t about r y e p about t r I with and yu t about with N about in y z e m of l and, about l highway e with in I z and N y with e e the top areas also inhabit they caves and grottoes; others in comparison with them are much weaker, and it comes down that they are afraid of swords, rods and threats is frightening their their people. Concerning them it is possible for du - mother that it to joint stock company of times those demons whom we call energumena. Demons, N akhodyashchiyesya in bigger from - daleniya from the earth and thinner by the nature, face people less often. In turn, wicked men because of the tendency make affairs, the most half of ny debauchery, becoming at the same time extraordinary pokho5zhi- 
mi on demons who grant them the friendship. In 
communications with it, they become extraordinary impudent and accept top of demons whose similarity of the power they use, however not real, violent, but false. And bo demons constantly support time of the people subordinated to themselves in a condition of perversity, at - tvoryayas at the same time that their dominion is shaken, and they willingly submit to them, as if on kind in le with to l about N I I with to p about in and N about in e N and yu 6. And oh, p about and with t and N e, n and k the t about will not tower the power vysh e demons, besides a forehead - a century which belief in domination And Christ's isusa of B of RSA of ours becomes dolzhn ym image pleasant to B of regional public institution because so about truly believing in the Lord And an isus govo-rit 7P an ison iye: "And it gave them the power over all of the demon - 
m and". P to oety also similar operate demons it 
bad people whom friendship and communications with them do by slaves and a subrank en to N ymiy. So if who - nibud from ra-the b which are given rise in grya zi for a long time towers (that happens quite often) and, being connected by friendship, privle-repents to management, without objections receiving everything that is required further to approve the domination, at least and equal royal, then near it people bad and rejected, consisting in friendship with demons, obna-ruzhivat more impudent shamelessness and imitate them; I do not speak about those manifestations of the power which they show thanks to similarity bad ha - a rakter. P oety they also receive everything that they will demand from demons, in all meeting the N ykh is confused or, on the contrary, a matter of course except that there is forbidden by divine resolution - it they cannot find. However not everywhere the rejected and wicked men gather; do are those, with koto-an eye demons sign what - nibud the contract, and 
witches over whom also ustan the Devil avlivat the protection and those which communicate with demons and received in the people of N azvan iye necromancers. 
There are two types of people who are allowed for operating 
demons. 
First, are those which, thanking the sacred sta before the favourite Lord, prin the yawl from N his power to trample down the head of an ancient dragon, to joint stock company ovy in pervonachal-ache churches was it is given and to apostles, his followers, and also Wuchang and to am about which in the sacred Gospel State - pod says: "In 8 mya mine demons is rejected also to joint stock company 
z m to it at N and h t about and yu t". 
The second look consists of people to whom for the sake of on - a row in C of an erkva of B the ozhiya granted the right izgon yat of demons from bodies of people. And this action of attendants of exorcists happens in C erk vi B an ozhiya according to the order svya-shch en N and to and. 
Besides, there are two kinds of people, zhelayushch povele-to vat them demons who find it, Zac lyuchy the forbidden and harmful contracts with in N and mi. 
P the ervy most harmful family of these people consists of witches who enter with demons the agreement, solemnly declaring that they voluntarily from - are given them in property and arrive on constant service. To joint stock company oh this most harmful sort lyu-Tay can create degrees zlodeyan iya, any person, zhi vushch and y, about N aimudreysh y Caesar, in your empire will not be able to describe. And bo denying B of RSA to joint stock company a source of everything, both Christ's belief, and sacred he is baptized iye, they offer the mind and a body to demons, bringing into the yaniye upset sosto-the sorcery of people and the cattle, p ri chi N I I harm and even killing with it them. N et such disease which (with a permission of B ozhy) they cannot send N and people, so to joint stock company he and, observing articles aforesaid dogo-the thief, expose themselves servants of demons and do anything, wishing to be compared only to N them. P oety they are also not stood anywhere, but more likely everywhere they are driven by B an ogham, the creator of all real which orders the following: "e permit N to witches zhi t" 9. Whether some of them magical Zac N of An and I am m and call demons, Others attract them with entreaties and zhertvoprinosheni-to a hole, other cause them to the aid of the neche-a stiya by means of uzhasn ykh Dejan Iyy and ceremonies. Sle-dovatelno, it is not surprising that witches seem vla-stvuyushchy over demons with whom they became skho- 

17 
zhi a will ungodliness it is also uniform odushn ym vza mn ym obrashche-niy to bad in the human race. 
The second family of vicious people, zhelayushch and x to rule over demons, it t0e which we in a popular speech of N azyvay 
N e to r about m and N of t and m and 1. About N and go in about r I am t, h that with p about m about shch yu r and z N about about 
whether sorts Zac of N of An and y they can convoke demons in a circle, find them in a crystal or the corked vessel and to do them visible. These most harmful people, half of ny falsity and superstitions, make and e bad - la, to joint stock company and x the kind person will not be able to himself even voob-r and z and t. 
To attract to itself N and service of demons, they is-use, glavn ym in the way, the most outrageous zhertvop r and N about highway e n and ya and s about in e r highway e N of N about about t to r y t about z and to l yu h and yu t about N and m and the contract. They extend a set of a razla chn ykh mean to N and zhechek, poln ykh an ungodliness and a lie, with is entered - N ymiy in a deceptive way of names of Amy ancient filo-sof and Wuchang there ykh, distributing which, they enter in for - a bluzhdeniye of many careless and curious lyu-Tay, carrying away them in the zapadn yu. They would promise them nevero-I t of N y e N e y l and c y, a l mustache y highway and in to about t about r y e, l yu d and about m and N of N y m and become dependent in the way on their N. 
By means of rings, pendants, images whether zagovo-a ditch and Zac of N of An and y they, according to them, can he is clever sh to ityit angry demons and to squeeze them in a circle, in a crystal or another to joint stock company oye a receptacle, and those N and all questions will give them separate answers. All of them promise it, however ash e time will be in N a little people to whom uk an adhan of N y m will obey in the way bad and spiteful spirits because State - pod the fair decision does not permit that - inquisitive and inclined to new people preneb-regalia Christ's belief and if necessary stremi-foxes to receive the answer at demons. Nevertheless, to whom povinu-evil spirits yutsyatsya whether the N ye Zac is called by N of An and I am m and nekroman-t, without hesitating, accomplices of N and principles of the signed contract pass to them to joint stock company. The rest, koto-ry the obvious majority, evil spirits refuse on - to vinovatsya though those and were not afraid all this time Zahn and - to matsya by godless art of N ekroman comrade. And therefore in N ash and days of N achin at strongly to extend razn ye burden, and at many the love grows cold, and slish to ohm these proud and extraordinary false people amplify; and how many they would not be despised by demons for the early views, they manage to enter in zabluzhde-ny many firm people in belief. P over to me, Caesar, 

1 8 
that these of a lie to the Vyya people, zhi vushch and e in your sacred empire, an essence the most spiteful; they are that deep source from which appear but - the Vyya witches and the sorcerer y. They promise a lot of things and all of you - dumyvat. Because everything that them on them to N a yoke is promised, a lie essence to the Vyya vydumk and, and nothing they show I believe - shchy, except crimes, cunning and extraordinary is-kusny deception. To an ogd to it azhtsya that they op-in a redelenny way it is connected y with demons, by all hundred - it novitsya clearly that from participation in their affairs is necessary to joint stock company it is possible to run rather as if from terrible most terrible torments. And bo the N and Dejan Iya of these necromancers in mno-a zhestvo run together demons and to support them in on - a chat artful business, they if can, vow them. Whether to an ogd they are caused by means of Zack by N of An and y, they reject any comparison with people, however despite this abduct minds vyzyvayushch them them. 
There is also a N of EC and y a kind of people as silly, so and full of prejudices - I mean those which, without wishing to have the intercourses with demons, pol-zutsya, nevertheless, in the affairs razlichn ymiy fal-by highway the ivy receptions peculiar to demons, and absolutely unlawful. Because they believe that in the objects used by them it is concluded and conducted - Kaya and melt N aya force, and for the sake of it they make time - personal awful Dejan Iya against Christ's belief. P about - the truth, will lack time to estimate everything them be-zumstvo which they pursue us. 
eobkhodimo also in brief to tell N also about why kind and fair people do not try to obtain the power over demons. To joint stock company and m in the way similarity of bents of business - et bad and impious people ravn ymiy to demons, that is Kim in the way dissimilarity of bents at all from - talkivat from N their kind and fair. Between people on ustremle-to niya not mozheg to be not similar and opposite the N and to joint stock company oh of friendship, but is constant in about z N and to and e t r e z to about e p r about t and in about with t about I n and e and n e N and in and with t. The t and m e where there is no N ik joint stock company oho of similarity zhelan and y, is not present also close svya-zi; there can be no trust in the relation the friend 
to
  To the friend, mutual inclination by production che- 
go- or wonderful. Also and you, nice Caesar, I will be - chi a great governor, you bring closer to yourself that - or Friendly, but you resist absolutely protivopolozh-to Nome in your N to rava and other than your zhelan and I. °avno people kind and just, it is constant soprotiv- 
lyayushchiyesya to the most vicious zhelan iyu demons, not mogug to enter with N them into alliance as do not want and not with - Zahn N ymiy glashatsya to be svya, but in every way them from - run and refuse similar meetings. Here poche-mu that is false mn en iye on which say that demons just a subrank yatsya their authorities. Because communication if it is not preceded by similarity zhela-N and y cannot be strong; there cannot be consent between opposite styam; there cannot be a friendship between N epokhozhy. Aude - N of Acre demons will obey not all wicked and damned men, but, on krayn it a measure, that with whom they posredst-vy contracts and agreements unite in the union and to - tory they can consider not in to an acha, to joint stock company of the true. Having heard that they are called, they voluntarily hurry N and I will meet; odn Acre at atom they say that they to it prin are uzhdat. And so, there is nothing surprise - telny, the most excellent Caesar that the bad, evil and spoiled spirits sometimes, to joint stock company tell, povi-nutsya to people who, to joint stock company we sk an azalea, are brought together with them by unfavourable disposition and usual human rage. The N about anything of Christians in at cannot wish to be operated demons, leaning N and similarity in bad deya of N and I x. P oety if who in this zhi zn also wished to have in Kacha - a stvo of companions of harmful spirits, then in the future he bu-is put together with N them to burn in an infernal plamen and. N about so to joint stock company fair people cannot operate sacred An of a gelama of B of an ozhya mi, they of own will assimilate to them. And so, I think that, leaning on sk an adhan - Nov vysh e, it will be easy to answer N and questions if we remember about razl chi I x in representations of these people. Because no matter how there was much in C of an erkva of B ozhy resist - chivy people in belief whose piety much on - rescue can find, nevertheless, even there are today those which seek to receive from angels nagra-du, giving as the basis either sanctity, or that they are afraid of demons, or the close unification. P roiskhodit that N yn esh and e people do not manage N - because of sanctity - spiteful spirits and not zaslu-zhivat friendship of sacred angels. If who stremit-sya to yuy that gives the chance sover-to highway to at miracles in C erk vi, to joint stock company once did sanctity degrees Saints, then they can become more powerful and operate demons, and also have friendly participation he is blissful - ny spirits. And bo it is defined that sacred and lovely B of regional public institution people in initial of C of the Christ's erkva were sil- 

20 
it, promoting ustan ovlen iyu she is kind among mortal, using blessings of kind spirits, than an ungodliness of bad affairs. Whether the m can make-legged miracles pribega-yushchiya to Zack of N of An and I am m, but by means of angels of Saints any jealous admirer Gospoda of B of RSA can create similar. 
Question second: from where do witches possess with gol conducted - to about y with and l about y, h t about p about z in about l I e t and m with about in e r highway and t with t about l m of N about go different and surprising, besides at the same time what or how many any kind person could not sover-highway and t z and vs yu with in about yu and z N? 
E with l and m y p about e for l and e to m to r and t to about about t in e to t and t and N and e t in about p r about with, it is obligatory sk azhy that all power - from the Lord of B of RSA without whom and to joint stock company aya a creature of nothing to make N not 
will be able. And bo Christ speaks in sacred Evang1e1lii: 
• without M enya you will be able to make nothing" from where oche- 
it is visible that the power to do what - or is granted to any che-a loveka from the Lord of B of RSA, but not from somewhere whether bad people will make or good. And here what is told by great Augustine: "The will of B of an ozha I is the first and vyssh aya the reason of all f izichesky types and dushevn ykh dvizhe-niya, nothing else. And let the lichestvenneyshy and huge republic it will become clear to each creation in this ve-that not from secrets oh, invisible, and also umopostigayemy in y with highway e y in l and with t and and m p e r and about r and e that a mustache of t and N and in l and in and e in t with I and the l and is allowed to t, but on N eizjyasn imy justice of races - a predeleniye of N of fencings and N of joint stock company an adhan and y". That is why, about tse-zar, not dolzhn about to doubt that this power of witches through which (and with assistance of a demo - it is new) they produce uzhasn ye and N evidan N ye deya N and I is given them to resist from the Lord of B of RSA to whose will the N ikto not mo-zht and without vozdeys1tviya, which people 
even a hand twin to utnut not cm ozht 2. Draw conclusions 
Saint doctors, that neither demons, nor witches will be able though that - in general to make - whether to the person to do much harm whether to an animal - if the Almighty B og will not wish, will not agree and will not provide them the power to make that they durn ym zhelan iy the already decided sde-lat. If the B og does not wish and will not agree, then the °dna a creature will be able to make nothing; in an opposite slu-of the h and e, e with l and y y l about in about z m about N about t oh, h e go about N of N e e l and l and with what not soglash it would atsya, from this with need 
Settlement 
edut that the B og is powerless and cannot forbid that 
Becomes in spite of himself. N about so to joint stock company to azhdy a forehead - a century, being tvarn ym, it depends on B of RSA, nothing not 
also I thanks to which it and * does that - or, and can carry out the desirable can do without it zhelan. And so, everything that is done by witches, occurs with pozvole-N iya B ozhy without which will they can do nothing; because if the B og will not agree to make that they want, then and m, it will be allowed to demons because all power proceeds from the Lord of B of RSA under whom all real stvut and lives because It - the prime causes and all things, and from his N we prin imay free will, from his N also of m y m about e m p about l uch and t t oh, of h t about x about t and m; N about m of N about and e l yu d also consider that they not human art make 
they those the villain of N iya which make, but at sodeyst1 - 3 
the Viy of demons whom He made tone to them on p ri a sort 
and after long experiments for production mimoletn ykh miracles. N e are called udiviteln ye f f ekta, about - exhausted by witches, what they use at sorcery? These are the heads of the dead, toads, snakes, time - lichn ye metals, f igurka and so forth. The N about prois-goes it from created these zn joint stock company and the Devil who, having been filled with pride, aspires at least on vi-dimost sravn yatsya with B an ogham. And it is valid, to and to All - the able B og established in C of the erkva certain tainst-va, to joint stock company ovy dolzhn ym in the way with support prislu-zhi vayushch and x uk azyvat N and rescue and lead to advantage and N and the benefit of people, and the Devil who does not wish bo-l e e, to and to y t with about h t e N of N y m r and in N y m of B about at, about e in r about to and to a certain stvo of secrets established t in which he helps it you - zvan N y, or svya Zahn of N y with it contracts the worker and if the B og allows, then he creates the evil about which about - with and l; e with l and e the N e p about z in about l and t, about N, in about shch e m, n and ch e about N e will be able to make. Because the creator of all acts of witches and nekro-manti - the Devil who through tendencies of the on - central parts, is chosen as N ykh it earlier carries out in podvlast-ny to it matter zhelan in N oye Dejan Iye, sometimes real, sometimes only to azhushch eesya. The witches who are already spoiled by the zhelan iy and f the act of partnership Second World War-lek atsya through soglashen iye in the contract with Amy's demon, and 
poluchayut1 4 from N of their N what zn joint stock company and and symbolical 
about tm etk and. And x zashch and ton and to am and demons soon and predsta- 
yut. There is no N ichy in these harmful actions of demons stronger, than thoughtless trustfulness of witches which is multiplied by the contract and a solemn promise because however more demon of Amy, or them zn am and they will be seduced by joint stock company in their belief, that those will achieve bigger influence this cooperation. With Lish a lump zlostn aya 


22 

the perversity nastr1oyeniya witches plunges them nekoto- 
eye in the way in gn e in 5, so demons, gathering, sra- 
storages take control of their mind and bring closer to themselves, and, on - falling N and their N, mark if the B og permits that, their signs and sign contracts with them. P in an odobny way and P Lawton in the book "About Poetic Madness" said: "In the same way wives shch and N y-vak the khan to and, not zdra- 
to the Vyya mind, drink honey and milk from the rivers; zdor1ovye 
it is not able to be drunk". Lish ivsh is shower and 6, pokhi- 
shchenny the demon, and with the assistance of the last they a way - 
ny to bad business. We for certain know that ve7dmy 
sometimes drink in fast streams an animal of m aslo 1, to - 
tory the N and to joint stock company differently cannot appear there, to joint stock company only by means of demons. P in an odobny way if who - or draws N and himself hatred, whether the person, a horse, they just are eager for their death, without thinking of anything, but only about mshch en AI, take then privychn ye and izvest-ny to them for sorcery of a thing, call demons, - monstriruya at once established by them zn to joint stock company and and from - fermentations and if they that - because of absence sobstven-ache bravery cannot make then they to a trace - yut for and h1 8 rasporyazhen iya. Others which did not obey to demons and did not sign the contract with them Even if they also know suitable means for a stake - Dovstva, it is equal also a way of a deystvovaniye no matter how these zn showed joint stock company and, seldom nevertheless try to obtain uspe- 

23 
ha. P to atom no that among them zn the joint stock company of omy demons has - sya. And bo extraordinary N the administrator of N y the Devil with C erkovyyu Christ's aspires sravn yatsya, but, N ep ri to aya N, it cannot un ichtozhit the Christ's Body, to joint stock company and e znachi-telny words magic Zac of N of An and y it proizno-forces; and the demon will seldom meet such person, to - tory itself could ityit a subrank with the help to - go in about r and whether ho I p r and e in t about m and ch and t and yu in t with I r and z in l and h N y e with and l in N y e Zac N of An and I and are shown by t razn ye zn to joint stock company and and from - brazhen iya. And bo if he also meets people, is located - N ykh to it, but not Zac Lyuchavsh and x with it the contract, then it 
not 1obladayet and mi Amy's sorcerer on the rights sobstvenni- 
to and 9. He is the one who by means of impious arts 
convokes, using awful plots, demons in a round dish, in a mirror or in what - nibud other receptacle, but ik joint stock company oho the effect does not follow N therefore h t about l and about about N p r about t and in about with t about and t in l and with t and B about a, l and b about e D I in about l despise this inquisitive person who did not bring to it to la of a tva. And bo three things are necessary for sorcery without what also its implementation cannot take place: spiteful and vedminsky zhelan and I mi spoiled a shower and, near - which cooperation with the Devil, but first of all - bo-zhestvenny razresh en iye. And if one of these conditions does not coincide with others, then sorcery cannot take place. And bo if the B og does not allow, neither the Devil, nor the witch will be able to make that. And if the Devil does not move towards zhelan and I mi bad zh0en shch and N y, then she to N ika- 
whom sorcery not p swarms zvedet2. And N aprotiv, if bu- 
is put to be absent the witch, the devil will not make N ik and - whom sorcery. The devil uses bent of the violent witch as if the skillful tool for action without which it cannot the reasons ityit the evils. And to joint stock company the demons differ on force and refinement of tricks, and witches are allocated with force not identical, but to azhdy in own way; so demons meet big or exchanges sh to them difference in the nature. Because their childbirth and raz2lichayutsya they is numerous between 
myself on defined a step en I am m 1, to the nature of their month - 
tozhitelstvo, that is those places, where P ovelitel - whether N izvergn uta padsh iye gela An. 
P the ervy family of demons of N azyvatsya "ogn en by N ym" 22. They rush near vyssh their layers of air and to Judgment guo dn I N of an ikogd will not go down N the Izh, but constantly pre-will be in sublunary space. They have no nickname - whom the intercourse with zhi vushch and mi on the earth people. About - 

24 
the monk, zhi vushch and x near the moon y, Saint Augustine svide-telstvut in the work "About Christian Struggle" with d e I blow shch and m about brazo m: "the demon y N e Ob melt N and N to an eba where an essence the sun and stars, but all of them rotate in under - lunar areas". It about their N, to joint stock company I consider, Apulya told that this demonic movement is the movement of fiery beings because also Aristotle utverzh-gave that in the N ykh furnaces often is heated beings who all the age of Provo - dit on fire because on fire they are born see restless small zhi to the Vyya and on fire die, and to the place from where they occur, is-chezy, come back. They have no N ik joint stock company oho of the message with the sorcerer of a yama because if they are late on fire, then, on the reasons e the subtlety, they cannot make the body tangible or create it from sgu-shchenny air. 
The second family of demons of N azyvatsya "vozdushn ym". They, wandering on the sky, live already closer. If some can go down N the Izh, then, having created themselves those - the Leningrad Region from more condensed air, they sometimes are visible to people. H asto, with a permission of B of an ozha I, they privodya2t in nervousness air, excite thunders and not - 
weathers 3, and everything together unites on destruction 
the human race, moving property inclined sty passions human. They are allocated with great pride and envy, create continuously waves en iya; their bodies pok are dug than - that firm, and N akhoditsya they not in one place, and not one all of them have the form, but mno-gy of them often change, according to mnogoob-r az and I eat with about with t about I of N also I. About N and in y z y in and yu t with I z and to l and N and N and I am m and witches and are excited to confusion and the evil. And in general, they have temper cruel and rough, are stout is distraught iya, that is why they zamysh la yut a great number of N eozhidan ykh intrigues and when they make the N apaden iya, odes - seek to make to N it vtayn e, and others of the reasons yat violence openly. B lagodarya to cooperation with these demons, witches are so strong for sorcery as far as they can follow the main thing uchastni-a lump from them soobshchestva4. In zhi ti and sacred An tone iya my God - 
stvenny Af of An Asya y 2 said that air is full of a demo - 
us about what broadcast earlier and M of erkuriya call three times - shiya: "it is obvious that whether any part of the world of highway en and presence of demons". The Saint Amvrosi y 25 says: * the world of virtues of Saints because it ispor-is full of decorum is full". That is why and demons P Lawton and, restless 

25 
in air, in the form of the dense shining snow, also m r and with with to and z and to t about n and h are visible e to l and yu shch, e with l and those in t e e n and e and z in e with t - a leg of time will incessantly look h a continuous look in heaven of N and the sparkling sun, but I not zn ayu whether an object in air from real essence is caused, or am laid by N y the look represents f alsh ivy about - times, and not without prejudice to feelings. Nevertheless, it is easy for it to obtain the evidence from the N ykh is given it is frequent - ny experiments. 
The third family of demons we are N azyvay "terrestrial". They, in the h e m m y p about h t and N e with about m of N e in and e m with I, y l and n and z in e r of N ut y about the sky on the earth for the pregreshen iya. About their N svyateysh y the father and the Christ's martyr And gn at y ogonosets wrote B not - when in one message to zhi a tel of m of the Hilt so: "N et nothing luchsh6e, than to have the world in which unichtozhen7o 
all about ruzh e2 to joint stock company of heavenly, and terrestrial spirits" 2. 
And z these demons some stay in forests, and also in groves, arranging lovush to and okhotn ik am. Others live in Quality Departments dug p Olya x, and at night they force to wander travelers; some of them hide - sya in inaccessible places, and also in caves. Ostal-ny, less terrible and uneasy, enjoy that detain people in the dark. Also they are conducted not by one passion, but razn y mi, so to joint stock company all of them obu-razla revayema chn ymiy passions, odn Acre all of them pre-are executed by the evil. Some of N like constantly stra-highway to ityit them people is visible iya, others prefer zavle-to at slush ayushch them them predsk an adhan iya mi about the future, - bark to be surprising. N ekotory of their N act with and m diligence that people, N the Japanese yatn ym in the way brought to fury, or tormented melankho-with Leah, are frightened, upset health or umira-yu t, about with about in e r highway e N and and h e go m y h and shch e bonds of N and e m p about about p y t at. So, the Saint I oann Zlatoust in 28 the third to N a yoke "About about - 
vision, to the monk From a taga ri yu" says: "Excessive 
despondency is more harmful than any demonsky action because also the demon if in whom dominates, then dominates through un yn iye and if un ichtozhitsya un y by N and I, then and from the demon you will not tolerate N ik joint stock company oho of harm". This family of demons not - somnenno zn joint stock company of ohms to oldun yam because of changeability on - with tr about e n and ya and l e to about m y with l and ya, t and to and to about N and about l highway e l yu I t to force to shiver mn ogy, than to submit vla-what st - or wives shch and N y. And a nogda they zaderzhiva-yutsyatsya and promise mad wives shch and N am, being vyzva-N y z and to l and N and N and I am m and in z e r to and l e, about to and l e and l and k r and with t and l of l e. 

2 6 
to give them answers and if who is going to cause to them what - that evil on their way, they about it preduprezh-give. And this family of witches differs in rather much about t ostaln ykh because the fact that those send with on - moshchyo sorcery, these promise to cure. That is why the church forbids Christians access to them because svo-to them sorcery they deny a lot of things. 
The fourth family of demons is called "water", poto-mu that they, having plunged into moisture, live near the rivers and lakes, full of rage, alarms, concerns and to - varstvo. They excite storms at the seas and, immersing the ships in a water chasm, take away thereby life from many people. And these demons appropriate vi-dimy body, and they are more often are in the form of individuals of wives - a sky floor, in men's appearances meet less often because they live in crude places and, leading izne-a zhenny life, as a rule, it is very hard at - nimat images of others. That is why having in the ancient time published - on called naiads and nereids, water ни^ф faces not men's, but a female. At us nazvani-I eat with the general for water women the word "wasserfrauen" serves. Some live in places more waterless and droughty, and every time, being seen corporally to people, they turn into men. Others use lichi-us animals depending on by what passions they are captured. Sacred angels a state never change, but always are monotonously in the husband - sky appearances. And we will not be able to read anywhere that the kind spirit stays in a visible form of the woman, whether - bo what - that an animal, but always in appearances men's. And it is valid, demons are visible to a thicket at streams and istoch-nicknames in the form of women who sometimes drive a round dance, sometimes on female custom will let hair down, sometimes talk to people, teasing them razlich-in a ny way. And this family of demons is not accustomed to communicate with witches. 
P the yaty sort is called "underground". These demos - 
ny live in caves and grottoes and also in the remote Clefts. And here they - that in character an essence sa-my the worst. Most of all these demons attack those who dig out mines, extract metals and look for the treasures hidden in the earth. Wishing death to the human race, they arrange in the earth of a crack, a cart - Diymayut fire-spitting winds also loosen a basis - 
N	I buildings. Sometimes at the nights they, kind of groups soy- 

27 
dya from mountains, drive N and the field udiviteln ye and unprecedented round dances then as if ustrashas p ri to an az to joint stock company about go-that the leader, in the joint venture esh to e disappear to and to on a signal and in about z in r and shch and yu t with I in with in about and at e and shch and. P about in r e m e N and m with r e di of their N the roar zhern ov sounds; sometimes, including themselves spirits, they prin imat an appearance of people, ush edsh and x from zhi zn and. Ichy they do not want N more, than fear lyud-sky and p eyes the thane and I. The N am for certain knows that they sometimes brought N of what gawks into the potayen-ny, located in mountains of shelters and and there, I vlya I am surprised by N ym extraordinary shows e whether in roskoshn ykh zhi-shch ah appeared at N them in a deceptive way to joint stock company in the form of them zhi vushch and x N yn e friends. And z these 2 demons 
some I vlya yutsyatsya vozlezhashch and mi by N and juice of a rova shch ah 9, a cat 
r y e at p r I am t and l and in z e l m yu and l of the h N about with t h e l about in e h e with to and I, the N about about - but to people does not manage h vzya t to their N the Azat - they them skry-in and yu t, o x r and N I yu t and and N about d and p e r e N about with I t with m e with t and N and m e with t of the lake. And yesAnd yes to joint stock company and x the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N - witches usually has no this family of demons of N. 
Highway esty the family of demons of N azyvatsya "svetoboyaznen-by N y" because they extraordinary are afraid of light and nena-see it because in the afternoon they what - or obra-zy bodies to themselves cannot create, but do it a way - ny only at night. That is why demons of this sort of times - of st. and in and yu t in with at m e r to and x, N e p r about N and c and e m y e and and with about l yu t of N about mrachn ye, torn apart holodn by ymiy passions, covar - N y e, e with p about to about y N y e and r about z N y e. N about h N y m and and with and m and about N and N and - strongly hold h sluchayn ykh passersby and very much hour - that (with it is allowed iya to B of RSA) or dykhan iy the, or at - a kosnoveniye of whom - un ichtozhat that. The N about this family of demons does not meet witches whether also Zac N of An and I am m and them you - to call N elzya because they run light and voices che-l about in e h e with k and h, n about in that e in r e m I about N and r and with p about l about e N y to about in with I am Kim is shocked to iya of air and to razl chn ym zlodeyan to iya because from all others they the thinnest and sa-my reckless. N ekotory of zemn ykh demons, pre-happening N and more than a N and zk and x stupen yakh, to and to was sk an adhan oh, serve witches, but nevertheless they almost cannot make zn ach teln ykh zlodeyan y. And so, becomes ochevidn ym that all strength of witches thanks to which they sotvoryat so udiviteln ye a thing and, is given to demons ogran Ichang by N oh the Lord of B an ogham, and when It not razre-highway and t, N and h e about p r about and z about y t and N e m about e t. 
Question third: why Almighty B og, being 
fair and I vlya I s the avenger for bad postup- 

2 8 
to I, assumes that and e zlodeyan iya could sover-shatsya to the detriment of the human race at which tyazh-to 0 p adat N e that l k about r e highway of N and to and, about and m of N about gi e N show N - novny people. 
The N and this question, is recently set by N y me in prisut-with t in and and t in about e about in e in l and h e with t in a, n and k in t about N e about t in e in t and l. Vs e, h t about N also allows Almighty B og merciful and pravedn y, good and fair, he permits fairly because It is fair and the N of his severity do not have, but everything, what with - vershatsya that becomes and what is permitted, It judge fairly. P oety when we are asked why the Lord allows to be created bad, we answer that he therefore permits it that It is fair. Yes will not seem to your majesty, about Caesar that whether we prive-precede the ridiculous answer as the N ik does not give that - telny otsen ki divine justice before to it it is allowed on the most fair reshe-a niya to make angrily; that assessment DRT will be possible, 
if It does not allow in N yn esh to N I eat the world sluchitsyazyxwvutsrqponml yaur- 
to Nome. And bo if not to allow to be made bad, then the person will not be able to sin any more and will precisely be without - guilty that is not peculiar to his nature to which from the N of an achal the creator of all gave free will. That is why the person, I vlya I s a creature, but not the creator, neiz-bezhno am turned to joint stock company to good, and to the evil. 
It depends on the Highest creator of all creatures precisely of t and to e, to and to in with e z and v and s and t from with in about e y p r and ch and n y. T in about r and t e it is left to one B of regional public institution who is imperishable and eternal; He can ityit unfaithfulness as necessary any perishable which remains by kindness of the Creator until then, on - It will not allow a free course of affairs. nevoz-it is possible for it and not to the person to do so that the person on the nature of the nature was created bezgreshn ym; sob-stvenno, it is that and pleases the Creator of all, invariable go and eternal. Vsyak y time when it is said to a chetovek that he cannot sin, is denied free will, explicitly otn an opportunity to work imatsya, but the aspiration to good is confirmed. And to azhdy time when this gift is given to a creature, it does not show blessing - sya favor of the nature. Because P ison iye says that God from the N of an achal created the person and left it in a hand of the resh en iya. And bo it cannot, to joint stock company he tells din that the mortal person from the very beginning life than - that is dissatisfied, but let it have free will and not otva-zhivatsya on a sin. And bo svyateysh y head Avgu 
Steen says: "P the ervy freedom of choice was vozmozh-a nost gresh to ityit, the last will be more slavn aya - nevoz-gresh to ityit a mozhnost". And so, if the person is not able gre-to ityit highway, let him have no power over the will. P oe-however the almighty B og wished that that not - the Leningrad Region of a sin, odn It fairly allows Acre that lyu-di gresh or also made bad, because when there is a freedom of choice, the person meets with the deserts and for good deeds, and for voluntarily perfect bezob-Raziy and durn ye acts. The N ik that does not do good and does not sin contrary to the will. And so, the almighty B og fairly assumes that people to whom He from the N of an achal gave free will sinned and it is bad on - went. There are many arguments given recently svya by ty doctors concerning that, on oh of the reasons e the Almighty allows to joint stock company that so iye bad deya N iya were made with assistance of the demon. And x we one after another vk ratets will also bring. 
P the ervy argument is that superiority of B of the ozhestvenny power which only one is invariable and moreover for a long time lips - N about in l e N of N about y is shown. In with I to and I e and z m e N I e m and I am t in and r N e with r and in N and m and with N eizmen N ym the Creator. P oety in to N a yoke of Numbers sk an adhan about: "God does not deceive to joint stock company of people and the son human does not change to joint stock company". In to N a yoke of the prophet I Sayah it is told so: "God is sincere without excessive severity, spraved-Liv and is truly just"; in to N a yoke of Tobit of N it is described about: "You are fair, My God, and all your court praviln y, 
and all 0 your ways - mercy, the truth and pravosu- 
di e" 3. And in to N a yoke of the Saint I of an ov we read: "N et from 
B of RSA of an ungodliness and from Almighty N ep ravosud I" 31. And bo he returns business of each person to it and renders to everyone in compliance with his way. And bo to an azhda y who pra-vilno understands the ignorance and an infirmity, I vn ym about - at once prizn the ayah that nothing can be compared to his creator because the Lord arrives fairly, pozvo-I to the person gresh to ityit la that also his freedom of choice about - a dolzhala to exist, and superiority of great B of RSA became to the famous people. 
The second argument is that not uttered mud-r about with t about with p hey yeahhey yeah with t and N about in and t with I and z in e with t of N and with m e r t of N y m; about N and with p about - the aries iyu dobra from N ash and x bad deya-sobstvut vozn ikn N and y r and d and at m of N about e N and I in m and r e with about in e r highway e N with t in and, to about d and gr e x one in relation to another becomes prestuple-niy. And bo if It does not assume that it happened silly women - 

30 
jjo, t about to t 0 and z the N and with will understand that such good? Because creates 
and ustra Gosp od good howls, z l and He is a N e tvo r and t, n about 
it is known to It that the deeds impious occur N e besp orya dochn the lake of N and to about var a stvo lyudsk oye N e and met vl - I am a N and I am a N and p r about and z in about l e N and e B about e, n and s and m of the h e l about in e to N e m about e t to make what the B og does not allow. 
The third argument that the Almighty B og to - lets that bad affairs were created is his desire to stretch the mercy kindness on those who sinned and created pok ayan iye that nobody not smo-zht to find out if He does not allow a creature to sin. Because if will not be gresh N ik and, then the Lord will not be able to become a sozhaletel. However all of us in many respects oshibayem-with ya, i, p about with the h and t and in N at N y m with N and z about y t and, l and go y T in about r e c about the N and - ruzhivat the compassion at a meeting with the guilty person. That is why the Saint head Augustine says: "If the innocent person do not affect by diseases, the doctor not ishch ut; if the healer is not, then the disease not Zac chivatsya by An because where there is a lot of sin, there is a lot of also grace which only one separates saved from lost, connected by it from the N of an achal of creation in one weight". P oety the mercy of the Lord is the highest than his affairs. 
The fourth argument about a divine pleasure is that justice of the Creator forgive - rummages on those which sinned and did not regret because if all do good and the N ikto will not sin, then divine justice will not have those whom sle-the N of joint stock company the Azat blows. P oety let takes place spravedli-a vost and let a creature from a divine pleasure gre-a board. Because the Lord rendering to everyone on acts zhelan is fair and I am him. 
P the yaty argument is made by living conditions che-the lovechesky advantage because if God not pozvo-litas to sin to the person, then it will be even worse if okazy-^ to vat the violent pressure of N and his N rav. And bo if people and Lish en y reason, then they, however, have before themselves the free movement of the nature to which and a trace - yut; at the same time the person, most likely, rukovodst-vutsya by N of unfaithfulness of N ymiy aspirations if it, konech-but, has no free choice of will. God permits che-a loveka freely to dispose of the zhelan iy, over to about that r y of m of N e in l and with t of N y N and to about r about l i, n and k N I z I. 
Highway esty an argument - it an opportunity is deserved hva- 
to pour virtue of human constancy, that is 

31 
when we praise to what - to the person on a spr of a vedlivost because, having an opportunity to make that - he did not make it, but, the B encouraged by favor an ozhiya, it constantly keeps kindness of the zhela-a niya. 
The seventh argument of a question of why the Almighty God permits that demons made so awful affairs, is that those who are enticed prezren- 
ache also false isti2noy, it is entered into deception izobretate- 
Lem of a lie dya 3 are also overthrown by an ox deeply vn and h. Because 
it is inevitable that sorcerers, and also witches, I reject - shch and e need to follow the saving doctrine of Christ, are deceived by demons and N of joint stock company an adhan and e are fond of them in an underworld of N and eternal. They try to obtain approval of demons, enemies of all human race, and Christ Redeemer of the world to which to one they have to poklo-nyatsya, they do not respect. That is why it is fair, kog-yes the one who, on a spontaneous proizvoleniye throwing the truth, becomes the adherent of a lie, is fond of a devil of N and death. The eighth argument consists in proyav-l e N and and about e with t in e N of N about y in l and with t and, h I am m about shch and s and l and p r about with ti - the N and all tvarn y the world rummages. And bo when the Almighty B og once permitted to a devil bigger and that not pozhe-in l and l of m and l about oh, about N of N e with t and l with and m y m with and l N y m in r and go m r hey yeahhey yeah h e lovechesky and obeyed in everything divine Conducted - h and bb. And about D I in about l of N and h e about N e m about e t with about in e r highway and t with and m p about myself, but everything that it does, occur from a pleasure of about with p about d and B about and. And t and to, p e r in about p r and ch and n and in with e go, p about to about t about r about y the Almighty God permits to be made> to bad affairs - justice which izn achaln about keeps in neru-a shimy order freedom provided to everyone tva-ri. P to atom that, really, the power of any creature, zavi-syashchy from the creator, svya Zahn and is also limited; and sde-lano all this in order that the devil could not make everything that he wants and the person to be not exposed to temptation great zhelan iy. And if the will on most le is free, then force is limited certain and not - izbezhny barriers. Also, to joint stock company if demons could do everything that they will want, and the person when would not be in safety, and they would bring everything into decline. The held-down power of demons well on to and z y in and e t p r and m e r and with t about r and and with in I t about about And about in and, and to about t about r about e the Satan any more than N did not dare to fall down N though to it i; divine permission was given. And bo the N ikto presently as it is fair and was swept away by him was, not mo 

32 
zkt to resist anger of demons if they can vre-dit to the choice of people, using the power. Before, to joint stock company Holy passions were made, they much in pain - sew degrees, than subsequently, used pre-freedom brought to them, however iskupiteln aya the death of Christ crucified for us by N and a cross it it is strong p r and at m e N highway and l and. To and to With p and with and t e l about in about r and t in E in and N of e l and and: "The N Ng to N I z the world is expelled". And bo Christ's humility and resolution of Saints strongly ogran ichit impudence of demons; and therefore instigators of deeds of evil should on - be zyvat openly, the same concerns also others to them similar. D I in about l of N and in the h e m of N e a mustache and l and t with I p r about t and in N and with, e with l and t about l to about will not derive strength from N ash and x sins. P an isaniye ostere-zyvy gat us, p ri: "Resist a devil and he will escape from you". And again: "N e give places to a devil". P oety, zaversh aya the speech, sk an adhan of N uyu to explanation of the offered question - why God allows sover-to shatsya to deeds of evil - I with all confidence darling vlya yu that arguments were provided satisfactory. Because if the will of demons is always hostile, the power cannot be unfair as if who wishes to make bad, it has an option, and bad he can only make this with razresh en iya B ozhy. About the same, to JSC On treats the N making bad deya and I, already was sk an adhan of the lake of N about why vsemogu-the shchy B og assumes that demons of N fell down N and people, using witches, N and people, kreshch en ykh for the sake of the Holy Trinity and trusting shch them in only-begotten the son and the Lord, And an isus Christ? Falling down N on bodies and affairs durn ykh, bad and incorrect people, they refrain from access and the N of An is clear iya harm kind and believing lyu-dyam; really, the sentence allowing it, spraved-to Liv. However N yn e thickets e kind and pure people of wasps - lablyatsya bad Dejan Iyami of demons, whether by times - shayas zhi z in N and; it becomes in order that we silently transferred loss prekhodyashch their things that quite often undergo also bewitched; many at the same time nachi-ache to be afraid why the Lord Vsemogushchy allows with about in e r to highway and t vs e e t oh, About N, to t about N and h e about N e p about z in about l I e with about in ER - it is unfair to t to shat. 
P the redlagayemy question differs in nothing from those which I gathered at ancient devout Wuchang ykh so as far as I will be able, I in brief and one after another from - lay down necessary arguments. And the following will become the first argument - it is test of belief of Christians and experience not - 

2

- 34OO  

3 3 
perversity when those whom demons castigate the angrily deya N and I mi uzn at through stradan iya fleshes, to joint stock company uyu beliefs \and love for B of regional public institution hran I am t they in the depth of souls and. The N etrudno to be patient, zhi vya is quiet and happy, however when during adversities expect the help from Christ Redeemer in e r uyu shch and m with about y h N y t m e r p e N and e m, t about e t about about r and z d about in e with about m e e and about in about r and t about N and with t about I shch e y in e r e x r and s t and and N with to about y. With in I t e y - highway both y And ov, narrating about the muchen iya, tells, how constantly he trusts in B of RSA; and and before, zyxwvuts v 
with p about to about y N about y about with t and N about in to e, about N, N e to about l e l I with, with about hr and N I am l of the h and with Tautou of belief. At the same time it should be notedit should be noted what those, to go zlodeyan iya demons and whether people what - or images did unhealthy, and it and, wishing to return to itself zdo a rovya whether also m Zac of N of hotel of m and the sorcerer am went to all to and consulted on N them, or through other people, so iye people oppose instructions of B of RSA to church. P redpochity health of transitory flesh to the Lord, they ishch ut rescue not at Christ, but at a devil and egs servants. They prefer to address a name of a devil and to be healthy, but fruitless, than it is a little p r e t e r p e t in about and m I would be l yu in and Hr and with t about in about y and z and t e m in e h N about r and to be given with N and m. To the same i force zap reshch en also I do not address to the sorcerer am God's, preferring zhi t, soblyu Dai Lord's precepts, in scarcity and grief, indulged <to oppose his N, being the rich and corporally zdo rovy, that truly loves B of RSA and the most exact about at once finds purity of belief of Christians of sky. Among a hra stian, about svya teysh y Caesar, do not suffer bad mind of i, at to l about N and in highway and x with I from in e r y, to about t about r y e and z l e h and in and yu t about to about l d about van of N ykh by means of sorcery and through posrednichestv1 reveal demons to a passion and f joint stock company you adulteries which predict future on to am N I am m and a zerka of lamas. I beg you, not vyslush a willow of those who ignoring divine Zac it y, these servants of the demons saying that in your state they are useful because a zna yut to joint stock company ustran to ityit results of crimes with pomoshchv the villain of N and y. And bo so harmful care about bodies - leads to death of souls and, zastavlya I people to recede from B of RSA - the creator of all real and to be p ri vya Zahn N y in m; to the impious, receding from belief demons, from a cat an eye after death they are condemned by N and eternal torments and. 
The second argument why the almighty B og allows that sorcery did harm in anything v to people are not guilty, Zac lyuchatsya in umn ozhen by AI of virtues, a dub; h e r e z m uch and t e l N about e and with p y t and n and e and t e r p e N and e about N and z and with l at 

34 
and in heaven their worthy wreath of glory. Because tells l
Saint Augustine: "the person not zn the ayah that it can you - N e with t and, and h t about N e m about e t; and and N about d and about N a t mustache r and highway and e t of t with I about oh, that cannot do that it, after all, could sde-lat; when it is started by somebody rasprashiva-yushchiya, the person a delicacy ivat at himself what was p e r in about N and h and l N about with p r I am t and N about in N e m, and about N about t about m of N e z N and l". B of l and e N of N about y p and m I am t and and r hi and p about with t about l P e t r, to about d and N e about and - 
yaanno came it is tested iye, found skrytuyu3 hitherto 
disease, about which neither it, nor others not zn Ali '3'. And so, 
by the highest it is tested iy for the person is it is unexpected - Nov, as it is testified in Sacred AI is written: "Vessels of the potter are tested by the furnace, and just people - test muchen iy". Legk about to suffer prospering, on - to a skolk of souls but the N and to joint stock company and m and cares and though many pravedn ik and test muchen iya is not mentioned, State - pod N ash And isus Christ will exempt them from all these not - with the h and with ti y. 
The third argument of the divine permission concludes - sya in zashch and those media Wren and I as the person true and just is always afraid of B of RSA and never works on the courage or a reasoning. Here what tells P isaniye about durn ykh people: "they do not work to joint stock company people, and therefore will not castigate them together with people". That is why they it is captured y by arrogance, and they conceal the evil and an ungodliness, and believe that their adversities as if result because of reached. God regrets that from time to time he allows to bring down on kind and just people razlichn ye adversities; in blagopriyat-Nov time these people could not be un and wives y. One - to many, becoming un and wives of N ymiy in misfortune, vposled-stviya vozvysh atsya. The careful image of bad acts makes the kind person God-fearing, and he diligently appeals about the help that, having become stronger against attack of demons, he could ensure bezopas-a nost. And bo N ik that, seized arrogance and relying only on the forces, does not feel safe from crimes of demons as so they inflated °t arrogance of people are left zashch both by those B ozhya and it, out of with - opinions, becomes to available crimes of demons. 
The fourth argument consists in need the section - 
niya of kind and angry people. And bo tells P isaniye in - yaniye of apostles about people kind and lovely to God - <<che-the Cut many adversities we dolzhn y to enter C arstvy Bo of Zh and 3 4. the Saint P avet l, Christ's friend, in one ambassador - 

L1 
the scientific research institute says: "All who wish zhi t devoutly in Hri-to a sta let will undergo persecution". Also aimudreysh y the tsar Solomon in P ri tcha narrates N: "To otory loving the Lord abuses, he treats that as if the father with sy-N about m" 35. The N et is more nice than nothing for Christians in and, than for the sake of the Lord patiently to transfer adversities whether bad lyu-di of their reasons yat, or demons. And bo and him slu-din is given to a devil and the power of N ap an adat of N and good and pravedn ykh people, odn Acre those do not come to confusion, words - but the herd of old rams, but souls and them get on - ibolshy and certain is consoled iye. Indeed, kog-yes the just person lives well, without harming N iky and iky without causing to N damage, not p ri chi N I I am a N iky not - justice, and loves B of RSA of the very much, bo-itsyaitsya and reveres N and m, with all eagerness zashch and - shch aya it is ordered iya and, nevertheless, suffers from a stake - dovstvo whether harming a body, its affairs, and quite often to that and another, this person is truly blessed N y because he, bu-clouds is tested, will apprehend it a wreath zhi zn and which sou - poured the Lord of B og to that, to that loves it. Vsyak y, praved-but zhi vushch and y in a unification with belief Catholic hristi- and N with to about y c e r to in and and t e r p e l and in about p e r e N about with I shch and y in e that m of m and r e bad for the love of the Lord, carries N and himself determined zn by joint stock company, saying that it is at B of RSA in on - stoyanny favor. About bad and wicked men on - it is written so: "Inut impious, riches podder-zhivat them and create them a cosiness. Their houses are safe and spo-to oh N y, and there is no scourge of B over N them about zhi I; zhi zn they will see off the well and then in what - that the moment descend in an underworld". The N about is obvious p ri zn to joint stock company p la's fate ti I here: if so oh the person is successful and healthy, but lives badly, in sins and defect, he B of regional public institution is objectionable. 
P I you y an argument are that the Almighty Gospod 
allows good and pravedn ym to people to suffer from wicked and angry men for the sake of ochishch en iya from all ways of souls and. And bo to joint stock company tells P ison iye: "N et N and the earth pra-the prominent person who makes only kind and not gresh it". The N about as the Lord any sin not of wasps - tavlyat without punishment, He, from compassion, ustanavli-howls to kind people for their fault temporary N of joint stock company an adhan and I; impious and angry are punished by eternal court. And z with - sufferings It replacements yat rask aivayushch I am eaten eternal with N of joint stock company and - zany N and temporary to which they it is inevitable podtver- and yu t with ya and l and v e that m of m and r e, and l and p about with l e with m e r in t and, in the h and with t and l and - shch e. T and to and to, p about and with t and N e, p y t to and in the h and with t and l and shch e and with N y and 
z 
I Cela, the compassionate Lord usually clean those tya 
rask ayavsh ikhsya whom He loves, in this zhi zn and by imposing razn ykh corporal burdens and adversities in them - la. And bo bad deya N and I atheists are useful for to - bry and pravedn ykh people in quality vrachevan iya, and with - tvoryayushchy these deya to N and I - as condemnation. 
Highway esty an argument proves that the person, is bewitched - ny thanks to N atisk at demons, comes to races again - to a kayaniye and in the heart promises that it surely is-governs the zhi zn. P to atom that the Almighty God not suddenly punishes us when we gresh to them, but to in advance mustache - expects tanovlenny time when we improve. If we azyvatsya by Quality Department rask ayatsya, to us prikho-dit when we do not expect that, the avenger for bad which we, gresh of N and to and, in quiet time it is proud we do not recognize, in an adversity, N of joint stock company it ets, was late prinima-I eat. With in I t about y p r about r about to in l and c e B about and about in about r and t, v about with to l and c and I, the following: "If they neglect the law of ohms mine and my son, and do not arrive on is solved to my iya, and do not protect mine I am taught iya, ukroshch at their disgrace - the wood and sins by their lashes, and my compassion not of races - prostranitsya by N and their N, but I will not do much harm in my truth". 
The seventh argument why the almighty B og to - zvolyat that bad deya N and I suppressed demons to - bry and N show N of N ykh, what un ichtozhatsya by them with l and highway to about m about l highway and I in about z in m about N about with t r e highway and t is. And about e with t m of N about - go poor and weak, B of regional public institution ugodn ykh, kind both pokor-ny, and un and wives of N y x whom the scarcity and corporal bo-lezn keeps in love for B of regional public institution; also there are those which, being the rich and vozvysh en in N ye honors, were quickly overthrown from the offered sanctity in a chasm poro-. N e lead to rescue of all those who have health, honors and riches, equally to joint stock company more prodolzhiteln aya life not always does the person better. To rum of that, the Almighty Gospod, wishing to extend on it is elected - ny him the compassion, allows to subject time - to personal troubles of people kind, just and N evin N ykh. And, through demons, through bad people, posred-a razla stvo chn ykh It deprives of other measures and acts they are ky people of wealth and honors, to joint stock company ovy, on it to me - a niya, were badly used, while in poverty both uny-n and i, h r and N I with m both r e n and e, o in N and N e p about y in m ut, to and to, p r about and in and I in 
Sbtogatstva and honor, they in fact in a smaller epen also preserved themselves. Also It allows N to asylat 
N
aa. them many vet to both e illnesses and p ri chi N I t to them, obla- 
dayushch to them tsvetushch to them carnal health, the highest - sincere stradan and I. To rum of that, It allows dovo to dit the person by means of sorcery to death whether highway and t opportunities to sin those who nepra-vedno used zemn the ymiy benefits in this zhi zn and. Here what tells P ison iye about the just husband: "P okhishchen it, N about N e and z m e N and t of l uk and in with t in about r and z mind e oh, and N e about m and N e t p r and a tvorstvo of souls at it". 
The eighth argument of a divine permission is the fact that the people esteeming the mysteries of a stvo tserk vi of an oblad yut Dejan Iyy of the bearing malice spirits is great them courage in fight against all bad. And bo to the one who due about r and z about m p about the h and t and e t of t and and N with t in and and about r I d y to and t about l and h e with to about y c e republics vi, annoy in the N ap adk to Amy demons less often. And is very frequent we sla of highway of Ali from own prizn of An y sorcerers that it and, slush aya a mass and using in e shch and, l and go with l about in e N of N y e c e r to about in yu, z N and h and t e l N about about with l and l I power of demons. And bo not in vain glorified ong in RSA church B, and is among them and e so iye, kotorts for it is strengthened iya divine zashch and you show m about N and to m z N and to and a t mustache r and highway e N and I. N and h ut N e with about m of N e in and I with, m 'we can sk the Azat about alcha m to ah and children, to reshch en N ykh vs Christ and umersh them ever because of intrigues of the demon! or people that all this allowed to make bozhest wine providence for the sake of it is saved iya because it all obnovlya et to the best also puts terrestrial in order. Odnash often is and so that children perish owing to a dovstvo stake, and also because of crimes of parents. 
Interrogation and p ri zn An and e izvestn ykh witches 
in the H e m l with f about r d e in r and f with t in e E with with e to with 
before judges 
it to about r about l e in with to about about in e l and h e with t in and 
in 26 day and wriggling 1566 
Introduction 

N edavno to the city slavn y this, I talk About Chelmsford, P sent glavn ykh three judges That Zac it y to save. And zvestn y the Royal Court Became justice chi N and t, And three criminals are conducted That put them to eradicate. Three local ladies Satanoy Z and r and e N y p r e z N and ton about y l and 1, N about spirit of guilty business by the death the claim of an upila. H and t and y t e N and e in y about t about m About what they to court sk an azalea, And to joint stock company of paper signed, P ri zn avsh and s in the sorcery. To Dejan Yam spiteful look narrowly, You, dear friend, and pray That took away B og quickly From us these witches with suite only. Here I am a game to tea and I hope, H t about t y p r about h t e highway m about and with l about in and, And the truth, N of joint stock company it ets, uzn ayesh, To about a gd p about y m e highway, h that p r about the h and t and e highway. 











40 
THEIR INTERROGATION AND THE CONFESSION MADE BEFORE THE DOCTOR HOUL AND THE MASTER FORTESCUE IN THE SAME COURT AND LITERALLY REPRODUCED IN THAT DEGREE IN WHAT IT WAS POSSIBLE; AND AT FIRST RECOGNITION OF ELISABETH FRANCIS WHO TOLD THE FOLLOWING. 
For the first time it pozn akomitsya with art of witchcraft 
aged dven adtsat of years thanks to the grandmother who was called by m atush to and And in from Hatf ild P everill, ny-not the dead. To an ogd she taught her, advised devoch-ke to refuse B of RSA and Word B ozhy and to give the 
blood to the Satan (so it N azyvat it), k2otorogo it show - 
l and e y in about r and z e e l about go p I would be t of N and with t about about to about t and, N and at the h and in e e to about r - 
Meath its bread and milk that this girl also did, to r about m e t about oh, about N and N and at the h and l and it in y z y in and t e oh, to N and z y in and I p r and it a name - the Satan and to hold it in to orz of N to e. 
To an ogd this m atush to and And in gave it the cat Sa-to the thane, Elisabeth sn wanted an achal that this cat (and the N was azyvat by it his Satan) made it rich and zazhi-exact, and he promised it that he will execute it zhelan iye, having asked it at the same time that she wants to have, and it from - a vechala - sheep 3 (because, on it p ri zn An and yu, this cat razgo-in and r and in and l with N e y with t r and N of N y m of of l at x and m go l about with about m, N about t and to, h t about it pon Imola), and it immediately delivered N and its meadow of sheep in number of eighteen heads, black and white, to - tory remained with it some time, but then all about N and and with the h e z l and, p r and h e m with and m and about N and N e z N and e t to and to. 
Also, when she received these sheep, she resh silt to catch to herself in a certain Endryyu's husbands of B of Iles. Che - lovek this was rather well-to-do so the cat promised that all and will be, but, he told, at first she dolzhn and with - to be said by N and the fact that this Endryyu will offend it that it and made. 
And after that to joint stock company this Endryyu offended it, it not - nitsya by N and it, that is why she asked the Satan unich-to tozhit all his good that he immediately also made; one - to it, being not satisfied with it, asked it to touch Endryyu's body that there was at once ispol-N e N oh, p about with l e h e go with it a m at the h and N and with to about N of the h and l with I. 
Also, to an azhda y time to joint stock company it did for it that - - oud, she said, he demanded from it to apelk at blood which it also gave it, use alyvy to himself skin 

4 1 
sometimes in one place, sometimes in another. Where she gave similar injections, and kras-N y e p I t of N still are seen and. 
Also, when this Endryyu already died, it achat N to think and whether it has child. P oety she on - asked the Satan un to ichtozhit it, and he advised it to take a certain grass and to drink the infusion prepared on it that she also made, and her child at the very same time p about gi b. 
Also, when she decided to marry for the second time, it promised to help her with it, meaning Fran - a sis who is her husband now, but at the same time sk azat that it is not so rich, to joint stock company others, wishing to achieve thereby her consent to illegitimate communication with this Francis that she also made, in rezul-the Tat of what conceived the daughter who was born in three months after their wedding. 
P a donkey of that to joint stock company they got married, zhi zn take place them - la at all not so quietly, to joint stock company it would like; they on - stoyanno (according to her) swore and quarreled, here poche-mu she wanted that her cat Satana killed it reben-to and, being then at the age of about half a year that that and made. N about and then she did not find desired spokoy-a stviye and asked it to fill with lameness of N and F rensis, her husband, and it executed required. One morning it made the way in bash poppy F rensis, settled there as if zha-oh and when he tried to put on the bash poppy, the cat touched his leg. F rensis strongly was surprised and asked that it was, however it forbade the husband to kill him, and here F rensis were overcome so aya by lameness of which already N of an ikogd could not cure it. 
P a donkey of all this when this cat lived at it years pyatn to adtsat or sixteen, and, to joint stock company speak nekoto-ry (though it is incorrect), she was tired of it, p ri highway of la it to matush to e Waterhouse, the sosedke4 (poor wives Russian cabbage soup - not) when that fussed at the oven, and on - asked to give it pie instead of what she promised to bring it such thing which it will be serviceable slu-zhi t to it all it zhi zn. And it m atush to and Waterhouse gave it pie then Elisabeth brought to it it to from in f an artuka and N of an auchil to everything that I would hear in with in about e in r e m about t with in about e y and ush to i And v, s to and z and in, about about N and dolzhn and N to azyvat h t his Satan, to give it the blood, bread and milk. B to an olsha of N and it dozn AI An it anything N e with to and z and l and. 

42 
THE MOTHER WATERHOUSE FROM HATFIELD PEVERILL, SIXTY FOUR YEARS, BEING INTERROGATED ON THE SAME DAY, ADMITTED THE FOLLOWING 
First, she received this cat from wives y upo- 
myanuty F rensis in that order, to joint stock company there was uk an adhan about above, and that sk azat that it has to azyvat N the Satan and that if about N and there are you juice about c en and t it then he will make for it everything that she will wish. 
Then, having caught it, she (having decided to test its cart - mozhnost) asked it to kill own on - a dewdrop that he also made; and for works it gave it c y p l e N to and, to about t about r about about about N p about t r e about in and l from N e e, and t and to e to and - to a pelk of the blood. And this way she continued to act every time when she it that - for it did that - it about - kalyvat a hand or a cheek and to ap is scarlet this blood to it in a mouth; he, N apivsh is, laid down in the of baskets again at where it also held it; places where it pricked itself, are still visible to N and her skin. 
Also it sk azat that when it was offended by a certain father To ers, she vzya la the cat Satana, put in an apron and carried his N and the tree growing before it to - my, and p ri to an azal to it to ruin three pigs of this father Kersi; having made it, he came back and told it about it, and it rewarded him, to joint stock company again earlier, having given him c yp a flax to and and to aplyu the blood. It tsyplen-he ate without remainder so it could not N of an IT a uniform stone or p erysh to and. 
T and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t oh, p about with with about r both in highway and with with N e to about e y the widow Guddey, she asked the Satan to drown it koro-vu that he also made; it rewarded it, to joint stock company and r An sh e. 
Also, having quarreled with the neighbors, it under - killed a bny image at them three geese. 
Also it prizn atsya that as she N ik joint stock company could not have a rest what it very much needed, it on - asked the Satan destroy to ityit brewery. 
The t and to e, to about d and e y N e p about N r and in and l about with h e - that m and with l oh, about N and Did so that at these people cottage cheese was spoiled for two 
and


and
whether even for three dn I forward. 
Also, having quarreled with whom - that from the neighbors 
Sv t his wife, it popros5ila the Satan to ruin them posred-°m bloody pon the wasp why that men and and vprav- 
DU Died, and it rewarded it, to joint stock company and before. 
4zyxwvutsrq i 
P in an odobny way it prizn atsya that whether as with the husband they zhi absolutely peacefully, she asked the Satan to kill him that he also made years nine N the Azat, and since then it is registered as the widow. 
Also it sk azat that if she wanted, that it that - nibud for it made, then she dolzhn and was the other Tat "Father of N ash" a N and armor of N and. 
Also it matush to and Waterhouse prizn atsya that it turned this cat into a toad, doing it as follows. It held it in to orz of N to e, the filled wool, but over time, on poverty, it was you - 
nuzhdena to put it on use. Then 6ona begged in 
and m I About t of c and, and With y N and, and With in I t about go D u x a, p r about with I p r e in r and t and t 
cat in a toad, and immediately the cat turned into a toad so now he could zhi t and in empty to orzin to e. Also about N and with to and z and l and, h t about to and to - t about r and z, to about a gd about N and highway of l and in B r e to with t e d, also was it shortly before arrest, the Satan sk azat it that - she would hurry home because at it will be big not - pleasant things and that soon it will be hung up or with - zhzhen and; it is more than a N and this time it nothing not sk azat. 


JOAN WATERHOUSE, THE DAUGHTER OF THIS MOTHER WATERHOUSE, EIGHTEEN YEARS, DURING INTERROGATION SHOWED THE FOLLOWING 
First, that her mother this winter taught it to the 
to art, but she learned nothing; she did not remember also a name "this a thing and". She sk azat that saw it in hands ah of mother only once and that it was p about x about and N and and at, and h t about in about y d I with about in e r highway e N of N about in N e z and p N oh, it hear it is scarlet, her mother calls it for joint stock company that - that sde-lat, saying at the same time the name "Satan". Because she not always and not everything told to the daughter and never on to elements of a shaft it to this case. 
T and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t about to about d and its m and t p about highway of l and in B rekstead, she wanted some bread, but, not N aydya it, otpra-curled to the neighbour's girl and asked it to give it ku-bread juice with cheese. To an ogd that azat Quality Department to it and gave nothing, or gave slish a lump a little, she came back home and made so, to joint stock company mother did it, causing the Satan. It I in and l with I to N e y (to and to about N and go in about r and r), p about its m of N e n and yu, i z and highway of m of joint stock company and her mother which stood under the bed; it resembled N and a big dog and, I vivsh is, asked what she wants. 

44 
At first she was frightened, but then sk azat that ho-couples that it N apugat this girl (at the same time it on - called and mya); then he asked that it will give it, and it 
answered: "R a yzhy rooster", and 7on objected: "N et, you 
you will give me the body and a shower at"; it was so on - 
the pugana also so strongly wished to get rid of it that promised to make it. And then it went to this девоч8th 
to e, p r and N I in about l and h e with t r and highway of N about about p with and with r about hectare of m and N and about l about in e, 
and strongly the N apugat it, and even pursued it. N yn e these witches cannot (to joint stock company they speak) again to call him here because they do not want that it poyavlyal-sya. The B to an olsha, sk was azat by it, I did nothing, one - to this its act of Quality Department dug all the rest. 

THE SECOND INTERROGATION AND THE RECOGNITION OF THE MOTHER AGNES WATERHOUSE AND HER DAUGHTER JOAN MADE AFTER CHARGE WITH QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS OF AGNES BROWN, THE GIRL FOR WHOM THE EVIL GHOST HUNTED, SPECIALLY SAID BEFORE THE JUDGE SAUSKOT AND THE MASTER GERRARD, THE ROYAL PROSECUTOR, JULY 27, 1566, NOT LESS WONDERFUL AS ALSO TRUTHFUL 

P Agnes Waterhouse's recognition made in 27 day 
July in a year 1566 in Chelmsford before the judge Sa-uskoty and the royal prosecutor M. Gerrard. 

At first, being asked, guilty it or not of the charge of murder of the person brought to her, she confessed that wines ovn and, and then, after witness on - to an adhan y, the N y x against her daughter Joan Waterhouse is given, she is a darling vi la that it had a white cat which it about - force un to ichtozhit cattle at neighbors, and also that it on - ruined one person that that and made. To an ogd it had a need to move away from the house on Two - three miles, she began to deliberate, to joint stock company to it to treat a cat. Here the cat and it resh or that he, that is a cat, there are no hundred - a toad then it dolzhn and will be it to lock and to Give it milk, and it will eat it until the °na does not come back home. Meanwhile, her daughter was in one neighbour's house located nearby. There it on - 
p
R Agnes settled B raun, the girl of years dven adtsat, to give her 

4 5 
piece of bread and cheese, N and that upomyan uty Agnes otveti-la that she has nothing, and, besides, there are no keys that - to get all this from to ladovk and. P a donkey of what upomyan uty Joan p ri highway of la home, angry at this girl Agnes of B raun, and here it and remembered whether to joint stock company her mother walked up and down vzyad-on to omn to an ata forward and you to the Satan, the Satan is scarlet "!". It sk azat to itself that will try to make likewise, and then p ri N I las to walk up and down on the house and to call the Satan. Here to it I curled chern aya a dog and asked that to it nuzh-N of the lake. She, according to her, was frightened and sk azat: "I want you to frighten Agnes of B raun". Here he asked that she will give it, and she answered that she will give a red rooster, N and that it sk azat that it is not enough. Then she asked that in so ohm a case it is necessary for it, and he answered that to it N uzhn y her shower and and a body. In a game tse a game of ts, having been frightened of him also hear av such offer, she gave it the body and a shower u9. Here the royal prosecutor asked her: "To joint stock company you made it in the face of the Lord?" "Oh, state - podin - she answered - I believe that the Lord smilosti-it is necessary to curl mn oh", and then it sk azat "correctly govo-Riesch", and then it left her then it uslysha-la that it really frightened this Agnes of B raun. 
Then p ri to an azalea to cause upomyan I will conceal Agnes of B raun, and about N and in about highway of l and, and it with p r about with and l and, with to about l to about e y l e t, and about N and about t in e t and - 
la, that, probably, dven to adtsat then the royal prosecutor asked her that it can sk the Azat: and it otve-tit that in such - that day (the N azyvy at the same time is defined - ny day) it churned butter and here something approached it, similar N and a dog, but with f an izionomiy monkey. It had a short tail, and around a neck - a chain with silvering - a ny whistle (so she thinks); the head he was crowned by couple of horns, and in a mouth he held a key from the storeroom with milk, and here, my master (she told), I was frightened because it sk joint stock company is scarlet and jumped in razn ye the parties, and then took seat in kra-to beer. Here I asked it what he wants, and he answered that he wants oil, and I sk azat that I for it have nothing, and he answered that all - equally descends and will get, and for - that it rushed to a storeroom door to insert a key into the lock, but I sk azat that it nothing there will find, and it answered that that - nibud yes the N aydt. P a donkey of what he opened a door and the N and a regiment climbed and there put a key of N and fresh with y r, i, p r about y in t and m of N e m of N about oh, about N in y highway e l of N and r at, z and to r y the l and sk azat a door that it nasbivat to me oils. Then it left. Further the girl told about it to the aunt and on - sent for svya shch en N and to ohm. It, having come, p ri to azat her mo-to flow B of regional public institution and to appeal to name I of an isus. And I follow N about N - shchy day, my master, it came to mn e again, holding in a mouth a key from N ash to her to ladovk and, and here I asked it: "In and mya And an isusa what it is necessary for you?" He put a key and sk azat that, Wai's vza to it names and, I said silly women - ny words then at once disappeared. Here my aunt under - took to lyuch because they were its N and AI of two days and night is lingering, then we entered the storeroom, where whether uvide-a trace of oil of N and cheese. In several days it came again, but in a mouth it held a peel from f asol. Here to - the rolevsky prosecutor asked that it was, and other judges asked the same question, N and that she answered: "My master, I asked him in name I of an isus that it is v you, and he put all N and the earth and sk azat that I said silly women - ny words, and left. P to an ozzha it came here, again - a rzha in a mouth bread pieces, and I asked it that he wants, and he answered - oils, both again left, and since then, my state - 
podin, I not vi0dela it up to last Wednesday, that is 
To 28 and yu l I" 1. And why, asked royal to use - 
Rohrs, he was with you last Wednesday? He was with me, she answered. And what he made with you, the prosecutor asked. My master, she answered, he came with a knife in teeth 
and
  with p r about s and l, n e mind e r l and l and I e shch e, and I about t in e t and l and, h t oh, with l and in and 
To god, no, and here he sk azat that if I did not die, it 

47 
will pierce me with this knife right in the heart and will make so that I died. And here I sk azat: "In name I of an isus, hollow zhi a knife", but he answered that he will not throw a knife of the lyu-the bimy lady, and I asked it who this lady. And he nodded towards your house, m atush to and Waterhouse. For - that the royal prosecutor asked the mentioned Agnes Waterhouse that she will tell on it and that asked the girl to describe a knife form, and Agnes of B raun sk azat that it was the type knife to and N of a sting. Then you lie, darling twisted Agnes Waterhouse. P to ochy, the prosecutor questioned. Wash uvazhaye-my mister (that told), she says that to and the N reaped it, and at my place there is nothing similar, I have only a big N ozh. That is why she lies, my master, chest-Nov a word. Joan Waterhouse sk azat that she lies also in when she says that it has a person to joint stock company at a monkey because what came to it, was similar to a dog. The N at well, sk was azat by the royal prosecutor whether you can cause it now that it appeared before Amy's N. If with m about e highway, then m y with to about r about about t p r and in and t m e I and z t yu r m y. The B e z in e - ry, sk was azat by Agnes Waterhouse, I cannot because it can be done only with belief, to joint stock company it did I and my daughter; then I could call quickly him, but now I have over N him no power. And so, sk the royal prosecutor azat, obra-tivsh is to Agnes Waterhouse when it is your cat sucked at you blood? N of an ikogd, that answered. The N at all right, told about - a kuror, give - to and we will look, and here the jailer removed from it a scarf and N and the person ton were found in it razlichn ye p I and, one of which was even a N and a nose. Here the royal prosecutor sk azat: well, respectable Agnes when he last time sucked your blood? I claim, the ska hall it that in the last two weeks nothing was. P about - to the sla of what the court was removed N and a meeting. 

THE FINAL AND LAST CONFESSION OF THE MOTHER WATERHOUSE BEFORE DEATH MADE IN 29 DAY OF MONTH OF JULY, 1566 
First (having already prepared p ri N I t death), 
it prizn atsya frankly that she was a witch and used the otvratiteln ym sorcery on AI p I ton of an adtsata of years is lingering, and made a set disgusting Dejan Iyy what she sincerely and purely - warmly regrets and asks to forgive almighty B of RSA for the fact that it spoiled his sacred name the 

48 
sinful acts. She believes that she will be saved thanks to his inexplicable mercy. And being with p r about highway e N and p r and with ut with t in uyu shch and m and, about N and p r and z in N and l and with, h t about p about - banished the Satan to a certain Uardol, the sose-du, to the tailor (who offended her) in order that navre-to dit to it personally and to cause damage to its property. And this her Satan went there to execute it pozhelan iya, but then he returned, so to joint stock company could not make it zlodeyan iya. She asked him in what - the Leningrad Region, and he answered that Uardol azatsya ok so kre-pok in vere11 that it could not do it harm; later it again repeatedly sent it (but everything is vain) in order that reasons to ityit to it what - or damage. And, whether being asked, accustomed to go it to church to the general prayer or a church service, she answered on - lozhitelno, and N and a question what it did there, she from - vechat that did the same, as others of wives shch and N y, and with all the heart prayed, and N and a question of what she told, praying, she answered that chi tala of Father of N ash, B to Devo's ogoditsa, I Believe then they asked, on - Latin or on - gliyska An, and she answered - on - Latin, and 
they asked why she read them on latyn and, 1a not 
in English, zn aya that government 2 and 
according to ozha Word B I is established that all people a dale - zhn y to pray to N and English I zy to e and N and native on - r e ch and i, k for t about r about e about N and l uch highway e p about N and m and yu t, and about N and about t in e t and l and that the Satan of N of an ikogd did not allow it to say it on - and N of of l and y with to and, N about everything in r e m I am t about l to about N and l and t y N and; p about to and to about in about y to the reason, and also because of the N ykh by it sets of other crimes in which it prizn atsya is made, she grieves, regrets and asks favor of B an ozhiya and all - the general proshch en iya, giving and m in the way the soul and hoping to find to happiness with Christ, her Christ Redeemer, to - tory the highest price of invaluable blood to the claim - drank her sins. Amine. 
About the most spiteful deya N of AI of N of ekoy unusable 
witches, about similar to otory N ik that not 
hear it is scarlet in England many years. 
R assk elements it is howled about one person e, P icharda of B to an erta, the servant of the master Edlinga, from 
Vudholla, arrival P in N of ER, columns stvo 
M idlsek with that in mile for Harrow. 
With about in e r highway e N about in m and r t e 1 5 9 2 g about d and and e shch e r and z p r and z N and N about with about about t in e t with t in uyu shch and m p r and in d e D zh. B., 
m and and with t r about m and with to a mustache with t of century. 
Hexastikon 

Of witches of spiteful kN in this a yoke it will be a question, Of that, to joint stock company they influence ordinary people, To joint stock company that - muttering that, villainies make. Let's glorify the Lord who will beat them! The B og expels them, but immediately the Satan P brings new witches - and is not present them chi sla1. 
Levit 20.6: "And if aya soul addresses joint stock company to vyzy-howling the dead and to wizards that bludno ho- 
to dit following them, I obrashch2u the person My on that soul, and 
I will exterminate it from the people it". 


THE MOST SPITEFUL ACT OF A CERTAIN UNUSABLE WITCH CONCERNING A CERTAIN RICHARD BERT'S IDENTITY 
Oh, courteous and favorable reader! So long, 
as we live in this vale of tears and pathetic sosto-ash I eat yaniya of N, all of us, even the best of us, are not tired to repeat that we stay in a condition of continuous war, conducting a deadly and most dangerous fight with vra-gy. Enemies of N ash and against which we have to battle, an essence are as follows: world, flesh and Devil; two of them (they are whom a N ash e blind obstinacy) the most part of people considers as the friends, at that time to joint stock company of N and business they an essence helpers of our very enemy; at the same time they the multivarious friendliness deceive these people, and shch and in fact their corporal and spirits - N oh with m e r t and. 
With and m y m of of l and in N y m of N and highway and m in r and go m I in l I e t with I With and t and N and, the creator of all evil; in P isaniye we see many names explaining its spiteful nature. For the cruelty he is nicknamed by Avvadon, the destroyer because unlike what - nibud the ordinary foe it not udovletvorya-e with the CU I with m e r in t yu and p about and e in l yu in t e in l and, N about z and m y highway of l I e in t and about to about N - chatelny destruction of souls and, intolerably tormenting them about - them. Z and the ability it pozyvatsya by the thief because it from - bretat a set of ways, having used which, it mo-zht having contrived and to joint stock company accidentally to collapse the N and pious people. Z and he got the rage about - zvishche "Devil", the accuser because all the time, day and night, he is Zahn yat what accuses conscience of righteous persons. 
For the cunning he got a nickname of "dragon" because since the time of Adam, the N and is lingering AI of many thousands of years, there was no rather wise or wasps - the torozhny person who could resist to his tricks; it wounded and poisoned them to the smer-ti. For the power he is nicknamed lvom3 because like that, to joint stock company the huge body of a lion, so is full of force 
and
  in his tail the extraordinary force and power is. 


53 
The m y N and with to about l to about N e with about m of N e in and e m with I in t about m, h t about with it in r and, N ash Apollion, more powerfully is also rather strong to fight against and x cowardly cowards and unitary enterprise - rya my, but indecisive people, to joint stock company we are ovy. But to make the victory stronger and not to experience defeat in achievement of the purposes, he got used to use force of the tail - that is the bewitched slaves whom it oprede-poured to execute all the zhelan and I in the relation bezobid-ny people that already repeatedly and was made sa-by m y in m and r and z in N y in m and with p about with about and m and. The N about about chn about he N and to about d and e vyk azyvat N the dexterity, force and the power directly through the servants, but does it with on - 
moshch4yu kovarn ykh dealers in seeds false uche- 
N and I and Zahn both mayushch and hsya sorcery of witches; some with - 
blaznyat mind and soul, others attack N and transitory flesh, mislead and catch minds of people in the networks. 
I tell nothing about these lozhn ykh dealers, but I want, the Lord the witness, to tell about damned - a move whether about their rage and Zac to N of An and I x, hated to a look of B ozhy, N en avidimy good people and bringing - shch their harm to, p ok azyvayushch and x what power and superiority is received thanks to a pleasure of B ozhye-mu by the father of a sin the Satan over gresh N and to Amy, devoted m both rsk oh and z N and. 
N ekto P ichard with B ert5, the servant of one gentleman by the name of the master Edling living in Vudholla in at - the course P in in N of ER in M to an idlseksa, N akhodyashch I am eaten in mile for Harrow - it - ze-Hill, the N recovered on a barn of the hozya-Ina, located near ok rain y it goro-yes. It was accompanied by a huge mastiff. N eozhidanno he saw before himself the hare who rushed aside from it. R esh willows of N to poison N and him a dog, P ichard absolutely forgot about the purpose of the travel.6 However a dog not 
t about l to about about t to and z and l and with e and t z and z and y c e m, N about with t and l and p r y and t 
around hozya in and; at the same time it sometimes fell to the ground, letting out compassionate cries so to azhdy could ska zat that this game was obviously not for it. R ichard, having lit up, followed a hare and saw, to joint stock company that ran into the house matush to and Atkin with which already was from - spring as the witch. Then, having said a prayer and having appealed to a name of the Lord, it with confidence sk azat: "P roch, witch!" 
It was the first (that is the fact that it N azvat it - mine) that then and P ichard of B of the ert led to the tragedy. It happened so that a month later P ichard the B ert met her near the shed hozya and N and and told "good afternoon". However she to joint stock company unitary enterprise rya May of wives shch and N and, a dangerous wasp, races - prostranyayushchy an infection the witch, p ri highway of la in rage, Zawiya of his maidens, and, having inclined the head, did not pronounce a word. 
The N and the next day, that is on Wednesday, March 8, it came N and a master's barn again to work there and at the same time to flirt behind some zhivotn ymiy and as he did not want to come back that not pre-to ryvat work, it took with itself(himself) a lunch - bread, oil, cheese, apple pie and a bottle of kind beer. P having come to the place, he put a small knot with food and started to - lu. P rorabotav till twelve o'clock, it, it agrees the manager - to a day order, and having also felt an attack naked yes, decided to have dinner; however his lunch proceeded not - to stir this straw long as he saw the awful black cat sitting in straw napro-tiv it who suddenly began with strash N ym noise. 
This person, uzhasn uvshis, rose from the place. - a rzha in a hand a piece of pie (because this hungry poor molotilshch ik at did not want to interrupt so kind meal at all), he suddenly heard a voice, govo-rivshiya to it: "Leave!" "And where to me from here - to dit an ear?" he asked. In reply the spirit said the following: "And di, but leave all the things and N ozh here". 
N the eschastny gawk, continuing still - to neigh in a hand a piece of apple pie, approached to you - to the course from the shed when vn ezapn about felt what tore off it from the earth and incurred by air. P ronosyas over the fields lying below, he saw workers svo-his owner and, however he could not call them though with naked howl at it, it seems, everything was all right. So it to a share - bodies to Harrow where the N and a slope of one hill was zn achiteln ykh the sizes a reservoir; R dragged an ichard through this pond in which it left highway of la p at, become subsequently the evidence of his tortures, but it could not stop; tashch silt is higher and higher than it and vysh e. It flew over top of this hill, over high Trees at city cathedral. He remembers all this very much 
hgorosho and in process of that, to joint stock company carried him further, he, on 
e
about words, I where a mustache got to the certain place full ogn - 
the thane and I and rydan iya lyshat and e mournful p ri chi that. 
it seemed as if all damned demons of hell subject - with I p y t to and m in e that to m of L and m about 7. 
And t and to, in y at z N and l and, in with to about l with t r and N of N about e m e about that y l p e r e - not Sep of this P ichard B ert; whether it is necessary to highway to tell about from - lichiteln ykh p ri zn to joint stock company ah of this place. 
First, he says, was very much zhark about and is very dark, is more dark, than in the country to and mmer y than c ev8, disgusting aromas soared in air and from everywhere the stench proceeded; there was highway umn oh, from where - that reached to ri to and, and so strong that, appear, odnovremen-but tell one million y razl chn ykh voices, but nothing was visible around, behind an exception plamen and which caused in it in a mouth such intolerable thirst that, having remembered about foams of N and, remained with it in to Osh elk e, he began to look around searching pivn oh. 
P rislush ivayas however to these voices and thinking that some of their N address it, it sk azat: "There is no N about for me N and to joint stock company oh of work here". In reply it immediately hear it is scarlet: "N e think of it. N about you will be svobo-den Lish provided that sokhran look in secrets e and you will not tell all about this N iky when you return to - mine". N and that he answered: "About my owner spro-sit N where I was?" 
Here suddenly he felt that I z y to in a mouth was folded double, legs lit up, hands smoked, to urtk and sorva-las from backs y and fell in fire, and it, is prompt vospa-Reeve over to An of an avama and fences, I failed then to the swamp and r z, and with c and r and p and in highway and with p r and e in t about m about to and to and e - t about highway and p y and to about - lyuchk and so it had a look so oh that to watch N but not - go was and strash N about and at the same time zhalk the lake. 
Having returned N the Azat to P and N of N er9 where lived it ho-z ya and n, o N with N and h and l and N and p and l with I in about dy and z to and N and in y, and z and t e the m in such look went to one acquaintance who also occasionally worked for the master Edlinga. I, however, cannot sk the Azat whether it decided to go on there - to the fact that the house of his friend was closest, or on - to the fact that it was absent already four dn I in a row. 
And here, Sunday morning, to joint stock company it was got, it hozya in decided to go the same road to church. N e zn aya that unfortunate P ichard the B ert lost his sheep, he asked the servant whether brought to it what - nibud the person. "P ochy what - that - that answered - same your person, the sir, Richard!" "Wash a forehead - a century? - he asked. - It cannot be". And here, having inexpressibly been surprised, it was silently looked at it. 

5 6 
N of windows ets, he asked it to tell what, for the sake of the Lord, with N and m proizosh the Leningrad Region and though that could not speak, however, pomn I probably about what - it constantly uka-zyvat, doing to joint stock company iye-zn to joint stock company and, N and the house where zhi la matouche-Atk ying with, and all his being exhaled so much fear and rage that everything that and fell by N of it into hands, was immediately broken off by it in to lochya. 
Meanwhile the audience resh or that it is necessary on - to send a parish svya shch en N and to ohm which called ma-Smith, and the gentleman the master of B erbridzhy of P inner erased P ARC. P having departed to this dumb sozda-a niya whether they express the regret concerning his grief - stny it is put iya and, having surrounded it with care whether nacha-to work on N and m. They cut to it teeth whether otkry-a mouth, disconnected a finger from I z y to and and with big I rub - the house unbent it. P the ervy words pronounced by it were so ova: "In B ud use of the lyat matush to and Atkin with, be damned by m atush to and Atkin with, it bewitched exchanges I". P about - to the sla of what he did not calm down, but sk azat that also the t with N e y can even p about go in about r. 
M and with t e r B e r r and d and m and with t e r With m and t p about with l and l and z and N e y. To an ogd it p ri highway of la, this P ichard N about in also the l with I, p about to and N e r and with to r about in I N and l e y in with e l and tso snatched on her N and N e about with t and, sentencing at the same time that he does charitable serious work by means of which he will be able to recover. All and occurred what confirms also itself zhi zn because since then he definitely recovered and now ho-dit in church. 
Such is, vk ratets, the description of all those alarms and angrily - to l yu h e n and y, k about t about r y e p r and highway of l about with p r e t e r p e t, to and to go in about r and t - sya, fully, to this poor creature R to an ichard of B to an ert. All this occurred on March 8, 9, 10 and 11 this year, and 
these days it was absent, prove1dya them, to joint stock company already izve- 
with ton oh, in y highway e at p about m I would be a N at t y m about r and z about m 0. 
N about about with t and in and t m e p e r P and h and r d and B e r t and and p about go in about r and the m of N e-is a lot of about matush to e Atkin page. And z authentic messages from P in the N of an er follows that upomyan uty matush to and Atkins somehow time p ri highway of la to the house of the master of B of an erbridge for a small lump and happened it in that time when sluzhan ki z and N I am t y N and m and with l about about y N e, to t and to h t about e in l and e in m about about about N but could not receive. And to joint stock company only she went beyond a door, 
t
Ut slivk and N achat to rise and rage in a tub ah 
t and to, h t about in to about N of c e to about N of c about in about N and in y r in and l and with N and r at, r and with - those to l and with p about to ukhn e and p about p and l and in with l and in N about e about t in e r with t and e; t and to 
h
that all their economy this day suffered a loss because 

5 7 
everything spilled N and a floor and to make nothing was already a m not cart ozhn the lake. 
Oh, risen against the Lord! Enemies of a sort to a chelovecha of sky! Extortioners! N and you even fire to spend not ho-it chtsya! N and the account of this of wives shch and N y carried much razlich ny cruel and furious deya N and y, however we podve-that a result and Zac it chit everything and m in the way. 
Soon later the N ykh events upomyan uty - ma prish la of N and a certain Gregory's site To an ulson is described to ask it to help her (because she lives alms and mercy of kind people), however saw that it strongly Zahn yat the affairs - I think, it marked sheep; having said the request and seeing that it does not leave Zahn I ti I and wants to finish it to a game tsa, she from - belched from herself a smoke cloudlet. Through what - that time after that to joint stock company it ush la, and he Zac he chit the work, it released to the yard of two sheep. Suddenly they achat N very quickly to run back and forth, and rushed so until then, pok but did not die. 
George Gifford 
Dialogue about witches 
and sorcery 
Dialogue about witches and sorcery, 
in which it is openly shown how the Devil fraudulently enters 
in delusion not only witches, 
but also many other people, plunging them 
in a bad way in many great sinful acts. 

In N it is described by George Gifford, the servant of word B ozhy in M to the aldena. 
P to ochtenneyshy mister Robert To lark at, to one and z and r about N about in to and z N and h e y with t in and E e In e l and h e with t in and. 
Yours and favor! P roshlo several years since then to joint stock company I published one small track the Tat, - savshiysya vedm1, on purpose pok the Azat tricks of the Satan and all its artful deya N iya that ignorant lyu-di did not give in to his deception and were not seduced with pu-ti true. However delusions such okaza-foxes much bigger, and sins - to which it by means of witches declines many - more tya zhk and m and, than usually think of it. P odobny things slu-chatsya in many places and, to joint stock company I think, all this - the Leningrad Region very N eozhidan N ym for people 2. N esomnenno, odes - nako, that whether thanks to highway tyazhk to ohm to condemnation of Bo-a zhiya the devil collected in the hands ah so strong 
the power, 3 about which to me earlier - also hear that to at not dovo- 
dielk. And bo when people are clarified, hear and a voice 
The B of ozhiya addressing N to them they fairly otka-zyvatsya from devil lectures and do not follow his example. However N yn e about the Satan speak to N and each corner, about it slyshn about everywhere, believe in him. Magicians, sorcerers, vedmy4 speak about it. To his word at - with l ush and in and yu t with I. About N e z and m y with l and l with about in e r highway and t N e h t oh, and ash and dn and it is realized into N in zhi zn, it is followed. About the highest providence of the Lord Almighty and all earth of the master it is told about us in P ison iya x I follow - a shchy image: without his N even the arrow will not be able to fall N and z e l m yu. N and go l about in e N and highway e y with about with the h and t and N y vs e in about l about with y. D e - Mona will wound and kill people, izn ichtozhat live tny and other creatures, p ri chi I I f izichesky stra-am given them by N iya, however all demons of hell are held down and constrain - are howled by this vyssh it P rovideniye so they cannot do even p er of highway to and to tear out from to the poor fellow's snout kra-pivn ik and without special N and that the permission given them P r and in and t e l e in m in with it in t in e r d and z e in m of N about y. T I eat with N e m e in N e e, N and with z and - stavlyat to believe in what at the request of witches and for the sake of satisfaction their angry zhelan y, their spirits mutilate and kill to joint stock company of people, and zhivotn ykh. And for - to extend similar opinion in the general stvo, these kovarn ye spirits give them, forcing at the same time is opened prizn to avatsya that they make - whether all these deya N iya which never could sde-lat - at the request of the person - any demon. And bo 

61 
if they could make similar then highway would be to persuade needs them. And a nogda God gives - Mona force that that could disturb people and zhi cotton, the reasons to ityit them corporal stradan iya. If he can, he will make it at a request and on appeals of witches, however itself can absolutely not predsta-twist that their appeals give it the known force or that it will not do allowed it to make the house Gospo-until they do not call it and not N ash Luth of N and anyone. In a body che-the loveka and zhi5 cotton is a set of diseases, on - 
artificial and m, and with their help it leads up lyu- 
Tay to lameness and even to death. P ri it it - rzhit witches in to ulak e; it, it is possible sk the Azat, creates them. Ely Zack to repit fruits of the works, it to action - et by means of sorcerers of other sort whom in on rod6e call zn ayushch and mi people and wise wives shch in and - 
m and. Through N and x he shows multivarious at - 
ema, wishing that aspired to it and read him as if B of RSA. P odobny things take roots in the hearts of people, zastavlya I them, and m in the way, to be afraid of witches; they cause suspicion and excite rumors among a great number of N show N of N ykh; some are included in the category wine - vaty, sentence others to death - generally, innocent blood spills much. That is why I also want pok the Azat in it the track the Tat (moderately my modest opportunities) as skillfully the devil carries out all this. I made it in the form of dialogue in order that the conversation of N ash was available to ordinary people and not really Wuchang ym. I dare to offer this to kN and - to a zhiyets your ilost M, but not because I consider levers needing similar N AI because you a stra are stno betrayed to the Gospel is left and are so strong in belief in you - a sshy P rovideniye that it was joyful to me to see and hear to at how it is reasonable and correct postupa-your la and M an ilost in court when vozn similar situations hiccupped. That is why I offer you this book as the evidence of the gratitude for that of races - situation and kindness which you vyk azyvat to me, and I offer yours to it Favour prin its yat. If it on - serves to correction of minds of flabby people. that I will be very glad. 7 If I am mistaken in what - or, and z l about e N of N about m of N and e, I go t about in e t about and with p r and in and t. 
Your Favour obedient servant 
D about r d and f f about r d8 

6 2 
Participants: 
Semyyuel. Dan Iel. en and Semyyuela. - train M.B. - N y y uch and t e l. D about r and I e N shch and N and River. 
Sam: Here we also met, my old friend. I am glad that you vyglya dish is so good, to joint stock company and all your friends, zhi vushch and e in your village. 
Dan: N adeyus that all of them stay in kind zdra-in and and... P about to r and y N e y m e r e, about N and y l and t and to about in y m and, to about a gd I arrived here. However I am upset by another - you you - look extraordinary pale. You what, was ill recently? 
Sam: P speaking about the truth, no. Glory of B of regional public institution, with zdorov-I eat at exchanges everything is all right though it seems to me that in on - sledny time stirs up me from meat a little. 
Dan: And what, buddy? Did you decide to care for the whole world? "And bo the grief for the sake of B of RSA makes neizmen-Nov pok ayan iye to rescue, and the grief wordly makes death", 2 To a shouting.7.10. This is a great sin, I result - shch y from disbelief and doubt in B ozhestvenny provide-scientific research institute if the person wants to get up over wordly grief. 
Sam: I also really am concerned, but not from about what you sk azat. And bo at exchanges I, glory of B of regional public institution, it zhela-N and I in and z N and N e in about z N and to N e t. 
Dan: The N about can be this concern results from awareness of sinfulness? If so, then everything can do pe-r e m e to N and t with I to l uch highway e in m at. 
Sam: N et, no. P the reasons and me it is unknown. Dan: Then I will dare to ask you a question that 
e, in with e - t and to and, e t about t and to about e? Mind about l I yu, about t in e t m of N e. I e friend to you, isn't it? 
Sam: Yes - yes, of course, I always considered you ho-the roshy friend and I am sure that you will give me a beam - 
shy council, as suddenly vy9yasnilos that we 
we live in very bad derevn e. I even think, 
that in one of the worst in England. 
Dan: P to ochy? And I - that to myself thought that you are upholstered - eat in the beautiful village, in the fresh air and the UAV - the godatny earth. 
Sam: N and air... Air - that here at anything, here wicked men. 
Dan: Wicked men? Where the person zhi l, it carried - the N atkn etsyatsya by N and N and x. B ogokhuln ik, liars, swearers, tramps, p ya N and the c y, fornicators, idlers and, players in braids - ti, very sage arrogant men - they everywhere, and them is a lot of. 
Sam: N et, I do not mean them, put not in them Witches at all, these the old, enjoying support дьявол^ witches - here to that the m e disturbs N I 10. 
Dan: And what you made it that you think, budts 
you were bewitched? 
Sam: N et, no. I think that any evil ghost not smo zht to put me N ik with joint stock company oho of damage though I enough on hear An about that harm which they the reasons yat to people, they send on them lameness and kill them cattle Yes - yes, they pursue adults and children. They say that in this district there are not enough cities and villages, but in each of their N one will surely be found - during the pesh of their walks I see two witches then, there - I will tell you it to joint stock company to the friend! - what - that darlings of c and. Consciousness prompts mn e that it is the witch or what - that demons sky spirit. P Rich he always stares on me N I. And sometimes at myself in the yard I meet ugly las ku, highway mygayushch uyu there - here and in the shed - huge from a vratitelny cat. It to me too not to liking. 
Dan: N about you still any witch of anything not to food of l and l and, N e t and to l and? 
Sam: Z ayesh that, I cannot do it sk the Azat, but am afraid that can be and made N as in our city lives parochk too and and x, and I do not love them. Especially one of their N, old woman. To joint stock company I tried to please her as if to the mother, gave it everything that she wanted, and nevertheless, I think that she watches N all the time, - me frowningly. I have a swine ya which obychsh ate together with all others and, in my opinion, she was with vershenno healthy still yesterday. And so, whether this morning her N ash died. Mine of wives y had five hens and all of them died. So some neighbors suggested to burn: whom - nibud, a rooster or this pig; others soveto1vali to me to ask 2 helps at what - nibud the magician 1 ds 
that, to joint stock company about N and 1 reasons yat to me still that - or. Here yazyxwvutsr v 
I want to make, to joint stock company luchsh e. 
Dan: And is at you what here - nibud the magician, a cat ry and really helps? 
Sam: Is, tell, one here. He lives in dvadtsat; miles from here with B.'s town and already helped much. In two miles there lives one my friend from here. So he was largely not lucky: he lost two cows from three and four pigs. So he was not even given and 15 shillin g for a pig. The N at here he also went to that person and sk azat that he suspects one old woman in this district 

6 4 
He told me what that person pok azat to it in a piece of glass, sk elements at the same time that at that wives shch and N y go to improvised three or four cherten whom someone azyvat N spirits. And so, razraz their thunder, one is similar to a gray cat, the second to caress, and the third - N and a mouse! Al, that the village of N and to joint stock company will not get rid of them! To rum that is go, that person told it and what she intends to make. All this happened half a year of N the Azat and since then at not - go in the house all in poryadk e. To rum of that, in twenty five mi-the Pole from here, in R.H., lives alone very known wives Russian cabbage soup - on. To it all come when almost all hope it is already lost and. The daughter of my neighbor - and the girl of all - syat years - lameness overcame, and it was so hurt by a back that she could not even sit. He went to this wives shch in e and it sk azat to him that somewhere near them zhi-vt N the what bad neighbor for whom it dolzhn y were, according to the preliminary arrangement, to marry. Toch-it she promised to tell in case the father descends home and will bring that - nibud from her clothes in what it, that is the girl, previously dolzhn and to oversleep all night long. My neighbor came back home and tied the to - Cherie around a neck the small towel lying obych-but on p about l e. N autro he returned to this wives shch and N e, at - x in and t and v, e with t e with t in e N of N oh, p about l about t e N of c e with with about bo y, and about N and with to and z and l and to it that the girl is really bewitched, and the story - la that in this case it is necessary to do P oluchiv lekar-stvo, it cured the daughter during the same day and it ozhi-la, having become the ordinary bright little girl. L at other my neighbor of wives and it is constant about what - that worried; so it - went to same wives shch and N e and it sk azat to it that pursues his wife to joint stock company oh spirit. I do not know that it poso-vetovat to it to make, but his wives and suddenly povesele-la. I hear it is scarlet also, not, to Shai, the truth it or not that it constantly carries with itself the Gospel from And an oanna or what - that a part it. 
Dan: N about (you have plant louses so iye skillful zn akhar, then of what to you to be afraid? 
Sam: Z N ayesh, I even decided was give to drink in. but some advise me to go to that man in the town B., and others - to that wives shch and N e to R.H. I waste in a razda miya time, and meanwhile I can be ruined before, to joint stock company I will receive means to disposal. To oye-who in general advises me to beat this witch till it bleeds and to threaten her with the gallows. Oh, if I zn am scarlet, what is better, having so given - but would already make. 

3-3400	 
Dan: I think that glavn aya the danger is now that you sit on two chairs. 
Sam: It is the truth. If I knew N avern I to and at least about one of these people, then would go to it. The N about I is glad that today met you. P I dew ret, advise, what should I do. N adeyus, you are not Quality Department azhesh. 
Dan: Sees B og, I will give you luchsh and y council, mi which is capable and which, to joint stock company I think, the N and advantage will go to you if, of course, you follow it. I am very sorry that everything so developed, but most likely you are really bewitched. 
Sam: Bewitched? Do you think I is bewitched? N about at me N I hurt nothing!!! You speak strashn ye ve-shch and... 
Dan: N et, I do not think that this old woman bewitched you or your body. The N averny, is bewitched your mind, bewitched by a blindness and disbelief to take away you from B of RSA and to force to worship it (to a devil. - 
P ER.), addressing thus, m for p3 omoshchyyu demons. 
Sadly to me to see, to joint stock company dya in l1 bewitches tysya- 
chi people and they run behind it and even bring it Gers TV y. 
Sam: I N of an ikogd will not obey to a devil! P oklonyatsya to it?! Fie on it!!! I am a N en to an avizh his all heart! Du - you wash, I will look for the help at him? N et, we will find means against it. I think that it never hundred - ratsya to be good to people and never N iky helped. 
Dan: However, the situation is here not so, to joint stock company we imagine, but so, to joint stock company learns Word B of an ozha of the е14th though the person and thinks that he does not worship a devil and does not look for the help at demons, moreover, - when of it and does not think about what it constantly ubezh is given, we, nevertheless, by means of Word B ozhy of N and r at and in and e m, h t about of N p about to l about N I e t with ya and m and p r and e and e t to n and m, i shch and p of m about shch and. 
Sam: So zn you achit you think that there are no witches? Whether the N about N <' suffered the Lord, seeing that harm is done to persons of no character? And whether you think that so iye iskusn ik help people by means of a devil? I very much would like - to dit Ube you, but I slish a lump am weak in P ison of AI. However we have a teacher here; speak, he well knows svyashchen-ny texts in addition svedushch and in armor of N and. To stat, now it - and call him M.B. - has to come to msh home. And so, I ask you to unite yours and efforts 

bb 
in this N AI is put in order and to discuss the main point. You are people scientists. 
Dan: It would be not bad, odn Acre N and all needs vre-mya, and I was going to go to one place on an important issue. 
Sam: I beg you, agree! H to an etyra, pya t hours - in e d e t about t and to m and l about! 
Dan: N at well, I will go with you. 



Sam: en and, I brought the friend so I ask 
you, meet him to joint stock company it is necessary. 
en and: Very much to you I am glad. N about zn ayesh, the hubby, voob-shche-I strongly become angry about you and I hardly restrain about t t about go, h t about t y N e p about highway e l p about p r about with and t p about m about shch and p r about t and in y the old bitch. This night at us one more ku-died riyets. Others N akhodit means from it! To us M.B. came now and told that kind wives shch and N and R. all last week of N and to joint stock company could not shake up oil. It and worked without rest, pok but did not send the husband to that wives shch and N e in R.H.; when he came back, they threw a heat handful in slivk and, pronouncing at the same time certain words, to joint stock company was N of joint stock company an adhan about that wives - shch in oh, and at their N good, soft oil what they did wounds sh e turned out. And I met this old creep this morning. Auger's B, with to joint stock company to them expression - as if okhotn ik N and the victim - vzglyan an ula it N and exchanges I, and, departing that - there murmured that! I even rasslysha-la something. "Ah - sk she azat - your husband the honest person, but I hear it is scarlet that he despises exchanges I". You know, at me inside everything turned over. N about here I on - undertook courage and scratched it. P a ravda then I is-was frightened that could with it and not master - it so aya the healthy aunt. I want me to me at - highway of la kind wives shch and N and R.I to ask you, my dear, descend, please, to that of wives shch and N e. You dobe-rtsya for poldn I there. 
Sam: en and, I ask you, calm down. I asked mo-his old friend to talk on this subject to M.B. because he sk azat to me that we fell into a deep zabluzhde-of N and e. 
M.B.: N askolko allow me mine zn An and I and spo-sobnost, I think that the small reasoning on this subject can serve to us the known service. Word 

3

*  

7 
The B ozhy yavstven N about pok azyvat N am that witches sushchest-vut. To rum of that, it rules to sentence to us them to death. And from N of our experience we slish a lump well zn Ai about that set of the evils which they can us p ri chi N and t. And if who - suddenly has a way - a nost ok the Azat the help in fight against their N, to joint stock company we are m about e m in t and to about y with and t at and c and and about t to and z and t with I? R and z in e y N e we drink m when getting thirsty? R to an azva we do not put on warm clothes when to N am it is cold? Adequately regrets if who - that stands up for witches, it creations not devout. 
Dan: H I concern exchanges, I am not going zashchi-shch to at witches, and I do not reject at all that from them on - power the devil creates the deya N and I. And x really it is necessary to sentence to death. And we is valid dolzhn y the claim to at means to get rid of N and x. N oh, to joint stock company I already sk azat to my friend, the devil bewitches all by means of witches and conducts them from B of RSA to that they followed it, made it a sacrifice, worshipped it, a subrank yalis his ox, making a set horror - N ykh sins and being involved in various sinful deya by N and I. 
M.B.: If you mean that witches and sorcerers are fascinated by a devil that they refuse B of RSA and follow N and m, worship and submit to him, at - carry to him the victims and make a set tya zhk and x gre-Hove, then I agree with you because I consider that they decline the necks before N to them, otherwise it would be very difficult for it to work with N and mi. N about if you are du - drudgery that search of lifesavers in aspiration un to ichtozhit them lead to the fact that people seduce - sya and go astray a devil, then I will tell that your speeches are hasty and silly because these people passionately vystu-sing both against witches, and against a devil. They throw down it a challenge, resist it, wishing un to ichtozhit its tools. So if you were an erudite person, you would see that contrasts cannot real stvovat in the same subject, at the same time, in the same part and in the same otn Osh en AI: to joint stock company then it is possible that the person of a nen sees a devil, fights against it and his affairs, and nevertheless, follows it? 
Dan: I zn ayu that usually witches and wizards of a dream - Chala are led astray then they stano-vitsya by servants About Aton y: they prisluzhn ik and, and not vice versa, to joint stock company you noticed it. N about I is valid 

68 
I mean that many are under a delusion and avert - sya from B of RSA, N of an acha of N aya to follow a devil, - giving the benefit to influence of witches and sorcerers. And I tell it not about those against whom win piety, but about those who are turned by means of blind anger and wild rage. If I tell it hasty and thoughtlessly, to joint stock company you desired to twist darling and if you, in your opinion, know everything, zyxwvutsrqp of 
I nothing then I can be disproved with a bigger ease. To N about I tell it so is-krenno and so I will be able to justify the N oye by me Word B ozhy is told that your VSR zn An iye and ability will not be able op-to rovergnut my words. First, levers the wine logic will bring sobst-. "P rotivopolozhnost cannot sushchest-vovat in the same subject, in the same vre-mya, in the same part, in the same otnoshe-N of AI". Has to notice that you are blind and are mistaken about these contrasts saying that the first of them - hatred to a devil, the N his epriyaty persons and his acts is in them (people. - P ER.) when actually it exists only in their representation. P to atom that if people speak and think that they from - vergat a devil and it deya N and I, being at the same time bewitched through disbelief and deception and following for dyavo-scrap and ispoln yaya its commands, then really their speech and blind imagination will force things to exist real-but? What from this if the poor beggar - the tramp thinks that she is a queen, and speaks about it. H that, she deystvi-telno any more not than N and shch en to and also does not ask to herself some bread on p r about p and t and N and e? And in highway e y N and N e y about l highway e N e t? 
M.B.: Whether you know... If people frankly vystu-sing against a devil, do not accept him and his works, really you will judge their consciousness and govo-to rit that whether they accept it highway in imagination, worshipping and following it in fact? Whether the N e is a B og the only Judge of hearts human? And then: you, maybe, compare the people staying in zdrav5om mind to mentally ill people and are not absolutely normal - 
m and? 1 
Dan: I zn ayu, perhaps highway to the Lord is allowed pron ikn to utnut in depths of heart human, having reached what is hidden in potayn ykh it ugolk ah. But if these it is shown iya are before 1 all, to joint stock company it is told, a tree pozna- 
it etsyatsya on p by the Leningrad Region I will give 6. If person thoroughly ispovedu- 
et belief And Christ's isus, in everything following word B ozhy then N achin the ayah to build the zhi zn in a new way, 

6Q 
doing good, hardly perhaps to whom - nibud osuzh-to give it and to say that he is the hypocrite doing all this for the sake of vain glory. It is possible that the Lord, razlicha- 
yushchiya of secrets ye N ameren i1ya the shower and, sees also that sobi- 
whether rummages to do c I eat ER 7. On the other hand, if it 
proclaims N and words that also his Dejan Iyy, but at the same time when it attract to is-p y t and N and yu slo in m of B about and m does not accept a devil, v N e z and p N about about to and z y in and e t with I, h it is seduced, tangled a devil in network of delusion, disbelief and sinful Dejan Iyy, in to joint stock company ovy it carries out will of the Satan and glorifies it instead of the Lord of B of RSA whether we can sk the Azat that whether it is the good person highway because he pronounces and e words and has under - bny representations and that it does not accept a devil and 
his Dejan Iyy? "A grief of subjects, k1otorye the evil of N is azyvat good, 
and kindly - the evil", And page 5 8. Dolzhn about to notice that all 
they are in very bad situation, except those who will regret and will be averted from About Aton y. That is why I am about in about r yu, h t about in e r uyu shch and y h e l about in e to m about e t about highway and and t with I in to and - kikh-that from these questions on the reasons e weaknesses in belief and on ignorance. And Menno therefore does not follow spe-to highway and t with otsen to Amy here. P to an oskolk you find mine vi-well that I compare people of mentally ill people and holes - maln ykh, I have to sk the Azat that because of yours - go ignorance you consider that there are no two vi-Dov of mentally ill people: the first, it is N akhodyashchiyesya not in the right mind concerning affairs zemn ykh, and the second - concerning affairs spiritual and heavenly. There is and e which N apravlya-yu t with in about y r and z at m of N and about Kommersant e to t y e t about about m and r and, and t and k and e, k about t about - ry, thinking of objects dukhovn ykh, happen so N ep rava, to and to that N and shch aya brodyazhk and, a m of N I shch aya itself the righteous woman - the queen. R to an azva did not speak St. The apostle, that whether "they p ri N I love of the truth y, B og will send them strong 1z9abluzhdeniye so they will trust a lie", 
2 F e page 2. H t about e t oh, to and to N e with about in r and shch e n and e, p about r h and and about to about l - 
dovyvaniye the Satan of minds of people whom he conducts to about - Manu and zabluzhden to iya, forcing them to believe that they worship B of regional public institution when N and the business they poklonya-yutsyatsya to demons? 
M.B.: Do you think, St. P avet meant it? 
That is what About Aton and bewitches minds human, misleading people, and conducts them to a lie, forcing to believe at the same time that they worship B of regional public institution, at that time to joint stock company they worship a devil? 

70 
Dan: St. P avet really speaks about coming of great An of the tikhrist in strength of the Devil. So those who are seduced by Antichrist and worship him, think that they ok azyvat honors of B of regional public institution. However listen that go-cooks St. And oan N: "Also the whole world was surprised, and followed an animal, and bowed to that dragon who gave the power to an animal; and they bowed to an animal", About shopping mall r D Z 20. Yes then look in the 12th head of the Revelation and there you will find that this Dragon to which pases - p and with t y in m e with t about t about go worship, to h t about y p about the h and t and t B about and, e with t with and m D I - in about l. 21 
M.B.: Truly, your words very much were pleasant to me and I made sure that the devil seduces and bewitches minds human. As for that on - to look for the help against witches, magicians and witches, I do not think that it is necessary to treat them so strictly. Perhaps, I am mistaken, but one I know N avern a yak and: if word B ozhy specifies to me N and mine Osh ibk, then an emphasis - will not be stvovat by me, of course. Give friendly about - we judge this question and do not take offense on exchanges I, so to joint stock company I, in return, will speak about everything that I know or what I think of. 
Dan: In turn, I want to ask you vyslu-to shat all mine vysk azyvan and I. Also let's follow in all this business from one p un to that to another, ostanavli-being howled only where we will disperse in mneni-yakh. And let word B ozhy will be the only Judge among us. 
Sam: To me the N ravitsya. There is nothing to add here so I sit and I listen to you. 
Dan: And so, to joint stock company oh we will discuss an issue the lane - 
you are m? 
M.B.: I hear it is scarlet that you sk an azalea if, of course, I am not mistaken that there are such witches who act by means of a devil. P I dew ret you, tell, you think that it indeed? I zn ayu that some think in to an acha. 
Dan: It is so obviously confirmed St. P isani-I eat and appears from experience, that is that exist - we acting by means of a devil or, it is better ska to zat, the devil acts with their help that desire to prove opposite will demonstrate only fault-finding of the people wishing to make it. 
M.B.: I am glad that in it Poon to a kta we adhere uniform mn en iya. N adeyus, as further all bu- 

7 1 
is put to be in a similar way. And what you will tell about the following is approved iya: that witches have the spirits, some one, some it is more - two, three, four or even five; some of them act in one appearances, others - in another: in vi-a cat, caress and, la of grounds to and, we are highways and. To their witches ormit 
milk or in c yp la tam2i, sometimes allow them sli- 
to zyvat to apelk and to r about vi. 2 Witches cause them when 
who - nibud offends them, at the same time they incite du - to do Hove offenders harm - to wound them either to kill, or to ruin their cattle. 
Dan: The extraordinary delusion and great deception consists in it. Here the devil conducts ignorant people to gross blunders thanks to which he vver-gat them in many regrettable sins. 
M.B.: Then I have to say that you zabluzhdaye-t e with, e with l and about t r and c and e t e vs e e t and in e shch and, about in about r I, h t about vs e e that some illusions. Similar already repeatedly dokazyva-elk, at least even numerous p ri zn An and I mi sa-my witches. I, in turn, test disturb - a stvo in this occasion and I can, having given a set fak-t, to tell about similar cases. Within these five years I zhi l in one village also was at us one zazhitochn y the person there. And suddenly within ten days at it die three cows, his bull at the cost of 10 pounds went lame, shot it in a back, and dithat it in in about z r and with t e with e m and l e t about t p r and in and l about with in m and r and n about y. About N p about highway e to that wives shch in e in R.H. and she sk azat l to it that N and it the witch sent damage of N of EC aya. P ri it she added that in its town there live three witches and one sorcerer. She asked it which of N them he more suspects. N and that the N ash men and answered that to him one is suspicious old wives shch and N and. P a donkey of what he forced this old woman to appear before the wordly court and to answer everything vop-dews. N of joint stock company it ets, after long zapiratelstvo it sozna-las in everything. And what became clear there? It had three spirits: the first in a species of a cat which it N azyvat Legkonog, the second - in the form of a toad. It Lang h called Tre-of tiya the N and caress resembled and whether carried to chk at Hitroum-N y. She told to court that this Legkonoga to it proda-la sixteen years ago N of EC aya matush to and B of Arly from V., p about p r about with and in z and N e go l and highway p e h e N y y p and r about about to. P r and e it sk azat m that the cat will serve it good service and that if she wants, will be able to send it on the instructions. To atom it used it not for long, odes - 

72 
N and to about l and with to and and and and and with p r and in N about and with p about l of N I am l and about I z and N of N about with t and: the cat ruined a cow, caress and - horses, and a toad nasyla-la I spoil N and people. All of them it sent (on sobstven-to Nome prizn An iyu) against this person. Sentence her - whether to prison it is concluded iyu and there she almost at once and died. I can porasskazat to you a lot of things that is to about oh, the N about and t about l e e in e that m m e with t e I would be a N e with about and r and yu with. 
Dan: N at, about me you are mistaken. I do not say that these things do not exist; just I think that the devil by means of similar is shown y deceives and with - rotates ignorant people and conducts them to zabluzh-to deniye and regrettable sins. That is why let's check each situation, the N oye is stated by you, and you will see that there is nothing else there. 
M.B.: And exchanges of N about it I would also like hear to at. You, zn achit, prizn the ayah that they have in service of spirits who - one who - is more and that those exist in uk an adhan of N of ohms of appearances. Into what sorts of delusion are entered then similar people? 
Dae of N: First, we will consider that there is a huge set, and N ymiy words, army of demons that we see already in Evan helium. Many demons lodged in the person, that is why Christ speaks: "To joint stock company yours 
name?" and 23slysh it answer: "Legion, because us set", 
M and r to. 5. So demons exists extraordinary 
it is a lot of, and all of them are conducted so great nenavi-by Stew to B of regional public institution and so great zhelan iy to reach that, h that y E g about p about N about s and l and i N about z about r and l and, since about r and I p r and e t about m about t of mad rage and hatred to people that all of them connect the efforts together, helping and advancing each other in all the deya of N and I x. Even in P ison of AI it is saidit is saidit is said, that is the fact that they look as if one uniform Demon. Here words St. P etr: "P your rotivnik, 
the devil, goes, to joint stock company roar ayushch and y4 a lion, both shch ushch and y whom 
it could absorb", 1 P e t. 5. To 2 B 12 chapter of the Revelation 
all 2nd demons make that huge red drako- 
N and. 5 And With p and with and t e l N and highway I in l I e t, to and to about N and p r e in r and shch and yu t with I 
in one when says: "If the Satan is separated from the Satan or if Sat2ana demands the Satan, to joint stock company will resist 
its kingdom", M f. 12. 6 So now all so or other 
che has one result, svya Zahn and whether the witch, to joint stock company she considers, with all at once or with mn ogy: to azhdy of them works not one by one, but by means of others. That is why, if such men and or wives shch and N and keep up acquaintance to one demon, then it equals to that, 

7. 4 
to joint stock company if they had the friends one hundred demos - is new. The B is more scarlet than that, these demons - spirits, they have che-go-no that similar to a body, though can appear in N what images, to and to that magicians before eyes f araon2a7 when their staffs were turned into snakes made once, 
And with x. 7. That is why one demon can act in vi- 
four or p I ti, and four or five demons cancan azatsya by one is uniform stven N ym. All this is pok and * uniform in many respects and vice versa - tricks About Aton y. 
M.B.: Then whether you think that the more - mon, the Satan is more powerful? 
Dae of N: It so, but here almost nothing N elzya to distinguish because if the witch also makes that - that, so to her and one - Maun can be in ten images and vice versa. 
M.B.: N at yes, it is possible to agree with it. P I dew ret you, continue. 






















Dan: Now we should note, to JSC Sv. P the isaniye represents to us demons. These are powerful awful 
spirits, vlastn ye, angry and cruel, comparable with te2m 
huge strash N ym to rasn ym a dragon of ohms, About shopping mall of river 12 8, 
or with a gluttonous and hungry lion, which nachi- 

74 
aches to roar after a prayer, 1 P e tr. 529, and with N azvan N y- 
mi St. P avly to N ya3 zya m and, masters and governors 
darkness of this m and r and 0. And so, as they prin imat 
form and x zhalk and x creatures to joint stock company to Osh to and, we are highways, a toad and caress and, we see, how they artfully hide the tyrant iyu and the power which is carried out by them over sulfurs - dets weak. The B is most scarlet to us it is necessary zn to at as the strong enemy resisting to everyone and everything, we have. So the N should am be soared to the Lord of B of regional public institution that it allocated us with the force in fight against N them. 
M.B.: Well, but that - you mean by it? I do not deny at all that P ison iye really depicts N am these demons to joint stock company of powerful and evil spirits. Possibly, they really so ova, though are before Amy's N in the form of a cat or caress and. 
Dae of N: H I concern exchanges, I do not say that they are not powerful and not uzhasn y because appear in and x here images, but prizn ayu that a similar form of their appearance of N uzhn and to hide and hide their force and e f f EC tivn ye actions which they make in temn ykh human hearts. Also notice, please, ho-Roshen ko that strength of demons is exactly in the hearts of people. They harden hearts, blind spiritual zre-N iye; thanks to corporal lust both zhelan and yu they vver-gat them in anger, rage, envy and incite to cruel murders; they excite in N their pride, vysokome- 
ry and tshchetn uyu glory, conduct to 3b1uystvu, to libertinism and about - 
chy otvratiteln ym in e shch and m of N hell all this they I rub - 
ditsya constantly and with such effectiveness that without force slavn ykh stradan y and it is revived iya the Lord of our N And an isus Christ which we find in belief, they nevoz-can resist, that is why they also perform in ro-as l and N e to about e y p r and with l ug and, z and N and m and yu shch e y with I p about r h e y in N and p and t to about in, do them zhi r to N y by m and, do not allow cheese to cook, and to oil to get off, exhaust to Ur and pigs, N and lower people of N chilly - I weave, etc. 
M.B.: The N about can be they do not do all these ve- 
Russian cabbage soup at once? 
Dan: Perhaps, but I consider that p ok and they Zahn ima-yutsyatsya to rup by N y mi affairs, to and to, N an aprimer, excite tyrants or angry lyu2dey to pursue, wear also wasps - 
korblyat E van gels e, 3 plunging their N and c; to divide 
kings and the kingdom and razzh a corduroy road between N them wars and hatred, and disagreement and quarrels between the husband and - ache, introducing and m in the way a commotion and bespo-everywhere 

7 5 
the row, they, dolzhn about to be, Zahn imatsya and p ustya to Amy, but it they so N astraivat minds of people that those cannot see them and just do not turn vn and Mang and I for their role in all this. 
M.B.: I pon imat what you under all this podra-zumevat, but the N and to joint stock company is not known to me to what you conduct? R to an azva vi dya shch and e all deeds not prizn atsya by witches what everything mentioned by you - work of a devil? 
Dan: N evezhestvenny people, it is strong zap stealing of N ye - mom, in words really prizn you at all that, to joint stock company and sk an azalea, but the code it comes to the real business then all of them reject. And bo the devil constantly besieges a shower at 
the person, str3emyas will throw in it all the awful stre- 
ly, E f EU. 3 wishing to death both zran and t it with the help 
sinful villain of N y. "The devil goes around, to joint stock company of roar - yushch y a lion, and shch and whom it could absorb", 1 P etr.5. By means of deception, using at the same time witches, demons for - stavlyat blind people to represent that they N of an ikogd will not approach close N to them unless in case - we become angry also N ash Luth of their N and whom - nibud. So they can easily be taken away if to burn what - or live sou - a shchestvo, N an aprimer, a pig or chicken, or having beaten till it bleeds the witch. Dumayushch iye that from N them it is possible - to curl a log hut or in this way, or having poured a heat handful into milk, the N and the business is far and from pozn An iya spirits - ache fight in which we dol4zhn y to act under zname- 
it against dya in la.3 Iechtch e less they know Christ, to joint stock company 
primen yat weapon of B ozhy (to joint stock company spoke St. P avet) 5 for that is 
go to resist and defeat him, E f the EU.b.3 It mo- 
zht to influence N and their shower and even then when it it is simple slu-highway the ayah. They prin imat it not as it stands, but through its messages when in their bodies there is pain, and their good and property bears what - or a loss. 
M.B.: I do not deny at all that demons stremyat- 
sya, glavn ym in the way, destroy and t a shower and human. The N about (to joint stock company I pon the yawl) you prizn the ayah that they, being the ambassador - ny witches, also make all these is broken iya. And after all I do not see p ri chi N y why people cannot N of an IT of means get rid from and x misfortunes and izgn to at by means of what - that suitable these demons? R to an azva With l about in about B about and e z and p r e shch and e t of N and m and with p about l z about in and t and x? E with l and I am sick, unless I will not resort to the medicine help? And the EU - whether I suffer from thirst, unless I will not drink water? Yes, I agree with you though till this moment I never noted so definitely that the devil acts here 

7 6 
extraordinary izoshch Wren of N about - communicating with all to and mi pus-tya highway of N y mi Amy's thing, he hides the participation in more serious as if it is not here at all also nearby. But the thing is that I resist to it in these serious a thing ah; so unless I cannot ispolzo-vat that N uzhn oh, and what will save me from him in ve-Russian cabbage soup less zn achiteln ykh? I am going if, of course, I am able, to get rid of him in everything. 
Dan: Whether N about we yet p ri highway to that, to joint stock company of the witch on - banish devils and to joint stock company they put all these injuries. Here - that also is the main insidiousness of a devil by means of which he misleads a set lyu-Tay. However we is somehow accidental upomya-zero about means to get rid of it as (to joint stock company I already spoke) dumayushch iye to get rid of it vysheopi-do not know a sled image spiritual fight. Still me-it they know, to joint stock company yat all weapon of B of RSA is necessary podn to overcome the Devil. P an oryadok of N ash to it conversations before - p about l and and e t, h t about with N and h and l and m y go in about r and the m about t about m, to t about to about go p about - banishes, then about all corporal is damaged iya, koto-ry the devil puts, and then about those means, koto-ry are used to defeat him. So let's return slightly N the Azat if you agree about those m, about the h e m I with e y h and with go in about r and l. 
M.B.: I will make it with big hunting because and m about - at once we will miss nothing. However to me to it azhtsya that we is completely uniform odushn y that witches send the spirits and make a lot of evil to joint stock company concerning people, and in the relation zhi votn ykh. Says us about it N ash daily experience. And if you do not deny what witches show in the activity, then, I do not doubt, on all this vop-to dews we will reach agreement. 
Dan: I say that witches send the spirits. M.B.: So to us then N uzhn oh, to bring 
result on it p un to that, N and which we dolzhn y sogla-with and t with I? 
Dan: N at though we also agreed that some on - banish others, nevertheless, we can disaccord N and the one who whom sends. For N of an achal tell - those to me: who is a servant, the witch or the Devil? To that from their N orders and who submits? 
M.B.: To joint stock company I can answer N and this question? It is considered that it I vlya etsyatsya by her servant and when the witch than - that is not satisfied and also I want mshch en, she N of An imat it that - 

77 
he would make that to it N uzhn the lake. Witches neodnokrat-but p ri zn avals s in it, and as for exchanges I, I am du - to May that the N and to will not be able to disprove it. 
Dan: Vypoln yayushch iye will of B ozhyyu essence children and servants of B of an ozhya. Vypoln yayushch iye pozhelan iya the Devil and under - a rank yayushch iye6sya to it an essence children and his servants, And oan.8.44; - 
I am a N 1 3. 1 0. 3 N e p r and in d and l and? 
M.B.: N at yes! Dan: These demons are governors of darkness of this world, 
Eph es.6.12.37 
M.B.: The text slish to ohm is clear. Dan: Darkness of this world does not mean darkness of night at all, 
whether I vlya yushch eysya highway an earth shadow, but am darkness du8khovnaya, 
with about with t about I shch and I in N e z N and N and and B about and, N e in e r and i and g r e x e. 3 
M.B.: The N ascht it I agree with you. Dan: Whether you then so think that the devil has 
the seat, the possession and the kingdom in a fit of temper not - vezhestvenny and blind incorrect? 
M.B.: Has to with need notice that it indeed. To it I am brought also by ozha word B e; it it is valid to N I z darkness. 
Dan: And whether is in whom is nibud a bigger disbelief and darkness, than in witches, magicians and in other, have - shch them zn an akomstvo with a devil? 
M.B.: I think that disbelief and darkness would overwhelm them about l with highway e, h e in m to about about y that N and y in l of the lake. 
Dan: And now put everything about what you sk an azalea, together also look whether it corresponds to the fact that the witch is a servant of a devil, but not it it prisluzhn Ik. He is Mister and to Oman di r; she submits to it, you - poln yaya all gryazn uyu work. 
M.B.: Yes, it is.Yes, it is.Yes, it is. However though he and Mister, nevertheless, in certain cases it uses it. Witches prizn at that they call them and posy-bark where it is necessary; or N of An imat them to do much harm to whom - that lichn about or to spoil the cattle at the one with whom they were dissatisfied. 
Dan: I am very sorry, but you are deeply mistaken. P r and with to about r to N about to about d and to t about - l and about with about in e r highway and e t of t and to about about r hey yeahhey yeah about highway and to and, about with about e N of N about e with l and e t about the h e l about in e to uch e N y y and p r and z in and N - ny to teach others. 
M.B.: Words yours and x I odn will not accept Acre because if you deny also it, then to argue silly on what - or further. I firmly stand N and the point zren iya, on that, h t about I z N and yu, and with N e e m e N I am a N e with t about l to N at t. P about with l ush and y t e e 

78 
mee*nya. In one big city zhi la of m atush to and V. A at 
^ the spirit, vn eshn e resembled caress. To joint stock company - that time her somebody very strongly offended G.M. P having come home, she you is 
called the evil ghost who lezhal3 9 in to orzin to e with 
the wool standing at it under to ro vatyyu. P ozhelav on - 
to send a pestilence on this person, it sk azat to spirit that pre-delivers it an opportunity to kill this G.M.I still it sk an azala that will give it a rooster that subsequently and .sdelat; and the spirit ush ate. P ocht at once that man fell down in a bed, he was awfully hurt by a stomach, for not - how many days he sharply weakened and soon died. This - ma was brought and to court, is condemned and hung up. To with t and t and about in about r I, about N and in about in with eat p r and z with N and l and with. 
Dan: I already said to you earlier that do not wipe at all - to Cai of these a thing to her; and, nevertheless, all of you - deception - are howled about their essence. With to an azhita, unless govo-rit not the truth St. P etr - "the devil goes around, to joint stock company the roaring lion, and shch and whom it could absorb", 1 P et.5? 
M.B.: N at and that? Dan: To joint stock company that? N of an euzhela you are so ordinary that 
do you imagine as if the devil lies in to orzin to e with yarn, in a cosiness and heat and does not move at all whether unless highways togas - yes, when will ask him or for what - that N aynut? Such demons agree about the actions, they ener-gichna and N of an ikogd have not a rest, neither in the afternoon, nor at night. They N of an ikogd are not tired, to them the N of an ikogd is not cold, they do not need a soft bed. Exist, to - nechno, so iye silly highways utk and by means of which he deceives witches and bewitches minds of many to the boor - stvenny people. And the fact that you say as if who - the N of An imat him too deception. And therefore whether allow highway for - to give you two - three questions, or if to be necessary, it is slightly more. 
M.B.: And what questions are? Dan: You say that the witch comes home races - 
serzhenny. To that, except a devil, can soften and uti-to sew anger in her heart? To that fills her brain with rage, e l and N and e m y t about t about m shch e N of N about y, with t r e l m e N and e m with about in e r highway and t different dirty tricks, to joint stock company not a devil? Whether in N e he governs her heart? With to an azhita what you think about it? 
M.B.: Has to prizn at that the devil vozbuzh-gives in her anger and rage. 
Dan: So he does not lie at home in baskets ke at all 
with
  p rya necks, and N and to that not the N of An imat him. Therefore, 
the witch goes at it in poden shch ik ah, submitting 

74 
to it and it uk an adhan and I am m, and not vice versa. And therefore tell me whether the devil is similar to huge red drako-on, Otkr.12., the N of N who is burned with rage against the Lord, p r e and with p about l of N e about go to r about in and in about y, e with t about the h and y highway e y N e N and in and with ti against people? And unless not it is more ready for any evil - act, than to joint stock company oh of men and or wives shch in and? 
M.B.: The devil is more cruel than who - or from people. It is impossible to deny it. 
Dan: So if the N ikto does not deny it, and he makes the evil and anger in heart of the witch, then why to it it is necessary also to imatsya N of An somewhere? It excites her, and 
if vozn ikn et need, czyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV of l is able to avert it 
from zhelan and I to use him. So why to it to be in service? R to an azva it for whom - that goes, for a chicken - mi or for c yp la tami? It what, it is hungry, to it, perhaps, getting hungry? 
M.B.: There is no N et-, however it is considered that the devil before - accepts all this in order that dock the Azat, as if the witch prin adlezhit to it. 
Dan: P lips will be so. That you sk an azalea, are that - that so oye... N and the business he gets much more deeply because the truth is that he convinces the blinded people as if he almost does not interpose in their matter. N about even if to it that - charge or somewhere send, then and then in all this his intervention is shown. That is why all also attack on old women whom though somehow it is possible to suspect that they are witches as if they represent heads - ny danger to the world. It is possible to think that all bu-it is put well and all will appear in safety if them you are 
drive. Here 4pochemu from them also begin so thoughtlessly from - 
bavlya tsya. 0 I zvestno that many consider as if - 
ma, having own spirits there is something it seems a forehead of the century holding bad dogs. It can set them on foreign cattle and dogs will obey to it because to it - mu there is a tendency in their nature though they never achn ut to do to N nothing similar, unless to them only p ri to anut. So here all harm occurs from the person who has such dogs. People a thought - yut that the village will be able to get rid of all these spirits if there is nobody, setting on them or posy-barking them at business. They think that in that case both they, and their cattle will stay in safety. Alas, unfortunate it is created iya! To joint stock company they are mistaken! 

80 
With to about l m and l 0 they understand in the highest P rovideniye of B of RSA 
the Almighty reigning over all N of Amy. 
M.B.: So, zn achit, you think that witches should not be expelled? And whether you consider that it will not become better for residents of this village if they are able to get rid of them? 
Dan: As for izgn An iya witches, on this subject P isaniye speaks quite definitely: "You should not allow witches to live", however whether before p un to that we yet Dosch. Main thing here here that: whether the person can be quiet if to expel witches, to joint stock company of N and volume on - the stray and blinded people melt? 
M.B.: The person feels that pain and those wounds y which they put him even if people it is very much old - yutsyatsya izgn to at them. In it there is nothing surprising. N about it would be good if it was possible to clear of them all earth. 
Sam: Truly, M.B., I completely agree with you. I wish all of them were hung up the friend opposite to the friend. And then (I hope) we will not be so strongly bo-yatsya their spirits. N about izvin to an ita, I interrupted you. 
en and: And I wish those who will not be hung up will not be burned, straight would send to hell. If whether all highway one vya Zahn to and sick around the world appeared hundred, I and that would carry by her N and myself the whole mile whether highways would only burn this witch! Here! 
Dan: N at ladn oh, kind wives shch and N and, hold - the brushwood so far and do not trouble the shoulders. P ozvol it is better for us to discuss this problem a little more. P I dew ret you to allow me to ask you such question: whether the witch or a devil causes harm to the person and domashn to them zhi-in about ton y in m? 
M.B.: N at, the devil does it own Amy's hands though it has to prizn atsya that all this can look and so, to joint stock company you sk an azalea that is that the devil makes all this in the head of the witch, forcing it on - to banish it where it is necessary. 
Dan: The devil has the kingdom and there is it in darkness and not righteousness of a sin. At it is not present it is right, vla-st over creatures of B of an ozhya mi, it is not so strong to Kill a fly or utashch and t zern ysh to about from what - nibud a barn until it is not given for this purpose strength. You 
you know that when Christ and zgn is scarlet demons from oderzhimogo4.1 
about N and p about p r about s and l and r and z r e highway and t and m in about y t and in with t and to with in and N e y. 
Here and sk to an azhita to me who gives to a devil this power when it is sent by the witch who gives it strength to kill and 

8 1 
to send damage of N and people and animals? Whether the witch put it - et? And whether you think that he has force to create all these zlodeyan iya, but only when it sends it? Or perhaps in your opinion, force to it is given by those f to joint stock company of t what the witch sends it somewhere? 
M.B.: Really, over this question the back should - matsya. N esomnenno that the devil does not possess neobkhodi-wash with force until it it is not given. It not mo-zht to touch, wounds to ityit, to do much harm a nickname - to whom to creation; he is able only ush to at and tempt the claim. To rum of that, I am convinced that only the Lord can allocate it with such force from above, but N and to joint stock company not the witch. 
Dan: Let's unite then two following hollow wives and I: the devil can only harm, but the N ikto not mo-zht to allocate it with such force, neither men and, nor wives - shch and N and, N about t about l to about B about of N about t e p e r with to and and t e m of N e, N e y l and whether people are oddly entered into one cruel delusion enough? And bo if they assume that the devil is something like the executioner Gospodny and obna-ruzhivat that it has the certain strength given to annoy it, to harm and concern people corporally, or to and to and m - t about and N y with m about r and z about m, t oh, z N and I am a N and in e r N I to and, h t about e that proceeds from the Lord, they understand (to joint stock company it and is in fact) that the B og is dissatisfied with them for them about - mortars. And they aspire to N to it and timidly beg to forgive and exempt from this enemy, wishing to the thief to be to multipowerful weapon of belief in order that 
to beat off his N apadk and and proti2vostoyat to him, to joint stock company of the same is 
the Lord, 1 P etr lat. 5. 4 N et anything more the worst 
for the person, than to fall into sinful delusion, thinking that witches made all this, to the management - yas the anger, and not pon imy that there is this from human sins and disbelief. In it there is no N ik joint stock company oho yet - I n and ya, n ik to joint stock company is oho forgiven iya they will not implore to themselves, but will vspomoshchestvovat even more to a devil, using those means which it through razn ykh ordered probation - ny wizards, scraping claws and being scratched, ispy-tyvy I am eager from blood of the victims, burning with rage about tiv those whom they depicted as witches that for - frequent happens incorrectly, as people think that if usual sorcery of witches is absent, then not the dale - zhno to be also so many disasters and the evils. As if and but there was a N and to the earth of sins and disbelief, or disappeared spra- 

8 2 
vedlivy punishment and to the macaw of B of an ozha y or as if the N have it no demons, performers of his anger any more. 
M.B.: P oistin e, words yours and N agn Ali of N and me stra-hu because leaves, as I am guilty of all these priskor-bny a thing ah. P about to paradise of N to it to a measure, you depicted it quite so. However, at will of B an ozhiya, I more vni-will matelno think over this business. I spoke with many, the N aspiring to these iskush en ym to people, zhelavsh them to use their help, agrees oprede-lenny is ordered to iya that, by your words, is equal to aspiration to the help of a devil. This question we dolzh-ny now razresh and t as I firmly oprede-flew also about one place from your speech so I want to ask you: do you acquit witches owing to the fact that B og, but not they, give strength to a devil? Don't you think thatDon't you think thatDon't you think that demons will ruin people and their cattle if they are sent not by the witch? Whether P osledut all these the villain - N iya if witches are not? 
Dan: I sk azat that only B og, but not witches give demons strength to torment and exhaust people. It is so obvious, to joint stock company and the fact that there will hardly be a person, about - ladayushch y so oh by force. And prizn it is necessary to at it. However this statement does not rehabilitate at all witches because their sin is in connection with a devil and that 
they represent as if their spirits so4vershayut 
all these zlodeyan iya at their request and N aushch en and bb. 3 Because on 
the business a devil, having force p ri chi in N I t harm or z in N and I, h t about with m e r in t in l and about t I e in l y e about l e z in N and N and with t and of N ut and h e - a loveka, and zhivotn oye, enters the witch into an angry state and lines it to give it what - nibud an assignment. H concerns other your question, I say to you, we see in P ison of AI that if witches were not with - everything, and then the person everything is equally the devil would pursue, doing harm to his health and welfare. Concerning pious people the Lord ispolzu-et the Satan, the reasons yayushch it to them pain, or harming ma-terialno to check their belief and patience, to joint stock company that the N am enough clearly shows an example of the Saint I of an ov. B ylo nonsense and narrow-mindedness to say that witches of N poisoned on it 4 demons, wishing unichto- 
to live him and his children. 4 Moreover, I consider 
extraordinary nonsense if what - that the person thinks that N yn e the Lord does not punish the children for offenses by means of the Devil. To rum of that, there is no doubt that - Maun, having strength given to harm it, uses 

8 3 
all the umrny will also seek to make so that it was sent by the witch, and he will try to make it izve-stn ym so it to will azatsya proceeding not from B of RSA, but from unfortunate angered wives shch and N y. Obra-shch gya the vn iman iye on and x angry people, provotsi-rovavshy B of RSA the immoral acts 
and disbelief, unless we in P isa5n will not see AI that angry 
spirit b. the l is sent by God of N and the tsar From the aul, 4 which to - 
sazhdat and pursued it? The B y this spirit is sent to l by the witch? Whether I4, maybe, the witch sent those spirits in 
E in and N of e l and and, 6 to about t about r y e in about highway of l and in with t and d about with in and N e y and p about of N and l and 
them? Whether N e God gave them strength and sent them? N of an euzhela we will be so stupid to think that He not posy-lat a devil against neblagschestivy people to annoy and harm them? R An it I already said that in that, h yu the Satan is represented sent - mom, his big skill is. The N and most - le him sent B og and N and to that, except B of RSA, could not make it. P omimo it, we dolzhn y to assume that in bodies of people and zhivotn ykh there are natural p r and ch and n y, in y z y in and yu shch and e p r and with to about r N y e m uch e n and ya and b about l e z - N and, able to cause even death. And x elzya to hide N in secrets e therefore the devil knows them about N, especially if they conduct to joint stock company to them - that to consequences. Then it on - chinat to communicate with the witch, it angers her, it N asmat it, and after it the N y the person or an animal in N e z and p is given to N y by m and with t r and N of N y in m about r and z about m of N and h and N and e in t of the h uv with t in about in and t inconvenience, gets sick and dies. P a donkey of what - mu N achin at this to suspect, interrogate her also she at - is known that } beat it are the person or exhausted at that - that sk ogya N at, or jinxed. Here people usually stanovyatsyazyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC in Tong ik are also surprised, to joint stock company it is the witch 
could do to the person harm, having sent the spirits, on - to a skolk they prizn atsya that their spirits lie and si-ly to N and to joint stock company oh they have no, but that harm came following - stvy actions natural p ri chi N. For the same. that - to confuse even more people and to force them pove-to rit, chgo the countries of N ye and N eozhidan N ye diseases prois-go from witches, the devil puts in action other type of sorcerers, men and wives shch and N who tell it slo-you, and to them, to joint stock company you know, has to trust. They govo-a row, chgo the victims were bewitched that presle-fairies gave them and that around, at all - 1 oh, there live many witches, nearly in each city. 
M.B.: That you sk an azalea, without somn en iya, very much pra-vilno. I further and not zn ayu, to joint stock company to disprove it. Wasps - is only thawed to be surprised to skill of demons in these things, and also to the fact that, possessing granted to them vla-Stew P ri chi by N I t harm, they are sent by witches, words - but at the request of the last, and also to the fact that when harm of N and with t unitary enterprise and e t, to and to in y with to and z and l and, p about e with t e with t in e N of N y m p r and h and - to us, they represent everything so that to it azhtsya as if it was made it and. N about you really you think that all or, on to Rein to it to a measure, the most part of all evils, sover-shayemy now, work of demons if we govo-Rome that it is not witches? Though I also have to p ri zn at what witches cannot give to demons of N and to joint stock company oh the power, is equal to joint stock company and they cannot influence whom - or, on - banishing witches, but unless cannot be so what the B og gives a devil strength and the power much of thickets e exactly thanks to existence svya Zahn N ykh with N it witches what could not be if the last did not exist at all? 
Dan: Skill of demons such is that without Word B light an ozhiya even the wisest person on the earth will be not - will izbezhno deceive. M y zn Ai that there are nastol-to kovarn ye and lovk iye people that others can distinguish them not at once. It is so however more difficult to make it on from - to carrying to demons who zn achiteln about more skillfully and more artfully most lovk them from people! As for that question which you asked, it, in my opinion reason - a niya, is rather difficult. The N esomnenno odn what the Lord of B og, giving rather often to demons strength vre-to dit makes to Acre it because of witches as demons svyaza-ny with "tools" of this sort. And these actions - its result otn Osh en iya to incorrectness of people, which N e in z and r and yu t of N and and with t and N of N y y N e e with N y y with in et E go with l about in and. To and to speaks St. P avet, prophesying about Anti-Christ's coming, the B og gave a devil strength through Antichrist for that is go to seduce people by means of a lie vy zname- 
niya and chu7des that whether people p ri N I love 
and st of N y.4 I it is valid, I cannot sk the Azat that dya- 
the ox received this power only for witches, but for the sake of weakness of people who zhi zn yu deserved the that he received the power also from now on and with on - power of witches seduced them. Here we dolzhn y to draw the attention of N and one general delusion to which opro-metchivo the majority follows. Z it aklyuchatsya in sle-blowing: people of N ik cannot see in an oy way that God moves N and these actions their own pre- 

8> 
gresh en iya, providing, respectively, to a devil similar "tools", but address against witches as if those can make anything. 
M.B.: Really, I will be good if achn at from - to ritsat N that the B og grants to demons the power to harm and with - vrashch to at names of N about because of Ali's N chi I human sins. The N about after all me would like zn to at whether it can be become so what pious and N abozhn y muzhchi-in N and or wives shch and the N but will not be bewitched by any? The m y was seen that the devil has force, sufficient that spra-in and t with I with And about in about m. 
Dan.: P the example with And ovy does not approach in order that dock the Azat as if the pious person can be bewitched because here the devil was not connected with the witch in fight against it. However the N y an example dokazyva-e is given to t, h t about N e by t about l to about in l and about the h e with t and in y e, N about and about the h e in N in l and go h e - stivy people (k4a8 to the Saint I ov, similar to which not 
there was a N and z eat with le) can be transferred for is tested iya 
in hands of the Satan they were checked iskush en iy. And, to and to I sk azat where About Aton and possesses the power, the N oh is given it by B an ogham, to harm corporally even blagochesti-to vy people for and the joint venture ytan and I their beliefs and terpene iya, it bu-is put to covet that (especially if it is feasible) that sent it what - N ibud the witch, and also a post - rummages to give to this event general popularity. The N about right dolzhn y to turn away from this witch and obra-to tit the looks to B of regional public institution because from his N everything proceeds. To an ogd they will is tested y, the Lord good luck osvo-bodit Zawiya sya shch and x from N of his N and joy to them and N and glory as if brave soldiers. That is why also I have no zn achen whether the witch sends the Satan against a pious che-of a lovek, or it has with it no N and to joint stock company and x communications. P a reodoly devil, and you will overcome all. Indeed, the devil dominates among most nevezhestven-N ykh people who when he enters with N them a game - t and to t, in about with p r and n and m and yu t in with I to and e I r to and e with l about in and to and to N e h t oh, is told to N oye by the witch. And many N yn e achin at N to confuse - sya and to fluctuate; equally and their belief fluctuates. If it has the power (they think) over zn ayushch and mi P and a dignity and I, then than then the last luchsh e in a professional otno-Shen of AI? Hell of N and mi, to joint stock company and the witch is N above others. Thus, by it it can pok azatsya (that with N them, sob-stvenno, and occurs) that and on - power has to look for means to rescue in other place, than in P isa- 

86 
N and I x. That is why they also go to at the claim of the help where its claim should not be at. 
M.B.: Though I also made sure that it is useless to address these sly fellows for the help against witches, but, I ask you, give - we will discuss still here that. There is dosta-precisely a lot of razla chn y x I vlen and y which wonderfully convinced me to think of these people well, moreover, I began to consider that the B og gave them zn An iye and skill to make dobrodeyaniye. We see many people, N ash edsh them at them on - power and exempted from misfortunes, svalivsh ikhsya on them thanks to the demon am. That is why I first of all would like uzn to at, to joint stock company they can be incited against witches if they it is connected y with demons and, thus, too are sorcerers? To joint stock company then they can think of what - that good and mercy, about with - 
zhalen AI on otn oshe9n iyu to n and shch and m? And whether to JSC Satana 
pursues About Aton at? 4 Because they undoubtedly, expel 
demons from some people. 
Dan.: I would like to answer your questions kasa-telno zhelan and I to find the help at skillful men and wives shch and N, but before sk to an azhita to me here that: did you precisely op-redelitsya in otn Osh en AI of a problem of a parcel of spirits and that harm which they do? And that seems to me that you already turned to other questions. 
M.B.: I cannot sk the Azat that understood the meaning of everything that is go what you spoke about, but now I am sure that I very strongly was mistaken before, and in it I prizna-yu with now. N about e with l and in y p about e l and e t e, m y about with t and N about in and m with I of N and e that m in p r about with e e shch e N e m of N about of the lake. 
Sam.: P speaking about the truth, I and most want that - you would talk about all these questions more podrob-but because though I also attentively listened to everything told by you, odn to Acre the last, sounded in va-shy speeches, I could not pon yat. From your pozvole-a niya, M.B., I will set to the friend couple - another of questions. And so, approximately one lived in seven miles from here, in V.H., healthy men and, somebody M. All neighbors knew it excellently. However within half a year it dried from what - that diseases then died. In this regard his wife visited what - that suspicions; she went to one magician, not zn ayu, however, where, having decided uzn to at why her husband scone chatsya. That told her that he died because it was bewitched. Then he asked her whether she suspects whom - nibud, living on sosedst- 

8 7 
vu. N and that she answered what is one wives shch and N and, to - t about r and I to it N e N r and in and l and with, N e to and I am m and t at highway to and V.K and to - t about r and z she quarreled with her husband and in two days he got sick, h t about y about l highway e e N and to about d and N e p about p r and in and t with I. T of h and r about - Tay also the N y in a glass e showed it the image of this of wives shch, and it is so clear, to joint stock company we can see each other now. It was in the same clothes in which it was in that hour because it old red carried highway ap to at with at of l and m and, t and to at yu, to and to at yu about y h N about N about with I t e N shch and N y. In N e y it also appeared in it stak An e. The magician taught the dead's wife, to joint stock company and m in the way it is necessary to take this a stake - to a dunye to p ri zn An and bb. N at here, she followed his owl - that, p ri highway of la home and made so that that sorcerer for - was held and put before wordly court. Her races - asked so skillfully that eventually it prizna-las in murder of it of a muzhcha of N y. Then it was sent in prison, judged, sentenced to death and to azn and whether. Standing near the gallows, it expressed raskayan iye and about - strength of all to forgive her. It sk azat that it had one spirit in image yellow sulfur to about highway to and. It appeared at it, according to her when this wives shch and N and sat near ogn I; at that moment she quarreled with one neighbor. She zakho-bodies that vengeance of B to an ozhya condescended N and it and all his family. This to Osh to and asked it not to be afraid, sk of elements that not reasons it to it N and to joint stock company oho harm; it already served a certain lady in To an enta on AI of six years is lingering, but those are p e r it x about z I y to and at m e r l and both e with l and e t and e N shch and N and N e p r about t and in, she will serve it. And so to joint stock company, sk this azat to Osh to and, that men and angered you, I if you ho-chesh, N ash lyu I spoil N and it skotin at. en shch and N and sent kosh ku and that killed three pigs and one cow. Zapodoz-Reeve, that - that, this person burned alive one more pig, and this to Osh to and, according to wives shch and N y, more there nikog-yes did not go. Soon she quarreled with this M., sent to him to Osh to at which sk azat it that it allocated it with such disease of which definitely not to get rid. Honestly, this of men and died. And so, whether it seems to you that this wives shch and N and told plain truth? The N of an euzhela it will put forward in the address with m e r t e l N y e about in and N e N and I? R and z in e N e y l and e t and to about highway to and e e the servant? And whether it sent it? R to an azva not it killed these zhivotn ykh and this person? H that in general it is necessary to think of it? 
Dae.: You offer us a private example so 
give really vn imateln about we investigate in it 

88 
everything, concerning this witch, up to that moment, to joint stock company of wives and the victim went to this skillful mu to the magician. So you say that this to Osh to and prish la to her when that was in a terrible quarrel with one of the neighbors and swore, calling vengeance of B about - zhy N and the heads of his and his relatives? 
Sam.: It really so sk azat. I heard it own ush Amy because prisutstvo-a shaft p r and to and z N and. 
Dan.: Then sk an azha to me who inflamed it such dya-with the Volsk rage what it achat N to swear and send damnations, p ri zyvy vengeance of B ozhy to fall upon the heads of it of men y and his relatives? R to an azva not kosh-to and? 
Sam.: P speaking about the truth, I think that all this was made in N e y D by me in about l. 
Dan.: P rekrasno, so, you see that all this representation began with to about highway to and. 
Sam.: You are a N azyvayesh representation? For whom - that it was not a game at all. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, in the end the witch worked absolutely not so, to joint stock company was conceived in her play. However I utverzh-give that as the deceiver the Satan acts here. R not he offered an azva the services? R an azv not it lined it to send it with the purpose to do much harm to this person? And ska zhi to me, really it is so strong that on - to banish it, and he only also waits for it? And whether you prini-wash in vn iman iye what it reigns in her du - she, N ap ravlya I her on similar acts? 
Sam.: I am absolutely convinced that he dominates 
in her heart. 
Dan.: Then, if she is his slave, but not he is a servant to it, then there is no need to line it or uprashi-to vat because if it sends it somewhere to do what it to make not in forces, or he does not see, to joint stock company and m in the way it is possible I vi t for all the evil design, then he will be able easily to dissuade her from it. Look: this kosh-goes and kills the person, or, for example, a cow or a pig. So to joint stock company she will be able to prove that all this with about in e r highway and l and and m e N of N about e that to about highway to and? 
Sam.: To joint stock company she will prove? The N about and happened to it oh men which lost all the cattle. And she saw all this and hear it is scarlet. 
Dan.: This to Osh to and lies, isn't it? Because say that 
t and to and e to about t y and z in e with t of N y e l e c y. 
Sam.: To and I really do not trust the words of this to Osh, 
however in practice all and happened. 
Dan.: N about if this pig and a cow died, whether uve-Wren you that this to Osh to and killed them? Whether N e they could die on what - or natural at - a rank? You zn ayesh, as this of men and, and sko-oozes and it were absolutely healthy and suddenly suddenly died. 
Sam.: It is strange, however, that they could die of the EU - the testvenny reasons - all this happened after that, to joint stock company sent this cat. 
Dan.: It is not strange at all if prin yat in vnima-ny what I told you, and you easily understand it. In bodies of that of men y and zhivotn ykh existed from - vestny natural the reasons y pains, sufferings, lomo-you and even death, however they were so deeply hidden, as most opytn ym doctors did not manage to find them. The devil sees all this, and therefore mo-zht with ease to calculate that time when they prive-here to natural result. P a donkey of what he vstu-sings in a game, creating visibility that all this proizosh-the Leningrad Region is, allegedly, exclusive because of his intervention. The EU - whether at the same time at it is what - nibud the witch who can be used it excites to action opre-divided p ri chi N y, bringing her into angry consisting - ny, and then he can already act is sent to roles - N ik and, at the same time he says to her that he will make - and-. If it has no such witch, it all - equally ra-will light disputes between whom - or one and others lyud-mi, having seeded their seeds of suspiciousness among N, its greatest zhelan iye - to shed innocent blood. 
Sam.: However a question - that here in what: to joint stock company cancan Osh to and make all this? 
Dan.: I already said to you that demons live all together and can extraordinary quickly and skillfully it that is far outside people of chesky is reasonable for a proda of armor iya. And the nogda in hands of a devil renders sya the N aya is given it the power to harm and put mutilations lyu dya to m Let's say that it has this power given it and kills that cattle about which we already spoke; one - to now we face a question - who, your way, allocated it with force to beat and kill? The witch gave I eat \such force or the Lord of B og? 
Sam.: To onechno, the witch cannot give it takop si ly. 

M) 
Dan.: Or perhaps he received this force after that, to joint stock company it sent him? 
Sam.: I cannot do it sk the Azat. Dae of N: Then notice to yourself here that: at a devil was 
the power to give an inconvenience to this person, ispol-zuya property of the last. And he made it, but made fraudulently. The Lord gave a devil strength that vla-to stvovat over good of the Saint I of an ov. That acted by means of certain means too, having used saveyan which took away his bulls and donkeys. The devil used also 5 impudent persons who took away away his camels, 
And ov I 0. N about even in and x cases, having force 
to strike blows, it will be sent what - nibud - mine though he can make all this also without it; dey-stvuya and m in the way, it gets a lot of things that we, however, also will see when we speak about those means to disposal who are alnut by all people. 
Sam.: Strange, odn Acre, the fact that at this person, on - to the sla of that to joint stock company it burned a pig more than nothing not prois-went. 
Dan.: Whether Z N ayesh, the Devil does not take out fried meat, ogn I. He very much is afraid that, burning these zhi-cotton, can burn also it. If on it highways ipyashch iye krasn ye coals get, then they can damage so it that his sovereign will be able to manage also without not - go if she wishes that he any more never came back. However we will talk about all this on - that m, in with in about e in r e m I 5 1. 
Sam.: Judging by your words, the devil in general neoby-is chayno skillful. 
Dan.: He is so skillful, dexterous and resourceful that any terrestrial being will not be able to avoid that - not to be seduced by it if, however, at it che-the loveka does not appear heavenly B of an ozhestvenny word. Aude - nako let's talk after all about that person, koto-horns the witch, on own prizn of An iyu, killed with on - power of the to from. 
Sam.: N at yes, I think of it so; that magician the ska hall of wives shch and N e that her husband was ruined by means of sorcery. The witch prizn atsya in everything before death, and this cat told her that murder was committed. 
Dan.: Z N of an acha of t, all this to omp An and I - persons who can be trusted?! This magician warrants that that muzhchi-on was bewitched to death. And who told him it? 
Sam.: Its spirit which made so that the witch appeared in that glass. 
Don.: And whom, your way, was this spirit - An - gely or the demon? 
Sam.: Some magicians say that at N they are Mo's spirit - iseya, And whether and or what - nibud other Saint. 
Dan.: The devil itself can prin yat an appearance of an angel to a sva of t and 52. The same who think that magicians deal with - kim-that other spirit, but not with the Satan, hardly that on is nimat. The Satan demonstrates that this person was brought to death thanks to sorcery. 
Sam.: The Satan - that testifies and to trust him Nesle zya. Confessed to N about the witch to everything. 
Dan.: And who sk azat about it to that witch? Sam.: It to Osh to and which it sent. Dan.: And who this to Osh to and, the demon, isn't it? Togd 
remember a proverb - "ask about a stolen property the thief" All this business is based on p ok an adhan and I x demons, but they did not bring N and to joint stock company and x to la tv at all. If we not Dov Ryaem p ok an adhan and I am m of people until then, p ok and they not at syagnut, then to joint stock company we can trust the word of demons? 
Sam.: So zn you achit you think that this person was killed not by the witch? 
Dan.: It is possible that the Lord allocated the Satan with force to do harm to a body of that person then it under to and kim-that a pretext also was sent by the witch. N about CKopet of all his body withered and withered on what - that estestven ache the reasons e about which the devil not z N is scarlet, here pocheml to it azhtsya that, byv it is sent, he also made all this though N <! the business it had no force even to concern it And bo without watching N and that. that the Lord allocated a devil of a vl of Stew to put to some people corporal a povrezhda a niya for their mean sins, most of people of which death the witches think that it happened on them zhelan iyu and by means of their spirits in N and the business umi-digs from natural p ri chi N. 
Sam.: Then it turns out that witches of an obmanyv yut, them sneer at N if the devil forces ich to believe that he makes these ub4iystva though on 
business it anything of that kind not delayet5. So, having 
strength given it by B an ogham to harm people and zhivotn ym, it can do it and does without the aid of the witch, IS using it, and m in the way, in quality p ri to ry ti I for most merzk their acts. 
Dan.: I am glad that you correctly understood everything the N oye is told by me. P odumay-properly about all these cases and you will see that this is truethis is truethis is true. 
Sam.: However I interrupted M.B. P I dew ret you, prodol- and y those. 
Dan.: Business to which consideration we now on - whether Dosch, Zac lyuchatsya in the help and means, finding - shch ikhsya in hands of magicians, namely for them and people fight, opposing witches. So, ^гли you wish to offer yours and a question? l, I will try m of N and \au tv e ti t. 
M.B.: P speaking about the truth, I see that to object here is useless, however I would like to speak on on - water of those things which misled me. I see that the person looks for means to get rid of demons, and I think that it is just a gift of B of an ozha y when It gives it to those whom we are N azyvay magicians, for that is go that they made many good deeds. If at che-the loveka vanishes to joint stock company aya-a thing or, let us assume, that - steal, many people go to them and find the help there. I zn ayu one case when was vykra-a dena of bowls and for a participle. C erkovn aya the guards went to a certain wise man and he gave them uk an adhan and I, in to joint stock company oye vre-mya and where they dolzhn y to stand as to omp An and I, uk-ravsh aya this bowls at, dolzhn and was to come there. It poo-beshchat N avern I to and, and, really, all and about - izoshlo. And whether eshch e. One person had a daughter, devoch-to and five years; so to her there was misfortune. And her father, being in an inescapable grief, not zn it is scarlet what to do. Then who - that advised it to descend to wives shch and N e, zhivsh to it in ten mi of la x from it and to bring to it that - nibud from clothes in which this girl lay in a bed. So it also arrived, and this shch and N and sk azat wives that his daughter is bewitched and that if he does not address lifesavers in time, then he will lose the daughter. She on - asked it vzya t what - nibud old clothes, to dress 
in it the girl and to put to bed, zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV and N and morning sn yat and 
to burn. P ri it he has to look: if clothes bu-to burn with Dut chern ym plamen I eat, the girl means it was bewitched. And still it sk azat that the witch will undoubtedly come back home to them. He followed its advice and toch-but, p ri highway of la to joint stock company aya-that there the old woman whom he, sobst-venno, and suspected, and it occurred then, kog-Yes these things still burned. Then the man without special works threw over it the p Lush and began to scratch it 

0 3 
until then, p ok and at that on the person blood did not zastruitsya. Through two dn I the girl got up N and legs. I could pove-give you about many the countries of N ykh a thing ah, but about their N I zn ayu l and highway p about r and with with to and z and m, ho t I e t and m with about about shch e N and I am m m about N about p about l - a nost to trust. B y l here one mya sn and to, and he has a son, malchon to and by the name of John. And suddenly at it the boy and the set of painful wounds opened. R oditel on - to ladyval of N and N and x curative ointments, but N and one of N of their N e m about of l and N both about the h and with t and t and h, n and o l e of the h and t about l. To and to - t about time the father complained to N and it is to one friend and that suggested it to descend to one very skillful che-to a lovek. That and made also N and the question of the one whom he suspects, immediately received the answer - to it pok an azalea in a glass a certain old woman, zhi vsh uyu is lonely in the small house of highway to e N to an epodalek from N and x. The father John and told this magician that this wives shch and N and ush la from their district and that now it is difficult sk the Azat, to joint stock company it is possible to reach it. The N about that prompted to him, to joint stock company and m in the way also h is possible for her N and with t. In y r in and, with to and z and l about N, in about l about with about to and z go l about in y t in about e go the son, put it in clothes and burn all this. And I rucha-yus that she will hurry home so quickly, to joint stock company will be able only. N about burn e that, N e in to amine e, and somewhere a dream - a ruzha because if you make on the contrary, you can have many efforts. The m a yasnik came home and made everything, to joint stock company to it sk an azalea. And this old woman appeared very quickly - she is la's louse to the house, approached the boy and sk azat: "John, scratch exchanges I". It began to scratch it, not p Osh la blood yet and if before nothing could and z l e h and t e about about t about l I would be a h e to, t about t e p e r about N and with and m and and with the h e z l and. H the same dolzhn about to think to the ordinary person about all this? 
Dan.: Really, you told us about people, poluchivsh their help from hands of magicians, and there are no doubts that and x examples it is possible to bring great mnozhest-in. Who has what - was gone, who has that - uk a rally who - is disturbed by health. And here they come to N to them, carrying the diseases and losses, and there to them go-cook that it is necessary to do certain actions and that is to them in the way they are exempted from the sorrows and stradan y. However we dolzhn y pomn to ityit that they receive this help if, its game echn oh, it is possible to azvat so N, is exclusive from hands of a devil. So really you a thought - etet what the person can really resort to on - relics, ok an azyvayemy devil? 

94 
M.B.: N ap ravlya I s to these people, some voob-shche are not convinced that they look for the help at demons. They consider that this force - the gift of B of an ozha y, is given to N y by it in B an ogham to help others. 
Dan.: I am indeed inclined to think that many people really think in this way. N about why then all this occurs? Whether the B og by means of Spirit svo-opens it where is the N aya or the Uke - shch en by N aya a thing is lost? Whether the angel that heavenly or a shower and the certain died person appears in a crystal or a glass, showing shape to omp to An and and, uk ravsh her a thing, or after all it is the witch? 
M.B.: I hear rather yours and thoughts on it vop-dew, than chetk and y the answer to my words. 
Dan.: So iye demons force to trust I zy chn and to ov 
that they are gods, providing so to them in the way seb5e 
human worship and ok adhan iye acceptable p ochesty 5. 
B lagodarya to the insidiousness, they possess a large supply of means by means of which they cancan - stignut it: they prin imat razlichn ye masks y and, being in N and x, give razlichn ye answers if they about what - that sprash are ivat. P ri it they act very skillfully: when they cannot precisely sk the Azat that has to occur, they give it predsk an adhan iye in a foggy form so everything can be perceived doubly. That is why it is necessary to look, to joint stock company oh you hear the answer to an ita because it also discloses essence of these gods. If they know what will turn out actually, to joint stock company they know everything, belonging to kingdoms and to Maun of very holes of the whole world on is written to iya of prophets, or razn ye the data resulting from is predicted y soothsayers, to joint stock company, on - an example when the demon told Saul that he will be killed because he saw that God left it, and hearts and zr5ai ltya N, and f ilistimlyan e preispol-weakened then 
nitsya courage 6 then about all this they rasska- 
z y in and yu t about t to r about in e N of N of the lake. To r about m e t about go, p r and n and m and I about l and to the man or wives shch and N y, they open things, a dale - Goya time the N who were considered secrets stven ymiy, to joint stock company, nap0ri- 
died (and I am convinced of it), prophecies With and vi lla 'at 
yazychn ik ov. Whether it was same and devush to and in ö5 p p ah, 
which the N and I x ap ostol 8, prino-is mentioned in Dai 
sat down big benefit to the owners with pomoshch0yu 
sorcery - from it the apostle P avet izgn is scarlet dya an ox 9. 
devush to and the thing is scarlet about missing and the N ykh is stolen by BP - 
Russian cabbage soup and all very much hoped for it, deciding to titsya an obra to so strange person. 
M.B.: P to an ozvolta, I slightly will interrupt you. The devil not mo / Siberian salmons to stay at the same time in many places. To joint stock company g> it could, remaining in devush ke, to say that affairs the elk in places is remote by N ykh? To joint stock company the Azat the devil of t volume where are could sk the N ye or the lost things lezhashch iye is stolen not only somewhere it is far, but also and i a secluded corner? Whether to joint stock company and m in the way it could pok the Azat to a rank of the thief or witch? May itMay itMay it at the same time si put on the place and to see hidden by N ye in the distance things? 
Dan.: Yes, we cannot say that demosh can be in several places at once, or, nakh dyas in one place, to see something, created where - t in the distance. The N about in these actions they is eaten around яют^ to create the kingdom, stories by people z itself, zastavya to look for them at N of their help and poklonyats to them. To - from them is here, others - there, from everywhere they line with N non-believers to resort to on power of similar people, and then enter in business because they also go there and they know, for example, TOI of the thief which they lined on theft so it everything it is easy to them to achieve similarity in the person and clothes; vs why they also can sk the Azat where there are things, yu tory it sprya tala even if they also are neobychayn raspberries k them. Here to joint stock company and m in the way spirit, to joint stock company that to me, to a last resort, to azhtsya, speaks about words, is said ny and about the affairs created somewhere is far. To the Oroch p vorya, there are many people, Zahn imayushch ikhsya it, and he is prak tichesk and everywhere where similar things sluchayuts 
M.B.: Everything, as for this question, I udovletv Wren. You p ok an azalea, to joint stock company demons arrive with I zy chn and to, mi, speaking from idols, wives shch and N and men. 
Dan.: And Menno so. They put again and again and!' shchrenny wounds y in hearts of Christians. And spolzuya witches quality of the tools, they force them will believe! that they commit a set of crimes, p <slan N ye and mi. what there is no N and the business, but poskol they possess the power given them B an ogham to do др^ gpm harm, to will azatsya that all this they delan because of anger and just for the hell of it the witch, its message!' Russian cabbage soup, and business or anyway obnaruzh sya, or to will azatsya that whether by its force Zac subordinated himself N ayushch aya it, or he recognizes that ei p about with l and l and t and to about y - t about m h and N an and l and t and to and I am t about e N shch and N and, l 
bo the witch admits all this. That is why people also think over that, to joint stock company to escape from witches and run to kudesn to ika in order that uzn to at that it should be made that zashch and ti tsya for anger of the witch which it will bring down or already brought down them on N; to joint stock company to them a log hut - to curl from its spirits and to make so that it did not send once again, etc. Here to joint stock company aya to Arti the N and will open before dya-in the Leningrad Region m and t about a gd about N p about to and e t, N and h t about with p about with about bin. H e r e z e t and x he teaches magicians razn ym to awful nasty things and pono-a sheniya of name B ozhy; people force to believe that they possess the lifesaver from the demons sent by witches and that they are capable to cure of vedovsky charms. 
M.B.: I not zn ayu, to joint stock company of people can explain or claim that spirits, yavlyayushch iyesya to them in to ristalla, bo-Calais or in water, to joint stock company and m - that in the way the angels telling with them and pok azyvayushch iye to them all these a thing and, an essence sacred or souls zamechateln ykh people, and x, N an aprimer, to JSC Mo - isy, Samuil, David and others though I and hear is scarlet that sa-mi magicians prin imat them for those and think that they act with their help against demons. 
Dan.: N evazhn oh, what the Satan forces to trust svo-their servants in, resorting to the help of a razla chn ykh charms. All this is harmful to Christians in and, harmfully even to allow zaro-to get to at itself in the thought head that all this is made by force and the Holy wisdom of the Spirit, or by means of An - gel and kind spirits or that magicians do all this in peak the demon am. They act with the help is clever iya, received from evil spirits. They aspire to - to mona, and those willingly run towards to these talkers. 
M.B.: I also really made sure that they look for - mon, but I want to see also the proofs of it obtained from Word B ozhy. 
Dan.: To asayas all spiritual questions, to joint stock company, press - died, possession of force in fight against demons and zn An iye that, to joint stock company I want to avoid all dangers created by them sk the Azat that to us anywhere not uzn to at about it, to joint stock company only at the most blessed Lord of B of RSA of ours. About and from N him directly uzn to at N we nothing not smo-zhy, but only from his Word of the Saint because in it It N am shows all completeness of the will. That is why when the Lord directed through Moisey the people And zra-ilya, Vtor. 18, He said that they not dolzhn y, having come 
in
  this earth to learn to arrive, according to gnusnost 
these I zy chn and to ov, listing razlichn ye types of former 

4-3400	1) 7 
tools About Aton y which that used for a sovr shch en iya many people with the help proritsan y, study N iya times, p redsk an adhan and y, the deception created with on - power of demons, uses zn a6k0 omy spirits, before - 
sk an adhan y and addresses to mind of ER of highway and m. He also told 
and about means, pok elements, first, that it has to from vergnut from the people because they listened to these talkers and prophets, and sk azat that to azhdy, doing on - dobny, makes a nasty thing concerning the Lord, that is why he also wishes that his people not prislushival-with I to n and m, n about with l at highway and l of t about l to about E g of the lake Z and t e M m about and with it with to and z and l: "P a rorok the Lord of B og lifts yours for you 6iz 
brothers of N ash and x similar to me, him slush you will at" 1. 
M.B.: Then these words you prove that we dolzhn y to aspire only to the Lord, but not to those who act besides his words. 
Dan.: If you read this place, Vtor. 18, and horo-Shen ko you will note all N uzhn ye m esta62, you will see that its text not only shows that they aspire to demons, spesh ashch to them in turn to so them to magicians and the sorcerer am because prophets whom the B og lifted that about Kommersant I in and t with in about yu in about l yu, p about in e l e in and yu t of N and m of N e with about in e r highway and t p about dobny things, but also say that all of them preby-howl in a nasty thing before the Lord because of use and h, l and b about with t r e l m e N and I to N and m. 
M.B.: I see that it is not just a sin, but a sin horror - ny - to aspire to and m to people. Alas, many do not even think that they are N and the business look for demons, going to similar people concerning the stolen things, or wishing to find a certain help and rescue in fight against witches. 
Dan.: To onechno, many people refuse prislu-to shivatsya to a voice of B of RSA and his N is left to iya. They to a pra zirat the word Its and and m begin prislu-to shivatsya in the way to demons. Everyone, aspiring to dey-stvuyushchy by means of demons, equally and for the first time seeing their shchy N ap adk and, has to confess for it, and not to joint stock company for what - nibud legk y a sin. It is big midges - a nost - to go for the help to a devil; it means p about with t and in and t e go N and m e with t about B about and and p about the h and t and t e go, to and to B about and. P odobny things result from disbelief and mistrust of the help received from the Lord, to joint stock company we see on the example of the tsar Saul who, without having received the answer, is consoled iya from B of RSA, to which it so priskorbnozyxwvuts not 
obeyed, went to the sorcerer. Seius I zychn and 

98 
told: "F lectere si nequeo Superos, Acheronta monebo", 
if 63 I are not able to ask gods, I will go down to a demo - 
N am. 
M.B.: It is doubtful, however, that was not in general zashch ita for those who look for the help at people, it is connected - ny with zn joint stock company omy spirits. About I in addition have a N some more questions. N aprimer: to joint stock company these magicians, the EU - whether they deal with demons, use pravil-ny and good words, wishing all coming to N to them that they arrived so - and so - in Jesus' name, teaching them to use at the same time words and sayings and z P and with and N and I. 
Dan.: In it the great cunning of Sa-the thane y is shown too. To joint stock company he could seduce then people if he did not use all the art for prik ryt I the affairs, wishing pok the Azat that demons here words - but also at anything, and all evil which they the reasons or, it is possible to cure whether highway having mentioned a name of the Almighty Gos - sweat. In it also the m e r z about with t, in t about m of the h and with l e about with to about r l e N and e and and with N e y highway e e about from quantities e r N e N and e l and go with l about in e N of N about go and m e N and and B about e about and With in I shch e N - a ny P isaniye witches, the sorcerer of a yama, Zac of a lean of hotel mi and razn ymiy devil arts is. P odobny che-the lovek is accompanied by elves and spirits; whether it has to vn a tub to people Zac of N of An and I made of what - that f time alternating a name of the Lord or to carry with with - fight what - nibud a part of the Gospel from And oan N and or that - that in this spirit. P odobny things are used against thieves and against the demons sent by the witch. What can the Satan more wish, to joint stock company not of that sacred things would undergo abuse? It is very difficult to cause it in a glass, a crystal or in what - that tanks with in - that, with some difficulty to you will and connect it if you bude-those to ask it about any given thing a name and vla- 
Stew Christ. Z joint stock company of a lean the hotel connects him by name B4 ozh- 
them and the power of sufferings and Hri's revival stovykh6, for - 
stavly it and m as image to serve itself. And they are its own Dejan Iya because nobody forces him, does not oppress, but he seeks for blasphemy. About (gawks speak) that for kind wives shch and N and! It govo-rit about the Lord and about Christ and everything makes them for the sake of N; how to good words it me N of an auchil and to joint stock company oh harm can turn out from use of these words? Alas, neschast-ny! Into what situation did you get if began to study the correct words at a devil? N e pronunciation nuzh- 
ny words and not carrying with itself P ison iya zashch and - shchat parts from demons; the cunning of the Satan to joint stock company of times and zaklyucha-etsyatsya that all these sacred things are used by him absolutely incorrectly even if this person also will be to - in e r I am t p r about and z N about with and m y m with l about in and m and in y r and e N and I am m D I in about l at it is possible to resist, only vooruzhas the power of faith when the Sacred P isaniye is imprinted in your heart, and soul yours and is full of strength given them. And Menno from it the Satan takes away people by the own words, accustoming them to the help of other sort as the N azyvan iye roofing felt - to about l and highway and m e N and B about e go and l both p r about and z N e with e N and e in y with to and z y in and niya from P ison iya will not connect the Satan because it can make to TOZhR it together with Amy's N. 
M.B.: And to joint stock company and m in the way this demon can feel pity for people and ok azyvat the help got into trouble? And bo many receive the help from these magicians. The devil is cruel and he N apryagat all forces that sotvo-to rit the evil. And Menno it is pursued by many, and on - dobny things can be made even with the help si-ly Misters. 
Dan.: These demons so iye compassionate, to joint stock company and a hungry gluttonous lion who growls, having asked that - nibud as if uzhasn y a dragon, un ichtozhayushch y all around the rage and to rovozhadn ostyyu65. They, to - nechno, can pok the Azat that are good to people, pre-following, odn to Acre, the most severe and terrible purposes - they wish to entice people in depths of hell. Because if they can help though to a few their bodies, then it means the legend and a shower and and bodies to an eternal damnation. It is very strong to N of hell to be careful when the Satan predla-gat the help. It is worse than when it resists from - to r y to t about and I in N about with t r e m and t with I of N and N e with t and in r e. 
M.B.: The N about then turns out the countries of N aya a thing: they it is not connected y with B by ozhestvenny force, but resort to uslu-din of a devil, wishing to hold demons from zlodeyan y. To joint stock company one demon can izgon yat of others? N ash Spa - the sitel says that one Satan does not expel another 
Satan because then him ts66arstvo it would be divided and not 
could sushch estvovat. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, it is undoubted, the Satan does not banish Sata- 
well, because Christ Redeemer of N ash pok azat the reason of all this. One devil is always ready to continue work of another, but not pasture yat it at all and not to disturb it. 
M.B.: And Menno it also makes me think. We see that the devil leaves and does not come back; and 
100 
if it becomes not the power of demons, to joint stock company you about that sk an azalea then it has to happen by means of B about e to TV e N of N about y with and l y. 
Dan.: The devil is expelled where the magician treats both not by the demonic force, and not in B of ozhestvenny. 
M.B.: And z all that you sk an azalea, these words nra-vitsya to me least of all. And bo if the Satan is not expelled neither devil, nor B ozhestvenno by the power, what force which can izgn at it is? If you show me this third force, then very surprise me because about it I never also heard. 
Dan.: In order that and zgn to at it, it is not necessary for t r e to t e y with and l y at all, and bo about N in about in with e to N e and z about N I e to t with I. 
M.B.: I already said that we do not have sense to discuss this issue if you deny everything that podtver-zhdatsya by numerous certificates. P odobny 
cases were in many places and kazhdodne6v7 but we vi- 
dy that is expelled from obsessed dya in l and that the EU - 
whether it annoys people and torments them, or their cattle, they find means against it. 
Dan.: I do not deny at all that some Oder - zhimy the Satan and tormented with it, were exempted from it. And nevertheless, elzya to get rid of a devil of N that is Kim in the way. Whether it highway stops the figure - a nost on introduction of people to delusion, keeps most gresh N ykh from defilement of name B ozhy and worship of, at the same time Ron and to aya in N is even deeper p and x. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you, tell, to joint stock company there is the fact that he voluntarily Quality Department azyvatsya from the deya by N y. You so sk azalea? N euzhet it readily and to - to the vliya of N iyu brovolno allows to disappear, koto-a swarm it had N and people? R an azva he did not wish to do to people harm? 
Dan.: It does not allow to disappear to the vliya-a niya, on the contrary, of N and business and it at all, and harm, to them the reasons yae-m y y, at in e l and ch and v and yu t with I, to about d and in with e m to and e t with I, h t about about t of N e go at last got rid. In P ison of AI it is N azvan "an old dragon" - he taught sorcery, that is why izgn it is impossible to at it by means of sorcery. Nevertheless, externally by all to it azhtsya that the magician connects it; he can use even name B to an ozhya and force of the Passion of the Christ. To it azhtsya that the magician expels by this strength of a devil from the bewitched person whose body it torments and disturbs. And it voluntarily ceases to torment him That whether Zac by N of An and e it was realized in zhi zn, taking away and m 
in the way of the person from B of RSA, forcing it to follow and worship it and to look for the help at it. Yes - e e with l and h e l about in e to and with p y t y in and e t t e l e with N y e m at to i, l and b about e the devil brings down diseases of N and his cattle and he looks for on - relics at magicians and witches, following the way ordered by them therefore, it seems, it appears in safety also it, and it skotin and, nevertheless, the Satan does not recede under this N atisky, but prekrashch the ayah proiz-to drive all those torments and which he can with ease of the reasons I t to joint stock company to a body, and soul. And if vi-dimost it is not saved iya, then to joint stock company to force the person to look for the help at the people acting in this way? To joint stock company in to an acha will receive all these the sorcerer y and magicians a cart - a mozhnost uzhasn eysh to them to at in the way use of a lean and bogo-to hulstvovat in otn oshen AI of nice name B ozhy? 
M.B.: P it oluchatsya that they expensively buy this on - power from hands of similar magicians. 
Dan.: Yes, what can be bought more expensive tse-ache, than when the person forever loses and I smother, and a body, pok idy Misters and following a devil. 
M.B.: H the same then the person has to think carry - telno all that it is not connected about with a devil and has right ways of detection of witches, and all by them it is created - a leg? 
Dan.: Though all these people are also not operated by a devil of N apryamy, I mean that at them ne6t zn joint stock company of omy du - 
Hove which with N them razgovar would bring down 8, nevertheless 
move them devil cunnings which also an essence a nasty thing before the Lord. All those versions to oldun y which are listed by the Lord, Vtor. 18, it is not connected y by N Amy, apryamy with the demon. And bo some of their N on - blyudat behind time, zn aya about happy and neschastli-vy dn yakh and hours. If oi also go to buy or proda-to vat that - or, they vybirayutzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUT glya it the necessary time. 
Others conjure on a trace of animals, on flight of birds, on a meeting with a hare or a fox, on a hand and one thousand under - bny things. N ekotory use a chair and couple prya-my plates, pronouncing at the same time certain words. Whether N ekotory resort to Zack of N of An and I am m against a toothache, others - at fever, or wishing to stop bleeding from a nose or when speak about thieves or when oil and cheese when not on - ale is melted are impossible to N them. To it azhtsya that from all witches these and you - z y in and yu t with and l N e y highway e e about t in r and shch e N and e; in t about e in r e m I, about N and 

102 
work by means of a devil so therefore we and N azyvay their witches and to oldun Amy. 
M.B.: y we consider m witches of those who have the spirits, and we do not consider so ovy using to what these people of N were auchit by magicians. And bo it at all not zn achit that they do that - that by means of a devil. That is why we think that hardly them it is possible to azyvat N witches and to oldun Amy. 
Dan.: However the N azvan and e sorcery belongs to all - mu that it is connected about with the power of a devil, from his fish soup shch Wren and I mi. The B ez doubts, some types of witches is more awful than others, however even most "innocent" of N their essence a nasty thing before the Lord, to and to us Vtorozak learns. 1869, and nezna-ny it cannot serve justified iy here. For what then, on mn en iyu this witch, Moisey's spirit, p about I in l I in highway and y with I in m and and h e with to about m to r and with t was necessary and to l e, and r and z in e to N e to about l - Doon this person? Yours and the neighbor who has oil - will not approach joint stock company and which throws a heat handful into milk, pronouncing at the same time certain words and du - May what it does it by means of B of RSA, deleting with that a devil? R to an azva she is not the witch resorting to what her N auchit not B og, but a devil? R to an azva she is not a witch if ishch et the help at demons? The burning clothes in which their children lay to learn whether they are bewitched, or wishing to bring this witch here, ravn ym work with image with on - power and on N aushch en iyu a devil; the same and about c the blackamoor of An and I because the B og did not learn similar a thing am. So, they too sorcerer y? P about whose p ri to azu and thanks to what force the witch when N achat azatsya ok at home to burn down in about l about with y with y N and m I with N and to and, about to about t about r about m in y r and with with to and z y in and l and? Whether in N e all this was made strength of the Satan and on it naushche-a niya? And whether I vlya people, Zahn imayushch iyesya under - bny Amy's thing, Wuchang and to Amy of witches and, and m in the way, too Amy's sorcerer yutsyatsya? The same who whether also Zac of N of An resorts to sorcery and I am m whom they can be, to joint stock company not of the sorcerer - mi? I consider that wives shch and the N and which resorts to hectare - Denmark cuts off hair and Zahn imatsya other erun-by Da at whom the name of the Lord is inevitably offended, makes all this thanks to the effective help of Sata-ny. The B og provides the natural help, and this help apprehended from his hands, we can ispol-zovat against natural misfortunes, however he does not provide us anything supernatural. Here on - 


103 
to what smeshn y all these people, pytayushch iyesya to get rid of demons and diseases. 
M.B.: You say about a thing ah natural, and we vi-dy that the nature Zac Lyuchayet in yourself a set melt N: so, the N an aprimer, diamonds is firmer than iron. P ochy togas - yes in all these natural things cannot be - to about y - that with and l y? 
Dan.: The B essporno, in the nature exists much tain-stven N ykh I vlen and y. And Zahn imatsya by it naturfiloso-f y and most umn ye from doctors. Ozhno to suspend m that - that N and a neck and to get rid of attacks of malaria and likewise mozhn about to dress to joint stock company uyu-that a thing whether to otory will facilitate horadk at, etc. And exchanges of N about thanks to it About Aton and receives vozmozhn an awn osushch estvlyat the of the villain n and ya and u with t r and and in and t r and z l and h N y e x and t r about at m of N y e f about to a mustache y. T and to and to p r and r about d and I in l I e t of N and m of m of N about e with t in about t and y N, e to t and l yu d also do a special ring, privya zyvat to it, according to the provision of heavenly bodies, N an itka and lower it in a bowl or bowls to at with water therefore there dey-it is stvitelno possible to see a lot of things. P odobny obra-zy they say what should be made red-hot under - to a kov, to put it in a day nursery and to take them over fire that and zgn to at from there spirit of the witch. And that at whom zakol-dovan the cattle, burns alive chicken or a pig that and zgn to at a devil. Whether N about can these natural things and zgn to at it? H these witches do, burning what - and wishing, the yak of an oba, and zgn to at demons? R the Lord learned to do to an azva what - or similar? Whether they for the sake of about with p about and l and e, with to about r e e, e burn t about N and with t about I shch e e e r t in about p r and N about - a sheniye to the Devil? At the time of Z joint stock company it and the burned victims predn azn achatsya by B of regional public institution; the devil does the same for the sake of himself, but in the environment I zy chn and to ov. However now he, thanks to the intrigues, carries out the same by means of and Amy's hands of these people which, saying that they Christians e, worship and m in the way to it. It in turn prek rashch the ayah to harm them, their cattle, gaining thereby additional benefits. 
M.B.: If this is soIf this is soIf this is so (though I not in forces sk the Azat it), 
that turns out that in all places where we see vedov-a stvo and sorcery, their great variety. Because I see that many people in similar affairs resort to pomo-Russian cabbage soup and strength of a devil to whom they anyway aspire. To rum of that, I am surprised also to those raznoobraz-ny I vlen and I am m which vozn hiccup when people wait for the help of a devil. Give - now a little on - 

104 
we speak also about it. The devil knows about things last and N astoya shch them, but only B og zn the ayah that will be made in gr I am a shower e m. And if e ti z N and ha r and and the joint ventures olzut p about m about shch a devil and only it, then to joint stock company they can speak so precisely about a thing ah which will happen in the future? 
Dan.: Whether only highway is allowed zn to at B of regional public institution that will happen in the future. N about Lord through the prophets and and p about about that l about in I in and l of m of N about e with t in about in e shch e y, to about t about r y e N e and z e N about would will occur in gryadushch I eat. Whether the Satan can highway predpola- and t, to about d and with about in e r highway and t with I that and l and and N about e with about y t and e. About N - very much vn imateln y the observer as for a thing to it, can also guess a lot of things, oso-benno when it has strength given it tvo-to rit and make that - or. Here he can and will before - tell it. To the Oroch speaking, the Lord the spraved-the left decision gives it strength to seduce unstable. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you in more detail to light about what you sk an azalea. 
Dan.: Good. What do you doubt? M.B.: I pon imat so that the Devil guesses things 
predicted and vigilantly supervises after ways their wasp - shch e with t in l e N and I. The N about in y with to and z and l and, h t about it go in about r and t about t about m, h t about will be when he works that before - tells. P bring, please, to several prima - r about century. 
Dan.: The N about unless is necessary luchsh and y an example, than when you rassk azyvat about church watchmen, poshed-shy to that zn akharyu uzn to at about the thief, uk ravsh I eat them cha-shu. M ozhno sk Azat so: if that zn akhar asked them to go to it - that place in what - day and in such - hour, sk elements what there will come uk ravsh y this bowl, how the Azat the devil could sk if it was day or two later what this person will really come to this place in uk an adhan of N y y hour? P to a rezhda of everything, you have to for - to mark, to joint stock company oh the devil has force, directing thinking - mi of this thief. It lined it to steal this bowls at. It lined and tserkovn ykh watchmen to go to that zn akharyu. It N azvat the place and time to which it in oprede-will rouse lenny hour to come this thief. And azn and - ceremonious time he brings it into N en iya there because it, having forced it to steal, could also by means of a secret vn ush rouse it to come to this place. The devil sk azat, as that witch will very quickly come back home - I mean that that bewitched the son and mya sn ik and. It, possessing the power over her heart and having made her the witch, also 
105 
zn it is scarlet that will be able to force it to return hasty to - mine. It vypoln yat that aya the sick personality considers N of EC by unconditional act of it zn akharya. Vozmozh-but, that also can sk the Azat on a clothes smell whether there was in it a devil (if it pakhn et it z ap akho m) 70, and then he says that the N y was given the person is bewitched. "Take - those clothes in which the patient lay, and burn them; if black smoke goes, then, zn achit, indeed, and togas - yes this witch will appear here, but only so far they go-a row". And so, if the Lord gave a devil strength to torment and deliver f izichesk iye stradan iya to sick people and if it undoubtedly lined the witch of N and that it sent it, unless it will not be easy for it to make this flame and smoke chern ymiy and to force the witch to come to this place? If it has a force to torment, but there is no witch who would send it, then it velichaysh it zhelan iy will be to make the person guilty in proli-Tia of innocent blood. So unless it will be difficult for it, with a permission of B of RSA who fair at - a dialect gives it strength to seduce people, prislushiva-yushchikhsya to demons, and m in the way, to make p lamya cher-N ym, or, at least, to make so that it it seemed to that and to force the suspect of wives - shch in at to approach and enter the house though she can not be a witch? He creates thousands of similar cases and, to joint stock company skillful f okusn ik, can represent them here and there. 
M.B.: Really, at so oh moment to the house of m of N e p about in also the N of N y y e l about in e can h in about y t and n and v h e to. I with l y highway and l, ho t I also cannot sk the Azat, the N askolko it corresponds deyst-to a vitelnost that in and x cases occur razn ye in e shch and. N and p r and m e r, p about p r about with a ba z N and x and r I am l yu di in p and in and yu t with I fingers in bread and at that moment, pok and they so do, the witch comes, and in several days it turns out that at it all person it is scratched about N of an ogtyama. Still I heard about one old woman who here and so entered, and in several days she was seen all the N uyu as if whether it was torn through bushes or it overcame highway ouch is scratched. 
Dan.: Depth of devilish delusion forces the blinded people to become Amy's sorcerer and svyazy-to vatsya with N and m. In this case, N an aprimer, he knew about disorder of health which was shown in nebol-by highway and x pockmarks or in what - like it and if it can incline whom - to enter there especially as this person is ready to make it, what here strange if it does so as if everything happens because of nails? 

106 
M.B.: Yes, in it the big skill of the Satan is visible. Dan.: However we cannot present all from - 
shchrennost of its tricks, equally it is not given us to see that secret force by means of which it operates minds of ignorant people, vypoln yaya, so it in the way, all the enterprises. In it is velichaysh aya cunning of Sa-that N y. 
M.B.: Really, it seems improbable and neoby-chayn ym that the devil can operate minds of people, their messages to that are and to that are. They about it do not suspect meanwhile at all, thinking that they act about - tiv a devil. However I doubt here what. I at - know that it is easy for a devil sk the Azat where is sweat - ryan N aya or the N aya a thing is stolen, however from where it has the power to cure sick and suffering from an ulcer? Undoubtedly, the number of the people going to zna-of this sort to mugs is great. You say that it helps a body, but can ruin soul. It does so that people stre-to be rumpled to it, putting it and m in the way of N and the place Gospo-yes. Because usually the person thinks that to help him - not with forces of demons. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, everything validly and occurs and in all this we see extraordinary dexterity of a devil. You sk an azalea that many people receive the help, coming to zn akharya m. However I am sure that them by no means N e with t about l to oh, to and to in y go in about r and t e. 
M.B.: Oh, much. Is and so iye which never tell about it because similar things some not N r and in I the CU I. 
Dan.: Yes, and many come back home, is fooled - ny by insignificant talks as these answers - p r about about that e m about highway e N of N and h e with t in the lake. 
M.B.: It is possible that they come too pozd-but when to make any more nothing N elzya. If they come at once, then can help them. 
Dan.: N at yes, the devil says what can udovlet-cook these ignorant people who are ready to believe in everything that he tells and to dance to his tune. The N an aprimer when who - nibud comes to zna-a mug because of the child and asks, not smertel-N about l and about N about l e N E with l and that t z N and e t, h t about with m e r t e l N oh, of t about says that the child was bewitched, but that time left and to help already N elzya; the child will hardly live even one or two days. The father comes back home and sees that the child ALREADY died, or it dies during two - three 
107 
days. And the devil is trusted. Another is sick and is strong stra-gives. In reply it hear it: "The Satan (because he sent them) sees that a disease posh la on decrease and the reasons and, you - z in and in highway and I it, p about about those p e N of N about and with the h e z and e t. H e r e z N e with to about l to about days this person will come round". Here to it govo-a row any nonsense, he observes all these uk both I and all pass an adhan. P onyatno that everything would pass and so, without devil medicine y, however to the Satan begin dove-ryat even more. The N ekto is ill and chakhn et. The neighbor govo-rit to him that, perhaps, he was bewitched and that it would be quite good to send uzn to at that it. It sends, but a devil not zn the ayah whether the patient will be able to recover or not. He says that, it seems, it really okol-was given, and nauchat that should be done though at the same time and doubts whether will be what - nibud advantage or not, but irrespective of, this person will die or all the game - chitsya safely, the trust to the Satan will remain and will not be shaken. And it gives and x there is a lot of councils. To rum of that, we have to remember that chelove-chesky imagination - the thing extraordinary siln aya, - whether satsya that continuations of a disease or its easing. And the Satan deceives people because it seems that his drugs that - that is done though the N and the business is all Lish a fruit of imagination of these unfortunate. 
M.B.: To onechno, is and razlichn ye focuses, but to me - it zhtsya that you too exaggerate everything. I not vi-zhu, to joint stock company to it can help human f to An a basin I. 
Dan.: The imagination can cause a serious loss, it is known by all. So why it cannot help human consciousness, especially this person is encouraged, having forced to believe what he receives on - m about shch? 
M.B.: And nevertheless, it is hardly possible to prove that so aya the help ever was effective. 
Dan.: P to render - that it is easy because it is proved oh, that the devil can do the same, as the person. I heard about one similar case. In London there lived a N of EC y the husband - a rank and (to joint stock company report about that), which was the sign about Wad Dra - the gy person by the name of F ita. And here, at these F its there was a black dog on to lichk e B omelius. Soon that guy imagined that B omelius - a devil and that he feels his action in himself. Having strongly upset - shis, he complained to one acquaintance and that told that it has a friend who can izgn at B of an omelius. Then this of men and made a breakfast and 
108 
whether two of them prish to it. Treatment was as follows: this "doctor" forced it to undress and ordered to get up near strong fire and, without watching N and the fact that that was dostatoch-but the fat person, the N amazat hurting all body IAU-scrap and tied up to a stomach smooth to amine. This husband - a rank lightened and subsequently strongly thanked the healer. 
M.B.: I zn ayu that the person can invent a heap of any nonsenses and though one f An the taziya can from - drive another, without curing, so to them in the way, in practice the N of an ikaky disease, nevertheless, from this does not follow that the human imagination can help to cure the real disease. 
Dan.: N et, f a basin I do to An a lot of things, even where there is a N an astoyashchy disease. The person is afraid that he okol-dovan; because of it his consciousness stays in postoyan-the number nervousness that all body disorders, making in it big unfaithfulness en iya, and involves different misfortunes. And so, if his mind is saved from all these images, then and it f izichesky concerns, p r about and with t e to and yu shch and e about t n and h, i with the h e z and yu in t. The B about l highway and N with t in about with and t and - ninsky drugs has such origin. 
M.B.: N about exist still diseases which really are present at a body and which occur not on at - what rank - that fears and f An a basin y there. And x treat! But to joint stock company, tell me, it is possible to cure them by means of imagination? To onechno if all this appeared on at - a rank of the nervousness which arose in soul of the person, then from it - go it is possible to get rid, having calmed him. 
Dan.: Yes, but so sometimes it turns out also at corporal illnesses which reason not the imagination, but other passions is. I can give to you one example, about to about t about r about m r and with with to and z y in and l of N e to and y about the h e N at in and and e m y y and uch e N y y the doctor. Highway tuk at did this what - that the weasel - the servant. Business was in Hermann AI. At one wives shch and N y it is constant slezi-foxes of an eye and therefore she badly saw. As for sa-the my servant, he rented at her the room. Once he on - promised to cure it and made so: he hung up it on a neck what - that zapisk at and strictly warned that it under to joint stock company and m a look not sn Imola and did not read it because then already precisely nothing will help. en shch and N and believed in it and became so oh cheerful and self-assured that ceased to cry (because frequent crying and tears poisoned with it eyes), and gradually moisture in her eyes p ri highway of la in norm and g of l and z and and z in l e ch and l and s. About in about r I am t, h t about to about d and about N and p about t e r I am l and e that 

10Q 
note, having been upset, it zap varnish is scarlet again and gla-for ached again. To - this note of N ash ate, opened and read. There it was written in German so whether it to transfer N and An gliysk y, it will turn out so: "The devil pinches you for eyes, N ap oln I I them the stake". So, unless it was not means to cure her eyes? If the similar medicine has the effect, then le's eyes - it is not necessary to chit any more. However it is not necessary to think that the Satan has at the order less means, than all people on the earth together vzya ty because all of them - whether highway its Wuchang and to and. And where the person fails, he can make that N uzhn oh, using a disease of consciousness of these people. And you will hear, to joint stock company they speak, using to and kiye-charms that you dolzhn y to believe in what it pomo zht, otherwise in general the N and to joint stock company oh of advantage will not be. So, - whether it is good to EU to look narrowly, the most part of all these yours of their numerous stories just deception. 
M.B.: Well, let everything that you sk an azalea, will be the truth. However there are a lot more things in which demons help. What will you tell about malchi-ke which recovered in several days after that, to joint stock company scratched the witch, and before his disease was awful and was not treated at all? H you will tell that about that case when oil did not turn out, and from milk not Uda of l about with with N I am t with l and in to and? H t about in y with to and e t e about with about e N i and zh and v y x beings, N an aprimer, a pig or to Uri tsy, and a prekra shchen AI after that diseases? And, N of joint stock company he ets that you skazhe-those about the help to those people whom N avern I to and wear out a devil, p ri chi N I I tortures to their bodies? 
Dan.: The N and all this can answer in several ate Vakh: when it can do harm a forehead - to a century or cattle, milk or oil, it can on can, having just stepped aside; when he prekrashcha-et a course of disease, it, to joint stock company I spoke earlier, he barks especially willingly because, ustran yaya it, it does so that people direct to it and sometimes become yes - N astoyashchy Amy's sorcerer. If what - nibud the demon exasperates or torments the person and that wants to get rid a post and prayers of him, N of an acha of N aya at once mo to pour about this B of RSA, then he without special efforts leaves it, though without wishing it because it concedes to force State p about d and and p r about about N I e t with I And m of N about to about d and about N p r and ch and n I e t about l, to joint stock company was in the case told by you with the son of a myasna to and, and they ishch ut his help also follow it predpisani-I m, start-up aya, N an aprimer, blood to the witch, then it leaves, is- 

1 10 
pytyvy pleasure - I mean that it prekra-shch and e m t at the h and t t e l oh, p r and e t about m of N and to at d and to about N e h N about e, N e and with - chezy, but rather pron ik aya taking roots in a shower e even more deeply and even stronger. Here so all also occurs in ostal-ny cases. As willingly it will cease to exasperate ku-a ritsa because to give it joy, this chicken will be burned zazh in. Its help - not that other, to joint stock company prek rashch en iye in harming if, to - nechno, it has a force to harm. 
Sam.: Strange, odn Acre, if all this so. P it oluchatsya that in these parts of one thousand deceived. They say that to that wives shch and N e in R.H. in one week prish the Leningrad Region somehow with - fate of people, and many of N and x were at all not and mi as you told. The N about I prevented so I ask you, continue. 
Dan.: The devil can mislead milli-ona of people and even the wisest in this world if they are not N of an auchayema the Lord and not prin imat in vn iman iye his doctrine, Zac it N ym can become in the way uche-N of an ikama of a devil. 
M.B.: If all this deception, then, zn ach of t, the witch do not kill, do not direct damage, but, most likely, the devil skillfully ruins people and the reasons yat pain in slu-tea when the disease has natural origin, forcing the witch to believe that he made all this at her request. And when the Lord gives it strength, he podbi-howls it that it sent it, as if he cannot what - to make or interfere with what - or put until then, p ok and it who - that will not send. Considering that all responsibility lies to N and the Satan, probably, there is no N ikaky p ri chi N y to sentence vedm1 to death; odes - 
nako P ison iye p ri to azyvat to do e that 7. 
Dan.: The Scripture says that witches should be sentenced to death. Here you are absolutely right. N about if you think that word B an ozhya orders not wasps - tavlyat to their N and to oi m in the way in zhi vy because they ruined people and zhi votn ykh, N asyly the spirits because of what people became obsessed, whether and their bodies preterpeva-muchen iya, then you very strongly are mistaken because, of course, you do not recognize N of an ikogd from those who tested 
m
Uk and and who was tormented by spiteful spirits that the Holy Spirit 
stays also on witches. P ri chi N y on which them sle-Blows to sentence to death, so ova: they drive zna-a komstvo with Amy's demon, to joint stock company ovy an essence use lyaty enemies of the Lord; they seduce people, forcing them to follow 

1 1 1 
to devil and Zahn to imatsya satan in sk by them deya in N and I mi; at them 
in ra2sporyazhen AI of N akhoditsya unsteady in belief personally 
with ti 7. And though they are not going to kill N of an ikogd lyu- 
Tay or p ri chi N I t to them pain, but want to do good only, to joint stock company they think, nevertheless, if they contact demons, then for it and dolzhn y to die. 
M.B.: So, you think that all these znakha-yards to which very many people hurry for on - power as it is considered that they do good at all do not harm, it is necessary un to ichtozhit. About give N on - we watch what tells about it P ison iye. 
Dan.: Yes, they, dolzhn y to die because prino-it is sacred velichaysh iye misfortunes. It is considered that others - we which have spirits the reasons yat the evil because the devil, according to the instruction of B of RSA, creates this crime, p ok azyvy that it does it according to the proposal of the witch. And what, to joint stock company to azhtsya brings good, the N and the business brings the evil, and all this is made in many ways, to joint stock company that with ease can see any che-l about in e to. To h t about e to and with and e t of t with I e to with t and P and with and n and ya, p about to and z y in and yu shch e go that it dolzhn and to die, about it read at first the 22nd chapter to N and gi And a descent, 7s3tikh 17 where it is said: "N e on - 
zvol to the sorcerer and t". 
M.B.: This place speaks about the sorcerer ah which posy-bark at a deed of evil of the of spirit v74; others cannot on - be called to oldun Amy. 
Dan.: N about about the sorcerer ah it is when urge to sentence them to death and at the same time is-use the word M ecasshephah; it is about them and resisted to them in the face of the Pharaoh Moi - with e y, to about a gd in about about chi yu about N and p r e in r and t and l and zh e z l y in z m e y 7 5. And the Lord of all those who acts by means of a devil concludes in one sort. And bo sushchestvu6et their huge mno-a zhestvo of types and all of them are N and z in and N y 'in Vto7r. 18, and N elements - 
they are howled by "a nasty thing before the Lord" 7, and N and to joint stock company oh 
nasty things of N elzya to allow to remain among people State - sweat. The same and in that place where he says: "Yes not the най8th 
to pout at you such - and such -", listing all and h7. 
So it is necessary not only to wish that nobody not for - N imatsya by similar Amy's thing, but has to un ichtozhat those who do it. 
M.B.: I have to agree with what pronounce a sentence of word B of an ozha y to. However there is one more, trudn eyshy, a thing - to joint stock company to prove their guilt. 

1 1 2 
Dan.: And why you consider that it is more difficult - to zat all dock fault of the witch or sorcerer? I eat h, to joint stock company not dokaza-with telstvo, is defined vi by N and murderers? If sushchest-the real suspicion and this person during races - followings prizn vut the ayah a perfect act, then it also is the sufficient proof. If this subject denies everything, and. two or three say on wasps - N about in and n and i and z in e with t of N about o and m, p r and N about with I p r and e t m about r e with t in e to N - a ny oath that he is guilty of deeds, it the sufficient proof too. Concerning this State - pod prik azyvat to Moisey that whether nobody umertvlya-until then, p ok and he will not be opposed on men-necks to a measure by two witnesses, Vtorozak.19, Article 15. 
M.B.: I think that if this person denies everything, especially, when business goes about zhi zn and then, of course, it is necessary to do according to law B of an ozha and m that there were at least two witnesses. It is so possible to arrive with ubiytsam9i, thieves, but as for witches, I do not see 
you hoda7. They so secrets about communicate with du - 
be rude that them it is almost impossible to convict of deeds the claim - lyuchitelno at the expense of categorical p ok an adhan and y svidete-leu, saying directly that they hear Ali or vi-put, to joint stock company they sent the spirits. To rum of that, re-when the witch in general confesses. Because it is well-known that the devil has over them such power that not on - zvolyat them to do p ri zn An and I. 
Dan.: Then I pon imat why you consider that to - it is the heaviest to fight from the witch p ri zn An and I prick also witness p ok an adhan and I, and its own it is not always possible to receive. N, about what then to do next? 
M.B.: I consider that if exists to joint stock company aya - that veroyat-a nost, suspicion, well-known rumors to what is to - statochno satisfactory proofs, and still a beam - she if there is an act for which it is necessary to hang up, then it will be so possible to save from them this area. 
Dan.: So you think that their spirits will hang up together with them and and in the way this earth will be saved by m both from witches, and from spirits, and people and the cattle will begin to live quiet and z N yu. 
M.B.: I after all am rather clever that so not du there is mother though, to tell the truth, slightly did not make it. And bo I consider that if all witches I am pov8e0 Shena, then togas - 
Yes their spirits will not be able any more N of an IT of people who bu- 
DUt of N of An to imat them, or to send that they did much harm to the person or cattle. N about I understand own hl> - 
1zyxwvutsrqp \L 
post because the Lord only gives to a demo to us an opportunity to do harm and to test blagoche-stivy people, and also to disturb, torment and dosazh-to give gresh N and to am, and they will do it even if on - to weigh all witches on the earth. I know that it is not necessary for them that cared for them or gave what - that work. 
Dan.: Whether about you are afraid of N that if all suspects are hung up whether then among them there can be suddenly highway a little really guilty people? You see that many, to azn en N ye on a charge of a stake - a dovstvo, after death appeared innocent. 
M.B.: I will tell you everything that I think on it vop-dew. Witches lift storms, they do harm pose-to you and to fruit-trees, bear to people plague, and the cattle not I shch Ur. They send N and people of the spirits, doing them lame, kill children and domash N y the cattle; their du - Hove cannot be noticed, from them it is impossible to be fenced off by a door and walls, to joint stock company from thieves and murderers, but they at - go if they are sent, and the reasons yat a lot of evil. That is why I think that it would be very useful prigovo-to rit all suspects by death even if who - that from their N and is innocent because in that case already N avern I to and N ik that will not leave from N of joint stock company an adhan and I. 
Dan.: And you did not think, how it is awful - to shed innocent blood? 
M.B.: Yes, it so, but I think that there will be much a beam - she if whom - that to sentence by mistake, than to leave odes - well the witch who will kill people and to harm them. 
Dan.: So zn that is why you insist t ach that it is necessary to sentence to the death of all suspects (though could happen and so that among N them were and nevi-novny) with the purpose to avoid great concerns, on - to a skolk otherwise several escaped witches could torment and kill people. Luchsh e by mistake to sentence several people to death than if demos - ny torment, kill or N to asylat lameness on mno-gy people. And what, you really so think? 
M.B.: N e absolutely. You claim that evil spirits on - delyatsya by force to wear out people and zhivotn ykh, is exclusive from B of RSA. They are eager for it, they smot-a row when and where It will allow them to N to achat to work and where will try belief and patience with the help svo- 
it pravosu8diya, to joint stock company It did it with And ovy. It It on - 
banishes it 1 when the witch wants to send the demon; it 
whether all highway a pretext, it cannot give the demon strength and 
he will make that he wants even if it about it not du - m and e t. To about d and about with p about d e l and e t of N and with t and of N ut and p about to and r and t gresh Ik's N, It gives is allowed iye to the demon so all this occurs not at will of the angered witch at all, but own weakness of people is the reason of it, to joint stock company ovy also causes feeling of discontent in the Lord. Thus, they give weapon in hands to the enemy. 
Dae of N: Therefore, as there are these two provisions that is that the B og through the Satan harms nekoto-an eye in the way and tests the children (to joint stock company, utverzhdaye-those you, He made with And ovy) and that He uses it in Kacha - 
the executioner's stvo to torment and torment gresh N of ik, to a2k - 
to torment with the Leningrad Region when It sent an evil ghost the tsar With aula8, on - 
to stolk and zlodeyan iya, made by spiteful spirits, will not stop, at least and all witches and zaklin hotels in the world were hung up. P examine better on the reasons y, the EU - whether we azyvatsya by Quality Department from similar conclusions. If you bo-are eaten with B of RSA, and the Satan strikes you, then be firm in belief and patience and wait for the release from the Lord. If you overcome temptation, then will be blessed and will receive a wreath, And joint stock company.1.12. If your sins provoked Gospo- and the enemy touched your body or property, fall N its and be in AI is quiet, you ache also to a prayer, and beg the Lord to moderate his not arrangement; do not look at witches, do not look for the reasons where they are absent, do not look for the help at demons, be not a pupil the sorcerer y, do not make dreadful in e shch e y about with to in e r N e N and e m and m e N and about with p about and in about z in e l and ch and v and N and e m With and t and N y, N e and with p y t y in and y and d y p about to r about in both N e in and N of N y x, to and to it often happens. 
M.B.: I agree with all this; of course, to shed blood of N evin ovn ykh - the huge evil. 
Dan.: And z the text of the Scripture we see that shedding of blood of the innocent - uzhasn eysh aya a thing before the Lord Almighty's look; and it is very regrettable, kog-yes the earth is watered with blood of N show N of N ykh. Whether there is highway one special the reasons and when the Satan contacts witches: he seeks pron ik to utnut N in wines ovn ykh, N akhodyashch ikhsya under suspicion, and he thinks that thanks to it pomo-Russian cabbage soup to witches in all cities there will be many malware - ny sorcerers so it will manage to enter many into the angered state that all thought about it at - a sutstviye or direct participation even in the nichtozh-ny affairs. Here - that all judges will also be guilty - mi of shedding of blood in anything not guilty people, a wasp - their stars to joint stock company of wines ovn ykh on the basis of them to lyatven N ykh for - 

1 1 5 
vereniye. All these suspicions are based N and the vapoury conjectures and representations, illusions arising from a blindness, disbelief and fear of the Satan who lives in ignorant people. 
M.B.: If you assume that all this occurs thanks to skill of the Satan doing many lyu-Tay by N, guilty of shedding of blood, evin to N ykh even pu-that their uses to la of a tva what is most of all awful, what, in your opinion, all judges and courts when any person can be accused on podozre-a niya of sorcery have to do? 
Dan.: What will I advise them? I would wish them to be very careful and circumspect not to become in and N about in N y m and in p r about l and t and i to r about v and n and v than N e p about in and N of N y x people. And if to accuse, just based on firm proofs and the immovable bases because the presumption will not acquit and not izvin it them in the opinion of the Lord in case blood nevi-by N about in N y is shed x. 
M.B.: And the nogda turns out so - especially if about - the thief vinyatsya, the murderer - that the direct certificate from sutstvut, but certain specific circumstances even increase confidence of court that this a forehead - the century is guilty. To it azhtsya, given p cancer ti to and priderzhiva-yutsyatsya, mainly, concerning witches as their communications are very close and hidden; besides, considers - sya that the devil possesses so big power over - m and, h t about about N of N e p about z in about l and t and m p r and z in N and t with I. 
Dan.: You gave two reasons, that to and z and in what when determining guilt of witches the assumption and probability, apparently, are valid more, whether nezhe-in a case with thieves and murderers. P ervy, is that their communications carefully disappear; the second - that dya-in about l of N e p about z in about l and t and m p r and z N and t with I. D e y with t in and t e l N oh, h ate about - the century assuming that witches cause neoba tea stradan iya just burns from zhelan iya to hang up them, hoping that after that he will become free, and. having convinced itself so to them in the way what you already mentioned, he thinks that it is the best of all to sentence to the death of all suspects. That leu concerns thieves and murderers, let people will pay attention to that, to joint stock company they polaga-yutsyatsya on the assumptions until they not stano-vitsya real because we see that sometimes the court obvi-nyat the innocent that is absolutely bad, especially if it becomes on the basis of them klyatven the N ykh is stated y. 
1 1 
In the questions relating to belief of the proof dolzh-ny to be especially chetk them because here the cunning of the Satan wishing to ruin N evin N ykh is present much more, than at other cases. Here it is necessary to use special wisdom and so t. And what - satsya those who prizn atsya, here the Satan priobreta-et to himself is more than benefit exactly thanks to them prizna-a niya than if they are locked. He is rather for - puts them to reveal and prizn to atsya, than nastra-will ivat them on otritsan iye. 
M.B.: These things to me are not let know also I in them and I do not understand. Whether I ask you to explain with highway to me them so that I could understand that you put in it, and to see the reasonable bases yours of their statements. 
Dan.: Then it is necessary to dwell upon it vopro-se. Let's begin with the last. 
M.B.: If you begin with the last, then then races - tell also about those reasons for which the Satan of races - kryvat witches, brings them to prizn An iyu and obnaruzhi-howls them, but does not conceal and does not hide them deya N and I. Has to notice, however, that most of people thinks differently, being based probably first of all, on f joint stock company ta, on the one hand, and on razumn ykh the bases with another. 
Dan.: I zn ayu that people think quite so, to joint stock company you told, however I am strongly surprised, seeing, to joint stock company prakti-chesky experience and reason prove opposite things that I also will try pok the Azat. To an ogd it is about reasonable grounds, you consider that demons, dey-stvuya at the same time cunning and insidiousness, do that, N and that the N is put in order y their most intimate zhelan iya and a t mustache r e by l m e in N and I. 
M.B.: And for this reason the devil will not expose at all the witches because he should disappear to make razlichn ye the evil - acts. 
Dan.: Really, it could become the good basis for the proof that the Satan polucha-et the force from the witch or that he cannot do anything, pok and it will not send it or that to it neobkhodi-ma it zashch and that or that he does not interfere anywhere, but is invited only to satisfy her rage. However it is absolutely clear that all this nonsense, and he uses witches and zaklin hotels in order that from beliefs of highway to at eshch e bo lsh and e z l about I am a N and I. From here 
with
  N e and z e N about with t yu to l of N about with l food in and t that r and with to r y - 
1 17 
tiye of witches is more favorable to it, than an opportunity to keep all their Dejan Iya in secret because if about it to nobody not bu-it is put it is known, then to joint stock company then he will be able to force people to think that he commits all these crimes on naushche-a niya of witches? To joint stock company and m in the way it will manage to it to carry away then so large number of people for demons that they looked for at N of their help? To joint stock company and m in the way it will be able to line then them to resort to forbidden and whether in the N of An damned Zac and I am m, to sorcery, offending and m awfully blessed name B ozhy and his sacred word? And whether to joint stock company then he will result people in numerous delusions, forcing them even to be out for blood not - wines of N ykh? All this and still it manages - to do many other things peshno a mustache thanks to exposure of witches. 
M.B.: The N about to joint stock company can confirm this situation re- and l to N y with m and f and to t and m and? I, N and p r and m e r, N e with about m of N e in and yu with, about it do not wish h t that his lady (to joint stock company tell some) about N and r and l and. 
Dan.: You it is correct sk an azalea, externally he does not wish that his witch was found. The N about actually it only this way to azhtsya because he forces also it, and all others to believe - even revealing her one way or another - in the fact that it becomes him reluctantly and against him zhelan and I. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you, explain it to N and an example. Dan.: To an ogd of people feels that it is infected chu- 
mine also writes down it N and the account of the Satan, he acts this way: goes to zn akharyu and that shows it in a glass or a crystal shape of this witch. So, who on e t about t r and z r and with to r y its l? 
M.B.: It was made by spirit given zn akharya, but not spirit of the witch with which she deals. 
Dan.: N about you - that are not sure of it because it can be that demon, with which it svya-Zahn and; and he shows its reflection. N ik that another will not be able to make it better. 
M.B.: I do not think that he will move away from it so far. 
Dan.: Yes, but you have to remember that the witch, svya-Zahn of N aya with to joint stock company to them - that spirit, has relations not with one demon, but with many because the majority them objedinya- 
it etsyatsya together. To an ogd one iz8 3 them goes, bearing it is given - 
Nov the image z N akhar yu, the others remain on me- 
to sta. N about what occurs when it turns out so, to joint stock company go-you cook? That is when what - that other spirits of an otkra 

1 1 8 
howl their essence. You think, they do it protiv4 
will of spirit of the witch? Whether the N about is separated the Satan from About Aton y? 8 
Whether the Satan of masks at About Aton y will open to create to itself an obstacle? P omn to an ita about what taught N ash to Christ Redeemer - satelno this subject. 
M.B.: Therefore, if everything is so, then you do not consider the sufficient proof in case against the witch, even for court if she p ri zn An and guilty N and about with N about in and N and and with about with t in e N of N about go z and I in l e n and ya, k about d and to and to about y - the l and - bo zn akhar by means of the spirit finds it. 
Dan.: It is one of the most unsatisfactory of dock - zatelstvo which in general exist because even if it also tells the truth, having disclosed original essence nekoto-ry people that is confirmed also their own on - to an adhan and I am m and, after all it does it, conducted nepra-by the visible purpose. That is why his words of a lie you because the father of a lie wishes to accuse only N evin ovn ykh to have an opportunity to make this person otvetstven-ny in a spill of their blood and to force people to believe that around their N there is a great number of witches whether to line them to Zac by N of An and y and sorcery, but, glavn ym about is studied iyu - at once in order that to it had an opportunity stre-aim all bad people. And so, if it skillfully razobla-chit whom - to win to itself(himself) more dove-r and I, the m about e t of l and h e l about in e h e with to about e r e highway e n and e, o with N about in and N of N about e N and an oath to lean N and certificates of this sort? The EU - whether a devil comes to court and says that the person whose case he investigates, the sorcerer whether members of sou have to - yes to trust it? And whether follows them sk the Azat that it brought a tva to la and testified already on its basis? If it is not why they have to believe - mu what it sk azat to this sorcerer? 
M.B.: Yes - yes, I have no N and to joint stock company and x doubts carry - telno the fact that he skillfully makes all this whether having before itself highway disgusting and awful tse- and that to its certificate if it becomes kind is free, not dolzhn about ok elements to vat N and to joint stock company oho of trust. N about what you will tell about its witness p ok an adhan and y when to it p ri to azyvat and force ozhy to tell the truth in name B? Then he if wants to hide that he - or, then will not be able any more. 
Dan.: The magician who assumes that e go 85 og-the name and strength of the Lord ranichivat in actions, oblige - Shchiye him to tell the truth, strongly is mistaken. It 
in
e d N and to t about N e about r and n and ch and v and e t and about N r and d, h t about with l and in N e y highway e e 

1 1 9 
and mya Misters is exposed to so awful insult and h t about about N of m about e t p r and in e with t and h e l about in e to and in e that with to about p and shch e in with e x m e r z about about those y. 
M.B.: N et, I do not mean volshebn ik, but when the pious person tries to influence asks - in y. 
Dae of N: You probably mean the following: if men and or wives shch and N and are obsessed with a devil, let us assume, that it so (we will make it to distinguish them from numerous pritvorshch ik ov, to joint stock company quite often happened), then all these obsessed gather in one place and vzyva-yut to the Lord, zastavlya I the Satan sk the Azat to them for the sake of Hri-of hundred, to joint stock company he prish ate here and who sent it. 
M.B.: Just about, exactly I also meant it. N ekoto-ry obsessed really demand from a devil otve-t and, to t about p about with l and l e go, and about N p r and z N and e t with I, h t about t and to about y - the t about the h e - whether lovek was read by Zac of N of An and I and sent it here or that sent it to joint stock company aya - that the witch. R to an azva it is not convincing? 
Dan.: To an ogd who - nibud we will gain a devil, that forehead - vechesky passions, love, a grief are shown very much yar-to, p ok Wai's elements that people, popavsh iye in this trouble can make. They dolzhn y in the N ezamedliteln ym obra-zy to beg Gospoda you to the Azat the mercy and from - gn to at a devil. The doctrine St. it is written iya confirms it, but for people who will discuss his words and to argue with n and m, ya I do not see N and to joint stock company oh of a support in word B about - and e m, about with about e N of N about e with l both p r and e t about m about N and x about t I am t z and with t and in and t With and - to the thane to be removed. He is an executioner Gospoda whether the B og sent it and we can ask to clean highway Gospoda it, but unless we have a power p ri to elements to vat to it to clean up if the Lord sent it? 
M.B.: He agrees, the person has no power, odn people uprash ivat Acre and even demand from it for the sake of State - sweat to leave from here. 
Dan.: What I speak about, not necessarily occurs, however let's think over the following sravneni-I eat. P ri the N of c is dissatisfied with the subrank en in N ym for is shown - N about e by N e at in and e in N and e. About N p about with y l and e t about f and c e r and and r e with t about in and t e go and to put in prison. Whether B will fish it or who - or another to ask this officer a name prin tsa to leave it to N and freedom and not to interpose in this matter? Whether N e will be on - pravlen y their actions N and the pacification p ri N tsa that he gave the command to this officer to refrain from ispolne-N iya p ri to an az? So when the B og sends the Satan, the - go the executioner, the only thing that can be made, so it about - 

120 
with and t about with p about d and with m and l about with t and v and t with I, and bo in t about d and with e y in m at the h and t e the l will not work so long any more. 
M.B.: To joint stock company what you tell corresponds to what we read in Dai to N and I x apostles when the Saint 
P avet p ri to azyvat dyav6olu to leave certain sluzhan ku, 
and in highway uyu in F and l and p p and x? 8 
Dan.: Saint apostles and other members pervonachal-ache churches possessed the extraordinary power given them that izgon I t devils to cure diseases, and they used this power under the direction of and guidance of the Holy Spirit. That is why we not mo-zhy p ri N and mother all this for the uniform rule. 
M.B.: However we see that demons sometimes izgo-N I yu t. 
Dan.: Whether it turns out highway when you address the Lord with a prayer; in to an acha to us only to it will azatsya, h that about N and with in I z y in and yu in t with I of N and sh and m and p r about with and m and i and z about N I yu in t with I. About to joint stock company it is possible for N dock the Azat what the father of a lie can be svya-z and N and z and with t and in l e a N with p about m about shch yu in m about l and t in y in about and m I am about with p about and it to tell forces the truth? To joint stock company and e garan Tia is at us what from lips it we hear them the truth? We speak to him: "M y we call you, for the sake of the Lord, sk the Azat N am who on - sent you. To that sent you? And?" "M atush to and Joan, it she", he will answer. "N about we we call you sk the Azat N am again, for the sake of the Lord who sent you". "Here I on - was sent by the magician L.B. (he will tell)". Whether Dolzhn y we to think that he made it, being subrepaired by force? And whether members of the court have to be sure that he tells the truth? 
M.B.: The devil, N akhodya shch iysya in the obsessed person, sk azat that here his N put in order such - that the person. Z and it uk an adhan of N y y the magician was sentenced to death. To stat, it in everything p ri zn atsya. And still there was a case when the devil, zhi vsh and y in the person, sk azat that it sent N of EC aya wives shch and N and that the last, in the general - that, and p ri zn is scarlet. 
Dan.: Whether all this demonstrates highway to what I already do not deny. The Lord gives to a devil the chance to seize the person. The same that it is sent by the magician or - mine whether highway serves as a pretext here. And the person thinks that the demon settles in him at their request. N what tory at the same time consider that the similar state even limits a little actions of the demon as it Operates only their mind. However then the devil willingly exposes these people, pursuing a set of the Aims, aspiring, glavn ym in the way, to generate sorcery, whether sorcery and Zac of N of An and I, doing so that behind it on - 
121 
whether highway people and that it could force to achat them among all these disasters of N to care for witches and magicians, words - but those can p ri chi N I t what - that muchen iya and not to turn vn and Mang and I am a N and Misters so, exposing it is defined - N ykh witches and mosh en by N and to ov, he will be able to gain trust of people and it will begin to be trusted even then when it builds f alsh and the Vyya obvin en iya so it will be able oro-to sit the earth blood of N evin N ykh the victims. That is why everything lyu-di dolzhn y to turn vn iman iye N and that, to joint stock company, without regard to la of a tva, they pronounce sentences, especially in slucha-I x, to asayushch ikhsya zhi zn and and death, to joint stock company to it prin uzhdat them: all this is result of extraordinary cunning and art of a devil. 
Sam.: R azresh both those and me sk Azat something. You said that the devil willingly exposes witches and wizards, and does it for the sake of to their joint stock company - that the purposes. The N about I much sly-shat about proizosh edsh recently their cases which, in my opinion, tell about opposite, that is kog-yes about N with p r and with to about r and e m in about with p r and n and m and e t in e with t about t about m, h t about about N both p r and z to N and l and with and r and with to r y l both with in about and with e to r e t y. 
Dan.: N et, he only vn eshn e perceives all this to joint stock company a bad event. Let's look better at N and these cases and you in the accuracy of a uva of di of highway that he deceives and whether covers highway what does not correspond to its actions. 
Sam.: N at, I hear it is scarlet from people, completely be credible howling, to joint stock company not so long ago of one wives shch and N and hundred - la to suspect another that she is a witch and that what - that in the way already managed to do much harm it. She podgo-cooked one Jen Tlmen and to send for the suspect, and then, having accused her of his presence, it left her to it by Jen Tlmen at which, going near it, began to admonish it and urged Quality Department to azatsya from a devil, osta-this Viv gresh by N y a way. P ok and he so finished it, and it stubborn azyvat dock that it usual wives shch and N and, N eozhidan N about N and some distance from them poyavi-las whether caress and, whether cancer staring in their party. P inspect (this gentleman told), your spirit sits over there. Oh, Mr. (she answered), it - which - that hishchn oye animal, and them here everywhere visible not - probably. And here, while they approached this place, the sou - a shchestvo disappeared from a look, odn Acre it sometimes appeared and again watched N and N and x. To onechno (told dzhentl-exchanges), it is your spirit. N about it still absolutely denied everything and here suddenly sharply warped her mouth on hundred - Rhone. Then this gentleman of a few N azhat on it and 

1 2 2 

about N and in about in with I eat p r and z with N and l and with. About N and z and I in and l and, h t oh, p about with y l and I the spirit, harmed people and killed them. The gentleman Zhe, without being a member of the court, allowed to go home her, having decided to open this business for some of judges. To an ogd she podho-put to the house, to her other witch, obrativsha-yasya to it with and mi words met: "Ah you, cholera! That you did! You betrayed all of us". "To joint stock company to us now 

1 2 3 
in with e e t about and with p r and in and t (with p r about with and l and t a)? H t about with to and ut about with t and l ny?" "And you went the spirit and let it will concern this person (the girlfriend advised it)". Then it really sent the spirit and that gentleman suddenly saw near himself fiery vspysh to at. The N about he immediately turned the heart to the Lord and nothing happened to it. Having returned, the spirit sk azat that he anything - go could not make on the reasons e strong belief the last go. "And what - other witch asked - it has nothing what it would be possible to touch?" "It has a child", another answered. "So send du - ha - advised predydushch aya - and let he kosnet-sya this child". Then the witch sent the spirit, 
that concerned the child why he got sick and died. Ve7d- 
we prizn atsya in deeds and were p about vesh en y 8. 
Dan.: And for what you in general mentioned this case? Sam.: That p ok the Azat as reluctantly there is a devil 
on that witches prizn avatsya and told about the activity. N et and to joint stock company and x doubts that when that gentleman finished her, the devil to joint stock company would distract it, being afraid of N, to joint stock company it not prizn would atsya. And when it not p about with l ush and l and with, about N p e r e to about with and l e y r about t. To about d and e about N and p r and - zn it atsya, the devil of N azhalovatsya to other witch and and m about r and z about m of N and t r and in and l of her N and r e e by N to and. 
Dan.: Business here extremely clear - it very willingly exposes them. P a ravda, you, maybe, think over why it appeared in the form of certain animal go and even pushed it to p ri zn An and yu, having given a shatelstvo in the deputy and having given thereby to this gentleman the obvious proof, especially when it warped it a mouth. About why then he forced other witch to line with N her (in what it prizn atsya) to send that spirit? And he made all this because wanted to light even more this case and to bring both of them N and a public inspection. 
Sam.: N about what moved him when it exposed witches? What could he have from it? 
Dan.: Luchsh e ask what he could not obtain. And therefore yn che in all countries the people beat Menno with N tre-to a vog. Witches as if gave the command to the spirits uve-to chit and kill, however not they in fact do it, but the devil sending spirits. He knows about that power with which his Lord that it prichi-nyal suffering and torments allocated and; he acts through witches, he forces others to be afraid of them, that is why and receives - sya that witches can quite be accused of commission 
124 
all these crimes. And it finds time - lichn ye means to open all this. And Menno it podvignut those witches on that they sent it about - tiv it to Jen Tlmen and. Its opportunities are perfectly known to it, and therefore he comes back. And unless State - pod does not allow it to the power to harm sometimes the true? N about unless he can influence all who have no belief? If could, then for a long time the most part of the world would be him un ichtozhen and. However and x people - on sravne-a niya with ispovedyvayushchy true belief - fortunately, it is not enough. In that case it should on - be sent to degyam which have no belief yet, but unless not the belief of parents feeds B ozhesky guardianship, zashch and shch ayu-Shuya and children, and their? The skill of the Satan for - klyuchatsya in the following: he knows on some at - z N and to and m, and m e yu shch and m with I in about r and N and z m e r e e N to and, about in those h e - ny certain time he will get sick with h t and will die. N about will take him for the murderer of this child, and will be considered that it possesses such power, doing everything that will want. And bo it possesses the power given it B an ogham which and primen yat in this case. If it to joint stock company and m - strikes image the child, really you think that he makes all this only to give pleasure to the witch? And whether you consider that he is N of an ikogd of N and what similar did not think of, and Lish 
it pushed his N and it? R to an azva do not walk up and down tut8 
and there legions of demons, and shch and, whom p oglot t? 8 
R to an azva they do not wait when the Lord gives them the chance to strike a blow? N of an euzhela all of us are still so silly to think that this wives shch and N and has to ask or beg them the reasons to ityit a coma - that evil? Whether look at Gospo-yes, because these spiteful spirits play in our game everything ro-, misleading both witches, and all others. 
Sam.: I will tell you one more case, also about - isogoing recently. One wives shch and N at suspected in a stake - a dovstvo and of that, h yu it the silt reasons whose harm - that skoti-not. She was interrogated and she prizn atsya that it had a spirit which zhi l in an old tree, sitting in a hollow of which, it often conducted with it conversations. And to an azhda y time when who - that offended it, it came to this tree and sent it, asking to ruin skotin at the offender. And here it persuaded openly prizn to atsya in everything and to promise to be become forever races with such unseemly activity. But after that, to joint stock company she made similar prizn An iye, to it when it was absolutely alone, this spirit came. "Ah - told 

1 2zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfe •> 
it - you prizn atsya and opened everything. Look, I mo gu to tear you on pieces". She was frightened, however it having risen up whether highway took it. N eskolko not - del later she strongly became angry with one muzhchi-well. It goes to this tree and the spirit asks it: "Why it you prish la? To that made angry you?" "To akoy-that muzhchi-N and" - sk was azat by this witch. "And what you want you to make?" - asked spirit. "It has two horses - from - it vechat. - They went there. To osnis both of them or at least one of N and x". Generally, one horse fell in the same night, and another nearly died, but it eventually after all left, the truth it hardly ho-dit since then. I think, here everything is clear: he became angry N and the fact that it opened everything. However when it p ri highway of la to a tree, he for - was about the discontent and was readily off to commit criminal act. 
Dan.: You think that here everything is clear. Here deyst-vitelno everything is clear if to consider that communication which demos - ny usually use. N about you indeed you think what the Satan lodges in a hollow tree? To it that, pain - 
she there is already nothing to do? N euzhet it per8e9stal to be that 
l in about m, both shch at shch and m, k about about y p about of l about t and t? N e e l and about N 
replaced the krov9a0 vy and cruel essence of that 
awful dr and to about N and and Quality Department azatsya the reasons yat for people 
harm whether doing this highway when to joint stock company aya - that it is angered - Nye of wives shch and N and asks it to go and kill a cow or the Leningrad Region - shad? The N of an euzhela he so grew old what to the person began .pod to find force his skill or even to become more skillful, than it? And can be in all this and there is no N and to joint stock company oh cunning? 
Sam.: Do you think that in these things covar is - with TV about? 
Dan.: Whether I think so? Better - sk azh that you on this subject think. What it can be, to joint stock company not to in and r with TV about m. 
Sam.: N about his purpose was (in my opinion, this demo - 
ny want most of all) the reasons to ityit harm to people. 
Dan.: I do not deny it because all his ability of N and pravleno on it. N about what do you mean, go-vorya slovo*vred"? 
Sam.: You see that in this case it pogu-beat cattle of this person. 
Dan.: Perhaps, it was really made by him. N about 
from where do you - that know? 
Sam.: You hear it is scarlet that at its request it went and killed one horse and nearly ruined the second. 

126 
Dan. I would not risk to claim so. To that told those - be that it ruined one and nearly killed the second horse? 
Sam. The witch herself admitted all deeds. D e N. L e y to t about e that with to and z and l? Sam. Its spirit told it that it made so, to joint stock company it about - 
si la. 
Dan. Yes, personality worthy trust... And, apparently, very obedient. 
Sam. N at why, we see that everything occurred according to it p ok an adhan and I am m. 
Dan. What do you mean? Sam. N at, it prizn is scarlet the fault, this spirit rasser- 
got to on it, then she squabbled with that man and because of it his horse died. It prizn atsya that on - banished spirit. R to an azva here perhaps mere coincidence? 
Dan.: To an ogd it prish la to a tree, the spirit asked it: z and h e t m y p r and highway of l and? To t about r and z about z l and l that I? T and to? 
Sam.: Yes. Dan.: You that, you imagine that the devil lay there and 
knew nothing until then, pok and she not p ri also did not tell highway of la to it? 
Sam.: And why it needed sprash to ivat it if he already knew about everything? 
Dan.: P to atom that it is artful. He glanced it in du - shu and ignited anger there, having provided so to them in the way all incident between it and that man. To rum of that, it zn is scarlet that already at this time horses suffered from what - what had to cause them smer-ti. Or it is the Lord gave it strength to strike them. Then he wrote on her heart that it at - went again to a tree. In appearance he was angry because of the fact that it prizn atsya, but actually he wanted these things to become everything known. If he not zn is scarlet that whether the horse will die on natural the reasons e which action began to amplify, or thanks to strength given it, then it would not begin to do so that it at - went to a tree to this moment. Even if her anger, without its participation, brought her so far, it could give quickly to it necessary the N is put in order iye. And bo strength of the Satan, ma-nipuliruyushchy hearts and x people is big. 
Sam.: The N about I noticed that you missed. Could happen so that God sometimes gives strength to a devil, even sending the witch. 
Dan.: I said that the Lord in the justice Gives the Satan strength to mislead people because lyu- 

127 
di of Quality Department azyvatsya to love its truth. The N about from this not сл^ blows that the devil has an opportunity to harm because the witch is sent to business. It occurs on wines <the person because strength of a devil increases sins lyud sk them. The Lord is offended and sends (to joint stock company govorizyxwvu> 
the apostle P avet) siln y deception. Whether about you have a N still to the prima ry by means of which it is possible dock the Azat that the devil of t wishes that witches were found? 
Sam.: I hear it is scarlet about many similar cases, but t you say that all this cunning and that a devil zastavlyae1 people to think that all perfect evil - business of his hands. 
Dan.: The devil will force people to believe that he put et all this, only when he is able osushchest to twist it. That is why to him it is favorable when it does the harm, not to hold it in secrets e, but to proclaim in in with e a l mustache y highway and N and e. 
M.B.: And what you will tell N and it. One witch was detained and on the basis of strong suspicion and before became before court. It led business and m in the way that she, to joint stock company I hear is scarlet, prizn atsya. P ri zn An and e it was the following sort: it had two spirits, one in the form of la - a ska, another - m y highway and. P about her words, they did for it a set of things. To joint stock company - that time she even accused certain wives shch and N at, zhi vsh uyu in ten - twelve miles from there which it is (quite possible) it and not zn is scarlet, it nevertheless, N of an azval on names and, in sorcery, and at the same time sk azat that it has in a mouth such place from where her spirit sucks to r about in 91. 
Dan.: To a devil the easiest sk the Azat to the witch that so aya that e N shch and N an and l and t and to about y - t about m at the h and N and z and N and m and yu t with I to about l - a dovstvo also carry N and a body defined secrets uyu otme-oozes at. The N and is lingering AI of N of eskolky last years he accused by means of witches and magicians of people, a neoba chayn about religious and pious. People dolzhn to remember that they are based not N and him svidetelst-Vakh. He should not interpose in this matter, and any its intervention has to be rejected, so to joint stock company he makes all this with extraordinary insidiousness. 
M.B.: B ezuslovno, the certificate of a devil should not in itself be valid in court until then, pok and it not bu-is put is confirmed to joint stock company by them - that indisputable a dokazatel stvo. N about what you sk azht concerning the tea following a sl? aya the witch was condemned by N of EC and, already standing at hung tsy, she tells not only about what she made, but also and about that from whom she received the spirit. 

128 
it gave it with regret because was going pok in to utnut fellow countrymen - ny zhi zn. P olagat that whether in her words did not contain in a similar case to ap a lie or unfounded obvine-niya. It sk azat that this spirit brought it one wives - shch in and from other city. To stat speaking, it for a long time on - some neighbors ripened. Then she was arrested and to - put in court, odn Acre she stubborn denied that she shows - sya the witch and that once brought spirit another - me, N yn e accusing her. A question here in what: whether certificates of wives shch and N y are, made it before smer-tyyu, the sufficient basis for court that prizn to at that, the second, guilty? Here - that at their N in rasporyazhen AI any more not of the certificate of a devil, but wives shch and the N y, is reported - ny by her let and not under the oath, but in the face of death, h that, N and m about y in z of l I d, to N e in m e in N e e in e with about m of the lake. 
Dan.: P the odobny certificate can seem to - the statochny basis for court and she will be called guilty though business goes about zhi zn and and death. About if it is good to N to look narrowly at him, then we will see that it not so. 
M.B.: Maybe you want sk the Azat what it not with - all is indisputable as it is the only thing svide-those l with TV about? 
Dan.: N et, not only therefore, but also because this certificate of just the same person. 
M.B.: I gave this example because wives shch and N and rask ayalas. And let it wounds sh e was bad, but those are p e r - that e y m about N about in e r and t. 
Dan.: I did not mean that if she is a witch, so to it and in e r and t N e l z I. N about e with l and about N and N and to about d and N e r and with to and and in and l and with, that its certificate slish to ohm poorly because she sil-but is mistaken, thinking that he tells the truth though N and sa-my business it at all not so, but continuous self-deception. 
M.B.: Do you mean that the devil could force this wives shch and the N at to think that another brought to it spirit, and in fact it was not? 
Dan.: Yes, I also speak about it. M.B.: N et, me never pon yat, to joint stock company it can do 
p r about and z about y ti. 
Dan.: You should pomn ityit that the devil deceives Women razn in the ymiy ways, zastavlya I them to trust in ve-shch and which in fact do not exist. In Ger-manias and in others of the countries ah demons so mislead witches that force them to believe as if they lift storms with thunderstorms and moln and I mi. Demons 
in
go zn at when there are similar things - storms, 

5-3400	1 2 f) 
r about m y, and r and with p a mustache to and yu to t with l u x i, z and with t and I I about with l e p l e N of N y y m and r to believe in l that all these great deya N and I Lord's an essence not it, but a devil. And exchanges of N about on this the reasons e he is eager to be shown in N and x. So iye demons force witches pove-to rit that at their request they ruin people and live t of N y x, N and N about with I r and z l and h N y m and p at t I am m and in r e d, in that in r e I to and to a lot of things happen to m naturally, and to azhtsya, bud-that it was made it and. The same and for the rest, in the relation che-go they are allocated to use the force - they line witches, pretending at the same time as if are those send them. In some places so iye demons force witches ve-to rit that they get masks from wolves, I tear apart - shch and x and the tearing N and a part of sheep that they gather N and festivals that sometimes they are had by air, to joint stock company of ovy things of N and the business does not exist, however - Mona most 9s2trogim in the way keep witches in similar 
zabluzhden and and. The devil can deceive wives shch and N at even 
so, poyavivsh is in image another wives shch and N y, bringing - Russian cabbage soup to it we are highways or a cat. In the minds suffering from melan-holiya he can create very strong the N uyu by it to Arti in N is invented at when to it azatsya that it is that business about - izosh the Leningrad Region, and in fact this N of an ikogd was not. In similar cases of people has to be especially rassu-ditelen, in to an acha he will be very quickly deceived kovarst-vy the Satan and vverzhen in conducted to and y a sin. 
M.B.: If this is soIf this is soIf this is so, then to joint stock company the court takes out at - the dialect condemning the witch? P it oluchatsya that neither it killed, nor the devil did it at its request. 
Dan.: According to word B ozhy, the witch dolzhn and mind - to ret, but not because she killed the person because she cannot make it (if it is not those witches, which ubiva-yut with the help I yes, or received by them from a devil, or prepared according to his recipes), but because they svya Zahn y with a devil. So if the court will find dokaza-telstvo of the fact that it svya Zahn and with demons, then it can and dolzhn and to be p ri zn An and guilty of sorcery. 
M.B.: If it is revealed that witches are guilty that they had communication with a devil, but N elzya will be sk the Azat that they killed the person, then the court will not sentence them to death. 
Dan.: It would be necessary to wish that Zac it bo-leu was perfect in it otn Osh en AI, up to the fact that - this nasty thing would be eradicated. These magicians and a stake - Dong I which, being svya Zahn y with spirits and whether the N of An resorting to Zack and I am m externally do good, N and the business 

130 
conduct people to numerous pregresh en to iya. As for ostaln ykh, vodyashch their acquaintance to demons and using magic, all of them it is necessary unichto-to live that the others saw and were afraid. 
M.B.: You N ik an ogd do not receive such certificate of a devil which will accept court. And what you will tell then people? H there was who - who died now and before smer-tyyu sk azat that all of them it is bewitched y. And you to precisely ska zheta that it was made by those - and that are. A question to joint stock company of times and z and to l yu h and e t with I in e t about y p about ho e with t and. 
Dan.: They are bewitched actually because them sozna-ny zatuman en about a devil. And you will not hear from them anything except that for them people - nothing, and they do not doubt it. 
M.B.: The fact that you sk an azalea, partly, maybe, and truly, but I lichn about zn am scarlet wives shch and N at, which very many schi-a waist the witch. And it is valid when she was time - a gnevana, there were many countries of N ykh things. You do not consider the real proof? She, of course, denies everything, odn Acre all this occurs and the incident speaks for itself. 
Dae of N: You dolzhn y rassk to us and then we will see their Azat. 
M.B.: It happened so that she became angry N and one person, and at it was a swine ya which suddenly died - la. Another thought that not the N ravitsya by it, and at him the horse got sick. The third could not sit N and a chair in operating time. Generally, for nine - ten years and x was a lot of cases. Some saw a devil the size slightly more to Osh to and, with og-frame eyes. To - cooked beer, but it did not get denser. The third saw in her house something of the size of I gn en to and, I play - shchy near ok N and. One more often visited what - that spirit. N of EC aya starush to and, N akhodivsh ayasya in inconsolable on - the building, saw this wives shch and N at, standing near it all night long; according to her, it bewitched her. And x cases there was great variety so they cannot even be listed. And if she was not a witch, unless there could be all this? 
Dan.: I already sk azat that where the Satan has from - carrying with the witch, he does so that in all cases when it possesses the power received from the Lord, - it zhtsya as if it does not do anything, but the N recovers is-klyuchitelno at the request of witches. When we meet a disease, lameness or death, on - stepped owing to natural causes, it put - 

5 *	1 3 1 
et so that forces the witch to believe that this is her doing. And all this is only in order that it about - was broken. In the same place, where it has no opportunity svya-to zyvatsya with witches, he tries to seed gradually in some people strong suspicion in otn oshen any given AI of men y or wives shch and N y. So if it achat N, then will not give up on the, and will do it with all force and ingenuity. If the person suffers from a painful disease and nevezhestven on - with t about l to oh, h t about about t to and z y in and e in t with I about t in e r y in B about e with t in e in N of N about e p r about - vision, imagining as if everything is done by a devil, is sent - ny by the witch, then that, in turn, enters it into a bigger delusion, zastavlya I to believe that behind it there is this witch. The people suspected in a stake - a dovstvo, cannot appear here. To then does e t oh, to and to N e With and t and N and? To t about - t about about and t with I, h t about N and N e go N and t r and - Vit of a devil of people whom he suspects of Zahn I is Tia sorcery - and m in the way, it gives to a devil even more power over itself(himself) regardless of the fact that it will do - to cause whom - that harm or just I vlya tsya to it. And bo the Satan constantly is everything lyu-dyam, using any case, and it is not necessary to it that sent it to joint stock company aya - that wives shch and N and at all or what - and - be N men and. The same who thinks that the evil ghost prikho-dit and appears before N them from behind the fact that they races - annoyed what - that wives shch and N at, as a result sent it, are extraordinary blind. R to an azva the Satan if it possesses in about z m about N about with t yu p r and ch and n I am t z l o and l and z N and t, h t about p r about and z about y - is put, not in forces by means of the cunning to force to think the injured person that the one whom he suspects so he as a result will become to azat-sya as if all evil occurred because of the last is guilty? And whether here the person, with fear and a shower and y on the dark street, at - N the yawl to oten to and or a dog for an ugly devil. The N apri-died, one span Yale not so long ago, having swum for a while somewhere in in - with a chain of N and a neck approached to the doors of the house certain che-l about in e to and. To t about - t about z and m e t and l e go in t e m of N about t e and with to and z and l, h t about e t about l about N e h that, r and z m e r about m with e r e e N to and and of l and z and m and, in e l and h and - ache about a saucer. Then this person decided to approach on - closer and to ask, for the sake of the Father, both the Son, and Saint Du - ha that he it for is shown iye. And here the dog started talking - and she answered N and them I zy to e - and sk azat: "With uk". So hundred - the Leningrad Region know who it was. If the devil knows that deterioration in health has to astupit N owing to este-stvenny p ri chi N, it does so," that these people who - 

13 2 
that offends and all N achin at to suspect the person, koto-the victims suspect horns. Or he fraudulently generates in N their feeling of discontent and a thought, h t about about l e z N m about of l and p r and y t and about t t about y and l and i N about y p e r with about N y. If it actually torments the person, having seized his body, it does not have sense still to lie and govo-to rit that sent it to joint stock company aya - wives shch and N and. 
M.B.: But whether happens sometimes and so what he believes as if sent it to joint stock company aya - that wives shch and N and in what the last and prizn atsya during the investigation? 
Dan.: Yes, but I speak about those cases when it has no communication with witches, and he tries that all under - zreval of the innocent, doing thereby people vinov-to N y m and in p r about l and t and i to r about in both N e in and N of N y x. And N about d and about N go in about r and t the truth, but it is possible to trust it only when he lies. So let people in the simplicity do not think that he tells the truth, let and for the sake of durn ykh the purposes. 
M.B.: This - that from all the rest also seems to me N and and about l e e with t r and N of N about y in e shch yu, e with to about l m of N about go m about e t to happen to t, at least it and was sploshn aya visibility, because of discontent of the suspected person. N ekotory ve-shch and, I so think, the Satan - N an aprimer when beer, oil, slivk is impossible does and. After all podozrevaye-the my person is not a sorcerer. 
Dan.: Oh, sir! Cunning of the Satan in all these affairs of N e in e r about I t of N and. And I z N and yu, h t about about y h N about (to and to go in about r I am t) with the h and t and - etsyatsya firmly dock an adhan of N ym that the N y is given the person is a sorcerer if all results of his actions obnaruzhi-are howled at the same time. About for the skilled demon it is absolutely easy to make N. 
M.B.: So zn achit you do not think that public opinion is enough in order that court with confidence in y N e with p r and go in about r? 
Dan.: Experience pok azyvat as it is precipitate postupa-yut the people condemning any given person for a stake - a dovstvo of N and the basis of simple suspicion. Force, nali-chy which attribute to witches gives rise in many to fear, forcing them to be and mi trustful. Mno-gy come at the same time so far that if they can force children to accuse own ro-ditel, then they think that they made extraordinary good act. 
M.B.: You say that the certificate of a devil not sle-Blows p ri N and mother even if and it is known that he not - once told the truth because when he speaks the rights - 

1 3 3 
du, he does it, meaning the bad purposes. And you schitaye-those the devil certificate not only what he govo-rit when from it it is demanded, but also when magicians who cannot sk the Azat nothing act except vnu-highway e N of N about about and m of B about l e e t about go, e with l and I am a N e p e r e in and r and yu, in y with to and z and - whether that the certificate of the witch concerning many things made by it before death is not what - or from - lichn ym from the certificate of a devil because he deceived her, for - staviv to believe in nonexistent the thing and. P omimo it - go, you say that neither suspicions, nor public opinion and judgment can have weight to affect N and court, so to JSC Satana slish the lump is cunning and interferes with all this. Then to joint stock company to court to find the witch? To joint stock company and e dock - a zatelstvo dolzhn y they to have N and hands ah? 
Dan.: People dolzhn y to bring to a lyatv about having - sya communications and if their participation in sorcery then the speech about zhi zn and and smer-ti can go is found. It - most vazhn oye; from this it follows that dolzh-ny to be also the N corresponding p ok an adhan and I nadezh-ykh witnesses, or p ri zn An and e the witch. And bo if the certificate turns out f alsh and vy what is quite possible, so to joint stock company everything, proceeding from demons, it is necessary to suspect of it, or will be based on rumors, accidental similarity, to joint stock company ovy can azatsya ok rezul-by the Tat hitroumn ykh tricks About Aton y, to joint stock company was about pain - a shinstvo of people, what then members of the court State will tell - I will fall, being not sure but only leaning on an oath? P ostupy and m in the way, they can quite condemn also the innocent, to joint stock company often happened at us. 
M.B.: You are mistaken in one - prizn An iye witches guilty is not necessarily connected by court about with a spill to rov. 
Dan.: I am not mistaken at all, odn if court roofing felt - to determined by Acre the person by suspicion guilty of murder sk otin y, then he sentences him to tyu-to remny at once is imprisoned iyu, pillories and not only obescheshchivat it forever, but if behind it 
again will follow new podozren3iye and arrest, it will be 
ozn to achat inevitable cm ert9. So you see, 
as the tone to aya a side separates them from shedding of blood. N about even if do not kill the person and he escapes, preby-in an imprisonment or costing Wai at a pillory, and in a distance - neyshy N of an ikogd does not fall under suspicion again, unless is not regrettable and the fact that it was osuzh-den court for sorcery is not shameful? I speak about those cases, to - 

13 4 
tory are based by N and suspicion, or on the witness - the stvo proceeding from About Aton y. In these cases of people of m about e t y t and with about l yu t of N about N e in and N about in e N. 
M.B.: And the nogda turns out so that, leaning N and on - a dozreniye and public opinion, judges get on a right way and the person, not prizn ayushch iysya in sorcery during the investigation and is shown iya charges, at - is known when the sentence is already read. 
Dan.: Let's say that the court, being guided by certificates of the Satan, suspicion and a rumor, sometimes attacks N and a trace that, in my opinion, happens very seldom; however full confidence about An which sounded p ri zn and I and obna-the ruzhenny certificates after all is necessary for the people bringing to a lyatv in the face of the Lord, it not osno-a vaniye because they klyan utsyanutsya that N and a basis of rumors testify or. If whether the person is considered coldu-the number highway on the basis of suspicion, without vsyak their dock - zatelstvo, then the court will arrive more fairly if osvobo-dit it, but will not condemn because to joint stock company oye the basis is received by them as a result of made in this way prizna-a niya and to joint stock company they will find what is not known? 
M.B.: I consider that these people break Zac he, condemning the innocent on the basis of insufficient dokaza-of t e l with t in, about with about bin of N about e with l and y l and p r and N e with e N and t about r e with t in e N of N and I to a lyatv. N about if they are N and the correct way, let it become also N and the basis of rumors, I do not see why they dolzhn y the reasons I t to whom - harm: condemning vinov-a leg, judges do not do anything bad. 
Dan.: I do not say that members of the court should be accused of the death of all innocently died, or in nepravil-the number the relation to what - that to the specific person. I ask about what they will tell in the face of the Lord concerning the N condemned only and a basis - scientific research institute of rumors. P to a redstavta that somebody was accused in ugo-lovny crime; suspicion concerning it vi-novnost extraordinary siln y, however he can be and absolutely a N evin ovn ym. H the court has to do that in that case? Does it have toDoes it have toDoes it have to deliver N and the card zhi zn the person, proceeding only from suspicion? P lips he will be really guilty, but wines and him is known to the Lord, and any person will not be able to find it - go, that is why they will acquit him. And whether they will put forward what - nibud charges? Whether they will be able to find out what is not let to them know? In this case they will not be able to condemn the innocent person? 

135 
Sam.: P odozhd, give I I will think a little. I still not really well understood all these affairs, kasayu-shchikhsya disclosures and detection of witches. That you go-in about r and highway, to and e t of m of N with I e N e with to about l to about with t r and N of N y m. I with and m of m of N about - go time was in court when there heard cases of witches, and we prizn avals their guilty persons, relying on public opinion, suspicion and on such certificates which you reject. Really, it happened so that pe-red death suddenly we hear Ali that they are innocent, however it did not shake my confidence that they are witches. Because say that the devil has over n and m and t and to uyu in l and with t, h t about N e p about z in about l I e t and m p r and z N and in and t with I. 
Dan.: And what forced you to think that the devil does not wish that they admitted? You see that some admit during interrogation and at the moment to azn and. Perhaps, the devil has also the power and over N and and about l e e z and to about r e N e l y m and in about r and m and both ub and y c and m and? 
Sam.: Yes, it so, but he not really worries when thieves and murderers do the p ri zn to An and I as it does not affect him in such degree, to joint stock company prizn An iye witches. 
Dan.: H that, you he thinks does not want to be obesslav-lenny or does not wish that badly carry to it - foxes? So after all, what it is necessary to do if witches admitted? To an ogd the thief or the murderer admits the sins, it is, whatever you may say, the first highway ag to pok ayan iyu. However if the devil can prevent them or hold them from p ri zn An and I, then he will make it. It is absolutely clear that he just aspires to that witches admitted everything; to it it so vazhn lake. He will force a forehead - centuries to think that witches are a hundred times more here, than them is actually. He will expose them through the stake - dun and zn akhary. An olsh of everything it wants B people to think that it does everything - and storms, whether also unusual - horadka, and all diseases which collapse on lyu-Tay and zhivotn ykh. And Menno for this reason he outposts - lyat people to believe and even to admit what actually was not; that he made what he actually never made and could not sover-ityit highway. And will be if we, of course, do not become wipe - to tsat the authorities and providences of B ozhy over the whole world. 
Sam.: If the Satan receives so huge benefit, exposing them, then in what then is the reasons and is convinced - Nosta of people as if he wants to hide all the Dejan Iya and does not allow witches prizn to avatsya in made by them? 
13 6 
Dan.: All this results from wrong confidence and fear that witches commit many crimes and that at their request and aiming the spirits make all this. If 
the Satan is so kind and obliging, 94pochemu he not at - 
bears it though how many nibud den eg? It zn ayah, where 
they and in whose to Armand ah lie. He says to the witch that he can make so that the person went lame. He says that he can kill losh ad. And sometimes he says that he mo-zht and by all means (if she wants it) will kill the person. As if it within his power is to make all these deya N and I, only he lacks a request. And nteresno, whether all these demons can bring at least one penny from the house of that a forehead - 
centuries, 9 whose cows or horses they, according to them, pogu- 
whether bi 5. Whether Z joint stock company of N hotel, this demon says, can install 
in the person and to cause it from there. P lips he will try sde-lat so that this demon got at least into a chest if, of course, is able, and brought from there that - nibud. If demons are not able to make it, then be sure that they will not be able pok the Azat nothing in case on murder or a wound - a niya, to joint stock company they do in most cases or that they there still make. All this occurs only with on - a zvoleniye of B ozhy, and at all not just for the hell of it what - that witches. And for to joint stock company oh the purposes have to serve then all these tricks and focuses if witches hran ityit a pier - h and n and e and n and o h e m of N e about in about r and t. 
Sam.: And after all, for the sake of own satisfaction, I want simply and zlozh t some of my reasons about those cases which I happened to meet. N e so long ago in court which member I I vlya lsya, rassmatri-vatsya case on charge of one old woman of sorcery. N and a meeting prish the Leningrad Region eight or ten people, koto-ry also gave against it p ok an adhan and I. I, to - nechno, do not remember all details, however and their main certificates are not of great value. One wives shch and N and, having taken the oath, darling twisted that her husband on the deathbed told that he was bewitched because it davnym-was pricked with a needle long ago. And further it sk azat that his N avern a yak and this bewitched wives shch and N and. Generally he and in a penny did not put it and considered that she became angry about it because somehow time she asked for it as a loan five highways illin g, and it did not give it. This wives shch and N and, also under the oath, say - la that she is absolutely sure that that old woman - the witch and that it killed her husband. Then entered men and and told such story. At me were strong earlier 
and
  healthy legs, sk it azat. This old wives shch and N and posso- 

137 
it ritsya with me because of the child. It sk azat that rasschita-etsyatsya with me. Three dn I later at me the knee so ached that I just could not stand. And since then, to joint stock company only I on - think of it, me to azhdy time visits so aya pain. Then one more person, low growth, by sight very much chestn y entered. So it at once darling vi l, prin yav at - to a syag that she is a witch. To joint stock company - that time I angered her, sk it azat, but soon rask aya lsya because waited that that - that slu-chitsya. And here N and the next night I saw it ripened - shche whom before I happened never to see. Having suddenly woken up, I saw near myself a huge face, such huge, to joint stock company and e usually draw at saratsi-is new. It looked directly to me in the face. P a donkey of it I could not recover, probably, dn I two. Then entered one more wives shch and N and at which as a result of a serious illness the child died. P ri N I in the oath, it is darling vi la that this old woman killed her di tya. Then appeared men and, to - tory sk azat that though he also does not know N avern I to and, but to it to it azhtsya that once she became angry about it because it p ri to it to ask highway of la flowerpots, and it did not give them to it. And right after that he heard at himself in an ear the whistling voice, sk azavsh and y to it that he is bewitched. N and the next day at him the back so ached that he could not even sit directly. It sk azat that sent uzn to at to zn akhark e, and that sk azat that he is bewitched by that wives shch and - ache which came for flower gorsh to Amy. Aude - N of Acre, according to her, he had to recover from it, as happened within ten days. So it sk azat. P atom entered two or three respectable gorozhani-on which assured the audience that, on the general to me - a niya, it was a witch. Whether we are N ash her guilty because that could be made; she was condemned also to azn and whether. N akho-dyas on a scaffold, she achat N to pray, and after her death it became clear that she was innocent so all these charges were from it sn I you. Do you think, we a gait - whether it is bad? 
Dan.: And you to joint stock company think? You are confident that she was a witch? R to an azva could not be what it is innocent also t y p r about l and l of N e in and N of N uyu to r about in? 
Sam.: If she was also innocent, what to us - wasps - was tavatsya to be done? We arrived according to p ok an adhan and I am m of witnesses, prin essh their oath which swore that they unconditionally consider her the witch and that she made everything uk an adhan of N oye. 
138 
Dae of N: And if who - poklyan etsyatsya what they think so, will be enough that on the basis of mine to l I am t in y z and I in and t, h t about e N e t and to? 
Sam.: N et, you vi di of highway what they told about and that forced them to think and m in the way. 
Dae of N: But whether all of you could be mistaken in the otsen to ah, kasateln about all these cases therefore you thought quite so, to joint stock company thought, and considered that znaye-in what here business as these people swore to you? 
Sam.: If the witness brings a perjury, then the court everything is equally the adhan works according to it p ok and I am m; and he is free from N of joint stock company an adhan and I, so to and to these certificates also the N e with highway and m p r and with I is given y h e to l about in e to about m, p r at. 
Dae of N: If the witness accurately pok azyvat that, according to him, the situation was so - and so - saying at the same time to la a tva, the court will work according to it svide-telstvo until then, p ok but will not understand that it to la of a tv of beds - on. N about to joint stock company to make this certificate sufficient if the person only thinks and cannot vysk the Azat neobkhodi-the my basis to the explanations? Whether in all this ostayet-sya to see highway aspiration of the person dock the Azat that it is given - Nye wives shch and N and it is inevitable dolzhn and to be the witch. That wives shch and N and said that her husband prizn atsya by her before smer-tyyu that the old woman killed him because it not odol-zhi with l it p I t highway and whether N of g. The N about unless it proves that it bewitched him? Whether the m is ozht by a devil to kill for the sake of udo-a volstviye, only to give joy to this witch? Here it is necessary to think that he died from what - that the disease which arose from races - stroystvo of his body about which the devil knew and so led - la with any given old woman that it quite could on - involve suspicion of sorcery rather. 
Sam.: You vi di of highway that there was it that the N and to that, except a devil could not make. 
Dan.: In fact, that huge face, koto-a swarm, to joint stock company seemed to it, that saw men and whether there was highway the ghost of ohms of a devil. However unless it is enough that dock the Azat what the demon appeared before it after that, to joint stock company it caused discontent that wives shch and N y, and so, it she also sent it? The N about unless not a Satan constantly I vlya etsyatsya to people and if he received on that pleasure of the Lord, terrifies them with the help here and x ghosts? Especially if the person of what - that is afraid and about - patches siln ym imagination. And to joint stock company and e the bases you - sk that azat wives shch and N and, absolutely confident in as if 
this old woman killed her di tya, dock azyvayushch and e what it and was? If she only this way thinks, and thousands of people do the same whether highway relying N and it voobrazhe-ny, then unless to you it is enough that with might and main klya-stsya what it and was? H that to the certificate of that zn akhark and, sk azavsh to it that men at were bewitched and from it at it ached backs and as it to whom - there azat Quality Department in flower gorsh to ah, it is the certificate of a devil what I already spoke wounds sh e about. So zn achat the rumors based on and x reasons? 
Sam.: So zn you achit you think that we dolzhn y to reject all this, isn't it? 
Dan.: N at, I just would not begin to say so op-rometchivy to la tv. 
Sam.: About could be N and so that it was - m about y, ho t I p about with l e e e with m e r in t and with to and z and l and, h t about about N and t and to about in about y in N e I vlya las. 
Dan.: Yes, most likely she really was not a witch. Because what could force it to reject it vvi-du of death? That she is a witch she was accused by a devil because against it he gave direct certificates. 
Sam.: You want sk the Azat that the devil told a mustache - weary that zn akhark and as if this wives shch and N and - the witch. 
Dan.: And you think that it was who - that another, not With and that N and? 
Sam.: At that time I did not think at all that it is a devil; N about t e p e r I in and at, h t about e that y l of N and to t about and N about y, to and to about N. 
Dan.: Than N at, be cleverer from now on and think over what you already N opened. 
Sam.: Honestly, I will suffer very much if renders - sya that she really was not a witch. 
Dan.: If she was also a witch, then the bases at you to think so very little. The N about it was not her, and you otn the yawl at it zhi zn also disgraced her name. 
Sam.: P a donkey of that time I happened to be a member of the court again and at us got one wives shch and again N and on which pok azyvat that she is a witch though it also did not kill odes - N about go h e with l about in e to and. P r about t and in N e e in y with t at p and l and p I am t and l and sh e with t h e l about in e to. P e r in about y y l and N e to and I with t and r ush to and, with to and z and in highway and I, h t oh, to joint stock company she thinks, it angered this wives shch and N at and that two or three dn I later to joint stock company - that in the evening she stayed at home at the center and there was something, whether a toad, whether cancer, koto-a swarm of N achat to creep to her heart. She grabbed palk at and dumped it from herself, but suddenly her as if that - that squeezed. The itsa following svideteln sk azat that she 

140 
quarreled with N to it then her hens began to die one by one, and so proceeded until then, pok and it did not burn one to Uri c at zhi we twist. The third witness, m h and N and, and with to and z and l, h t about about N and to and to - t about r and z with and l N about p r about gn e in and - las N and it entered, and it had so aya temn aya a cow who at that moment stood N and p ri vya zi at their N in the house because was zi ma and he was afraid, to joint stock company to it there would be no what bad. And he in zhi zn would also not go there where it was, but whether, probably, because of her Zack of N of An and y, it entered it pome-a shcheniye and kissed a cow under a tail. P atom two more or three witnesses sk an azalea that, agrees to the general to me - a niya, she was a witch. M y considered her guilty and she - la is sentenced to prison is concluded iyu and shameful 
to column, though sama6 N of an astaa of a wave of N and that witch it 
N and to about d and N e y l and 9. 
Dae of N: And you are sure that you were? Sam.: I indeed thought that I was though many from 
her neighbors thought that it not so. N about to joint stock company could about - izoyt all these things right after that, to joint stock company she razgne-vatsya? To an azaelk that all this work of a devil. 
Dae of N: Really, he is so cunning that could represent all this. P lips really the devil was to that old woman in an image of a toad or cancer and, and it held down her body. The N about unless from this with need follows what he was sent by another of wives shch and N and? He cannot p ri N I t another of masks y until then, pok and the Lord will not give it N and it soiz-a voleniye to mislead so nevezhestven-ny people. The N and one witch cannot give vozmozh-to appear to it to Nosta before people in a visible image. To it it is granted to B an ogham, and the Satan gradually is angry all with and l N e e and s and l N e e, p about with l e h e go and p about I in l I e t with I, the t and to h t about to and - zhtsya as if p ri chi the N and is in it. 
Sam.: We see that he is to witches and zakley-a N and bodies I am m. 
Dan.: Yes, it so, but we not dolzhn y to think that it on the zhelan and yu can p ri N and what mother - nibud about - time to appear here. The fact that he is - whether mothers and Zac N of hotel of m becomes only on the reasons e gne-va Lord's, so to JSC On the Azat for - bludshy people, not vn imayushch them and not a subrank yayushch ikhsya wishes strictly N of joint stock company to the words of the Lord of B of RSA. And bo demons svya Zahn y mogushchest-by the venneyshy strength of the Lord and his providence, and in all cases when On weakens fetters, they move on - so much, the N askolko On allows them, N and inch pain - she. If the person loves darkness, but not light, then to the demon 
141 
is granted permission to make most here things are various". Ekotory it frightens N ugly images mi, another it zatuman ivat brains razn ymiy pictures and m and, t r e t and m in about about bshch e I in l I e t with I in about r and z e l and with to and, m y highway with or still what - nibud a small animal. 
Sam.: I thought that the Satan can be in that vi in which he will want or which will be pleasant to it if the witch sends it somewhere. 
Dan.: You strongly are mistaken. Because the fact that it on is banished by the witch does not give it N and to joint stock company oh of force. If \it is force, then it undoubtedly, will be everything and everywhere and m in the way and in such look, to joint stock company will be oh eat \is necessary. So if it is to whom - nibud, the CU let this person thinks that the Lord allowed a devil to reach it, and let him hope on trust to resist to it, and on destiny to get rid of deception and delusion. 
Sam.: N about unless sometimes he does not appear when it is sent by witches? 
Dan.: To an ogd he finds out that it is authorized to it to appear, it - if at it is the witch - does so. as if she sends it. If that is not present, it all the same appears and works so as far as to it it is given forces and the authorities. 
Sam.: And that you sk azhesh about hens of that of wives shch and N y / Dan.: And what I can sk the Azat if they are dead? Sam.: I mean whether you think that they - 
whether are bewitched? 
Dan.: My God! The N and one arrow will not fall to the ground without permission of the Father of your N ebesny. And than chicken of l uch highway e with t r e l y? 
Sam.: WellWell, I was satisfied what you told that the devil cannot concern anything - whether bo, neither to kill, nor to do harm if is not on that oso-god of a pleasure of the Lord. Witches cannot give it N and to joint stock company oh of force, though think that it they send it when it lines them on everything so iye postup-to and. Let's not say on this subject any more. To N about after all, unless it is not clear that it is a devil ruined those 
hens? P to atom that after that, to joint stock company 9 this shch and N and burned wives 
one chicken, case p rivers of a host lsya 7. If the Satan not - 
lat it, to joint stock company all this could stop? You are the ska hall that it, having force of the reasons I t harm, wants and mo-zht to stop it though similar Dejan Iya and osushchest-vlyatsya. So, if all this was made by the demon, not 
142 
whether it is necessary to think that this wives shch both N and and the truth was a witch, prin I in in vn iman iye that everything occurred on - to the sla of that, to joint stock company she became angry? P lips will be so that to do to Sa-of the thane, having received the power that he made it will be sent by the witch (using it as a pretext) and to make it obvious, it will seed discord between it and that wives shch and N oh to force du's people - mother that it to it has no N ik joint stock company oho otn Osh en iya, but, the N aprotiv, is used by the witch because who - that angered her. So nothing remains to us - lat, to joint stock company of N to azvat this wives shch and N at the witch. 
Dan.: N about this very weak basis for it with e r e z N about go z and I in l e N and I. D l I am a N and h and l and, N and m of N e and z in e with t of N about N and - a vernyaka whether really the devil killed those hens. Perhaps, they had to joint stock company aya-that an infection which - and he knew about it - could ruin them; it skillfully zaver-sewed business, having forced two wives shch and the N to quarrel (and sde-lat it was as easy as shelling pears). To an ura as a result died, and to people it could pok azatsya that they were for - coldovana. The N about you still asked: to joint stock company could happen what after burning of one chicken others did not die any more? R to an azva it not work of a devil? N at, and you mo-zht sk the Azat that if this chicken was not burned for - vividly, then all other N avern I to and would be died? And what if it he made so what any chicken did not die any more, and he lined this wives shch and N at on sorcery what - she would burn this chicken that could show - sya that means consists in it, with on - power of which it is possible to get rid of demons? And whether present that it had force un to ichtozhit all these hens, and it is unimportant whether he was and m an inept murderer or simply vypoln the yawl the work with laziness. It could ruin fast huge herd of pigs, to - whether Christ gave it N and that p r and in about 98. R an azv it could not if this wives shch and N y had five thousand hens, poubi-to vat them at once? So, he is so silly and stupid that he kills them in turn and, without having managed to kill all of them, is already expelled? If he had a power to kill already before, to joint stock company burned this chicken why it did not kill the others when these people decided to burn it? Perhaps, it and not zn is scarlet that they are going to do, and lay to itself(himself) in to orzin to e with ER highway with tyyu", and, having come to kill Others, felt this smoke and was frightened. 
Sam.: Z the N achit, you think that he did not kill these hens. 

143 
Dan.: And from where at you so aya confidence that it was made by him? You came to this conclusion to wasps - novaniya of the oath recited to you; for the same reason you are sure that it was sent by those wives shch and N and, but I put hundred against one that it never had such force, h t about y x about t I y p r and to about with N ut with I to N and m. 
Sam.: N at, and that you sk azhesh concerning other guo? This person whom the back at to about ro you forced to kiss? 
Dan.: I think that he just strongly loved the cow. P lips this person will learn to learn Gospo- and will expel from the head all these f taziya An that the devil did not possess N ik joint stock company oh the power over in N any more it because it tvo-rit the deya N and I in f An a basin I x, the people born in minds, and especially it manages it if people are afraid of it, to joint stock company was and in this case. The Satan creates in them go-lavas a set of silly representations and to force the person to believe that it is bewitched, it embroils it with the one who can be suspected in coldov-a stvo. Thus, your court, prin imy these display - N and I, condemn a great number of innocent people because you believe a devil and what witches can do though actually they it to make not in forces. 
M.B.: I also heard about many cases when lyu-di were condemned for sorcery, and before death go-cooked that they are N evin ovn y. And against many of their N much less serious charges were brought, than about what you today upomin Ali. 
Dan.: Yes, I spoke about it. The person very seldom thinks of supreme authority and Lord's providence over the whole world. People give very big znache-the ny authorities of a devil and to anger of witches and is so strong boyat-sya them that the last even manage to show them what can be made by means of tricks of the Satan misleading them. The only way for the person to avoid all traps placed by a devil, all it ukhishch Wren y and zlodeyan y so it vn to imat to a voice of B about e m at, uch and t with I about t of N e go E go and in about t in about r N y m with l about in about m, p r e and with p about l of N e N of N y m of the h and with t about go with in e t and, to about t about r y y r and z about l and h and its t also will disperse dark fog, N apushch en N y the Satan by means of whom it forces down the person from a way of the truth - 
leg. It will arm the person with belief that prot0ivostoyat 
to devil what also the Saint apostle P e wished t r 10 and to descend 
from this way which conducts to strashn ym zabluzhdeni-holes and to dreadful sins, leading up so it in the way a forehead - 

144 
centuries before full death. N at, and now I have to with you p r about with ti t with I. 
M.B.: I am satisfied what heard on all these questions, and now I see, how deeply zabluzh-was given. And though you were already going to leave, I, that not me-it, I hope that we somehow will meet once again. God bless you! 
Sam.: Has to thank you very. Z you at N if suddenly there is an opportunity, come to N am. We will be glad to see you in our house. 
M.B.: And I - that thought that the devil is not capable N and such artful zlodeyan iya, able to bring to such sin, to joint stock company it nearly became with me. 
Sam.: To onechno, it is strange to see, to joint stock company thousands of people are led astray and are exposed to deception, but after all many understand in what here business. 
M.B.: And for the wisest a devil too hard, 
e with l and t about l to about about N and N e p r about with in e t I am t with I with in e that m with l about in and B about e of the lake. 
en and Semyyuela: Hey, the husband, goes kind wives Russian cabbage soup - 
N and River. 
Sam.: I wanted it to hurry. Kind wives shch and N and R.: N at and with whom you sit here? en and Semyyuela: I so wanted that you prish la 
a little a bit earlier, because there was here one person who sk azat that you are a witch. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: There was who - the one who sk azat what I am a witch? So check. 
en and Semyyuela: Yes, however, he said sover-to highway en N about sulfurs ez N of the lake no. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: I am a witch? Yes it is a lie, at least it was told by the Lord of B og. I would like that I in - am general all witches of N and light hung up and their spirits in addition to N and m. 
M.B.: That is you will be glad to have clothes, is decorated - ny with skin of the hung-up witches and their spirits in addition? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: And what, they have fur clothes? 
Sam.: en and why you told as if he called to - bry wives shch and N at R. the witch? He did not tell anything similar. 
en and Semyyuela: P oslushay, the husband, I very much vnima-t e l N about with l at highway and l and, h t about it about in about r and l, i it with to and z and l, h t about about N and the witch. 
Sam.: Yes he does not even know it. So from where he could tell that she is a witch? 

1 - I"> 
en and Semyyuela: N at and that from the fact that he did not know it? N about unless he did not say what she made precisely, to joint stock company the witch when vzya la a handful of heat also threw it into cream when oil was impossible? 
Sam.: Ha, precisely, you tell the truth. It sk azat that to it it was taught by a devil, likewise, when szhi-gat chicken or barash to and and so forth. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: This sorcery? The N averny, it told you what - nibud a scientific cracker. So it is taught by a devil? et, to it my husband that kind taught N wives - shch and N and from R.H.Z and year we received from her so much horo-shy how many similar zn and will not make the attacks for all the zhi zn. 
M.B.: And to that, your way, the N auchit to it that kind 
wives shch in at in R.H.? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: Yes it gift of B of an ozha y. I am du - 
to May, to it she was taught by the Holy Spirit of our Lord. 
M.B.: So, you do not think that to it it on - the devil taught? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: That is I dolzhn and to think what to this her N was auchit by a devil? And you sometime heard that the devil taught what - nibud good? 
M.B.: And you are sure that it was something good? Kind wives shch and N and R.: About unless it is bad to N - izgn to at it 
evil spirits from my cream? 
M.B.: Do you think, the devil was frightened of your piece of coal? Kind wives shch and N and R.: I zn ayu that it was banished also with 
that time we got rid of it forever. 
M.B.: And whether coal of the reasons to ityit to it harm could? Kind wives shch and N and R.: Yes, could; it and the witch can 
the reasons to ityit harm. I am sure of one: more it will not come. R avn about and it will not be able to force it to return - sya because fire put to it wounds y. It not smo-zht to force it to return N the Azat because also it suffered from a piece of coal. 
M.B.: And zvestno what spirits it is possible to strike only with spiritual weapon so your coal cannot - which image of the reasons to ityit harm to the demon. And to joint stock company and m, ska zhi-to and, image it could damage to the witch? You do not think that she sat in your slivk ah, isn't it? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: N ekotory people think that she exactly there also sits therefore when they throw these pieces of coal, they say: "P lips ztot coal will get those is be in an eye". 
14 6 
M.B.: N at if she visited your slivk ah, then TV about e m and with l about N e about the h e N - t about the h and with t about e. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: You just like that say yes, M.B. I zn ayu that you think likewise, to joint stock company and I, though you ask me these questions. I am sure that - who will not advise more hotly to address for on - m about shch yu to z N and ha r I am m, than in y. 
M.B.: I so thought, but now change my opinion - an elk, so to joint stock company I saw, to joint stock company and m silly I was. I am very sorry that I so strongly was mistaken, advising lyu-dyam to go to these devils. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: P to an oslushayta, M.B., who it chi-tala to you today lecture? I am sure that still yesterday you thought absolutely in a different way. 
en and Semyyuela: Just about, dear R. I think, as my husband began to think in to an acha. Here one talked to them hour three or four umn and to. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: So your husband thinks other che too? I would oitsya that you will lose all the hens soon, and on - volume it poshleg the spirit against your ducks and geese and will ruin you soon. You that, zashch and shch Ali of witches? 
M.B.: Yes anybody we not zashch and shch Ali. Kind wives shch and N and R.: N about after all very many for - 
shch ishch at them. I think, they can conjure so (not in with e, to about N e h N oh, t about l to about N e to about t about r y e), h t about the h e l about in e to p r about in and l and t - sya to hell that N to apugat thereby others that they zashch ishch their Ali. And your cavils, M.B., I think, will stop soon; let's look whether you will be delighted, having received the same help. 
M.B.: P I will ask omoshch... Yes I will take away them to the smith that he looked whether he 0 1 is not present on them what - 
nibud a puncture or to l e y m and 1. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: You joke. If you have la likhoradk and, to joint stock company happened to some, then you togas - yes so would not judge it. 
M.B.: You think that the devil can kill foreign cattle, N to asylat lameness on people and zhivotn ykh, and all this for the sake of the pleasure. You think that if the witch causes and sends it, then it obediently vypol-nyat her p ri to an adhan and I. And if she not N sends it, then it vmesh will not ivatsya. You also think that when it comes, you can izgn at it by means of a heat handful, or having burned alive chicken or a pig. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: N ik you do not tell an ogd to me. that I so think when you so think. And let 
147 
they say about what they can do, and all zn the attacks and P ison iya in the world will not convince me of the return. 
M.B.: I am surprised - not to that, of course, that you are so ignorant in this question - and to that, as I thought likewise, without seeing own delusions. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: Delusions? To joint stock company it suddenly you became so wise? I zn ayu that their spirits somewhere hide, so to joint stock company of the witch cultivate them; and when what - nibud the person angers them, they cause these spirits and send them. Also look what they ask them to make, N and that adjust: when so aya the witch razgn evan and, this spirit asks her: what to me - lat? Such - that the person caused me troubles, go-she cooks. P oyd also kill his cow; it goes there and does about what it was asked. And di also kill hens at such - that wives shch and N y, and it goes. N ekotory of their N are not satisfied what is made so neznachi-telny zlodeyan iya, and then they say: go and sde-bark so that such - that the person limped, kill his or his child. So they are always ready to ispolne-a niya of any p ri to an adhan and I. And I think that people will be happy if they learn, to joint stock company to get rid of them. 
M.B.: If I begin to discuss this issue with you, proceeding from ozha word B I, then you will see that all ska zonal you is incorrect. The devil cannot kill or on - to harm whom - that, even most zhalk oh chicken. If he possesses the power, then who then will be able to escape from not - go? And, your way, he cares for that it nastro-silt and N poisoned to joint stock company aya-that wives shch and N and? It - wines ovn ik all evils and misfortunes. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: H you tell that to me about word B ozhy? R to an azva not word B to an ozhya says that to a being - yut witches? And can you think that the B og will stand wicked men? You that, renegade? P groves to an ayta, me pain - highway e N e about the h e m with in and m and r and z about in and r and in and t. 
M.B.: It indeed unitary enterprise rya May. Then I will go too. Sam.: Thank you for to ompan iyu. 
TO IT ETS 
The extraordinary message about six most 
thorough sorcerers, which the devil acts 
ruined more than four hundred 
juvenile children. Besides, put 
harm to other people; which for these and another similar to them crimes 
were executed in the princely city 
Munich in the Top Germany 
26 And wriggling 1600 
I am sure that there will be no it Christians in and, to - tory will be softened with heart, or delighted will turn the look to heaven, or will not be surprised, uzn av about the villain - N iya of six most otjyavlen to N ykh sorcerers, about koto-ry it in general ever hear the ave Because they (having betrayed those - la and a shower and to an eternal damnation) committed very many brutal murders, it is a lot of uzhasn ykh to a passion, robberies and N arush en y public order, spoil - whether cattle and a harvest, caused a hail and a storm and to that similar troubles among inhabitants Herman of AI that I think that this case is necessary zapomn to ityit that the shameful end of these villains served us ho-a roshy example to grief pious and to ustrashe-a niya durn ykh and the people stagnating in a sin. And exchanges and these otvratiteln ykh prestupn ik, and also transfer of their crimes follows N and. 
P e r in y y, P and at l and m p e r l e and l and P about p p e N ha m e river. The second, An of N and Gamperle, wives and mentioned P aulya. 
T r e t and y, With and m about N of and m p e r l e	"Scientific Production Enterprise, I 
 	THEM	iblH U bbJi u
H e t in e r t y y, I to about and m p e r l e P I you y, Ulrich Seeltibaum, oruzheyn ik. Highway esty, George Smaltes, tailor. These six people whom there are already a lot of years podozre- 
bring down that they Zahn imatsya by sorcery though for this purpose and there were no sufficient proofs, nowadays with - all undertook together near the city of Dettingen in to and to about y - t about p e shch e r e, the State Duma e about N and m of N about about to r and t of N about in with t r e h and l and with p about - a dobny image and till this moment. Thinking that still nothing is known of them ok ruzhayushch to them, they began to imatsya Zahn by the privychn ymiy affairs and the UAV - godarya to the sorcery lifted such storm with vet-rum that all cities and villages suffered from it a big loss. 
N about B about, N e e l and I, h that y e t and about t in r and t and t e l N y e p r e - stupn ik remained still N ezamechen N ymiy, shed light on all them deya N and I. lagodarya I would howl dogs, sbesivsheysya because of this awful storm whether some from zhivsh them in the district prish to the mentioned cave or a crevice where all of them were arrested and next day, that is on Jun 24 I, presented before the governor M of a yunkhen who, having considered them on the basis of inquiries by guilty persons, sentenced them to a prison zaklyuche-of N and bb. 

151 
However listen that here happened: when a forehead - the century (or the secretary) the governor took paper in a hand that - to give p ri to az, suddenly both feet were taken away from it whether and there was all this because lodyzhk and at it vysh from sheaves so through three dn I he died. 
Then the governor p ri to azat to officers to search them, whether also those N ash sprya the thane of N in N, ymiy under clothes, and a body sacks with pork manure which, being taken y, izda-bring down such stench which any person could not take out. And N and breasts at P aulya Gamperle (who was at their N glavn ym a ringleader) whether they are N ash devil kN to a yoke Zac of N of An and y and the image of the person holding a roll in hand made on a tin plate or the kN to a yoke on which there were N is described y three words "M Agoll, To Umat, Hellbeza". 
Their harmful activity was that dock - Zahn and is so clear that they immediately prizn atsya (without to joint stock company and x - or difficulties) in all murders and disgusting acts which they ever committed, about what and go in about r and t with I of N and e. 

Paul Gamperle's recognition 

P aul Gamperle or P oppen Hummer, fifty 
eight years, prizn it atsya that he adheres vedov-sky p cancer ti to and since childhood and that trained it in it it with t and r and I and at highway to and, to about t about r and I am mind e r l and m of N about about l e t of N and z and. 
Also it prizn atsya that during this time it by means of witchcraft and sorcery ruined about one hundred raspberries of ky children. 
Also it prizn atsya that it sent lameness and sde-lat humpbacked most zazhitochn ykh citizens of M of a yunkhen, so to joint stock company they did not forgive it that money which it has to them. 
Also it prizn atsya that by means of sorcery it got rid of two uncles in order that zavla-to put them property. 
Also it prizn atsya in commission of ten ograble-niya of churches, in p I am adtsata ton murders of N and travelers to - horns, in night robberies of merchant houses, koto-ry he lichn about made twenty seven, and the N and to joint stock company oh for - became wet or a door could not stop it, but by means of sorcery it could open them without any work. 
In to about N of c e to about N of c about in about N p r and z N and l with I, h t about z and vs yu with in about yu zhi zn he made eight night arsons neighbour's 

152 
houses thanks to what sixteen people, muzhchi-N y, wives shch both N y and children, burned down in the beds. To rum of that, it made a great number of others prestuple-niya to great misfortune of all this earth. 

Anna Gamperle's recognition 

en and it, An of N and Gamperle, sixty years, at - 
z N and l and with, h t about z and in with yu with in yu and z N about N and with p about m about shch yu to about l - dovstvo also ruined about one hundred raspberries ky - those y. 
Also it prizn atsya that it spoiled, sdela-la humpbacked and besides just killed by means of sorcery devyatn to adtsat elderly people. 
Also it prizn atsya that by means of sorcery it forced to climb the wife hozya in and - Shuya to bake hotels in a grief where it also burned down; and a similar image it so finished the husband of this of wives shch and N y that it buried the head in the trough full of a forage for pigs, and so for - was died. 
The t and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t about about N and in about l highway about m to about l and e - a stvo spoiled h cattle, scattering grain on the ground. And that it set fire to two haystacks from which fire pereki-nulsyanutsya by N and all village. P ri it she did not help lyu-dyam to fight against the fire. And zbav us, My God, lovely serdiy the from it! 

Simon Gamperle's recognition 

And x native son, Simon Gamperle, twenty two 
years, prizn it atsya that it by means of sorcery killed thirty juvenile children, and except their N - six hundred - rik, N and which it sent in a similar way lameness and gibbosity then killed. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that robbed nine tserk-blow, four times the N and roads, twelve times - merchant sk plundered frets; at night it N arushat public order and plundered six times; often by means of a hail and a storm caused a loss to alien cattle and gardens. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that with the help coldovst-va it did itself(himself) nepobedimym1 thanks to what he one opposed six people, robbed them, and then killed one behind another. I do not speak about many other cases to a passion and here any more murders which it from beliefs of highway and l. 

1 5 3 
Jacob Gamperle's recognition 

Other their son, Jacob Gamperle, twenty one go- 
yes, prizn it atsya that it killed sixty five children, and except their N - five old men whom it sn did an achal humpbacked, the N and N sent their ache, and then ubi-a shaft. 
To r about m e t about go, about N p r and z N and l with I in about r and l e N and and p I am t and c e r to - blow, in ten robberies of merchant houses, in couples - rekh - N and public roads. It set fire to five houses, the N arushat an order and plundered N and streets at night. P about - sledny he made several dozen times. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that with the help coldovst-va he made so that the storm carried away herd of sheep to the river and all of them drowned; the storm was so strong that pu-teshestvennik could not even pass on roads. He made much and others mean zlodeyan y. 

Ulrich Seeltibaum's recognition 

Ulrich Seeltibaum and z Dettingena, sixty 
eight years, prizn it atsya that for all the zhi zn it with on - power of sorcery ruined seventy juveniles - Tay, and also sent an ache and destroyed thirty lyu-Tay of old age. 
To r about m e t about go, about N p r and z N and l with I in about r and l e N and and c e r to in e y and merchant houses, in robbery and night 2 murders, in 
damage of cattle and causing damage to gardens, and - 
it lat it so often and in and x quantities that could not even list all these cases. 

George Smaltes's recognition 

George Smaltes, tailor and z P ions, sixty years, 
prizn it atsya that for all the zhi zn it killed thirty six juvenile children and besides sent an ache of N and p I ton adts to at elderly people, having killed them subsequently. I think that there is no need to list murders of N and proyez-zhi x roads, robberies in villages, arsons of houses, og-a rableniye of churches. The N about in conclusion follows sk the Azat that this person had in custom to dig out on but - to cha of a grave of just died people and to plunder them. P ri it it took away everything that there was, up to on - sledny trya p to and. P about - mine, does not have nowadays N and to the earth of people it is worse, than e that six. 

1 5 4 
That is why all Christians dolzhn y to pray that 
God in the favor kept us and all other people from similar cases and cleaned from and x pre-stupnik the earth, to JSC On already did, and let the shame and razlichn ye N of joint stock company an adhan and I will be an award him. I ask you about e that m, B about e! 
Were that p ri zn An and I made before govern - Lem and other burghers of the city of M of a yunkhen. These people listened to charge, them prizn Ali guilty persons and you - bore them a sentence. And on July 26 they were to azn en y that is Kim image and the following order: 
First, they were brought before a town hall of M of a yunkhen where upomyan uty wives shch and N e, the ovyama placed between two of her son, pulled out both breasts, to joint stock company ovy her executioner Udaril three times on the person then in a similar way to an azhda y from her sons sitting Obock it received three blows in a face a breast of their mother. It also the N of An if six siln ykh blows is twisted by N ym in the Plait of kN uty then to it broke both hands on to - 
the wood also placed N and the 3rd certain seat, specially prigo- 
tovlenny for e that; then her body was burned. 

1 5 5 
To other five to oldun am-men am were distributed 
on six blows of kN uty, broke and m in the way of a hand, p ri vya the hall of N and the same me-to a sta to a stake and burned four of their N. And P aul Gamperle, the father and heads the ny sorcerer, was alive got by N and twirled and whether so by it in his way gradually zazhar to death then his body was burned dotla4. 
And t and to, l and about with to l about N of N y y h and t and t e l, t y a l mustache y highway and l and about that I fly zhi zn and and the death of these six most otjyavlen N ykh sorcerers. And let the N ik that will not doubt in it truthfully st because told about it not only many poch-muddy people, but also the translation of this to N and gi was made from her first Dutch and also I am handed over. 
And now we will fall N and knees and with the N ymiy sulfurs - dets pomoly Misters from whose pleasure were with - all these tops zlodeyan iya that it pacified arrogance is broken and he is clever shit rage About Aton y, reigning nowadays among people, and N apoln silt of heart of N ash and so strong belief that similar N apadk and N of an ikogd not of the reasons the yawl to us harm, but that we could serve It with perfect love and piety, to It, most it is powerful mu, C aryu among tsars, to which the power, praise and S1ava for ever and ever. Amine. 
Friedrich von Spee 
Cautio criminalis 
and whether About processes against witches 
IN ABOUT P P ABOUT WITH 4 7 1 
Whether the demon can create visibility of presence 
the innocent on vedovsky sabbaths? 2 
YazyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA I answer this question so: "yes, can though it 
only the visibility observed, however, by all who take part in this action". To fetters osno-a vaniye to approve similar? 
Basis 1. The fact that it can occur under - examples tverzhdat, therefore, it perhaps. I know one monastery where there was a similar event, as it was noted in dokumen taln ykh by joint stock company ta. One of monks of this monastery was accused by a large number of witches that it prin imat participation in their highway abash ah. It and N and z y in and l and t and to e l and c oh, with to about t about r y m about N, I to about y, t and N of c e - a shaft, and, full rask aya N and I, in the face of death podtver-waited for all this, at that time to joint stock company according to everything mo-nastyrya in this hour the defendant together with other mona-be rude sang in chorus, uplifting prayers to the Lord. Z ayavitel could lie that is quite usual after the prima - N e N and I p y t about to, and about about in about r and t N e in and N about in N about go and z z l about y. E with l and e, N and about about r about t, about N and N e l of and l and (N about t and to p about with the h and t and l and with and m and judges) whether they p ri N I am a ghost for reality. I can azvat N and others, devout even according to sou - Tay before which there passed many witches, people who are well and pon yn e who were also repeatedly accused that they danced on vedovsky highways abash ah. It is possible to give also many other examples, however I will not begin to do it as they are rather known and come down to the fact that separate persons were noticed on highway abash ah, at that time to joint stock company incontestable dokazatel-stvo demonstrated that they were at this time bezotluchno in other place. 
About with N about in and N and e 2. D I in about m l about e t p r and n and m and t about l and ch and e and N - 
the gela sveta3, is told about it in Sacred P isaniye and in numerous examples from zhi ti y Saints. Sle-dovatelno, and the innocent it can present in about - a face p ri zrak and that gives the grounds to think that Lord allows it a lot of things. 
Basis 3. Arguments of supporters protivopolozh-a leg mn en and I do not give enough sure proofs for a denial of our initial thesis, I conclude - shchegosya that for justice it is necessary to follow in the vozzren iya to common sense, but not 
to be satisfied with the words of others. I turn vn iman iye on the fact that I, supporting mn en iye about what the demon can create p ri zrak and N evin ovn ykh, am not obliged to prove the case. It belongs to rather objecting me in case they begin to deny my point zren iya. Because business is in what for me will change little from whether the demon can make similar or cannot. I want to bring nothing out of both utverzhde-niya and whether I trouble myself highway because of joy zn An and I, pozvo-lyayushchy to warn others. But if in it I am not accompanied by good luck and zn iye mine threatens nobody with An, then it will not bring N to iky N and to joint stock company oho of damage and will not represent for whom - or danger. Mine against - N of an ika would do the views to joint stock company by the base, with you - cells of which dare to judge a human zhi zn and. P oety follows them if only they are not easy myslenna, to joint stock company it is possible to approach closer difficult and tya-to inhabited problems, zn An iye which at all not sostavlya-et their base pozn An y, and to study them. 
The one who denies that the demon can create an image of the innocent encroaches on p Ravi of la di Alec of Ti to and; a debt is-the investigator and his duty - dock to azyvat utverzhde-ny. It, certainly, concerns not only those who from - ritsat, but also and to those who agree with the N ym utverzh-is given by a deniye. P odes a word "agrees" (to joint stock company the reader could already make sure) it is necessary to understand "he agrees under a condition...", and therefore if to azhdy - he agrees or denies - vos-adopts this provision to joint stock company fundamental isti-well and wishes to use it for daln eysh them umozak-lyucheniye, then he is obliged its dock the Azat. P rotivn ik and hollow wives iya that the demon can create images nevi-N ovn ykh, dolzhn y to prove it, to prove, and then to carry out on this basis processes as other che, rejecting proofs, in this case they will achieve opposite result. However on the other hand. even having created the base of the proofs, they not on - improve the situation much. 
For us enough given bases to light this doubtful business and that further people, not absolutely expert in N auk ah, were terrified Dejan Iyam of a devil and did it with B of an ozhy pleasure. For us it is enough that we are N amek Ai about it to judges. If they want to perform in process frankly, not pribe-in hectare I to e with t about the h and y highway and m p y in t to and m, and about p and r and I with in t about l to about N and p r about the h - N y the base of arguments, they will arrive to joint stock company dostoy- 
160 

ny and circumspect people; without having made it, the N elzya to - to fight fair resh en iya. P we will examine, to joint stock company and e proofs are brought by the opposite side. 

QUESTION 48 
What arguments are looked for for dokazatelst- 
va regulations that the demon on vedovsky shaba-the shah cannot create images of innocent people? 
I answer: The B insf eld collected these arguments voyedi- 
but; Delri o4 also is based on them. To me having appeared - 

6-3400	161 
the reliability of all issle-giving about sorcery as arguments of B insfel-yes we will subject to ri ti to e at repeated them from - lozheniya, and azvat N their thoughtful lyatsya very doubtful I also cannot. So to them in the way, I will state one after another are - insf the elda and only the first argument will be to take gument of B me from Delrio. 
Argument of I. The N e should be described, probably, to joint stock company not - long ago one not really umn y the fighter against witches bragged of Delrio's words, referring N and it to N to a yoke and bringing sle- 
the blowing situation, in which Delrio za5ya vlya l so: 
"Demons well are able prin to imat images of the innocent 
people and at such look to be present at highway abash ah, the EU - whether does not interfere with it the Lord of B og. However I yet never read about it and do not hear it is scarlet that it slu-chitsya" (to N.2, vopr.12, the number.5). And slightly N Izh in the same place: "If the Lord also allows it, then soon deception vskry-is howled and the Lord allows or to confess also for other sins or through stradan iya to deserve glory And descending from vysh esk an adhan of N oho, this confessor voskley-tsat: "Do you see, Delrio himself about anything similar not chi-tala and do not hear the ave To the same can believe that it happened?" 
Objection 1. This argument proves too much and, eventually, nothing. It proves t, as other numerous circumstances from which some are lit tshchateln oh, others are not present, on - about it did not read Delrio's skolka and do not hear the ave I, on the contrary, spoke much and hear it is scarlet about it, also to joint stock company and many together with me. 
In about z r and e N and e 2. In N and with t about I shch e e in r e m I and N to v and z and t about r y to azhdy day by means of new tortures pull out from witches p ri zn An and I about N eslykhan N ykh still prestup-a flax iya and fish soup shch Wren and I x and do it, without looking on to N I z e y, n and n and N and r about. 
Want to use I this argument, Lish to them one, and to challenge everything as Delrio read nothing and do not hear it is scarlet about it what would be told then? They were is indignant y and would begin to assure, cht <the Lord razresh silt to make sins every day. P ochy they do not want to agree with me, this great number of N echitavsh them and N eslysh avsh them, that - Maun can with razresh en iya Misters present on sha-to Bachet images really existing and nevinov- 
162 
ny people? This disbelief also is one more sin of each of their N. 
Objection 3. To an ogd on people inform that they vi-were put during devilish highway abash and, it is possible that they are guilty and deystvitel-but f izichesk and there were present. Then they are tortured so much how many it is necessary for them p ri zn for An and I and if not - which maintain p y shopping mall and and not prizn atsya, those - strenko burn alive to joint stock company zakoren ely and stubborn gresh N ik ov as they anyway wines ovn y. Unless it is not adequately surprised iya that Delrio heard nothing about it and did not read? 
Objection 4. You want to object me that not everything occurs so, to joint stock company I described vysh e that those neschast-ny that sustained p ytk and and muchen iya, not prizn av se-bya wines ovn ymiy, were, according to Zack it at, are released back home, but is not burned y. Well, it is useful to me too. If the N e m of N about gi e about t p ushch e N of N y e y l both p r and z N and N y N e in and N about in N y m and, and it happened more than once (according to you), then to joint stock company it was possible not to read and do not hear to at about it? If these people it is justified y, then who then was on a sabbath? Sledo-vatelno, and this argument of nothing not the dock azyvat. 
Argument of I I. The devil has no N and to joint stock company oho zhelan and ya and m and t and r about in and t p r and with ut with t in and e N e in and N about in N about about N and highway and and highway e, therefore... This situation is especially doubtful because from the Sacred P ison iya it is known that State - pod does not oppress and does not tempt the N ykh unless only when wants to test them to - a brodetel, dushevn ye qualities and terpene iya is elected. It - uche-ny B insf an elda. 
Objection 1. This argument proves a lot of things and consequently, nothing. P almost the same samy-mi words it is possible for an oskolk dock the Azat that the demon did not strike all being And an ov, and he is responsible for the death of martyrs not only thanks to the art and from - r and N of N y m and m and s t about h N and to and m m uch e N and y. T about h N about t and to e I am m about - gu sk the Azat: "The demon has no N and to joint stock company oh requirement in on - dobny deya N and I x. He knows from Sacred P and a dignity and I that the Lord is elected N ykh the does not oppress and not iskusha-et unless only when wants to test their Virtue, a shower evn ye qualities and patience". 
Objection 2. P ozhaluy, not all those whose shape at - was nimat by the demon, B ozhy and zbran N and to Amy are. N e-which are capable to create the evil they can be the villain - mi, zakosn evsh them in mortal sins even if they 

*	1 bzyxwvuts?, 
have nothing in common with sorcery and, sledovatet * but, in this meaning of N evin ovn y. N about even in this case if the demon has no requirement p ri N and mother shape bozh them the N of ik is elected to highway abash e, then highways are necessary distant and e proofs that the appearance of N evin ovn ykh mo zht to be used by N and devil highway abash e. Nothing not the dock azyvat Tai as this argument. 
Argument of I I I. The B insf eld considers that the doctrine about TON: that the demon cannot I vlya tsya in shape of N evin ovn oye derives special strength in consciousness of the innocent. Show N novny, the N ye is exhausted with fear and cares whether the demo us is represented in society the sorcerer y and witches - on the other hand if the demon can make under bny, then, therefore, all of us on merits pre-will be in horror and fear, and the body and a shower and on - real' will be exposed to constant danger. However chis concealing conscience absolutely is afraid of nothing, therefore it so. 
Vozrazhen iye 1. This argument the dock azyvat a lot of things, zyxwvut < 
therefore, anything. P okhozhy words it is possible to the Azat that any N evin ovn y the person, is not bewitched ny by witches or not affected dr\by gy charms, can all the zhi zn live N of an eschastla you and that it just does not happen. Proof: who and N evin ovn ykh is afraid since morning of the fact that him in this den> witches did not bewitch? On the other hand, if vedm can similar, then we on merits will stay" in horror and fear, thinking that because of magical charms m N and vs yu and z N about with t and N e m of N with I e with the h and with t of N y m and. T about l to about the h and with t and! the conscience is afraid of nothing; from here follows 
In about z r and e N and e 2. The N e in and N about in N y e with p about to about y N y and e z about I z N e N ny not because believe that the devil cannot use IS their appearance in the purposes or not dostavi-to them N epriyatn awns, but because are sure that if yes their shape and is used, for N their it without awaking" to have consequences. They are sure that in court wise judges who, uchin willows process on N them on denunciations of people, a subrank yayushch ikhsya to a devil about l highway e p about in e r I would be t of N r and in with t in e N of N about y h and with t about t e about in and N I e m y x, to about tory, on them mn en iyu, speaks for himself sit not podkupn ye. 
Objection 3. I have to challenge a statement, a gl syashchy that where also to vi zsh highway about N of N y e processes on witches are carried out by N with userdsh-in l and a heat and where courts adhere mn en and I about which we speak, it; provozhdy process by skillful excuses, obvinyas 
164 
my (actually innocent) there is nothing to be afraid. It does not correspond to the truth. I zn ayu many vydayushch ikhsya, zdravomyslya shch and x people who felt this fear, and sometimes so siln y that they nekoto-ry of them went to other places. I zn ayu and and x which asked me and others for suggestions. I know also people, the joint venture esh and vsh and x behind council and on a confession to the neighboring city and byvsh them, on a cart next day - vrashch en AI, the N ymiy as it was considered braids - a wine proof is seized - they, allegedly, tried to run, but on p y the shopping mall but did not work well as the Lord from revenge pomu-tit their mind and they came back N of aza@. To an ogd they tried dock the Azat that everything was not so, the N ik that did not trust them. I zn ayu as many references I had to give on spetsif to ichesky questions of mine zn An and y and about that to joint stock company to behave to avoid a mortal sin, not on - govoriv on myself and N and others during tortures, and about that how many in fact people lives in this place, being in a condition of fear. P oety an argument of B and N with f e l d and N e m about e t y t and m and s p about l z about in and N; N and about about r about t, he helps me against him rather. And, zaversh aya, I want sk the Azat: if the B insf eld in these affairs got so m and l about about p y t and and z N and n and y, e with l and about N of N e h and t and l and N e with l y highway and l that everyone knows, that it is possible to wish to such scientist and it similar? They can on - prezh-to it to sit in the cabins eta, to joint stock company they did it and still, protecting with N us theological I rub - the lady. However I ask about one: that people, I have - shch and e about that l about l highway about y and in t about r and t e t, p e r e with t and of l and with the h and t and t p r about - tsessa an amusing game and were not afraid to suit closer to Zac Lyuchen to N ym and to feel dirt temn its if they, of course, there sometime get. And bo from opy-that it is known that the spirit and force of imagination constantly excite, and razmysh a flax and I soften the person. 
Argument of IV. The fact that the N of an ikogd did not happen at 
usual combination of circumstances, it is possible to consider voob-shche the N of an ikogd who was not occurring; if it follows from the facts unusual, then it should be investigated. The N ikog-yes, or to Rein e seldom was necessary hear to at sure and full p ri zn An and I in that. that the demon prin imat on highway abash ah shape of N evin N ykh. To N aoborot, from experience it is known that the noticed N and highway abash ah are really guilty of sorcery. So, the B insf eld argues. 
I object: the last statement has to rit smallpox. From where the B to an insfeld knows that is valid 

1 t S 
innocent N ik an ogd were not represented by the devil on highway abash ah, and therefore all who are accused are worthy on - ri c of An and I and is condemned iya? And z reliable prizn An y? From where it zn the ayah that all accused of sorcery and convicts because of it, are really guilty in for - N I ti I x sorcery? avern oye, from p ri zn An and I unfortunate, to and to, on to paradise of N to it to a measure, he approves N. N about from where he zn the ayah what all these p ri zn An and I deystvi-are telno reliable, but are not received owing to tortures and under a vliya of N iy fear? Often it happens that znachi-teln aya a part of proofs looks doubtfully; so from where it zn the ayah that those, N and which it posto-I am N of N about about with N about in y in and e t with I, N e I in l I yu t with I of t and to about in y m and e, e with t vvodyashch them in delusion. A grief that whose leg at least once entered the camera p a ytok; they will already not return to N of an ikogd - sya N the Azat, without having confirmed what is only possible I will come - mother. Here the N can refer again and the third vozrazhe-ny N and the first argument, brought vysh e. And therefore I consider a debt to repeat often that I not all of us yavlya-am eaten to oldun with Amy; whether the only basis for this statement I vlya etsyatsya by highway that whether us prinuzhda-to it p y shopping mall am and. So approved also N what in to vizi-Torahs of one powerful governor, sitting for pirshe-a stvenny table and being in consciousness of absolute correctness and as p ap and Roman itself enclosed in his hands and the tool p a ytok, it is not surprising if itself p ap and sometime prizn it atsya in sorcery. The same will make also B insf eld, both I, and others, for isklyucheni-eat the few to turnips to and x spirit. That is why also nothing not the dock azyvat this argument. Here it is possible once again about - to ratitsya, to and to already uk it azyvatsya, to the third vozrazhe-of N and yu by N and p e r in y y and r mind e in N of t. 
Argument of V. If the demon can on vedovsky shaba-of highway ah p ri N and mother images of N evin ovn ykh people, then it mo-zht to wish to present them in the form of murderers, prestupni-k, fornicators as it glavn aya a task - un ichtozhen iye bezgreshn ykh people. That is why maybe so that the person accused of murder, gra-a bezh, slander and adultery, zashch and shch aya s can for - I vi t that it is innocent, and the devil, p ri N I vsh and y his appearance and committed this criminal action, etc. is guilty of everything. 
By means of this argument of B insfeld wants so far - to zat that be not able to solve are those who act with 

1 6 6 
An constrained sozn iy, or is frequent and able about a flax and I grew blind. 
I object, so to joint stock company prak tichesk and iya follows from any osno-of van that B insfeld and his adherents of t r and to t uyu t of N and highway e m of N e N and e about the h e N and z and r and t e l N about and p about r and c and yu t they it so far as are blind and cannot distinguish intention from a harmless vydumk and. That is why if who - could not razvya zat similar knots, dove-rivshis deception to its uvshy feelings, for us all this is equally in nothing not the dock azyvat as we zn Ai, to joint stock company to resolve a similar situation. We darling vlya I eat with all evidence that all statements of B insf not mo-gutnut an eld to be compared to N ash and m a game kretn ym a case. And so the situation is prak tichesk and always. The B ud is attentive, the reader, and you will make sure of it. 
P redpolozhy that there is a place which in accuracy is known that there in certain time and hour poyavlya-yutsyatsya razn ye it is given iya to spend time and to do razlichn ye things, to joint stock company that is done by people; let's assume that Semprony accuses Grak ha that is that who - that saw other person when murder was perfect. However at any sensible conceiving judge of the bases somne-it will enough vatsya whether it was N astoyashchy Gracchus, suspecting that in that place was seen its empty masks at. At the same time, it would be silly to release Grak ha back home without distant - shy investigation and analysis of proofs. In the same way the situation and in N our case is. N ash and protivn ik defend the provision that the demon has obykno-a veniye to be in certain hours in certain places where occur satan in sky festivals, sha-bash, round dances. They also claim that he posto-yanno changes an appearance, acting in one, in other look, and appears in shapes of men, wives shch and N, soldiers, young men, girls, goats, lions, etc. And if whom - whether - bo from N they are absent among p la of highway ushch and x, then, to joint stock company approve N ash and oppon en you, the demon himself accepts their appearance. A lot of things occur really there, but it is even more to azhushch egosya there. Witches are in the habit periodi-in chesk to eat, drink and sleep in beds from ivory even if they absorb carrion and drop, zapi-Wai its bile, and have a rest under gallows. Nevertheless the rest can be considered illusion and a thing nedoka-zonal, that is the fact that whether on and x festivals neobkho-dimo there is a large number of all - 

167 
rank, ghost ov, shadows, ghosts and masks. P show ku everything my opponents say that it is possible (about what I consider possible N and satan in sky highways and basha, I will tell later), that everyone, appeared mi the place of the judge, painful doubts begin to torment - he thinks whether the power of demons and ghosts of all types so far extends that there is possible use by them prizrachn ykh appearances of people, the N ykh is especially convicted of commission of a mortal sin. If the judge of people pron itsateln y and zdra-vomyslyashch y, then he, without fluctuating, doubts (or on - a zyvayta it to joint stock company you want) and whether there was a suspect dey-stvitelno in uk an adhan of N y y hour in this place or it is the suspect's ghost used by the demon. From here the N does not follow in an ikoy way that I should be suspected and the claim to at the proofs speaking about from - lichiya p ri zrak and from me whether doing this highway to N and that basis that who - saw whom - among thieves, murderers and fornicators, or in general to resort to focuses and receptions of this sort. All this razn ye things. From here it is absolutely clear that the N y y an argument of B of an insfeld, to about t about r y y about N with the h and t and e is given to t of N e about t r and z and m y in m, about t of N yu d in N e I in l I e in t with I so ovy; especially vidn and its groundlessness - his creator just blindly draws N and is mute. Only he also confirms it because what wants to see with its help B insf eld is not visible to us at all. The m ozhno, of course, to talk also about other parties of it argu-the cop of B insf an elda, however the fact that I azat dock here whether it is quite enough in order that completely highway and t his what - or forces. 
Argument of VI. The B og did not allow the demon prin to imat about - whether to N evin N ykh, therefore, it cannot do it - la t. 
I object because from where at my opponents so aya confidence that the B og resolved nothing it? To joint stock company we spoke vysh e, the Lord allows also many other bad things - death of martyrs, babies, violation svyashch en N ykh wafers and other awful things. Besides the B og allows the demon to create the ghost and razn ykh people, is equal and them is reflected iya in a mirror, water, oil, an independent image so many informers, klevetn ik and various witnesses, wishing uzn to at who in to joint stock company of ohms concrete me-to a sta Zahn imatsya by indecent affairs, go there where the cattle where whose - that the daughter vykho-is allegedly bewitched existing then 

1 68 
dit in marriage where who - that died. Unfortunately, it stano-in and the CU I in e with m and r and with p r about with t r and N e N of N y m and about y h N y m I in l e N and e m. The demon feels at the same time especially well and, to joint stock company we know, confuses the innocent f alshivy at - mints. I know one worthy and scientific svyashchen-N of Ik, very good person to whom one on - hotlivy wives shch and N and, the witch, tested intolerable love heat, seeking vn ush to ityit thus similar to a zka zhelan iye and to object of the desires. N e was they are ky tricks and receptions which it would not use, but, having made sure of their futility, she neodno-multiply by means of the demon created incorporeal at - zrak resistant svya shch en N and to namely so, to joint stock company it is statedit is statedit is stated in bulls of the Pope. P ochy then the demon has to prin imat shape of innocent people roofing felt - to about N and highway and and highway e, h t about about N, to about N e h N about e, m about e t? 
You say: if it was authorized to it prin to imat shape of N evin ovn ykh N and highway abash ah, then already mentioned third objection cannot be executed, and sa-my to the state the irreparable loss can be caused to those. 
Objection 1. If this is soIf this is soIf this is so, then from where you zn at what the B og will not allow this harm and a loss to the state? God razresh silt to a devil to transfer witches from the place on me-hundred, to create a magical potion for their acts, etc., che-go any of my opponents does not deny. N about unless it it does not matter? As it is worthy regrets! That God does not know about to joint stock company oh activity of a devil including that it accepts shape of the innocent on magical festivals, out of the question, because with telling it it is necessary to argue. 
In about z r and e N and e 2. I about with p and r and in and yu that m of N e n and e, ch t about in y highway e - at to and z and N of N about e p about l about e N and e in e r N of the lake. And bo to and to about y in r e d, with p r and highway and - to Wai I, can the reasons ityit the innocent person gosudar-to a stvo? Perhaps, it is that nevinov-a leg as necessary held for the guilty person, obrashcha-foxes with it to joint stock company with the guilty person, etc.? And I will answer N so: the clever and judicious judge is not guilty here. P about - dobny narrow-minded and silly people create, and in it is harm to the state. And for the rest a position of mine oppo-N e N of t about in p about l of N about with t yu about highway and about h N and. About N and z and I in l I yu t, h that in N e in and - novny, whose images were used by the demon, on - fall in a trouble as they are taken for guilty persons and as appropriate concern them. sa-my they claim by that that anything whose image ispolzo- 

169 
shaft the demon, it is necessary to consider the guilty person. It obra-zy here vozn one more question hiccups: whether it is possible schi-the Tat for guilty persons of the person who got to such situa-a tion? And so, the circle zamyk atsya, but there is a question: on - to what in the majority these people have to be considered as guilty persons that they were seen on magical highways abash ah? P to atom that the B og does not allow a devil is-to use N and highway abash ah images of the innocent. The N about poche-does not allow mu Guospod of it? Yes because all not - happiness is in what all noticed there has to consider wines ovn ymiy. Here it is especially visible, how my opponents follow the rule dialek-ti a little to and: "And therefore is In that In is And". The N about unless N ikto did not break off this vicious circle? Aude - nako and still scientists spiritual zvan and I, the authorities using it and misleading and governors are; they never return to a right way, using protection of the priors, so there is not enough pon imayushch of them in all this. And if the B insfeld thinks that ozhy - to solve this right of sons of B sud-people, then this thesis it should arrange before those ten questions, N and which I answer. In for - a klyucheniye I have to tell shortly something about with - lives in one known corner of Germany, is turned - the number nowadays into ashes and ashes. The N of EC y to N I z suggested on - to reach to the table to two svya shch en N and to am, known among other people for the learning and righteousness. P rodolzhy a meal, to N I z set to one of them vop-grew: "Father, whether you praviln ym consider that we still subject p y shopping mall am everyone to whom will point dozen witches, to joint stock company on uchastn ik and a magical sabbath? I very much am afraid that the way on which we are conducted by the system of denunciations can be absolutely incorrect, on - to a skolk the devil, the master on any tricks, could take care of the is committed tsakhets, but not to give them in dozens in hands and justice. What do you think of it?" The N and it sprash ivayemy answers with excessive diligence of the person, Zahn imayushchegosya house philosophy furnaces. "To joint stock company the fact that, without watching N and with in about y r about z N y y x and r and to t e r can grieve you p r and N e with l about with t about l in m of N about go in to about - a file zn An and I? To believe that God could assume that images of the innocent were used on shaba-by highway ah zn achit to doubt the Lord of N ash I eat. I do not see any reason for doubts and fluctuations which can vozn ikn utnut at the judge concerning the validity sve- 

170 
the deniye reported in the given denunciations". To N I z the cart - struck, and between them the serious dispute erupted. Aude - N of joint stock company about as svya shch en the N and to constantly tried - to zat dock the correctness, to N I z put an end to a dispute, sk elements: "I am very sorry, the Holy Father, but you defined with in about y with m e r t of N y y to about N e in c, uy in t and about t to about t about r about about N e in l z I, e with l and I will put you in temn to iyets. Near pyatn adtsat of witches at - were known that saw you on the highways abash ah. And it not highway utk and, you will be able to read made p ok an adhan and I in which about all this it is detailed napisa-but. According to your opinion which you so otsta-ivat, you dolzhn y to incur deserved by N of joint stock company an adhan and e". Here the valiant man froze, having lost a speech power and not zn aya, to joint stock company oh to bring an argument into the zashch and that. It zamol-chat and his look stopped. And it at all not sk azk and, I stated this story so, to joint stock company it was, having lowered Lish N azvan and e areas and a name of this person. They here to anything. And here that surprisingly: why the demon has to and whether can prin imat a view only of highway nevinov-ny people, even in the Scripture stories - is howled that he is capable not only to ruin a shower and, but also 
to turn into An of a gel. Really, on slo7vam Apo- 
table (2 To a shouting. 11), it it is constant soversh the ayah. Here on - 
to what also nothing not the dock azyvat this argument. And those are per we will consider the last from the remained arguments. 
Argument of VII and the last. In this regard B ins-Feld considers that the true doctrine that the devil cannot appear on satan in sky highways abash ah in obli-chy N evin N ykh people, zashch and shch atsya by all scientists and in all to N and ga, from "Hammer" to compositions of the Back, joint stock company e and L about y e r and I 8. 
I object: ours mn en and I if it when - - be it will be published thanks to the deniye opened obsuzh-, the much bigger number of people will adhere. And it it will be connected oh, first of all, with the fact that it is true, but not with the authority of his author. Aude - nako as B insfeld proceeds first of all from ponderability p ok an adhan and I witches, it is really ridiculous. It is like darling vi t: this doctrine of the rights - a miracle because schoolgirls zashch and shch at the father of all lie. Velikolepn y argument! Own to suite a telstvo of the witch strengthen the authority. In Evan-helium Christ says: "If I provide svide-a telstvo about myself, then my certificate is false". And x 
and
R barns of t says: if satan and confirms itself, 

171 
that this certificate - the truth. With surprise I look at where it can get. That is why, if m of N e p about z in about l e N about in y with to and z and t with about with t in e N of N about e m of N e N and e, I with full confidence darling vlya yu about the conviction in m, h p about to and z and n and ya, v y r in and N of N y e with p about m about shch yu p y t about to - a lie if the speech goes to them about any given person who was seen on highway abash e. I consider that bolshin-the stvo so of their people is innocent. Also the fact that if in vedovsky processes and it was involved not - how many wines ovn ykh, then the N them by all means will be followed by a train absolutely to N evin N ykh people became clear to me. P odes threat py-current and tortures of N evin the N y says slander others about what they and not zn at and by that entrains them. P we zn ag do not want a ravda, but we wish that they prizn atsya in all the affairs. Kog-yes - nibud it is surely Zac it chitsya. And therefore I ra-pout because I N of an ikogd had no doubts that all over the world not so there is a lot of witches. What - satsya their sabbaths and dancings, and here it is possible vyra-to zit doubt in their reality. I wish that all this who - nibud sometime really izu-chi l. Whether the to N igy I wanted everything highway vskolykhn to utnut, provoke Wuchang ykh, to involve them in discussion vopro-the owls accompanying trials of witches. 
To azhdy day I see, to joint stock company many of N them allow to carry away themselves short-sighted and rash is stated iya-to m and. M of N e e N r and in I t with I those at the h e N y e, to about t about r y e N and h e about N e take on trust without doubts even if all people trust in it. However at the same time to N I zya dolzhn y proyav-la t an attentiveness maximum that in and x seriousness - N ykh affairs rashness did not result in harm even if for the sake of satisfaction scientific lyubozna-those l N about with ti. 












172 
Sulfur and about de Bergerac 
Z and	to oldun ov 
P to a company in to oldun ov the State and Empire of the Sun 
FOR TO OLDUN OV 
Monsieur. Since then to joint stock company I had honor to see you, from m of N about y p r about and z about highway of l about with t r and N of N about e p r about and with highway e with t in and e. 
Tired with reading to N and gi which I at you once borrowed and which you to me once praised highly I left to walk to dispel mrachn ye and ridiculous f taziya An which N ap oln I am la me uzhasn aya nonsense e that y a N and at to and. With and l I with with about about ton e with ti with in about and m y with l and with in about with p about m and N and - N iya about these mrachn ykh stories, I gradually to a corner - and l with I in in and highway of N e about l highway about y l e page. With p a t mustache I, to and to m of N e to and e t with I, four hours of a way, I vn ezapn about noticed a broom, the countries of N ym in the way ok azavsh uyusya at me between legs. So, having rendered - shis it is free or involuntarily on it astride, I suddenly pochuv-stvovat that I fly by air. The N of joint stock company he ets, not zapomn willows that, to joint stock company I podn imatsya, the road, I azatsya ok on - among pustyn by N oh of the area. Around there was no N and one 
tropin to and. I without to it tsa watched on svo1yu a broom... Solitude 
e that p about to and z and l and with m of N e to and to about y - t about p l and N e t about y. 
P r e and with p about l of N both in highway and with r e highway and m about with t and p r about N and to N ut N e m of N about go deep into, I, without having noticed N and to joint stock company and x obstacles, H and to about N e ts, s and l N about at with t and in, I moved in p e r e about p a mustache of t and l with I of N and to about l e N and, but here I saw something that strongly surprised exchanges I. N and a background of the Sun blue light shone stars, further was poln aya Long and, and it zn achi-telno exceeded by the sizes N astoyashchy. Three times they disappeared and three times air became N epodvision ym, streams stopped, birds left the of foams iye, fishes as if glass - N e to l and, and in with e and in about t of N y e in t and ho in t r e p e in t and l and. N e in e r about I t of N and I am t and - highway and N and, with t about I in highway and I to r ug about m, in N at highway and l and to and to about y - t about with t r and x. 
P ri light Loong y I saw, to joint stock company from depth certain pe-shch e r y in y highway e l of of l ub about to and y with t and r e c, about l and h e N of N y y in e l y e clothes. By Li in c about it it was exposed to the wind, a look grozen. And z-under dense and bushy eyebrows severe eyes looked. The dense beard of N ispadat to him N and a breast. His head vencha-the l and highway of l I p and, with p in l e in t e in N of N and I and z in e r e in N y, t and l and yu e about hv and t y in and l a belt, made N y of a May paporotn ik and. The N and breasts at him stirred a half-dead flying mouse, and around in - r about t of N and to and about in and in and by l with I e in l e z in N y y about highway e y in N and to, un and z and N of N y y family of a razla chn ymiy dragotsen N ymiy to am N I am m and, to azhdy of which I vlya lsya zn joint stock company of ohms separate the plan of an eta. 
Dressed and m in the way, he held in the left hand tre-a coal form the vessel filled with dew, and in right - a rod from buzin y, one game ets which it was fettered pla- 

175 
Steen to oh, consisting from razn ykh metals, was made the second in the form of a small ruchk and. 
P otselovav a threshold of the peshch er, it was undressed and that - that p r about about r m about t and in, and z r e to and to and e - t about N e p about N I am t of N y e f r and z y, p about with l e what, moving back the back, approached an old oak, to four highways aga from which he drew one in one three f and - gura. There is an earth, shaking, by itself p ri N I am la those with and m y e about the h e r t and n and ya, k about t about r y e about N of t and m and z about r and z and l. To r about m e that is go, it N described names and vydayushch ikhsya people, a century, year, season, month, week, day and their hour zhi zn there and, even kings were defined by him there, having put everyone on the place; p ri it it to all of them to Adie of l, but everyone about with about bin of N y m about r and z about m. 
Z joint stock company it chiv it, it placed the vessel in the center of these circles, Quality Department dug it, took the zaostroyenny end of the staff in teeth, then settled on the earth, having faced on the East, and fell asleep. To an ogd of a min. ul approximately p about l about in and N and in r e m e N and, N and p r about t I e N and and to about t about r about go about N with p and l, I noticed, to and to in a vessel fell pya t seeds paporotn Ik. P rosnuvshis, he took out them from there, at the same time seme-put two in ush and, one in a mouth, shipped one in water, and remained threw out out of circle limits. However hardly he let go it and, to joint stock company I saw that its okra is zhat by more than one million but animals and N asekomy, not predve-shch avsh and x the poyavlen iy nothing good. It svo-to them a rod he touched a forest owl, a fox and kro that which, and handing over to monsters of N ye to ri to and, immediately entered a circle. He a copper knife unstitched them brew ho, pulled out and x hearts and, having wrapped everyone in three a leaf to and from a laurel tree, immediately swallowed. For - that it vyn st. from everyone a liver then again about dolzhat the incensings. Having mixed dew (which it had in a triangular vessel) and blood in a basin, it shipped pure parchment there, holding it in the right hand; for - that, having published four or p I t what time - that awful in about p l, it z and to r y l of of l and z and and N and h and l of m about l and t with I. 
The old man almost did not glevelit lips, however I heard 
to joint stock company at it inside as if would tell time several voices. P odn yav from the earth a palm branch, it directed it up, at the same time and zredk and darting a glance on nogot! 
ukazateln oho finger left hands and. zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV It was terribly time 
goryachen and vzvoln ovan, it was visible that he is tormented kiye-that by spasms - vn ezapn about he, having sighed, fell on Coca of N and. However immediately he pronounced what three words - whether that for to N of An and I and forces returned to it again. Now it 

17 
there was directly, not highway aty s, despite terrible on - ryva of the terrible wind blowing to it directly in the face and N and l e t and in highway e about N and N e oh, t about to and to at r and and N, to and to with m e r h. To and - it zatsya that this wind wants to leave this ring. N about here upomyan uty a circle suddenly made three krugo-howling dvizhen iye, from their N the stream ogn I which, rotating, the N and several spheres, with a crash which were throwing up from themselves thunder peals was divided escaped. 
In N e z and p N about I with N y y and p r about z r and h N y y with in e t r and with with e I am l e t and m r and h - ny meteors. P osred of all this vozn ik the young man, one leg op and ravsh and y sya N and an eagle, another - N and a lynx. It on - gave to the magician three sk la of N to and, N apoln en N ye liquid unknown to me. The same in turn gave it three volo-sa, having pulled out one and z m of joint stock company ush to and, and two others - from temples then hit it it can do a stick which - neighed in a hand, and everything disappeared. All this occurred when stars of N of an acha of N of Ali slowly to turn pale N and a background of a rising sun, gradually merging with the sky. 
Here I started to hurry was at way, wishing to find the village, odn Acre the sorcerer, fixedly razglya dyvavsh and y me, approached the place where I at that moment found - sya. N esmotrya N and the fact that he went slowly soon he on - ravn yalsya with mn oh. P having departed, the old man gave me the hand which azatsya ok so cold that then my own hands and for a long time it could not be warmed. For - that he led exchanges I by polurazvalivsh ikhsya hovels in hundred - Rhone uzhasn ykh ruins old thrown zamk and, to about m of N and t y to about t about r about about z and m and l of l and about N of l e t p r e in r and t and l and s in m r and h - ny vaults. To and to only we entered, it. having turned - shis to mn e, sk azat: "R aduysya that to you the sorcerer and Agrippa, 2 souls was necessary - to ripen the person and which through peresele-ny a shower once odush showed the scientist Zarathustra, vla-to a dyk of B and to tr and and. 3 Already about hundred years passed since I left the world of people and I disappear here, staying in health thanks to drinking gold. That is why to me not strash N and N and to joint stock company aya a disease. I drink this universal remedy, omolazhivayushch its exchanges I and restoring in 
body dissipated forces. P examine on these three s4k tya N to and, 
which to me were presented by C ar Fiery the demon ov. P ervy 
it is full zhidk of an awn, in the second - powder izverzhen iya, in the third - oil talc and. By the way, you have to me be very grateful because from all mortal I you - took you for participation in secrets stvo which I with - vershat only once in twenty years. By means of my magic I N asylat scarcity or abundance; I razzhi- 

177 
to Guy of war, lining on it Geniuses, upravlyayushch their Corot la of m and; I train shepherds to love wolves; I train a stake of dun in a way vrashch to at a sieve; I incite to vat dance fairies by the light of the moon y; I do so that kartochn ye players go to at the claim of clubs four together under the gallows. At midnight I send with to ladb shch dressed in cloth attires is brought y that they demanded from the nasledni-of k vypoln en iya the N ykh is given them obeshch by An y. I prik azyvat to demons zhi t in p ok and N uty zamk ah and to kill prokho zhi x which there ostan will avlivatsya and so will be until then pok and who - nibud reshiteln y will not force them p ok the Azat where the N akhoditsya to a harmony. edn ykh I would do are rich mi. I help thieves to burn the candle made of fat in and with e in l in N and to and, h t about y at with y p and t x about z I e in, p about to and those with about in e r highway and yu in t to a passion. I give to people letayushch y a pistole which returns in to Armand of the owner after that again, to joint stock company it spent it. eya m I give to Lach rings, with the help koto-ry they can during dn visit I Orléans and beliefs - to nutsyanutsya back in P Arie zh. By means of ghosts I can turn everything in the house upside down - they would overturn at t y l to and, with t and to and N y, t and r e l to and, p r and e that m of N and h e about N e r and z and Wai and not p Wai's roles. I train old men to cure dashingly a radka by means of plots. N of joint stock company of An un e prazdn Ik St. And an oanna I awake spozaran ku locals and they, not p ozavtrak av and without having made a prayer, go to collect herbs. To oldun I train in art to become about rotn to a hole. I force them to catch and to eat the children meeting them on roads. I posyl5ayu to am grieved 
N ym to people big black person and, which both 
shchat to make them the rich if they want to give I eat> the shower and. Whether N arush and vsh and x similar contract I highway ayu zren iya. With the same who reads magical to N and gi without ponya-ti I, calls me and presents with nothing, I kill. N about I peacefully I leave back if vyzvavsh y gives me to me old bash poppy, a hair or a bunch of straw. All p ri highway edsh and m of N and highway abash I suggest to kiss on the back of the goat sitting on a stool. And x I plentifully treat not with salty meat. If who - nibud the stranger, not zn ayushch y customs, dawns on himself the Godfather zn amine iy, then everything disappears. It will appear in the desert place, somewhere in the middle a sloe ovn ik and, in three hundred leagues from a sort of ny places. I find in a bed razvratn ik ov: wives - shch in with in to ubam, men with succubuses. That sleeping shch to them who did not cross before going to bed, I send night to Osh Mar in the form of infinitely long marble to omn ata. I obu- 

178 

to tea, to joint stock company to get rid of enemies: it is necessary to make their wax it is represented iya, to puncture them or to throw into fire. Then your foe the same fate, as him izobra-will comprehend wives iye. Whether sorcerers have me highway ayu sensitivity those places on a body where the goat left the mark. I vn ushat krestya-to us that they put a shred of hair under a shed threshold 

179 
or a toad if they want N to aslat damage on N t, akhodyashchy with I, and m with to about t and N at. P r and e t about m of N and d about p r about and z N e with t and t r about e to r and t of N about e a damnation that sheep, passing through a threshold, gradually withered. I give money which turns then into du - bovy leaves. I provide to magicians of the ordinary demon who accompanies both zashch and shch the ayah them from everything that incessantly starts St. M artin. To deliver to the succubus of the okolodovanny person, I nauchat to do treu-golny lepesh to at and to give e" as lane alms - vy popavsh emusya N ishch to it. I turn werewolves blow of a pitchfork between an eye. P about mine zhelan iyu sorcerers mo-gutnut to feel when they are beaten, but only if it affairs - etsyatsya by a stick from buzin y. I training an izgotovteniya svide-telstvo, to damage, magic, production of the seals, that is Leisman ov, Gadahn iyu on magic zerk Alam and to stars. I train them to find a mistletoe, a grass of delusion, a gaiter, 
magn and ton y plaster. I send lemurs, do6movykh, 
larv, lamas and y, p ri zrak ov, man, p ri vi den and I. N ako- 
not c, I am a Devil... and ober-egermeyster of the wood F onteblo". 
With these words the magician disappeared. Everything was dissolved and became covered dense chern ym fog of ohms. I found se-bya in the to rovat, my heart trembled, the body is strong weakened from souls evn ykh torments. I felt like so ustavsh him that I had not the power further N to describe to you the letter. 
Monsieur, your obedient servant. 


P P ABOUT TI IN TO ABOUT L D AT N ABOUT IN 7. 

Monsieur. With show honestly, really my last pis- 
mo did not frighten you? H you told that, 8 but I 
I think that the person is shown iye to you big black and is 
result of an emotional condition of your soul and whether, p about to r and y N e y m e r e, in and highway e about with about z N and N and I. R and N e e I am that h N about t and to e it was frightened it is given y, however now I slish to ohm was vzvoln ovan to describe all this uzhagn uyu to artin at. Now, wishing to make amends, I will draw shiro-which cloth of Otago is shown iya in all its world, with all oso-e in N of N about with tya in m and and about t t e in N to and m and. 
Whether P you redstavlyat to yourself how many worldwide with - zhzhen about the sorcerer ov, the N ykh in Zac Lyuchen is caught by AI of the contract with a devil; how many unfortunate prizn it atsya by N and a fire that they participated in highway abash e, and on interrogations govo-to Rila to the judges that on these feasts they ate - t "h. However the N elzya to trust to even Yuma to the word of the person because 

! 80 
the person can sk the Azat everything that ugodn o9. Because even if from the personal permission of B of RSA of souls and can return on fellow countrymen - lyu to ask whom - nibud to pray for it then whether it that ghosts or spirits if all of them - are available, are so thoughtless to take on se-bya responsibility for reckless whims nevezhest-a vein dereven shch in y, or to appear in the field when in the silly head of the rural shepherd amplifies at - mortars black Milan holiya, or as if a falcon on a hand impatient okhotn Ik to give in on priman ku and on a whim of this contemptible person to execute everyones clowns - sky p la sk and. Yes, I do not believe in sorcerers at all though neko-tory great minds adhere to other mn en iya, and I will not concede N ik to joint stock company to ohm to the authority whose judgments will not be coordinated with arguments of reason or do not proceed from B about - hectare. The N and Aristotle, more expert, than I, neither P Lawton, nor Socrates will not convince me of anything if what they tell, is not coordinated with reason. Because reason - only wash lords and to which I voluntarily submit. And then, I know from experience that very often happened so that greater minds receded before bo-leu of N and zmen N ymiy, and falling from big height always with and l N e e. In to about N of c e to about N of c about in, and about c t y in N and highway and about highway and and l and with, about highway and - we batsya by N yn che and we, and N ash and descendants would will be oshi- and t with I p about with l e N and page too. 
The N elzya to adhere to any given mn en iya Lish only because this judgment of the great philosopher. As for exchanges I, I despise those pedants who to the speeches give not are as the proof - gument, and refer on vysk azyvan and I authorities as though these it is uttered iya are more reliable, than Wad Dra - gy arguments. Nevertheless, I could believe also them if provided me philosophy which basic provisions could not be called in question and where everything would be among themselves coordinated. Otherwise, everything that you will want because obych-N about with about about t of N about with I t p r and N of c and p y with in about z z r e N and I am m and, and N e in about z z r e N and I with the principles is possible p ok the Azat. To rum of even if to concede avtorite-that these it is big their husbands even if prizn to at that these principles are formulated by former philosophers, not - obkhodimo to mean also that this ancient, like us, wrote not everything that thought. Very often Zac it y and religion of their countries y p ri N uzhdat them to conform the suzhden iya with interest and requirement p Olya Ti to and. 

181 
That is why I will not believe in sorcerers until do not prove me their existence. 
If who - nibud is able to prove me an ego, the Volga Military District dya more reasonable and serious arguments, than mine, then do not doubt, I will not tell it: "Oh, the monsieur, you the one for whom I waited. I renounce the views and I accept va shi!" Otherwise, to joint stock company the trickster would get the best N а^ the fool if he thought the same that the fool thinks? He has to be able to cope with crowd, pretending at the same time that it concedes to feelings of the majority, dab> not to oppose to general mood. N aprotiv, fit sofas has to make to itself idea of the inhabitant, but not judge to joint stock company the inhabitant. I am not so reckless that, having got rid from the tyrant of AI of foreign authority, neo bosnovanno ustan to avlivat own. That is why I also report the motives which induced me to tell about priv deniye and to get rid of this chimera, it is necessary to turn on a lot of things vn iman iye. 
P to a rezhda of everything, in all stories told mng about sorcerers the fact that their action usually takes place for three - four hundred leagues from given places to Nosta guards. I suspect that similar remoteness of races with the h and t and N and N and t oh, h that y about t and t e l and n and e and v about z m about N about e ™ to make sure of reliability of told. P add is that the band of people disguised as cats, Naha ditsya in the middle of the field where of course there is no N and to joint stock company and x a sva of detel. What belief - nibud one old woman in so unusual incident has to cause under - sight because in rural areas it is simple to swindle k where to joint stock company is lighter. She is poor - the need forced it to lie for the sake of money, she is old - the age stirred up her races - day, over the years she becomes talkative - and here she invents this sk azk at that Zahn yat a conversation of the with the horseman, weakens sight with age - and here she prini-washes a hare for a cat, years do it timid - and here fifty people instead of one came in dream to it. 
Give - we will look at these sorcerers. You will see the rude yokel who lacks mind to untangle me-shayushchy to it thread at which danger size ubi-howls ability to think which cannot justify - sya which will not even dare to answer N in an adlezhashchy way because of fear that the devil tells it a mouth. The N about turns out so that if he does not speak words, then kazh-dy shouts that he is caught by the conscience, and it is thrown immediately into a fire. N about really devil, which prezh 
182 
could turn into a cat, it is so silly what cannot turn him now into a fly to give it the chance ule-aunts? The N oh, are spoken by them the fact is that sorcerers, hardly on - fall in justice hands, at once lose any magical force. Oh, I swear honor! It is charming to - waters. P it oluchatsya that meter and Giyo's N, having bought dolzh-the judge's nost for twenty thousand ECU, acquires also the power over a devil. P to the oistena, the devil has great respect to mosh en N ik am! 
I am t and to e z and m e t and l, ch t about vs e e in t and in about highway l e n and k and s in t r e in m I in t with I to be the N both shch and mi as if Dee ogen y 10. O B Auger! Whether it is possible that the person, and so doomed itself to eternal torment of hell would wish besides zhi t in N ishch you etet, hunger, constantly being afraid to be at the same time erected on a fire on go-the rodsky square in front of all population? That og- 
to take care unfortunate from pra1vosudiya, the Satan had to 
to give it not leaves duba1, and pistoles for purchase a dale - 
zhnost. However you see that still demons okaza-foxes are so silly that could not guess similar cunnings. And for what you condemn the poor shepherd, koto-horns locked up recently and N un e burned Akan? For the fact that he was convicted of as if he said a prayer of "Pater Noster" in relation to a wolf. Ha! P you raise to it that he without game tsa repeats it, see in it a full nonsense, besides more harmless, than carrying amulets and ve-ra in their force for which, however, yet nobody was burned. It to azn and whether, say, also that it, allegedly, okol-gave herd whether having made it whether by means of Zack N of An and y, whether with the help melt N ykh what properties - nibud poisons. I do not think that twenty four letters Alf of Avitus comprise melt N y intention, and harmful properties of poison, at is-p about l z about in and N and and to about t about r about go N e l z I am a N and about t to r y t r t a, n and s and t jaws, N and to set I zy to ohm, can or infect sheep with plague, or cure them of a disease. You object me that it could be made by the contract with a devil. I did not meet in chronology of date when he concluded dogo-the thief with mankind on which when pronouncing op-the redelenny words stipulated in the agreement it has to destroy people and cattle, and when pronouncing - gy to cure Wad Dra. 
Perhaps, you a soglasitel with me that magical words have no N and to joint stock company oh of force, and all wizards, about - iznosya them, actually use poisonous svoyst- 
in
and herbs with which infect the cattle. In that case, 
why not to burn them to joint stock company of poisoners, but not to joint stock company a stake - 
183 
dun? They admit (you object) that they were nl a sabbath and urged demons to seize what bodies - that people who and the truth were obsessed. As for a travel of N and highway abash, I am convinced that the ointments used by them for N atiran iya bodies still v2o 
wakefulness time, to joint stock company of times also cause vi den and I 1 
when by it to it azhtsya as if they take off on a broom through a pipe and arrive there where have to feast, the thane tse in and t, z and N and m and t with I lyu bo in yu and c e l about in and t to about z l and N y y z and d These visions so strongly blew their mind that even so iye details, to joint stock company the broom clamped between legs the field over which they flew, a goat, a feast the ladies dreamed were perceived by them after probuzh a deniye to joint stock company real a thing and. 
As for obsessed, I will express you the opinion with the same frankness. First, ten thousand wives shch occur among them on one man and N of N euzhet a devil so oh razvratn ik what with so it eagerness tries to obtain connection from wives shch and Amy's N? N et, it not so, but I solved the reasons at. en shch and N and - it is more credulous and impudent, than men and, therefore, by the nature more slope of N aya to pretense. It immediately will get a false idea of itself excessively, it needs to achat N to torment itself latyn yu, grimasn to ichat, jump, prin of May razlichn ye shameless poses. To an ogd the deception will be found, they will begin to hope that these whims will be attributed to some suffocation matk and and, N and thin to - not c, will forgive to joint stock company an illness of genitals. You, maybe, object that similar deception has nothing in common with those who are really obsessed. 
Let's stop N and it and, without offending views of an obyv of tel, sk azhy that obsessed existed to joint stock company prezh, and now. I do not doubt at all that they sou strode before because Sacred it is written iye assures that fortune-tellers are haldeyka by means of a magical iskusst va zagn Ali of the demon in a dead body prophet Samuil, and he started talking; Whether David Zack of N is scarlet by means of playing a harp of Sa of an ul who as a result became obsessed, and the savior of N ash, And isus Hristo1s, izgon the yawl of demons from Jews, the shelter yaya them in 
herd of a sva of N to it 3. The N about should think that to joint stock company only God at 
went to the world, the power of a devil stopped. 
That is why I do not trust in obsessed N ash their days and I will not trust until the church orders it - lat. In that case I have to trust in the N repenting gresh obsessed with a devil and to and Goffridi, nuns 

1 84 
from Luden whether the maiden from Evreux highways only because they to uvyrk atsya, grimaced and jumped". To joint stock company! They could talk only on latyn and! N ekotory from - vechal it is even quite convincing, trying - torturing these itself - to repeat f times from the breviary after ek-a zortsist, chi tavsh and m its text with pathos. You see their pretense, listen to their church service and you make sure that, not zn aya vespers, they begin to bawl, hardly catch at "G loria P at ri". 
H I still find that very much zabavn ym, so it is that putani-tsu which occurs at vypoln en AI obsessed those or in ykh p ri to an adhan and y the exorcist. Every time for - to l and N and t e l, p r about and z N about with I with in I shch e N of N about e and m I am a B about and, p about in e l e in and e t to kiss the earth. A devil, N akhodyashch iysya gain inside - my, obeys, and everything looks very piously. To about a gd e p r and to and z and N and e p about in t about r I e t with I, e with to about l to about in and the N y x is expressed to N about N also I x, N eopytn y obsessed, without understanding bogoslovky tone bones, reddens and swears to those sa-a my time, pok and the exorcist will not calm him more pon yatn y-mi words then it continues uveshcheva-ny again. I had to observe also it: in process of that, to joint stock company svya shch en the N and to povysh is scarlet the voice, the devil strengthened with in about y of N e in, p r and e that m with l about in and m about l and n and ch e about N e z N and h and t whether the N about to act with highway owing to that, to joint stock company the exorcist proiz-carried them - at the top of the voice or on the contrary; so to them in the way, for - to a lean of An iye evil spirits directed horror on I am present - shch them, so to joint stock company the exorcist, to richat the charter, gradually pe-rekhodit N and ominous whisper. In reply obsessed or very strongly to ri chat, or from them it was impossible vytyan to utnut N and words even for the whole day. However at - the tvorstvo seemed to me slish a lump rough. And why I am obliged to think that all this obezyanichaniye is made by a devil, at that time to joint stock company of people can make it more skillfully: to be bent by a wheel - I often saw it in 

* Louis Goffridi, the cure of church in the neighborhood of Marsechya, bych is burned as kochdun in 1611, by means of a dyavoch to whom it Was given, he sobchaznich the 16th chetny maiden, his parishioner to an imine emy Madchen de Demandoch - Nuns from Luden, from the monastery Ursulinok in Ludena on which the cure Urben Grandye I spoil a slander also was sentenced to burning in 1634 - Decho Madchena in B ovan, Maidens from Evreux, is put absolutely recent Matyuren P ik are, the cure, and his Helper of Volume B to an uchya by dyavot tried to fascinate this Nun and it podru1 from Luvye, and bp are burned together with it according to the Decision of the parchament of Rouen on August 24, 1647 It decho borrowed • public opinion during five couples - primas avt 


185 
execution of c y gan; to jump - who cannot do it, kro me p shouted ti to ov; to swear - it meets N and to even house of highway Aga. 
If demons, to joint stock company you claim, are capable to do not probable, let they will convince us of it. P lips they pe renenut bash N and cathedral P arizhsk oh B of an ogomatera in Seong - Dae and at the same time will dance the Spanish saraband. Then we and p about beliefs and m. 
They say that a devil uzhasn y the ribald, but it when did not incite obsessed to talk scandal about Wad Dra; friend. N aoborot, they tested mutual uvazheniyezyxwvuts \ 
N e m about of l and p about with t unitary enterprise and t and N and h e, t and to and to p e r in and I e about with to about r l e Nye's N of N arush and la would melt N at. P ochy, the venerable father, your court does not consider those zlodeyan iya which are created by a devil? A devil (you speak) - the father of a lie. Whether P ochy the nanosecond <dn yakh burned the sorcerer and all by highway for the fact that he on was called a devil? P to atom that, I answer, imitating all, a devil - the father of a lie. P rizn aytes, admit, mine to a pra P ODOBNEY Sh I Y THAT the DEVIL TELLS the TRUTH OR the LIE of PS/ 
measure of that, to joint stock company it is necessary for your slyness. N oh, about Auger's B, i I shudder p1ri a type of that, to joint stock company of this devil throw i 
sacred in du 4; really it is so sacred thing, cht ( 
it cannot stand her without horror? I in general am surprised to joint stock company he in that case ventured to put on chelovechesko> weight which the B og created on the similarity, B og, a way ny to see from inaccessible height, uzn ayushch and y the re a benka thanks to acquired by a baptism to a vozrozhda a niya, obozn achayushchiya unction the temple of the Holy Spirit and gifts of wounds iteln itsa of sacred relics. To joint stock company it, a devil, the poem to enter this place, more sacred, than water, over a cat the swarm is just said by several prayers? However at on. the good result is available - I mean the cross, wearable to it, raging a floor at a look obsessed with an extraordinary image. Oh, monsieur exorcist, you bespodob ny1 However whether you know that in the nature there is nothing what would not have a cross, so to joint stock company everything has length and breadth well. So, a cross which you hold, in effect HI a cross, and an ebony; and that, another - not a cross, and sereb ro. Nevertheless, both of them are crosses because in them pe plant louses of N and and highway and ri resekatsya by N and. And so, if gain this my already has hundred thousand lengths and hundred thousand latitudes which are crosses, then why present to him but the Vyya? Nevertheless, we see wives shch and N at which washes prin N y a look when to her lips bring eshch (one cross is puzzled. To joint stock company oh deception! About however many sentence N 

18 
bring down obsessed to it is tested iyu by water, to daily hundred blows by a lash, not to cure it and this is N of an ikogd not pre-to r and ti the CU I. 
It at all not ozn achat that I doubt in mogushche-a stvo of the Creator and not prizn ayu the authority of church, but all 
these I am great iye coldovsk5iye deya N iya the N would azvat foolish 
chatter or with r ed o 1 of those who slish to ohm strongly trust. 
I z and m e h and yu, h t about m about e p and with m about N e with to about l to about z and t I am N of st. about with, however it is really that question which induced me tshch ateln ym in the way to finish this sketch. Du - to May, odn joint stock company oh, that you izvin iteit similar importunity to the person who vowed to be to death yours it on - Korn the eyshy servant, the monsieur. 


STATES I AND M P OF ER AND AND A1 C SOLN. 
(fragments) 

The N of joint stock company he ets, ash the ship pok azatsya by N in gavan and Toulon; having rendered sn achat gratitude to winds and stars for the benefit - a poluchny travel, we embraced and said goodbye. Concerning exchanges I to ap and the thane at did not remain nothing else whether to joint stock company to be content highway with honor to ship the person who fell from the moon as in a lunar mi-re from where I arrived, money is estimated in N ebylitsa. And so, nothing prevented to go to Toulouse to one of mo-their friends. I burned zhelan and I eat it to see, predvk ush aya that joy which will be given to it the story about the p ri to lyuchen also by me x. e I will be N annoying, narrating about what happened to me in p ut; I was tired, had a rest, suffered from thirst, wanted to eat, and I drank and ate directly to joint stock company those twenty or thirty dogs who made rack of my friend. And though I looked shaky - thin and on - blackening from suntan - he nevertheless learned exchanges I. 
From delight it hung on my neck; trembling from ra-dost, kissed more than hundred times and carried away me in the for - became wet where immediately enthusiastic tears gave way slo to you: 
- N of windows ets-that - wax a face of N ut it - we zhi you will also be zhi t, without watching on to joint stock company and e accident, koto-an eye the fate diversifies N ash at zhi zn. N about gods mi-lostiva! Z N of an acha of t, that hearing is incorrect that you burned down in To and N and d e in about gr about m of N about m to about with t r e in m e about those with and z about r e t e N of N y m in and m and the mechanism. Among those who brought me sad news were two or three deserving trust 

I 8 7 
persons - they saw and touched this wooden pt tsu, carried away you, and told that, unfortunately, in! entered inside when brought fire, zyxwvuts and 
speed of rockets, szh gavsh and x all around, podn the yawl птиц^ is high, and attendees lost sight of you. They assure that you burned down, whether and in fallen mash in e vmep <you N ash only raspberries a ky small group of ashes. 
- These ashes, monsieur - I answered it - was about - mekhan a-ism because to inut fire of N to me did not damage. Furs the nizm was attached sn aruzh, a sledstviye of what the heat of highway could disturb me. 
T and to z N and y t e e, h to and to t about l to about with e l and t r and to about N of the h and l and with the carrying power of rockets did not support that any more wave well, and it fell to the ground. I saw, to joint stock company it fell, s was going to fly head over heels together with it, but chre-i was vychayno surprised, having felt that I rise to L \not. Nevertheless it is necessary to explain the reason that all at N the yawl for a miracle. 
In day of the incident I rubbed the deniya of a part of a body hurt at a pas with marrow so when a pier the box rose over clouds, Long and, being N, damage, zhadn about soaked up the substance which impregnated mine flesh, and the body obeyed to it prityazhen iyu. Uverya you, it continued to attract me to gekh a time, on I, N of joint stock company he ets, did not land in that world which at shi N and z y in and yu L t un about yu. 
Then I very in detail told everything circumstances of a travel; The M To Olya of N I to, delighted is heard by N y m, mind about l I I am m l e N of N and p and with and t about with t about l N e about y to N about in e N of N y e things, I long enough opposed, being afraid of visits which, perhaps, will follow later is published iya this work because I love rest. He reproached me carelessness i to its requests. And I, am shamed by N y, N of joint stock company he ets, decided to follow his advice. 
And here I picked up a feather and when he added a notebook, is passionate zhelayushch y my glory (it did not give I eat \rest more, than its own), went to Toulouse \to present this work in most and zysk to An of N ykh a meeting I x. P okhvala of one of the most educated people svo his time made me known. Already the engravers never seeing exchanges I cut out mine to an izobrazha ny; the city of N and each intersection rustled with the become hoarse drinks, Wai's zaza: "Here a portrait of the author "The states and the empires of the Moon "1" Among people, chi tavsh and x I wash kN to a yoke, many ignoramuses who only its Perrelet met 

188 
styval. They applauded, to joint stock company and others, imitating highly educated minds, and were zealous in hlo-a pannier after each word not to be trapped, and in places, to them at all not pon I am ton ykh whether it is joyful vosklitsa-: "To joint stock company aya charm!" But the herd instinct disturbs zdra-vy sense; all of them without maleysh their remorse will prefer to refuse rather reputations of the philosopher (also improper to them, to joint stock company and it is bad ssh ity odezh-yes), than to object the standard opinion. 
Here the medal back in relation to those, a lump \* are sung iramba diff. It appears, the composition which was given it zn achen iye, according to other readers is, no more, than mix of ridiculous stories, a lot of incoherent tales for an ubayukivaniye of children, like "Wasps - Lina of highway to an ura"; it is clear, that the author went crazy. 
The difference of opinion increased glory. Not - 
much vremen2i later hand-written copies were on sale 
from under p ola; and everything, from noblemen in and to the monk and even 
wives shch and N y, bought this composition. Judgments were about that l r and z in l and h N y, and with t r and with t and N and with t about l to about N and to and l and l and s, h t about to azhdy family and all city were divided two groups: lu-N and t I am a N and and N of t and l un and t I am a N. 
Business reached firefights; one morning I saw, to joint stock company to M.'s bedroom To olin a yak and vo3shli nine 
or ten bearded men in lengths of N ykh p latya x also told 
to it: "The monsieur, you know that there is no among us who would not be yours and m an ally, the relative or the friend. Therefore, all shameful, happened to you, casts a shadow and on us. We know from a reliable face that you cover the sorcerer in the lock". 
- To an oldun! - M. To olin I exclaimed to. - Oh, gods! You azovit N to me and mya, and I will give him to yours of hands and. The N about should beware because it can be slander. 
- Monsieur! - interrupted its one of is most honored - ny. - R to an azva is available what - nibud another parla-the cop understanding sorcerers is better than ours? My dear p lemya N of N and to, we will not hold more you in not - popularity: the sorcerer whom we accuse - the author "The states and the empires of the Moon y"; he cannot deny what is the greatest magician in Europe and recognizes it. To joint stock company it rose by Long at? And. nako-not c, tell me what it did on the Moon? 
- That for a question! - another interrupted it. - - He with - biratsya to participate in a sabbath which, perhaps, with was stood there that day; indeed, you see that 
1 8 h 
it had communication with the demon. Whether costs after that having fished - lyatsya to his words as if the devil brought it to this world? So many the moon and travel by air divorced that, between you and mebetween you and mebetween you and me (with these words it bent to his ear), I N ik an ogd did not see the sorcerers who were not dealing with the Moon. 
P a donkey of this good advice they ceased. M To Olya of N I to stunned with their general wild behavior not MOI to say words. Started talking the honored numskull, before being silent: 
- We zn Ai that forces you to be silent; the sorcerer - h e l about in e to, to about t about r about about in y l yu and t e, N about N and h e about N e about y those with, only give it to us in hands and; from it will be complied iya to you everything decently; we, for the love of you, swear our honor to subject it to burning without scandal. 
P a donkey of these words M. To Olya of N I to who was propping up sides to ulak Amy could not restrain; the laughter shaking his body offended visitors much; and to the azhdy paragraph of their solemn speech he answered N only ha - and - and - and and ho-about - about - about; they left strongly indignant, but also the N ye because their shame already on the way to Tu a billiard pocket dissipated is not really shamed. To an ogd they left whether I zatashch and M.'s l To about N I to and in an office, Zac dug a door and sk azat: 
- P ozor! These ambassadors from lengths of N ymiy hair are similar N and comets having a tail; I am afraid that highway mind which they will raise will be more dangerous than a thunder and a lightning to me. About a vineniye ridiculously is also result of their nonsense; and I will not remain in zhi vy from the fact that, seeing, to joint stock company I under zharivatsya who - that will tell as if my judges - fools; then already N and to joint stock company and e arguments in favor of my innocence will not revive exchanges I; my lifeless ashes on will koitsya in a tomb or on a dump. That is why me with about l and z N I e m t y with l about with t and in and t in e that y p r about in and N of c i and l and sh e l e dy the stay; and to die for what I to apelk also do not trust in, silly doubly. 
The m To olin a yak hardly waited for windows a tub iya a t monologue. began to play a trick on my fears; but having put uv that I perceive everything seriously, exclaimed with is pugan N ym a look: 
- Oh, damn! The N ikto will not touch even to kra your clothes, pok and I, my friends, servants and all those, kts respects me, before will not die. nevozmozh but to occupy my house without p ush to and; it it is very favorable raspolozhe and it is well strengthened. N about I not the madman, that bo r about t with I with mind and N y m of r about m about m. 

140 
- It at times is more dangerous, than a thunder heavenly - in about z r and z and l I. 
From now on we told only about priyatn ohm; hunted, made walks, prin imat guests and put vi zi you; but always any entertainment we wasps - tavlyal before it managed to bother us. 
M arkiz To yussan, the neighbor M. To olin I to and, known for the kind acts, usually accompanied us; to prolong N ash and friendly meetings, we proguli-fall from To Olya of N I to and in To yussan and back. These bezobid-ny pleasures made a smaller part of leisure; they could not ityit replacements what finds mind in iskani-yakh and a talk; ash e society involved with N many scientists. We connected reading to a conversation; a conversation with horo-PWM by a table, fishing, hunting or walks; in a word, we enjoyed ourselves and all what is created by the nature for the sake of N ash their pleasures, ogranichi-Wai the last the mind. 
Meanwhile, my popularity, mesh avsh aya to rest, extended on neighboring villages and even goro-ladies of pro-wines of a tion. P odes a pretext to see the señor, the N and the sorcerer wanted to look at everything and. To an ogd I went out of the lock, not only children and wives shch and N y, but also men y that is r and shch and l and s a N and m e N I to and to N and e with t and yu, o with about en N about p and with t about r and z To olin a yak who whether the ave. of cunning, whether on glubo-to whom to ignorance was Zac a la my ty enemy. Under simplicity it in soul concealed rage and vindictiveness, as regards slanders could surpass any Norman, and the love for a slander at it grew in the main passion. He hated the señor because of powerlessness; having started with it a long lawsuit, he was afraid to sweep also in order to avoid it in about z N and m e r and l with I about m e N I would be t e N e f and ts and y 4. The N about p about that m and z m e N and l the intentions or only delayed them, having solved nane-st M.'s blow To Olya of N I to at, using mine and mya; however as it masked the plans, but frequent it on - ezdka to Toulouse caused suspicion. He told one thousand ridiculous stories about my volshebstvo; a voice of this angry person, joining chorus of gawks 
and
  N e in e d, N and in l e to and l p r about to l I am t I N and m oye and m I. 
About me spoke to joint stock company about new Agrippe5; because of about - 
claims of the cure all were incited against me. About it we were warned by the people close to M. To olin to a yak and the marquis; rough customs of it to paradise surprised us and ve-lodged, but I was secretly frightened, deliberating over the most probable consequences of similar delusions. 

1')] 
This fear, undoubtedly, vn was ushat by the good genius, oi clarified reason that I saw an abyss where m e t. wanted stolkn to utnut; but, being content silent to an owl volume, he decided to warn more noticeably. 
In one of the uneasiest nights which ever followed one of - whether p r and I am ton to it x days, a prova day in To Olya of N I to e, I got up from the dawn, and that rasseit, concern, zatuman ivsh her my mind, left in a garden where greens, the flowers and fruits created by people and priro that fascinated soul and vzglya d; immediately I sweep up., Mark Iza, thoughtfully walking alone ps to the big avenue dividing tsvetn ik into two equal hour ti. I was much surprised, having seen him against an obyknova of N iya so wounds about; it forced me to accelerate highway ag, chtob-uzn to at the reason of so early awakening. It to me with sheathed about N epriyatn ykh the dreams tormenting him and having forced shy to rise much earlier usual; he wanted to disperse the harm done by darkness light. I told it and <own alarms, the mesh avsh and x me to sleep. And' the detail did not manage a zlozha of t - we noticed M. To Olya of N I to and, going big highways of an agami along a fence. Still published! about N in about with to l and to N of st.: 
- You see the person who just a feather 
lived the most awful vision capable to stir up to Russ dock. Having dressed N to amzol, I went down to tell a shaft; about it; but you were not in komn to an ata. Then I ran out in a garden, guessing that you here. 
The N the eschastny count really was out of himself. Edv, he calmed down a little, to joint stock company we asked him osvobo to get to from warm weight. 
The B an esedka from a zhasma of N and very opportunely provided us a shelter and a cool; we entered it and neprinuzh denno settled down; To olin the yak continued M: 
- Twice or three times dreamed me mn oh absurd at night: prin imat a dawn for twilight, came in dream as if dear visitor stood between the marquis and me, l> he strong obn was imat. Suddenly appeared black hugely! the many-headed monster wishing to pull out it at us. I even think that it was going to throw the guest in pylav a fire shy nearby; it already shook it on, a flame, but odn6a from girls, similar to the Muse, chtg' 
E vterpy are called, rushed on knees before the guo 
pozhy, begging about rescue (this lady had vn eshn y vi; and attributes which serve N ash as it hudozhn to dl ika; images of the nature). Hardly madam listened to npocv 

19 2 
sluzhan to and, to joint stock company the last with exclamation: "uvp JT O one of my friends!" - Dong Ula under legs of my dear guest brought to a mouth something it seems sarbak An a7 and so that threw it to the sky and by that zashch and ti la from zhes-tokost of a stoglavy monster. I, to joint stock company to me to azhtsya, a dale - go to the mooring to it after, begging not to depart without exchanges I. Then a great number of podgy angels, N azyvavsh and hsya children of a dawn, podn the yawl me to that country to which, kaza-an elk, it departed and where I saw the most ridiculous a thing and. About them I do not undertake rassk to azyvat. 
We long Rush also bring down unitary enterprise, and it sk azat: - I p olagat as if N akhozhus in the Sun and that 
The sun is a m and river. From it zabluzhden iya exchanges I am a log hut - twisted rzhan iye losh Adie, banished a dream; having woken up, I found out that I lie in the bed. 
To M.'s ogd To Olya of N I to Zack it chi l, Mark and z asked: - Monsieur Dirk it and, to joint stock company ov was your dream? - My dream - he answered - the most ordinary 
also it is not remarkable. Since then, to joint stock company I exist, 
I am constantly dreamed peshchery8 and fire. P the reason is simple - 
I and ho l e r and k, i m e l and N x about l and to. 
In youth, in a dream, I easily rose under obla-to avoid rage of crowd of murderers, having pursued - shy exchanges I; after otchy the N of N ykh efforts to me was possible pre-to overcome many obstacles, but always came across - kaya-nibud a wall, and I was unable to get over through it. To an azaelk, I direct directly up and already long I swing Amy's hands in the sky, however still the earth was near; illogically I not oshchu-shchat neither fatigue, nor the weight; to my enemies to - with t and t about h N about y l about l and highway p r about t I am a N ut r at to and, h y with hv and t and t me for a leg and prityan to utnut that to the earth. Since then, to joint stock company I remember myself whether I dream highways similar sn y, for isklyu-cheniy this N eyes. To joint stock company usually long flying, I neskol-to time avoided the persecutors and, N of windows ets, on - lost sight of them. In clean and yark about the lit sky I, incorporeal, flew on N also light is put in order iyu to the palace, izluchav-shy warmly. B ez doubts, I well razli-would chit also another: but, flying in a dream, I drew near edge of a bed and fell down between a bed and a wall; it is frightened - ny, with vytarashch en N ymiy eyes I examined naked and in about t, and z m and z and N of N y y p about e l to about y. In t, m e with e, with about N, N and in about z - a niknoveniye of which, I think, lines of my character affected; it differs from prezhn their dreams Lish in that. that I flew in the sky and did not fall. After all, N ash and 

7-3400	1 () * 
zn An and I about dreams very fog of N y, about much at is gone to build guesses. 
- P rizn I atsya - picked up To yussan - you are right, it is mixture of all those thoughts which dawned on us while we were awake, monsters of N aya a chimera; soyedine-ny vague f An basin y, N eupravlyaemy reason; in that N e m e N e e m y with the h and t and e its m p r e and with p about l of N e N of N about y and with t and N of N about about sense also we consider dreams to joint stock company oracles, predskaza-a future body; sk the Azat on the truth, sn y, it is equal to joint stock company and the Orok of an ula, usually p it I am ton y. Judging by my not outstanding dream, it is not worth a pin for the rest too. Dreamed me as if I very much was sad and everywhere I I about its l r and with - a pike perch a florid explanation of everyones dark zaga-met D and r to about N and, in z y in and yu shch e about to N and m of N about N e at t about l m dock, I will reveal to you briefly their truth N y sense. P in To Olya the N I to e dream an oskolk slish a lump bad sn y, I can assume what in To the yussena will feel better us. 
- So we will go there - the count told - if everything here so disturbs us. 
We decided to go on the same day. I persuaded friends to leave wounds to a sha of exchanges I because I was glad to a case pe-to repravit there a little to N and. They agreed and sra-the storage after a breakfast and started at way. 
I those m in r e m e N e m at p and to about in y in and l to N and and, to about t about r y x, to and to me to an azaelk, did not get in library K of a yussan, loaded them N and a mule and left about three hours N and a quick trotter. However the library demanded prismot-ra, at the same time there was a wish to admire the surrounding nature, and I had to go pesh to ohm. P atom about - and z about highway of l about z and and in N about e p r and to l yu h e N and e. 
P reodolev four leagues, I came to be in the area, to - tory, undoubtedly, was to me zn joint stock company of ohm. This landscape concerned imagination; I am a N ap rya p amya t and remembered that this area dreamed me last night. P odobny coincidence Zahn would imat for a long time exchanges I if not strange vision. P an osreda are expensive on - the ghost (on krayn to it to a measure I it prin the yawl for that am kovy) was and seized my horse by an occasion. He was ogrom-a leg of growth and N elzya to understand - is beautiful or ugly, so to joint stock company the long dress sewed from rolls for a church p en and I hid its figure; the face was hidden behind a leaf with inscription "In N to an Achala..." 9. 
- Devil! Satan! - the ghost with horror - whether Zac of N ayu you a name of almighty B of RSA exclaimed... 

1 94 
N and these words he zapn ulsya, in embarrassment repeating: "Almighty B of RSA" - he in vain looked for the pastor that that podsk azat to it continuation; from a fright it strongly began to tremble why a half of teeth dropped out, and pain - a shinstvo uk ry vavsh and x its countries its were curtailed in papil-Quality Department and. Nevertheless he addressed to mn e; in his empty eyes I noticed doubt: it not zn is scarlet, to become angry or reduce zap is scarlet: 
- The N at well - sk was azat by it. - Whether Z joint stock company of N ayu you ime-the B of RSA and monsieur Zh of An of ohms is mute - do not prevent me to act; e with l and t y highway e in e l N e highway N about go y and l and r at to about y, h e r t in about z m and, I those I r and with p about t r about highway at. 
I tried to pull out at it an occasion whether but raspirav-highway y exchanges I laughter of highway is scarlet forces. At this time near polusot-countrymen seemed because of a fence - costing on to olen I x, it and, N adryvayas, sang L and that N and yu 10. Four most siln ykh men came nearer, and, having washed hands and in to ropiln to an itsa who was held by the servant from to - 
ma the pastor, they seized me by a collar. Here zh1e1 giving to drink - 
in and l of m with I about N with e N about r and N, about N with about r in and l with in about yu e p and t r and x and l and it 
with in I z and m l e N I p about r at to and m and N about and m; p about that highway m at m of N and I am t about l p and wives shch and N and children, without watching N and my protests, zash and la me-nya in a huge cloth - dexterously turned, hardly vidne-las the head! In such look also incurred to Toulouse. One kri-chat that, not svya zhi they exchanges I, I would fill with damage on fields, and all would be expected by hunger; another complained of sheep smallpox which N fell down N and a flock after one wax - resny evening when I slapped it it can do. N about nesmot-rya on these a zlok lyuchen iya, one circumstance brought me to laughter - to ri to young to restyan to and, to ri to, full of horror for the wives and ha (it he in an image of a ghost from - nyal at me sk joint stock company un and, took seat on it and already to joint stock company of the at - shporivat very much): 
- N eschastn y - it is shrill to the mooring its cart - lyublenny - really you went blind? R to an azva you do not see that a horse the sorcerer and is more black than coal? Same the devil, koto-ry will carry away you N and highway abash. 
The m uzhchin and in horror fell down from a horse and that at once 
mustache to and to and l and. 
About N and p about with about in e t about in and l and with and r e sh and l and v z I am t m of st. and; r and with p about t r about - sewed a bale and Quality Departments dug the first sprained book - "F to an Izik" D EC and r that 12; having noticed circles which this fi-losof noted dvizhen iye everyone the plan of an eta, all in one го3rd 
the Leningrad Region with z and about r and l and, h t about e t and m I to about y in y z y in and e t with I In e l z e in at l 1. 
Derzhavsh and y to N to a yoke with a fright threw out it; unfortunately, 
7 * 
Q5 
p ady, it revealed on the countries to an itsa, razjyasn yayushch to it properties magn and that; exactly here was pok an adhan about dvizhe-ny to magn to an it become shallow highway and x metal bodies, izobra-wives of N ykh in the form of hands. Z ametiv it, one of contemptible for - about x and l, z and I v and v, ch t about e t about and m e N of N about t and and and, about N and r e N of N and I in 
scoop e 4v to it yush N e it to uzen and, because of which his horse 
sdokhla1. P donkey of these words even the most impatient 
put hands and N and a breast or thrust them in to Armand y. Monsignor Zh and N hysterically warned about danger and did not advise prik to asatsya to what - nibud supposedly all these to N and gi - magical, and a mule - a devil. The crowd was frightened and left a mule alone. Odn Acre I saw, to JSC M of an atyurin, sluzhan to and monsieur cure, gn is scarlet an animal to a house shed svya-shch en N and to and, being afraid, to joint stock company it would not come N and the cemetery and N e about with to in e r N and l about m about and l y. 
At seven o'clock in the evening we arrived in the city and me for - t and shch and l and v t yu r m at. To and to t about l to about t yu r e m shch and to r about with and m l e N I in this mrachn uyu a cave, I sk azat: 
- If you give this cover from to am to N I in quality p l and t I, t about d and about N and with l and highway to about m of highway and r about to and; e with l and e that m about and l and, it slish to ohm uzk and. Here it is possible to consider only but - chi; from pya ti feelings at exchanges I will remain two, sense of smell and osyazan iye: one to inhale prison zlovon iya, another that shch unitary enterprise to at it. P ri zn to atsya, I thought that I am in an underworld, not zn is ouch reliable that N evin ovn ykh do not let there. 
N and the word "N evin ovn y" mine tyuremshch and to raskhokho-tals I: 
- To lyanus honor, you from N ash and x people. Guilty do not get here! 
P a donkey of it to omplimen that the softie quickly me about highway and r and l. E go with t and r and N and I y l and N and p r and with N y, t and to and to p r and a meeting with a ghost I thrust gold into highway the thane y: and likewise, to joint stock company I nearly died of fear, he nearly died of a grief, nothing not N aydya during the search. 
- And! Devil take it! - with foam at a mouth exclaimed prisons - shch and to - I from the N of an achal pon the yawl that it is the sorcerer! The B is uniform, to joint stock company a devil! Ladn oh, think till tomorrow of the conscience. 
It z and r I would be c and l with in I z to about y to l yu h e y, about t y with to and in and I am a N at N y y about my t to amer. Ely to cajole him, I is quick vyta-shch and l tr and p and with t about l I and with to and z and l: 
- Mister p ri vratn and to, here one pistole; I did not eat eleven hours, I beg to bring a piece of bread. 

196 
It it is polite p ri N I l a coin and assured that sochuvst-vut to my distress. I pon the yawl - am gray - his dets was softened - and continued: 
- And here one more for trouble which caused you. 
It was all vn and Mang and e; transferring the third coin, I begged to send whom - nibud from his assistants for kompan to AI - Zac Lyuchen N ye most of all are afraid odino-h e with TV and. 
R astrogan N y my generosity, the jailer promised to grant requests, to ritik an oval existing for - a game y, assuring that at once pon I am l - at exchanges I am enemies, N of N about I e p r e m e N of N about in about with with that N about in l yu with in yu h e with t, about N e h e r e z three dn I will wash mine Mang Zhetk and. I is very warm on - thanked him for courtesy; having snuggled me in to embrace - I x, the new friend locked a door of N and two bolts. 
In deep Milan holiya I lay on a heap small solo we on which ran to a rysa. With - oruzhena from six tombstones as if in N azidan iye about with m e r t and and h t about y I would be a N e with about m of N e in and l with I in with in about I would eat the arch, walls and a ceiling p about r e e with N and and. Whether cold p to and e worms and toads crept on my person, 
Don imal vsh and. I think, was not enough for me li5sh wives y and 
broken gorsh to and to resemble on And about in and 1. 
In two hours a gnash of a big key and la zg for - vapors of a door distracted me from these sad thoughts. P ri light of lamas p y I noticed mighty men at. It on - put a bowl between legs and sk azat: 
- Hey, there, do not grieve, here soup from to an apusta. They say, and z N e go N e in y l about v and l and n and k and p e l k and zh and r and. 
He put the hand in a bowl, p ri glash aya and me to make the same. I followed its example, not - bark to irritate the merry fellow. Laughing, it vosklikn st.: 
- You quite good guy! They say, at you is zavist-nicknames? P redatel! P lips will only come! 
Seeing this naiveté, I hardly constrained laughter. The destiny, to azhtsya, give la acting through this contemptible an opportunity to be released therefore it was important not to lose him horoshe-go arrangements to mn e. It was not necessary to choose - arkhitek Torahs, stroivsh y prison, Dov made a little vkho- and forgot to punch at least one exit. All these soobra-e N and I z and with t and v and l and m e N I p r about in e r and t t yu r e m shch and to and: 
- You are poor, my friend, isn't that so? - Alas, monsieur - the yokel noted. - Hold - sk I azat, is a pistole. 
197 
I enclosed a pistole in a palm - it so shivered that it is hardly her Zac Ry of l. Such beginning seemed to me bad p redzn amine ovan and I eat; but p y lx and e thanks convince - whether - the yokel trembled with joy; then I continued: 
- If you helped me to carry out one plan, then 20 pistoles (besides rescue of soul) would be a naver of N I to and yours. Z the N ouch, for a quarter of hour before your arrival pe-redo me appeared an angel and promised to report the truth about my business whether highway tomorrow I would serve a mass behind a big altar in city cathedral. I explained that I cannot in y y t and, to N about about N p about about e shch and l p r and with l and t h e r e z t yu r e in m shch and to and h e in l about - a century which will be accompanied exchanges by me. It has enough p ri to an az to lead me to church and back to prison; he has to obey without objections under fear not - otvratimy and fast death; his possible doubt I will disseminate p it I ton ymiy to it zn joint stock company am and because he is a fellow - the monk. 
For the reader I will report: through a hole of a shirt of the yokel Maun Ash esky clothes flashed. It - that also induced me-nya to an invention: 
- To onechno, my kind señor - sk he azat - I will execute will of an angel. The N about should wait for nine hours, at this time the N ash the owner will be in Toulouse a N and the son's engagement with the executioner's daughter. They say, given to the daughter will drop down for vyk UPA of the king, be taken prisoner it. N of joint stock company he ets, she kra-Siwa, but the poor young man will get neither that, nor another. Alas, my kind master, it is necessary that you zn Ali... 
N and e that m m e with t e I p r e r in and l p about t about to about t l about in N and. M y t shch and - telno considered the action plan, and the yokel said goodbye. 
N and the next day in N azn achen N y hour it prishele for me. I dressed up in tatters - about it we dogo-in about r and l and s as N and to and N at N e. To and to t about l to about m y about to and z and l and with N and in about l e, I counted to it the promised twenty pistoles. He watched N and their N with greed and surprise. 
- To lyanus, they are golden and heavy. - E, monsieur - he answered - not I think of it. 
The house of the senior Mase is sold together with the earth and wines ogradn by Ik. I to would upit it for twenty f of wounds of k; for execution of the transaction of N uzhn and week. My kind master, I want to ask if there is on that yours and in - la, to make so that before transaction the senior 
Mase kept yours and pistoles in the s1u6nduke, not prevra- 
they titsya there in oak l and with tya. 
The N an aivnost of it mosh en N and to and was made laugh exchanges by me. Aude - N and to about in with to about r e m y p r and highway of l and to c e r to in and. H e r e z e to about that r about e time the solemn mass began N; having seen that wash 

1 98 
okhran the N ik rose from the place to make pozhertvova-a niya, I in three p ry zhk and jumped out N and the middle of the temple, and then quickly got lost in the distant small street. In this mo-the cop I was overwhelmed by different thoughts, and I followed odes - ache: to reach Toulouse to which there was a half-league and to locate there. Soon enough I reached the suburb; m e N I with m at shch and l and p r and with t and l N y e in z of l I d y p r about ho and x. P r and - ceremonious their surprises my N aryad because in vop-dews of N ishch eta I was ignorant served, the bearing and gait were not combined with clothes, I looked in tatters of the countries - but, resembling N and masked more, than the poor. 
N of windows ets, I overcame shame, pon imy that general vn iman iye threatened with dangerous consequences. Having noticed whose - nibud a look, I immediately gave a hand, begging about mercy. N about to joint stock company it is frequent instead of following cautions of Destiny, we ignore them, razdra-zhy this arrogant woman! Led me to such conclusion on - the event following it; having noticed the person standing to me a back, on clothes of the citizen of an average to - a statka, I address it: 
- The monsieur, if the compassion can touch... N e I managed to pronounce the following word, to joint stock company this che- 
lovek turned the head. Holy Christ! It was my jailer. M y y l and p about t r I with e N y in with t r e h e y. About N p about and r and m l e N I am hl and z and - mi; I attentively watched N and him. N of joint stock company it ets, the general in-those r e with, ho t I and with l and highway to about m r and z l and h N y y, in y in e l of N and with and z about c e p e - N en and I. 
- And, what I unfortunate - cried the jailer - 
really I was spent? 
This exclamation guided me N and the thought to use cunning: - Hey! N and the help, misters, to the aid of justice! - 
I shouted, passing N and squeal. - This thief stole Wad Dra - gotsennost the count of an ina de Mousso; I look for him year. State - sweat - I continued, being more and more excited - hundred pistoles to the one who will arrest it! 
Hardly I sk azat it, to joint stock company the rack of villains snatched N and t yu r e m shch and to and. And z mind of l e n and e, v y z in and N of N about e in m about e y h r e z in y - tea impudence, so it struck that long time it was in a state of shock because I could not, like the deity escape, having got through walls of prison, N e r and z r ush and in and x. N and to about N e c, N e with the h and with t of N y y about p about m of N and l with I and, Wishing to undeceive crowd, prin yalsya ubezh-to give all that he is very dear person. However dozen of dealers greens, footmen and porters, - layushch them to do a favor for my money, Zac dug to him a mouth, 

19 9 
having given on teeth; besides they imagined that pla-y it will be equivalent to insults - to azhdy ran up to kick it or a hand. 
- P examine on dear person! - zloslo-twisted this crowd. - And he dares to speak so after that, to joint stock company was identified by mister who caught it! 
The most amusing was the fact that the jailer dressed on - festive, was ashamed prizn to atsya that the m p and l and and and in about z in r and shch and e t with I with p about m about l in is h with in and that to and, about p and with and I with to be beaten even more if learn about it. 
Having run away into the heat of a fight and having provided Spa - Senja to legs, soon I found freedom. N oh, unfortunately, the eyes turned in my party caused former concerns again. Any of gapers and could allocate me from crowd of beggars, appear, that at me on a forehead napisa-but - here the run-away prisoner. To an ogd of people took out a hand from a coat, it was represented by the sergeant, sobirav-we shitsya me to arrest. Even ravn odushn ye passersby, I convinced myself, pretend to be, and are ready to snatch for me behind. To an ogd saw the dealer entering a bench, was struck for fear: "It will unhook alebar-du now!" In populous quarter I thought: "Here I under - am steregat!" Having met an obstacle in a way, razmysh la of l: "Blocked streets, surround!" The N of windows ets, fear absolutely paralyzed my mind? to the azhdy person saw arrows - a lump; any word - "you hold", and maleysh y noise - not - about those r p and m y l m I z about m z Aso in in t yu r m y. 
And z m at the h e N of N y y p and N and h e with k and m and s t r and x and m and, I r e highway and l p about p r about - highway the Ainu to ichat to cross the city rest without suspicions; but for fear to be uzn An of N ym on a voice, on - chat to represent mute. I pok azyvat a finger under podbo-a rodok, then it is necessary a mouth and, yawning, opened it with nechleno-a separate sound, giving pon yat that unfortunate about - sit alms. I was sympathetically patted it can do, put in a bread crust fist; I hear it is scarlet, to joint stock company of wives - shch and N y highways eptatsya supposedly probably, I am a martyr for belief from Turkey. To me the truth opened that the N ishch the et is a kN of a yoke which teaches us to customs of the people better, than opi-Sanya of all great travel To an olumb and M of an agellan. 
Mine vydumk and could be come to a bad end. The N about to oh of other cunning to resort to joint stock company? The sucker dressed in zhalk and e - motya, to JSC Arlekin, I nevertheless was not sure that Uda - stsya to make the way N euzn An of N ym on such big goro-du, to JSC Toulouse because on an engraving with a portrait me bonds - N any dealer is scarlet. 
Ludovico - Maria Sinistrari About a demonialiteta and a bestialiteta 
inkub and succubuses 
The I head. P the roiskhozhdeniye of a word "demonialitt" 
(demonolozhestvo). Than this crime 
differs from "bestialitet" (skotolozhestvo). 
M neny St. Thomas Aquinas 
P e r in y y and in t about r, to about t about r y y, N and with to about l to about I z the N and yu, and z about br ate 
the word "demonialitt", there was Juan To aramyue l1 in the • The main divinity", and the N ik that to it, to joint stock company to me - zhetsyag did not distinguish this crime from "bestialite-that". Really, all theologians are moralists from St. my Fo-at the head understand as the name bestiali-a theta "any carnal intercourses of the person with - 
kim-nibud object of other sort ili2 look"; it on - 
long it is expressed iye St. F ohms. To ae the thane in the tolko- 
vaniya on this matter ranks the intercourses with dyavo-scrap as a sort of "bestialitet". 
However it is known that St. F ohms, mentioning this vop-grew, had no owing to the intercourse with a devil at all. R az - the dialect about a sin against the nature, "when happens sno-a sheniye to an object of other sort that is called "besti-alitt", assumes under this N azvan iy a being of other look and a sort, than people; therefore it not mo-zht here to use a word an object or a subject in about - shchy sense". Wanted to define St. F ohms snoshe-a niya of the person with zhi a vy object of other sort here, i.e. with zhivotn ymiy, and did not think of the intercourse with a devil at all. 
And so, sn oshen iya with a devil - demonialitt, be it inkub or the succubus, differ from the bestialitet and do not represent what - or a special type of it on - sledny, to joint stock company To ae the thane as whatever ancient writers and To aramyuel told, sins p r about ti in p r and r about dy about the h e to N r and z l and h N y mistakenly thinks. 
This doctrine and opposite opinion were osuzh-dena dad Alexander unitary enterprise 3 because each of these sins has the special ungodliness opposite to chastity and interferes with reproduction of a sort che-lovechesky. The m ozhno to refer for enough izvest-Nov the doctrine of moralists established on "Cathedral of Thirty" and "A meeting of the H etyrn adtsat", recognized by theologians that on a confession it is enough to tell about circumstances which will define a sin sort. 
If demonialitt and bestialitt - the same, though special type of, then repenting enough, the EU - 

203 
whether it had the intercourse with a devil, sk the Azat to du - a hovnik - "I sined the bestialitet". 
N about it a lie in, because these two sins not odina-a kovy sort. 
About e in t y in t, with to and at t, h t about about with t of t about I e in l with t in and with N about highway e in N and I with a devil dolzhn y Quality Department to be dug m to the confessor because of wasps - a korbleniye which they put religions; deystvitel-but, this insult comes whether that will be from poklo-N en iya, turned to a devil, or from the victims and a pier - N y, addressed to it, or from the contract signed with it (St. F ohms, question 90). To N oh, to joint stock company it will be visible vpos-to a ledstviya, there are inkuba and succubuses to whom nothing from this concerns. 
To rum of that, on p ri zn An and yu all theologians - morals - st, the sin of the intercourses with a devil is much heavier, than similar Dejan Iye, made with what - nibud in live ton y in m. 
The N oh, in the same special sort of a sin, one sin cannot be more tya m zhela, than another, but all odi-nakovo tya zhela: the same - to have the intercourse from wasps - l and c e y, with with about and to about y, and l and with to about y l and c e y. 

I I of l and in ampere-second of N about highway e N and I with and N to at and m and and with uk to ub and m and 
there is no fruit is imagined iya, but deystviteln an awn, 
to joint stock company testifies the N y Augustine is blessed 
Having defined distinction of words "demonialitt" and "besti- 
alitt" that it was possible to estimate all weight of this crime and to define N of joint stock company an adhan and e which it deserves (that for us the most important), we should investigate, sk olk and mi razl chn y mi in the ways this sin can be made because the devil, in the form of an inkub or the succubus, unites not only with chelove-to about m, N about t and to e with and in about t of N y m and. P about m of N e N and yu N e to about t about r y x authors, all this not other that, to joint stock company a fruit of the upset imagination. P odobny things, they say, meet - sya in stories about to oldun ah; at N avazhden AI a devil people think that are present at night gatherings and have the carnal intercourse with a devil; actually they imagine all this, to joint stock company that also was ustanovle-but two cathedrals. 
To an olduna and the sorcerer really prisutstvu-yut N and N ochn ykh gatherings also have plotsk iye snoshe-N iya with dya an ox. It mn en iye theologians and to atoliche-sky lawyers, "Compendium which is extensively stated in 

204 
M aleficarum" and whether "List of witches" F ranchesko-M aria of ua c of c of the lake. 
ets to resolve this issue, we have a N of windows av-toritt blessed Augustine who said so ("About a hail of B ozhiy" To N.15, Chapter 23): "Very much rasprostrane-N about m of N e n and e, ch that with and l in and N y and f and in N y, about y to N about in e N of N about N and z y - in and e m y e and N to at and m and, h and with t about e with p about to about I t e N shch and N E with t t and to - devils whom Gauls of N azyvat Duzi I mi koto-ry indulge and m dirty sn Osh en in iya. It zasvi-detelstvovano and m and numerous the authority - mi that would be impudence them wipe c to at" 4. Are that on - lengths of N ye it is expressed iya bl. Augustine. 

The III head. Attitudes towards a devil of sorcerers and 
sorcerers and ceremonies at their dedication 
R azl chn ye authors teach us, and them mn en iya podtver- 
zhdatsya by numerous examples that the devil has two ways of the intercourses from men of Amy and wives shch in and - mi. P ervy concerns sorcerers and the sorcerer y, another - men and wives shch and the N alien to sorcery.5 
In the first case, the devil unites with Amy's sorcerer and to oldun ya mi only after the solemn contract by which these unfortunate human beings indulge in it. N ekotory authors give judicial 
p ri z6n An and I to oldun y, am pulled out by N ye at N and x in time py- 
that to. 
These stories are collected F ranchesko-by M the aria Guazzo. Such contract is followed by 11 ceremonies. First, examinees dolzhn y Zac to lyuchit the contract 
with a devil or with the sorcerer acting from it ime-to which it and, in the presence of witnesses, a post - N sing and service. Devil, in return, garantiru-et to them honor, riches and N aslazhden iya. 
Secondly, they recede from Catholic belief, wasps - vobozhdatsya from poslush by An iya in B of regional public institution, Quality Department azyvy s from Christ and zashch and you are B ozhy M of an atera and all sacred C of ER - to vi. 
Thirdly, they reject from themselves a wreath or beads of B ozhy atera M, a rope St. F wounds of c and sk and Assisi, or a belt bl. Augustine, N ap lechn and to an armelitok - depending on that, to joint stock company to ohm to an award they prin adlezhat; a cross, an incense to and and everything that carry svya shch en N and to and, they top chutnut agami N. 

205 
Fourthly, they to la of N utsyanutsya to a devil in obedience and povin the aries of AI, express it respect and humility, having put a hand of N and special black to N and gu. They obyazyva-yu t with I of N and to about d and N e in about z in r and shch and t with I to in e r e Hr and with t about in about y, N e to arrive on divine precepts, not to do - to joint stock company oho a good deed, but to obey one devil and p r and l e N about p about with e shch and t N about h N y e with about r and N and I. 
Fifthly, they promise to care and use all efforts whether to enlist on service to a devil of other c. 
Sixthly, the devil gives them something in a sort impious to reshch en iya, zastavlya I their Quality Department to azatsya from the godfather and mother and from to it f and rmats and, N azn achy by it others vos-priyemn ik to which charges to train them in sorcery art; whether they atsya by highway names and which had, and receive new, thickets e all a clownish nickname. 
Seventhly, they cut off a part of the clothes to offer it to a devil in zn joint stock company is honored iya, and he carries away it also with about hr and N I e t. 
Eighthly, the devil draws N and the earth a circle and hold - howls in it examinees that Zac to repit everything to la of a tva which they give, to joint stock company sk an adhan about vysh e. 
Ninthly, they ask from a devil vycherkn to utnut them from to N Christ's yoke and to enter them in the. Then that Part e r is N and I to N and and, to about t about r about y about N and p r and t r and and in and l and with whether to about a gd and zjya vlya the humility, and the devil brings them and m e N and svo and m to about of t e m there. 
In - the tenth, they promise a devil to sacrifice opre-divided time - to azhdy pyatn to adtsat days or, on exchanges to a shy measure, to an azhda y month to commit what murder - nibud the child or to create to soul terrible sorcery and to weekly make other deeds of evil to the detriment of mankind, namely: on heats, storms, epidemics, etc. 
In - one N adtsaty, the devil marks their what - nibud zn an eye and in particular those which hardness to it on - a dozritelna. However, this zn joint stock company not always one for-we and look: sometimes this image of darlings of c and, paws of a toad, spider and, raspberries of a ky doggie, squirrel. It puts zn joint stock company and on more sk the dug parts of a body, N an aprimer, under centuries, on lips, shoulders or somewhere in other place. P to echat this is not nothing and N ym, to joint stock company zn joint stock company of ohms of a claw of a devil. To about d and vs e e t about with about in e r highway e N oh, of t oh, with about of l and with N about N and with t and in l e N and I am m of those which trained examinees, these last that - the dock the Azat the final address, is promised 

206 
to despise evkharistiyu7 and especially the Maiden M the aria, top t and t N about and m and and p about N about with and t with in I shch e N of N y e and z about r and e n and ya, k r e with t and r e l and to in and and; N and to about d and N e uch and with t in about in and t p r and with about in e r highway e N and and sacraments not to execute svyashch en N ykh ceremonies, unless roofing felt - to for fortunetelling; not pok to azyvat and hide the otno-Shen iya with a devil. In return, the devil undertakes to azyvat ok him always quick help; to execute them zhelan iya N and this light and to make them happy later with m e r ti. 

The IV head. The tricks used by a devil 
to get to itself a body 
Can ask, to and to a devil who has no mother - 
and l N about about t e l and, m about e t and m e t with N about highway e N and e? The N and e t about m about N about to answer that it sometimes borrows a human corpse or forms to itself a body in other ways. If wives shch and the N e comes f An a basin I to become pregnant from a devil (that whether there can be highway from her consent and on her - Lang Iyu), then the devil turns previously into wives shch in at (succubus) and unites from men oh, or causes in men y what - nibud voluptuous sno-vision during which abducts at it sperm and transfers it to a bosom of wives shch and N y as generates zacha-tiye. So Guazzo claims, bringing for podkreple- 
N iya the mn en iya lot of exiles i8 primechan y, zaim- 
stvovanny at a razla chn ykh Wuchang y x. 
And the nogda a devil, in the form of an inkub or the succubus, soyedi-nyatsya from men oh or from wives shch and N oh, not ok azyvayushch and - mi to it special respect and not prin osyashch by them to it the victims which he ordinary demands from sorcerers and the sorcerer y, to joint stock company it was sk an adhan about vysh e. This is just passionate lover who does not have other purpose except possession of the person whom he loves. The N and it is the mass of examples at razn ykh authors and, by the way, the story about M to an elippa Luts and and which, after that to and to long vre-mya zhi l from one wives shch and the N oh, wished N and it wives to itsyaitsya, but N of EC y the philosopher who was present at a wedding p-ru sk azat M to an elipp that he dealt with kompuzy, i.e. with the she-devil - sukkuby - and the bride immediately with groan 
unitary enterprise and l and in about m about r about to. 9 
e to t about r B about e t and at with r and with with to and z y in and e t of t and to e with l uch and y, p r about and with - 
going with one young man whom pose-shch it is scarlet throughout several months, despite densely Zac the dug doors and ok N and to omn ata, the she-devil - a bough - 

207 
cube of captivating beauty; caress and, kisses, embraces, entreaties - started up everything it and in the course to incline it to a sin, but could not defeat the virtuous young man however. 

The V head. Inkuba attack 
not only on women 
M about N about p r and in e with ti m of N about e with TV about p r and m e r about in about e N shch and N and x, 
tempted by a devil - inkuby which at first also opposed he is experienced iyu, but were inclined on his requests, tears and caress soon and; this is the mad lover, koto-rum should concede. And the nogda it happened at what means - nibud the magician whom the devil used to and to the intermediary, but quite often, however, he acted itself, to joint stock company it describes Guazzo. The devil with - edinyatsya not only from wives shch and Amy's N, but also with a mare mi; if they concede it zhelan iyu, it showers them for - boats and Amy's caress: braids a mane in braids which cannot be untwined then; but if they soprotivlya-yutsyatsya, he breaks them, awards sapy, harms them vsyache-sk and eventually kills them, to and to it the m is proved about and z to N e by N of N y in m about p y that. 

The VI head. Spirits of "folleta" which are not afraid 
spells 
Thing wonderful and nearly a N the Japanese yatn aya are inkuba, 
which N azyvat in F wounds of a tion and in And a waist and folleta-mi, and in And span AI - duendes whether also which will obey Zac to N of hotel of m, whether Zac N of An and y fear and, at at a blizheniye svyashch en N ykh objects, not vyk azyvat N and the slightest fright contrary to devils, mu-chayushch to them frenzied because to joint stock company these evil spirits are persistent whether to and to are stubborn in the unwillingness povi-to novatsya to commands Zac in N of hotel, prikazyvayushch his wasps - to tavit a body obsessed - enough, however, proiz-to bear P resvyaty Both m I And an isusa or Maidens M of the aria, or several verses the Sacred P ison iya whether to assign re-to vi and, glavn ym in the way, a particle of a tree of the Saint To the rest and whether to bring closer svyashch en N ye images that - immediately would hear to at, to and to they will begin to roar a mouth besnova-that, and to see a gnash of his teeth, nervousness, a shiver - a word, all p ri zn joint stock company and fear. The N about N and follt nothing similar has N ik joint stock company oho vliyan iye: if they and pre-krashchat the prosecutions, then only after dolgogs 

208 
\time and when that z akho tya t. To 10 It I witnessed ^лично and I will tell one improbable Real ri yu. 

The VII head. And N teresn aya history 
si N o r y Both ER about N and m y 
About twenty five years of N the Azat when I was about - 
divinity fessor in the monastery St. To the rest in P aviya, in this city zhi la highly moral zamuzhn I I wives shch in and about which all who her zn are scarlet, and, the main thing about - at once monks told only good. She was called Also eronimy; it zhi la in arrival St. M of an ikhail. Odnazh-dy this wives shch and N and kneaded bread which charged then to bake to the holder of the public furnace. It brought it finished bread and big lepesh ku very strange for-we, made of the Venetian test and zamesh An of N uyu on oil, like pie. 
It azyvatsya to take Quality Department this flat cake, saying that not 
did nothing similar. 
"The N oh - answered the holder Arn baked and - at me se-godnya, except yours, there was no other bread. Take this lepesh ku; possibly, at you bad pamya t". By B of an uducha it is convinced, kind wives shch and N and p ri N I am la flat cake and ate it with the husband, the three-year-old daughter and sluzhan which. In a trace - yushchy night when they with the husband fell asleep, it suddenly about - snutsya from a sound and, similar to silent by N ezhn y whistle which whispered to it on an ear very much vn yatn about: Whether "The B yl is tasty pie?" And spugan N aya wives shch and N and N of an achal to dawn on itself a sign of the cross and to call names I of an isus and the Maiden M and r and and. 
"N e be afraid of nothing - said a voice - I do not want to you the evil; I am ready N and everything whether highway to you pon to ravitsya; I p l e N e N of TV about e y to r and with about t about y, and m about e with and m about e about l highway about e e in l and N and e - to enjoy your embraces". At the same time she felt that who - that kissed her in shch to an ek, but is so easy and gentle, the down of the thinnest cotton wool touched joint stock company as if to it. It resisted, nothing not otve-h and I and about r and n and ch and v and I with m of N about about to r and t of N y m p about in that r e N and e m with in I - shchenny names and the Godfather zn amine iy. The temptation prodol-pressed close about half an hour, then the tempter left. Ut-rum of wives shch and N and posh la to the confessor, the person sedate and clever which supported her in belief and Convinced to continue courageous resistance, Pozo in e that in and in z and p and with t and with N e with to about l k and m and s in I t y m and r e l and to in and I am m and. 

2 0 e) 
In the next nights repeated same iskushe-n and ya, s kisses, the N ye wives of tires oh is firmly sustained. Tired with these tyagostn ymiy and long it is tested by iya, it was solved, on the advice of the dukhovna to and, about r and t and t with I to z and to l and N and t e l I am m, h that y and with p y t and t whether highway she is obsessed with a demon. Z joint stock company of a lean hotels, without having found anything what uk would azyvat N and presence of an evil ghost in Hei, consecrated the house, the bedroom, a bed and enjoined inkub-to end the harassments. N about everything it is vain! And to a sk the sheniye proceeded: the sly fellow pretended that he dies of love, p varnish is scarlet, sighed to soften the woman who, odn Acre, on favor of B ozhy, remained nepo bedimy. Then inkub unfaithfulness silt the so ti to at: it showed sya to the beauty in the form of the young man, extraordinary beauty, with golden curly hair, with a white chicken the beard casting gold, with the gray green eyes, hair similar I blossom ln and, and to add is fascinated iya, in clothes izyashchn oho the Spaniard. It did not cease pok to azyvatsya by it, at least it and find - las in society; it, to joint stock company it is done by lovers, a pla to is scarlet, sent it kisses, say, used vsevoz mozhny means prelshch en iya to achieve her UAV of a gosklonnost. She one saw and heard it, for others it remained N evidimy. But kind wives shch and on nevertheless stayed in surprising hardness; nako not c, in several months is enraged by N y inkub at run to other sort of prosecution. At first he stole at it a silver cross with sacred relics and is consecrated - a leg vo1skovogo "P the apsky Innocent person" blessed dad 
P iya V, 1 whom it always carried at itself; then 
the turn of rings and other jewelry, koto-r y e it p about hi shch and l, N e t r about and I z and m to and highway to and t at l came to and. And to about N e he began it to beat N with c cruelly, and after each it slu-tea on her face, hands and a body blow traces were visible! and Xing I to and which remained day, two and suddenly sraz\disappeared, then to joint stock company natural Xing a yak and decrease, gradually. And, at that time, to joint stock company she fed a nogd. a breast the little daughter, he removed the child at it with to a flax and put it on the very brink to rysh and or hid ku yes - nibud, but never the reasons the yawl to it N of ikaky harm. That it overturned upside down all economy, razbi-the shaft gorsh to and, plates and other ware, and a moment restored them in the previous form. One night, when she slept with the husband, inkub was her in svoyet; a usual state and strongly begged her to concede egs 

210 
, to makings; it resisted, to joint stock company always. It removed-> sya enraged, but with huge cargo the fireplace of N ykh tiles with which residents of Genoa and Liguria cover the houses returned soon. And z these kamn to it he constructed such high wall around a bed that it reached bed curtains top, and spouses would have to take lest-Nice to leave it. However, this wall was constructed without lime; destroy it or, and to amn and put in a corner where they remained throughout two days, and z and those m and with the h e z l and. 
In day of St. Stefan the husband invited to them home not - how many friends, brave military, and arranged in honor of the guests paradn y a lunch. At that time, to joint stock company on custom, before that, to joint stock company to sit down at a table, washed hands, the table, dishes, bowls, to ush An ya, all tableware from to ukhn and, all to uvsh and N y, bottles, stak An y suddenly disappeared. P to a redstavta to surprise of guests! Among them there was is-panets, to ap and the thane who exclaimed: "e be afraid of N, this delusion, but, devil take it! There was a table, and it still here. M to an inut terpene iya, and I will find it". Having told it, the man of courage walked about the room with the hands given forward, trying ashch to upat N a table. Certain guests, vi-dya that it finds nothing whether began to laugh and vysh to the hall to leave, to joint stock company suddenly heard strash-ny noise in the dining room. They returned uzn to at the reason and, having run into the dining room, saw the table forced races - koshny ware with to ush An ya mi which earlier not - the Leningrad Region. The wall had a big buffet with crystal, se-r ebr I am N y m and and z about l about you of m and gr and f and N and m and and h and highway and m and, N and p about l - nenny To anarsky, Rhine, Cretan and other wines. In kitchen there was never an abundance razlichn ykh to ush An and y in bowls and N and dishes, before N evidan N ykh. N e-which of guests fluctuated at first to try these to ush An and y, however, encouraged by more courageous whether se-at a table and were accepted to a lunch, which whether N ash pre-voskhodny. To joint stock company only they took seat before a fireplace of ohms on - to the sla of a lunch - everything disappeared at once, and the old table with dishes which were prepared by owners was; but all guests were so full that the N ikto did not want uzhi-to nat, and it proves enough that the changed dishes were real, but are not imagined. 
P the resledovaniye from an inkub proceeded already 
several months when wives shch and N and addressed 1s mo- 
Lithuania to blessed B to an ernardin F eltrsk to ohm, 2 mo- 
Which Russian cabbage soup is based in the St. Yakov's church finding - 
21 1 
sya near the city. She vowed the whole year to carry a gray cassock of Minorists to whose award prin adlezhat the UAV of wives of N y B ern ardin, in hope - to voboditsya by his protection of wasps from prosecutions of an inkub. 
Really, September 28, in Christmas Eve temple prazdn ik and St. The archangel M of an ikhail, it and put on on both that cassock and N and other day posh la in church. B ylo okol of ten hours when the big crowd of N recovered to a mass. N about only chasms yazhk and joined N and a church porch, to joint stock company suddenly her clothes fell N and the earth and disappeared as if une-with e N of N y e in e t r about m, about with t and in and in e e with about in e r highway e N of N about N and uyu. To with the h and - Stew, among crowd was two elderly people, to - tory, having taken away the incident, the hurried sn yat pla-shch and that prik to dig nakedness naschastny, and, having seated her in the carriage, saw off to the house. H concerns clothes, uk-radenny inkuby, it was returned only che-r ez to highway e with t in m e with I in c e century. 
I could tell you many another stories, even more zabavn ykh, but to all there is a limit. 
It is necessary eshch e to add that throughout many years inkub iskusheni-I persistently pursued the victim mi; but, N of joint stock company he ets, having made sure of unsuccessfulness of the efforts, he was forced to leave. 
In the case given vysh e, to and to and in many - gy about which it is necessary sometimes hear Wad Dra to at, inkub did not concern religion, but only chastity. The investigator - but if concede iskush1en iyu, then sin not bezbo- 
zhiy, but evozderzhan also I eat with N. 3 

The VIII head. People born from inkub 
Proved about theologians and philosophers that from the intercourse 
the person with a devil people are born sometimes; and mzyxwvutsrqp 
in the way, to joint stock company many scientists claim, 1 will have to 
to be born An a tikhrist (B ellarmin, With uarets, 5 M of an aluand and 
other). P ri it they notice that, on quite estestven N ym p ri chi N am, the children born from inkub obykno-are venno very high, siln y, are furious, proud and angry. 

The IX head. Inkuba are not spirits, they give rise, 
therefore, have own substance. 
Several words about giants 
However, not the N arush aya is complied also I to and m conducted to and e 
the scientist, I do not understand, to and to their opinion can vyder-reap to ri ti to at. Really, Alexander Makedon- 
''1zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC 2 
sk AI, N an aprimer who, to joint stock company we upomyan Ueli, was born about t and N to at and, y l of m and l e N to about about r about with t and. D and l e e, ho t I am l and c and, z and - chaty under these conditions, ordinary and surpass other people, but not always by perversity, but sometimes also and virtues, even highly moral, N an aprimer. Scipio Af Rick of An sk y, Augustus, the philosopher P Lawton which, according to Tit Li vi I, people of excellent qualities were Sveto-of N iya and Diogenes Laertsky. R avn ym in the way, we find in the Sacred P ison of AI (To N of B y ti I 6.4) that An y is big were rozhde-ny from sn Osh en iya sons of B of RSA with daughters of people; so of l and with I t with l about in and with in I shch e N of N about about t e to with t and. To N about e the t and in e l and to and N y y - whether people of big growth, to joint stock company is told by the prophet Varukh (3, 26), and in many respects surpassed other people. To ro-me the huge growth, they still differed in the force, indulged in robberies and were ti Amy's wounds; and these crimes of giants should be considered the first and heads - ache the flood reason, in opinion To an orneliya of Lapidsko-go ("To an ommentariya to kN a yoke of B y ti I"). N ekotory utver-zhdat that under a name of sons of B ozhy is necessary for a pony - mother of sons of Sif, and under a name of daughters cheloveche-sky - daughters To ai N and because the first were is-polnena of favor, belief and other virtues, then to joint stock company children To ai in N and differed in all opposite properties and defects; but, not N arush aya due uva-wives iya to Zlatoust, To an irill, And a lariya and to others, it is necessary prizn to at that it is in disagreement with ochevid-N y m with m y with l about t m e to with t and P and with and n and ya, t and to and to about t with about yu z and in y highways e - whether upomyan uty c were born people of enormous growth. And so, clearly that these giants were not before and if their birth was result of this connection, then not - it is admissible that it was possible to attribute it snoshe-a niya of sons of Sif with daughters To ai to N and, which, being 
obyknovenno1g6o growth, could give birth only this way and x 
children. Therefore, the union, from which 
p r about and z about highway of l and with ushch e with t in and and and N of t with to about about r about with t and, N of N about r and with - with m and t r and in and t N e to and to about y to N about in e N of N about e with N about highway e N and e m h and N y from wives shch in oh, but to joint stock company business of inkub which by the nature can easily be N azvan y sons of B of RSA. That is to about in about m of N e a N and e f and l about with about f about in - p l and t about N and to about in and F r and N of c and with to and - e about r - hectare from Venice, and it does not contradict opinion And an osifa F laviya, F Ilona Aleksandriyskogo, Yustina - the martyr, To limen that Aleksandriyskogo and Tertullian which about in about r I am t, h t about e t and and N to ub y y l and and N of e l y in about p l about t and, in p and in - shy in a voluptuousness sin. Really, to joint stock company we it 

213 
let's show further, here, under the guise of a contradiction, skry-the same thought is howled. 
Though, according to the general opinion whether in cubes and proizve-these "giants" with the help zhizn en the N oh of the energy borrowed the person, it, odn by Acre is not - vozmozhn ym, and we come to that zaklyuche-a niya again that gigan you are born not from a human seed; and consequently, inkub to bring forth offspring, uses a seed, the N oye is not borrowed the person. N about to and to about e e? 

The X head. N e all An of a gela are incorporeal 
To joint stock company the representative Ts of an erkva and to joint stock company Wuchang y, I katego- 
hairstyles darling vlya yu that inkub in the sn oshen iya from wives shch and Amy's N makes the child absolutely samostoyatel-but. Many will find this statement heretical and ma the Leningrad Region judicious, but I ask my readers not osuzhdat7 it so soon because, to joint stock company speaks 
C els: 1 "N e it is necessary to say condemnation, not races - 
smotrev it is comprehensively put iya, and also nespravedli-in to condemn mn en iye, without having weighed and without having disproved its arguments". Therefore, dock the Azat mine is necessary to me zaklyu-a cheniye, and for this purpose I have to enter some podrob-to Nosta. First, I am based N and an article of belief that there are creations purely spiritual, not having - anything materialn oho, to joint stock company it was ustanovl1e8no Lat - 
r and N with to and m with about bo r about m p r and p and p e And N of N about to e N of t and and I I I. 
These are the N ye An of a gela and the condemned N and eternal tortures devils is blessed. 
P a ravda, some scientists dock azyvat even after Cathedral that spirituality of angels and devils not of ustan Lena an article of belief, others, going further, whether an utverzhda that to joint stock company of An of a gela, and demons - teledreams; from here B onaventuro B Aron Zack of a l lyucha that there will be nothing - logical in if to attribute to angels and devils double essence: corporal and spiritual. I, osno vyvayas N and formal razjyasn en AI of Cathedral that Boi created from nothing all existing, to joint stock company spiritual, and corporal, angelic and terrestrial - claim what hardly blows prizn to at existence of some creations chis that dukhovn ymiy - to joint stock company of an ova of An of a gela vyssh their rank ov. Mno-gy theologians prizn at between gelama An so big difference that some An of a gela an essence pure spirits, therefore - the highest nature, and others - 
214 
teledreams, are not so perfect and some differ from others with the essence, corporal and incorporeal. It 
the doctrine has that advantage, 19chto reconciles reshe- 
N iya the seventh ecumenical council and mentioned earlier 
L and those r and N with to about go. 
Deystviteln oh, of N and zasedan AI of the second N of IKEA Cathedral was the N ap and a dignity of N aya against one pagan philosopher where he speaks so is shown and to N and hectare And oan to N and F essaloniky-sky: "As for to angels, arkhange-fishing and forces as which I rank both N ash and a shower and, To atolichesky the C erkov learns that it is spirits, but not with - vershenno incorporeal whether highway en as N ye bodies and invisible sous - shchestvo, to joint stock company it are approved by you, I zy chn and to and. C erkov in them prizn the ayah, N aprotiv, a body distinguished, created from air or ogn I, so to joint stock company sk an adhan about: "He made du - Hove by the An gelam and of the flaring fire on - slan N and to and"". And further: "Though they are not teledreams, to joint stock company we, i.e. are not made of four elements, but however it is impossible sk the Azat that gela An, demons and a shower and besteles-ny because they were many times invested with a body by that to whom the Lord was kind Quality Department to dig eyes". And p about with l e about go, to and to e t and to N and and y l and c e l and to about m p r about the h and t and N and before the fathers who were present at Cathedral Tarasius, the patriarch To it a camp of oozes Opole, offered t it on odob-rhenium of Cathedral in and x also I am expressed x: "And zjyasn en iye the dock azyvat the father I of an oann that can be An of a gela izobrazha-ema because their form ogran Ichang and, and they were in the form of a human f of an igura". N and that the cathedral edinodush-but answered: "Yes, Lords about". 

The XI head. About sushch estvovan AI razumn ykh beings, 
to the person and and meyushch and x I smother similar also a body 
And so, by this approval of cathedral it is established polozhe- 
the N and e about t of N about with and t e l N about those l e with N about with ti and N of e l about in, t and to and to N and to e y - sky cathedral a slope was eaten to opinion Platon Ikov, predpola-gavshy corporality of angels, and cathedral Lateran sk y, with the NAO - borot, followed the authority of Aristotle who defined in 12-oh to N a yoke in M etaf izik and consistence of spirits of incorporeal - judgment which made great success At many Wuchang y x. 20 N about to coordinate opinions of two Cathedrals, it is necessary pomn to ityit that the N ik and y tells Yeysk about a body - the number a type of angels, and Lateran sk y - about sexless. 
N azvan and e "angel" (in Latin N un tius - is sent - 
the nickname) is not designation of the nature, but whether highway sorts is- 

2 1> 
poln yaemy them f un to c and y. Many agree with it from - tsy C erk vi: St. Ambrose (letters to E BP. Chapter 1), St. And chests (About the Trinity, 5), bl. Augustine (About a hail of B ozhy, to N 15, of l. 2 3), since century. r and about r and y (B e page about E in and N of, of l. 3 4), since century. And sidor (De Sim.Bonit., 12). And z it follows, cht on - slan to N y B an ogham for ispoln en iya what - or poruche-N and I, whether it be the spirit or the person, can be N azvan An - gely; and it is valid, they carry it N azvan iye in the St. P ison of AI when it is told about preachers and vestni-to ah B of ozhy will. Alakha m I (3, 1) gives it to N azvan iye And to an oann To a restitel: "Here I send Angel Moy, and he will prepare a way predo for M I ache". H that this prophecy belongs literally to And oan N at To a restitel, the witness - stvutsya Evan by helium from ATP M eya (11, 10).21 
Even Itself And isus Christ the N azyvatsya by the Angel, so to joint stock company was sent by the Father to the world for announcement for - a game and mercies. 
Therefore, there is nothing absurd in if m y with to and e m, h t about N e to about t about r y e and N of e l y t e l e with N y, and bo the N and z in and - ny angels primen yatsya also to people, which already undoubtedly teledreams. It is necessary pomn to ityit that else nedosta-neither the essence, nor the nature of things in the world are precisely investigated whether also N elzya to deny f joint stock company of t highway because it is not investigated. 
H if there is other world, than that, koto-ry we inhabit, and in it there live other people, proizo-going not from Adam, but created by God what - or in any other manner (to joint stock company this is assumed considering lu-well lived) or what in the same world which we inhabit there are other reasonable beings, kro-me people and An of the Gaelic spirits which are ordinary invisible and do not open to people in to an acha, to joint stock company at special cases, the act their own zhelan iya or their own force? All this has no N ikaky otno-highway en iya to belief, and zn to at or not zn it is not necessary to at for rescue of soul of the person also, <to joint stock company zn to at numbers and the nature a thing to it. 
N and f ilosof iya, theology do not represent N ika-whom vozrazhen iya that there can be creations ra-zumn ye, presented with mind and body and excellent from a forehead - centuries; it vozrazhen iye if it was N and most - le, will be not what and N ym, to joint stock company inconsistency or from B of RSA (that N evozmozhn oh, because God nepogre-highway it), or from creations and things that it is also incorrect because these last are or creations 

216 
purely dukhovn ymiy, to and to gela An, or it is clean material-N ymiy, to and to inorganic mi r, and whether, N of joint stock company it ets, spirits - N about - m and t e r and and l N y m and, r ub y m and, z e m of N about - t e l e with N y m and, to and to the person. It is possible to allow existence with - also I am handed over, presented razumn ym with spirit and corporality, less rough and more distinguished, than the person. N et doubts that, after resurrection from the dead, a shower and pra-a vednik Chong in N ym will be connected to a body blissful and uton-; from what it is possible to lyuchit Zac that the B og could with - hand over a being reasonable and corporal, but with a body more tone to them, similar to a body the N ykh is blessed. 

The XII head. What these creations differ in from 
person? 

That luchsh e to define an opportunity sushchestvova-a niya of these it is created y, we disprove arguments which m about N about p r and in e with t and p r about t and in N and highway e about z and to l yu h e n and ya, i au tv e ti m on questions which can am be offered N. 
P ervy question. Whether these creations of N razumn ymiy, and, in an affirmative case, than they otli- and yu by t with I about t of the h e in l about in e can azyvatsya h to and? 
The N and it can answer that these beings have ra-a zoom and carnal body y, to and to and the person; however they from - lichatsya from him not only more distinguished priro-by that, but also thinner matter. Really, a forehead - the century is created, to and to it approves P ison iye, from by GRU - by parts of elements, then to and to these beings, on the contrary, are created from the cleanest parts of elements: some - from the earth, others - from water, the third - from air, couples - verty - from ogn I. 
The second question. To oh an era should carry to joint stock company about - an iskhozhdeniye of these creations: whether there are they from fellow countrymen - whether or waters, to and to zhivotn ye, quadrupeds, birds, etc. and whether, N aprotiv, are created, to joint stock company of people, B about - gy? 
The N and it can razjyasn be ityit that the B og, at means of angels, created their body also, to joint stock company and a human body, having attached to it immortal a shower at. Deystvitel-but since this body by the nature is more noble, than a body of others zhi votn ykh, and it befitted to it at - to connect incorporeal and noble spirit. 
The third question. Whether P roiskhodit these creations from odes - a leg of a being, to and to all people from Adam and whether, on the contrary, them a little at the same time was created, and to a being - 

2 1 7 
yut they to and to razlichn ye the creatures which arose and z lands and waters? 
Here what is possible for N and it to answer: it is possible that all of them come from one being, to and to people - from Adam. Notice also that they will be born and die that they share N and males and females that they have, to joint stock company people, feelings and passions that their body eats and develops. N oh, in any case, them p and shch but it should not be so rough, to and to p and shch and, demanded human those is scrap, but Pitana iye has to be gentle and air. 
N of joint stock company it ets, it and probably live society; at N them can be razlichn ye conditions of advantages and pervenst-va; it is possible that they Zahn imatsya by arts and nau-to Amy, Zahn imat positions, contain army, build the cities and, N of joint stock company it ets, do everything that is necessary, for them about hr and N e to N and I. 

The XIII head. Form and organization of bodies of inkub 
and succubuses. Comparison with formation of wine 
H etverty question. And whether these beings vnesh-met 
nost of the person or what - nibud another? Whether P an ostoyanny form and x bodies, to and to at zhi votn ykh, and whether only slu-tea of N aya, like a cloud or zhi recreation center and m to substances, on - an example, to oil, water and so forth? Whether their organism is made, it is similar human, and z razl chn ykh substances: bones, muscles and so forth? 
And these questions I can answer N that it is difficult to define a shape of their body because the structure it not podda-etsyatsya to control of N ash and x feelings, being too uton-Chen N ym for f izichesky ours zren iya and osya Zahn iya. M ozhno, odn Acre to assume that their appearance on - the dobna human, but is more perfect than it because sous - these shchestvo less materialn y and, therefore, nakho-ditsya by N and the highest extent of evolution. H concerns to essential parts of their bodies, it is necessary that they were elastic and less than a N ezhn ymiy, answering trebo-to a vaniye of organic action. Concerning doubt in chrezvychayn oh refinement of their bodies, I will tell that the hardness of parts their body of a-ism will not be unconditional not only concerning other, more distinguished parts that it is possible to observe in all zhi recreation center and x bodies, to and to on - an example: wine, oil, milk, etc., the distinction as a part of structure can be revealed only by means of chemical An of Ali for. 

2 1 8 
Thus, if we apply this natural rule and we will assume distinguished corporality their shouting - gan a-ism, An alogichn uyu zhidk to awns, then will not remain me-to hundred for what assumption - or razn itsa, i.e. dock - a zatelstvo against their existence because, to joint stock company we spoke, the heterogeneity of particles of wine and their case - ny ratios does not harm any essential order of parts that is possible sk the Azat and rather distinguished body of N ash and x beings. 

The XIV head. Whether P these beings are outcast 
to diseases, mutilation and death? Whether they will be born in 
original sin? Whether they are expiated by Jesus 
Christ for pleasure or on them gravitates 
bloody hell? 

P I you y question. Whether P these beings bolez-nyam and to mutilations, like people are outcast? Whether they are tired from ra-boats whether they need for recuperation a dream, food and drink? To akovo their food? Whether P they are outcast death and whether they can be killed accidentally or action of other beings? 
And it is possible for N sk the Azat that to joint stock company are refined there were their bodies, all of them - materialn y, are subject to decay and, therefore, can suffer from harmful forces and to be patients, i.e. their bodies can refuse to work, or will execute Lish hardly and neso-vershenno the f un to c and and that all is a consequence - which diseases. Really, so to joint stock company matter of their body not so plotn and, to and to a human body because not soder-zhit smesh An of N ykh together elements, they do not suffer so easily from harmful forces less person podverzhe-ny to diseases why zhi zn is more long than them because, the being is more perfect in own way, the dol-she it lives, the certificate of what is the person, zhizn which longer, than other beings. I not at - know century zhi zn crows, deer and some Wad Dra - gy zhi votn ykh about which P lean y tells us fables and that before its works though they also were it is published y, but the N ikto did not take the trouble to check them. From here it is necessary to remove it is concluded iye that beings about whom we speak surpass the person by durability. 
To joint stock company we it will show N the Izh, they being more noble chelove-, therefore, are subject to others of a body - to ny feelings, they need rest and pishch e. That 
concerns their prudence and education, they can be and are ignorant if their mind was not developed uche-by N and e in m and N and with t and in l e in N and e in m. In about shch e m, about N and, in e r about I the t of N oh, bo its l is expert, than the person, so to joint stock company their body is more refined - but, the mind is more active, and zhi zn is more long that helps them uzn to at more, than to people. Are that at - 
chi N y, uk adhan of N y e bl. Avgu2stinom (D ivin. D aem. page 3 and 
De Spir. et An im a, page 37). 2 
They can probably suffer from stikhiyn ykh forces, but can be hardly killed, possessing astral zre-niy and speed of movement. And x it is probably possible to mutilate during sleep or at the time of an oversight by means of a solid body, N an aprimer, highway p Aga that can the reasons ityit them a mutilation and even death, so to joint stock company of a shower who is indivisible several parts of one organic body which are not able to recover. 
Highway esty question. Whether their bodies can put on other weight, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, a tree, metal, glass, etc.? Mo - whether they zhi t in a large number in one place (ma-t e r and and l N about m), and N and to and to about e p r about with t r and N with t in about r and with p r about with t r and N I e t - sya gutnut their body? 
P about this occasion it is possible sk the Azat that all bodies, to joint stock company oh p l about t and about N and N e y l and, and m e yu t p about r y, h e r e z to about t about r y e others, more tone to iye bodies can enter their N, at least this time was impenetrable for liquid, gases and to that similar bodies. If several angels can live in one space, very limited, 
though 3 not indefinitely as, it proves 
With to Ott, 2 it would be reckless to attribute same spo- 
sobnost to bodies of beings about which it is. And x bodies have defined is lingering iye, are impenetrable one for another and if two angelic bodies cannot on - be gone at the same time by N and the same place, then and N ge in m l about e in t, p r and e in l and n and i, v with e in l and t with I to the h e in l about in e to and, to and to some scientists claim, but it cannot do sde-lat of a being, possessing though distinguished, but all e to m and t e r and and l in N y by t m e l about m. 
The seventh question. Whether R these beings in pervo-a native sin oditsya whether they were expiated by Christ Redeemer and whether can count N and beyond the grave zhizn? 
The article of belief claims that Christ released du - highway and all razumn ykh creations. Other doctrine says that the pleasure is granted to reasonable creation when it becomes it adequately. These merits consist in perfect keeping the commandments of B of an ozha and x. 
220 
Whether R these beings in an original sin, we not zn by Ai, but zn aya oditsya that God of N of an ikogd does not leave reason - Nov a being while it lives, without means to isprav-laziness, we can assume that Christ's mission concerned also them. 
Further, it is necessary to assume that they will obey - kim-nibud to the established B an ogham Zac it am, soblyude-ny which can beatify them. 

The XV head. Dock of an azatelstvo sushch estvovan iya 
and N to ub about in and with uk to ub about in 
P Lawton ("Socrates's Demon") and P lutarkh ("And zida and 
Osiris") 24, consider that they prin adlezhat to the category of the animals with the subordinated spirit endowed with reason with bodies vozdush N ymiy, and name these beings of "demons" which in itself has no anything oskor-bitelny, so to joint stock company means - full of wisdom; kog-these authors say about a fallen angel yes, i.e. dyavo-le, they N azyvat it not the demon, but "какодемон"; concerning a kind angel use it is expressed iye "эудемон". As for the St. P ison iya and fathers of C of an erkva, they also mention these beings, to joint stock company we it will show N and. 
Now, when we established an opportunity sushchest-a vovaniye of these is created y, we will go further and we will prove dey-a stvitelnost of their existence. Having established sn achat reliability of stories which concern the intercourses of inkub and succubuses with people and zhivotn ymiy, stories so numerous that would be impudence from - to vergat them, to joint stock company speaks bl. Augustine, the certificate to - tory was provided vysh e, and having defined it, we mo-zhy Zac to lyuchit that where there is a suffering, there has to be also a feeling because action and process - it only his N aruzhn ye is shown iya. And so, at inkub and succubuses actions, processes, passions are observed, is-going out of feelings - zn achit, they possess feeling; but feelings cannot be shown without complex bodies, without connection of souls and and bodies; zn achit, they 2 have a body 
also I smother and consequently, it - zhi in ton y e 5; them deyst- 
the Viy are consecutive, zn achit their shower and razumn and; and so, it razumn ye zhivotn ye. The N ash and the second parcel of dock - zyvatsya easily by An alizy: the passion demanding a raft - sky sn oshen y, is feeling; chagrin, grief, anger, frenzy owing to Quality Department of an az in sn oshen iya - also 

22 1 
essence of passion, feeling; origin through the intercourse obviously process of feelings. And all this is observed at inkubo to joint stock company we it is dock of an azalea you are highways e; they covet wives shch and and men and if receive Quality Department of az, happen ogorchen, fall into frenzy, to joint stock company lyubovn ik. They a prekra <but execute sn Osh en iya and in engender an ogd. Itakh it is necessary to lyuchit Zac that they are allocated with feelings and, a trace. in and t e l N oh, and m e yu t t e l oh, i.e. about n and zh and v about t of N y e with about in e r highway e N of N p Further, they pron hiccup to houses even at Zack of the faces dug дв^ and ok N ah, so distinguished their body. They know predict future, they reconcile and embroil; it in (the actions representing properties of reasonable soul therefore they possess razumn oh soul. 
P about this occasion the scientists ordinary speak, cht these vicious actions - affairs of an evil ghost, and to it one mu attribute passions, love, chagrin at an otka ze in sn Osh en iya, N of windows ets - falling of souls and into a sin. The N about will be objected by us, is in to the uba choosing predmeto-the passion of horses and whether others zhi votn ykh, and esl they akhodit not N in N of their humility of the passion, t. the reasons yat to them harm and therefore elzya to approve N, 4i the demon pretends to be zhelayushch and m sn oshen y that whether p op to beat with highway a shower at, so to joint stock company of souls and an animal not of subbeliefs the use a lyatiya gatsya eternal. Besides love and the gneena antipolos make at N of their action absolutely" ny. If wives shch and N and or the animal obeys them at ho to t and, t about and N to at y about r and shch and yu t with I with n and m and p r e to r and with N about; and N and a turn - it is very rough at resistance. And so, INK \would be had by N and the business of passion, feeling. To rum of that the evil spirits dealing with the sorcerer of a yama are also obsessed mi, force them to idolize itself, to oshch un stvovav to make deeds of evil and uzhasn ye is broken iya. INK> would not demand anything similar: it is not angry dukhl to banish the demon to force him shiver and to tremble, enough, to joint stock company Guazzo, names I of an isus or the Maiden M of the aria, the Godfather zn writes amine and I, pribl of wives and I Saints relik the Viy or osvyashch en to N ykh a subject! z and to l and N and n and y, z and to l I am t and y and whether p about velen and I with in I shch e the N of N and to and it can see daily N and frenzied, and Guatsp' gives many examples, the N ykh from history of night gatherings the sorcerer y where, at the Godfather zn amine is borrowed and! one of attendees and 6 at name I of an isus, an ischa. < 
whether all demons and to about ldun i 2. And N cubes, I will subject 
ty similar and the joint venture ytan and I am m, do not run, do not show HI when N and to joint stock company oho of fear, sometimes even meet Zac Lp 


222 
I am An and I am a N asmesh to Amy and tear clothes svya shch en N and to ov. Ltak, it is clear that in cubes not evil spirits, not kind ange-dy; it is also clear that it is not people, though are presented ra-with a zoom. H the same they it? If to assume that it is pure spirits, then they would be or use of la you, or UAVS-yasenna because, on divinity, there are no pure spirits of N and a way to pleasure. P la's fate ty, they feeling - would bring down otvrashch en iye to a name and a cross And Christ's isusa; blissful, whether they sk bosoms I the person to a sin. Means, they something another, than pure spirits, and trace t e l N oh, and m e yu t t e l about and with t of t of N about I and p ut and to l and e N with t in at. The m and - terialny joint stock company ti vn aya force cannot work in to an acha as soon as on so uyu material and stradatel-ny; purely material cannot work on chi-hundred spiritual. There are natural forces which can work against inkub; from this it follows that these inkuba materialn y or teledreams. N ash and a parcel to - a cauldron and Dioskorid's certificates whether P N and I, Aristo-of a tel, Apuley is also approved and zn by An and I eat; we have not - how many herbs, to am N to it and zhi votn ykh beings who are valid a run yat of demons, to joint stock company of an ova: a rue, zvero-fight, a verbena, darling chi y garlic, to a bream evin and, zolototysyach-N and to, br and l of l and and N of t, to about r and l l, a cher of N y y I am a N that r, I highway of m and, to about and from the head of a wolf or a donkey and hundreds of other things; it is allowed to the one who is exposed to N apaden to iya of the demon to have such objects, but not to resort to magic. From this it follows that to am N and and herbs can the are natural - mi properties to bridle efforts of the demon. P to a rezhda tser-the kovny charter did not allow to use them and zapreshch is scarlet as superstition. lestya shch and y an example of it we find B in the St. P ison of AI where the angel P af ait speaks to Tobit (6, 8) about fish which that hooked in the Tiger: "If you throw 
on coals ch7astitsu her liver, smoke will force to disappear 
Demon" 2. Experience the dock azat the truth of these words because 
the liver of fish did not burn down yet, to joint stock company inkub, the lover 
in
  To Sarr, disappeared and sk rummaged not to return any more - 
28 
The N and theologians ordinary object that este- 
with t in e N of N y e with and l y p r about about N I yu t and N to at and, N about t about l to about in N and h and l e, 
and
  that full action has to be from sverkhjestestven- 
ache strength of B of RSA or an angel and m in the way that sverkh- 
e
with t e with t in e N of N and I with and l and and e with t p e r in and I p r and ch and n and, p r I am m and I and 
hl and in N and I, and e with t e with t in e N of N and I with and l and t about l to about in t about r about with t e p e N of N and I, 
Kt osvenny and subrank en N aya. To explain, to joint stock company smoke 
° a liver of the fish burned by Tobit could force be- 

21 i 
to reap an inkub, Valezi y 29 assumes that this smoke receive i from B of RSA supernatural force progn to at in a cube that>, to joint stock company of mother aln y fire of hell is valid m teach demons and a shower and p fate of la ty. To JSC Liran j mustache, To orn unction, dock azyvat others that smoke from a liver of fish of the ave. drove the demon vn to an achala by natural force, okonchateln he was removed with force angelic and heavenly, and et the opinion is shared by all authors who whether rassul give about a way Zac N of An and I besov30. 
However, to in to uba, to and to we sk an azalea, it not to a mozha to be primen en about: they do not besiege a body, not nasylak diseases, their rage ogran ichivatsya by blows and durny--, manner with N epok orn ymiy. 

The XVI head. Story about an inkuba and young 
to the nun. Story about the deacon 
P ervy of these stories I borrowed at an ispova.4 
N and to and Maun Aachen, the person sedate also deserve. * go trust; I witnessed the second. 
In one wives the sky monastery zhi la, as a pas> sionerka, whether the young maiden noble f Amy and. Oi was the claim ush an ayema inkuby which I vlya lsya to it in the afternoon, • 
N about the h yu with N e about t with t unitary enterprise of N y m and p r about with and m and, to and to with and m y y with t r and with 1 
the ny lover, incessantly inducing it to a sin 
She, odn Acre, opposed, on favor of B an ozhiya, and ost • it vatsya firm in the resistance. N about without watching her piety, fasting, vows, despite zaklin n and ya, b l and about with l about in e n and ya, p about in e l e N and I z and to l and N and t e l e y and N to uo. to azatsya by Quality Department from the prosecutions, contrary to mnozhest!>, relics and others svya shch en N ykh objects, are built. in komn to an ata young devush to and, inkub I did not cease to flow under the guise of very beautiful young the person. The N of joint stock company he ets, between Wuchang ymiy, arguing about et <m a case, N ash was eaten one theologian who, observing • the tempted maiden and having swept up i that it possesses krl. not f legmatichn ym temperament, guessed that e inkub has to be vodyan ym spirit (exist, stvitelno, according to Guazzo, in cubes: fire '1 ny, vozdush N ye, zemn ye, underground, enemies dn I)> i p ri to azat, that whether in to omn to an ata young devush to and proizv okurivan iye the ferry. P Rihn if a new copper from hl' N y, put un a tion aromatic to An of N y, highway tsu there, a kubela, aristolokhiya roots, cardamom and, is large also small ginger, long pepper, a carnation, reproach • 

'24 
muscat color, nutmeg, rosny an incense and, benzoya, an aloe tree also mixed all this with three butyl-of Kami of the semi-peeled vodka. Then put a copper in hot ashes that went ok urivayushch y steam, and a lump - whether Nata densely Zac Ry. Fumigating forced to be an inkub who, odn Acre, N and this time did not sweep away got - chick-pea in to omn to at a, and only when the maiden left in a garden or highway of la to the monastery, he immediately I vlya lsya to her, wasps - tavayas for other N evidimy, embraced her, kissed why she very much suffered. P a donkey new soveshchan iya, our theologian p ri to azat to the maiden to carry at himself malen-Kia to highway ata to and from and x aromas, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, a muscat, ambergris, the Peruvian balm and others. SBI - ruzhen N aya and m in the way, it left in a garden, and immediately p about I in l I am l with I and N to ub. About z l about l e N of N y y and r about z N y y, about N of N e with m e l more to approach her and, the N of joint stock company it ets, disappeared that bo-l of her N e in about z in r and shch and t with I. 
The second case occurred in P Abijah and, in to artezian - the sky monastery where zhi l diak it, by the name of Augustine who was exposed razlichn ym to oppressions about hundred - r about N y with uk to ub and. e with to about l to about z and to l and N and t e l e y t shch e t of N about p y t and - foxes it to release N; all means were left without success. In and to and r and y m about N and with t y r I p r and highway e l to about m of N e p about with about in e t about in and t with I. Whether seeing invalidity ordinary Zac of N of An both y and vspomnya vysh epriveden N y an example, I advised an eye - a rivaniye blagovon iya, like about what there was a speech, and p ri to azat the deacon at to carry on itself to highway ata to and, on - dushenny the same blagoukhan iya; and so to joint stock company he upot-reblyal tobacco and very much loved vodka, I to it recomen-allowed to use tobacco and vodka with a musk smell. The succubus to it I vlya lsya in razl chn ykh types: a skeleton, a pig, a donkey, a bird, sometimes prin imat what look - nibud Maun Akha of it of Maun Astyrya. Once he even prin the yawl shape of the abbot also convinced diak it and to clean with - a message, to be entrusted to B of regional public institution and to confess secrets oh, the other Tat with it psalms, E xsurgat D eus and Qui habitat and 
Evan3geliye from And oan N and; at words "Verbum caro factum 
est" 1 it bent a knee, and then, having grabbed epitra- 
Gil and aspergillum with holy water, the prior blessed a cell and a bed, to joint stock company of N astoyashch y, having enjoined not to disturb the demon di of joint stock company it from now on and. P a donkey of it he suddenly disappeared, having found these the deception. N e vz of paradise of N and to an eye - a rivaniye which I advised the succubus nevertheless not pre-kratit the prosecutions and once even prin the yawl a type of the victim and was to Vick the aria at whom on - 


8-3400	2 2 5 
asked vodka and tobacco with muskatn ym zap akhy. P oluch that and another, it instantly disappeared, pok elements so to them obrg 
zy Vick the aria that he was deceived by the succubus what •., then it is certified also the deacon of ohms which klyatvenn, 
assured that not b2yl in a cell vi to Arie I. Then I conclude • 
that this and the N to ub3 was not vodyan ym, to joint stock company inkub, vlyublt, 
ny in the young girl, and fiery or air and therefore enjoys warm blagoukhan iya. Tev a perament of young di of joint stock company it and, angry and sangvinich <skiya, only strengthened my suspicions because lp inkuba of N of an ikogd do not pursue people, temperamen> which is similar to their own (new dock of azatelstvo of mine mn en iya about their corporality). I advised in and to and r to give t diak it at a grass, cold by the nature, i: to uvsh and N to and, pechen ochn ik, the euphorbia, is wild y ches NOC, a plantain, a henbane, etc., having made of N them dr bunch i one of which to hang up at ok N and, and another at a door. To omn an ata, a floor and a bed I advised the settlement a stalemate these herbs. And, countries of N aya thing! the succubus was, but remained behind a threshold, without daring to enter and when the deacon asked it about the reasons e such unusual modesty of t oh, in m e with t about about t in e t and, with uk to ub r and z r and z and l with I p r about to l I am t and I am m and and 
I scolded exchanges, advised it sre3dstvo zashch ita 
Then it disappeared not p about I vlya lsya 3 any more. Ate these two * 
tea clearly determine removal of an inkub and the succubus roofing felt to natural by force of herbs or fragrances, without all of whom influence of divine force. And so, N and ink\b influence the known properties materialn ykh предм^ t, and, therefore, they comprise this sushch N about with t. About t with yu yes N and d about z and to l yu h and t, h t about about N and and m e yu t t e l oh, that we also wanted dock the Azat. 

The XVII head. And a zgnaniye of the inkub disturbing 
To Sarr; old Tobit's treatment 
Better to prove by N ash e it is concluded iye, follows 
to mention delusion of some scientists, press measures, Valeziya and To orn unction of Paws and dsk ogo34, utverzhdav their highway that Sarr it was exempted from an inkub by force are the khan of a gel P af ai la, but not a liver of fish which Tovig hooked at coast of the Tiger. 
The N e arush aya due is complied by N iya to so them to mail!' ny Wuchang ym, it is necessary prizn to at a similar explanation sch vershenno protivn ym to meaning of the text from which but it is necessary to move away. Here words of an angel to Tobit: "If to 

226 
go the demon or an evil ghost torments, heart and a liver has to smoke before and m the man or wives shch and - I ache, and more will not suffer any more; and bile poma-z and t h e l about in e to and, to about t about r y y and m e e t e l m and the N and of l and z and x, and about N will recover" (To N of Tobit 6, 8-9). 
The words of An of a gel belong to properties of heart, liver and bile of fish and carry certainly the general harak rubbed, on - to the fact what he does not tell to Tobit that it will remove the demon. If it sk azat it, I prizn am scarlet together with kommen Tatars that P af ait everything made the sob-by stvenny supernatural force and that actions dy-ma and bile were not able to make it. 
Can ask whether sk the angel azat an honest truth about force of things or he could deceive and whether cured old Tobit's eyes fish bile or force arkhan get Rafa - silt? With to the Azat that the angel could deceive, N elzya, so to joint stock company the demon was and zgn An smoke pechen and, without means of supernatural force. 
In r and h, to about t about r y y go in about r and t, ch t about t and to and I am t about t r and in and and with c e l I e t absolutely pleurisy or epilepsy, would lie without with - opinions if this grass did not cure a disease, and for full healing it was necessary to add still other grass. 
P ereydy now to old Tobit. elmo it would be removed from his eyes, and his blindness passed from the natural force of bile of fish, N azyvayemy in And a waist and bocca in capo possessing according to medicine y, bile, from - l e h and in and yu shch e y e l m and; with e t and m with about hl and with N y D and about with to about r and d, and l and - en, whether P N and y, Aklan ius, Valezy, etc. The Greek text of Tobit (11, 13) says the following: "It N reddened bile in eyes of the father, saying: "Trust, my father" and when 
nachalos3 5 vytravlivan iye, he to it wiped eyes and removed 
cataract". So to and to, according to the same text, an angel from - 
covered to Tobit force of a liver and bile of fish and cured sle-to old Tobit's sweat, it is necessary to lyuchit Zac that and m in the way by the natural force and smoke from a liver banished the succubus, and it is certified by the Greek text of book of Tobit, Chapter 8, Article 2: "It took ashes or heat, hollow Veins there heart and a liver of fish and when smoke, the demon went, being not able to transfer zap an akh, is-chez". H concerns the Jewish text, there sk an adhan about: "Asmodey felt a smell and escaped". From here hardly - Blows that the demon escaped, having felt smoke which was harmful to it, and not from action sverkhjestest-the wine strength of an angel at all. And if in this liberation of SAR - 

8*zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA	Til 
ry from prosecution of the succubus Asmodey action smoke:! from a liver was also followed by mediation P af ait that for this purpose only to chain an inkub in the desert the Top E gipt, to and to it sk an adhan about in to N of Tobit (Chapter 8, Article 3). Here we can coordinate N ash e opinion with on - m e shch e N of N y m in y highway e z and to l yu h e N and e m uch e N y x, to about t about r y e p r and pisyvat this miraculous escape of Sara to action of Ra-f an aila. P about and x mn en iyu, Sarr it would not be absolutely released if inkub not was prikovanzyxwvutsrqpon in are empty 
not, and it we allow, but are actually released *. both zgn An and e the demon and z spaln and Sar3ry - was direct, 
natural action of a liver r y y 6. 

The XVIII head. Saint Anthony meets in the desert 
Faun. Their conversation 

The third and glavn ym the proof of ours zaklyu-Chen Iya about existence of these creations and about corporality of inkub serves the certificate as St. And eronima. 
• Sacred An tone y - this scientist tells - 
went odn azhda to the Saint P to an avl. 
P a donkey of N of eskolky days of traveling he met Ken the Tauri whom he asked where he lives otsh eln ik, N and that that. having murmured several rough words, showed it ru-which road and ran away into the forest. P roydya it is a little, St. Anto of niya met, N and this time, the little person, almost to Arly to and, about the claim rivlen N ymiy Amy's hands, with horns of N and a forehead. which body ok An chivatsya by legs to an ozl. P ri a look his St. Anthony stopped and, being afraid of intrigues of a devil, about with e N and l with ebya to r e with t of N y m z N and m e N and e m of N about m and l e N to and y h e l about - a century, without thinking to run and even without having been frightened, almost - telno approached the Saint aged man and offered it fruits p Alma, to and to testifying the peacefulness in y e N and m e r e N and I. 
Then St. Anthony asked, to that he so oh. "I smer-ton y - that answered - one and z inhabitants of the desert whom the paganism in the delusion awards razl chn ykh names: f arieses, satir, inkub; I am sent with an assignment from my people - herd; we ask you to pray for N the expert of B of regional public institution, To otory descended for the UAV! l zyxwvu 
the whole world and glorification To otory sounds on all earth". 
Having heard such respectful attitude towards Christ, St. An tone y, full of joy, jio turned on-4 
to board to Alexandria and, striking with a stick with zeml. 

228 
vosklikn st.: "1'ore to a teya, razvratn y the city which adores zhivotn ykh, to joint stock company of gods". 
T and to about in r and with with to and z with in I t about about t An about N and I. To doubt truthfulness of this story when it 
zasvidetelstvov7ana it is big them in scientific C of an erkva, 
since century. And e r about N and m about m 3, and in t about r and t e t to about t about r about go N and to about d and N e about with p and - 
it rivatsya by any Catholic, it would be impudent. 
Let's consider details of this story and we will solve, - to them in the way it confirms to N ash e opinion. 
First, it is necessary to notice that if what - or svya-that the subject and was exposed to intrigues of a devil, in zamys-ly which it got and gained a victory over it - 
that of course, it was St. Anthony, 38k the joint stock company approves him 
the life written to St. Af of An asiy. And so, St. Anthony 
not prizn it is scarlet the demon in this little person, but at - nyal him for an animal, saying: "A grief to you razvratn y go-the sort adoring zhivotn ykh to joint stock company of gods". From here vyte-kat that it was no demon or spirit, and zgn An of N y from the sky and use lyaty, but what - that animal. Saint Anthony, on - stavly the monks and warning them against on - mereniye of a devil, speaks, to joint stock company it is mentioned in the breviary (celebration to St. Anthony): "Believe me, brothers that the Satan is afraid of pious people, and also prayers, fastings, voluntary poverty, mercy, smire-N and I; but most of all - passionate love to Christ, N of Ashe - mu Christ Redeemer, and therefore to turn a Satan into run - a stvo, rather sacred cross". 
And raspberries the ky person when St. Anthony thought from him zashch to ititsya by a sign of the cross, not vyk azat - what fear and did not think to run; on the contrary, it at - approached the Saint aged man with a trustful look and poch-titelno offered it f and n and k and. Here the proof that it was not the devil. 
Secondly, it is necessary to notice that this of raspberries of kiya a forehead - the century sk azat: "I mortal" - from where follow that it was an animal - death object which was on light by means of is engendered iya; the spirit non-material - is immortal because it does not receive zhi zn posredst-vy origin, but through creation by the nature of a prereal stvovaniye and therefore it, does not lose zhi zn and through a plant louse - ny, differently through death, and the being can cease - in and t h e r e z un and h t about e N and e T in about r c about m. And t and to, with to and z and in, h t about about N mortal, he explained that it - an animal. 
Thirdly, raspberries the ky person sk azat that to him izve-stno about suffering of B of RSA in a human body. These words 

229 
prove that it - an animal reasonable. Animals no what is known over the felt present and not mo-gutnut to have N and to joint stock company oho of idea of Aage's B. If raspberries k y the person sk azat this that it and to it similar zna-yut about stradan iya of B of RSA in a human body, then, trace telno thanks to what - nibud to a revelation, they and m e yu t p about N I am t and e about B about e t and to e, to and to both m y and m e e m about t to r y - a thuja to us belief. Z amechan iye that the B og was embodied in a forehead - centuries and suffered, confirms two glavn ykh members of N of our belief: whether about existence of Uniform B of RSA in three tsakhets and about the embodiment, suffering and revival. All this shows, to joint stock company I already said that it was the reasonable being ready to a divine pozn of An iyu in the way from - a kroveniye and allocated, to joint stock company and we, razumn ym, bessmer-tny spirit. 
Fourthly, on behalf of all the people which were sent it asked St. Anthony to pray for them to general B of regional public institution. From here I take out that this of raspberries the ky person was ready both to pleasure, and to the 39th damnation, and 
that it was not "in term in o", but "in via""; if it was 
razumn ym the being allocated with immortal soul to joint stock company I proved vysh e, the logician and recognizes also that he is ready to pleasure and to a damnation - it is property ra-zumny it is created iya, an angel or the person. He was a N and pu-ti (in via), i.e. the N and feats and N and acts, so is ready to joint stock company if it was in term in o, then it would be already or is blessed, or is damned, but it was not either that, or another because prayers of St. Anthony to whom it obra-titsya could not ok the Azat to it N and to joint stock company oh of the help if it was finally use lit; and if it was already in pleasure, then would not have in N of their need. P from - mu-that he also addressed St. Anthony's prayers that they could help, therefore, he was a N and ways to an UAV-zhenstvo of "in statu viae et m er it i" 40. 
Fifthly, this of raspberries k y the person words - "I on - slan the herd - the people with an assignment", declare myself the envoy of other creations of a similar sort. From here we can take several investigations: this of raspberries the ky person was not the only thing, i.e. to joint stock company and m - or an exclusive miracle, but them existed not - how many one akovy connected together, they are structure - lyal the people (herd), and it I vlya lsya on behalf of all. Z aty, these creations live society because send one for all, to joint stock company of the representative. N of joint stock company he ets, upholstered in the desert, they not were there is attached y by N and constant 

230 
time. Saint Anthony had no case to visit this lonely place which was znachitel-prior to this meeting but is removed from its cell, and they in the desert could not uzn at - who is he was, to joint stock company oh of sanctity degree it towered; it is necessary that they it uzn Ali somewhere in other place and consequently, they were also in N e e that y p at to t y N and. 
Sixthly, raspberries the ky person sk azat this that he a being from those which I zy chn both to and in the blind person for - bluzhdeniya of N azyvat f avn Amy, satires and in cubes that proves quite truthfulness of our main thesis i.e. that a creation inkuba razumn ye, able either to reach pleasure or to be use of la ty. 
P the oyavleniye of raspberries of ky people such happens to - is free often in rudn ik ah, to joint stock company tells Agriko-of la about it in the to N a yoke "De Animal, su bt err." 41. They are displays - also those are howled to children dressed in the same dress, to joint stock company; they play, highway utya t, laugh, amused, throw - tyam in a game to am esh to and, and it is good zn joint stock company, speaks you are a sheupomyanuty author - it is possible to be sure that Quality Department will be dug what - N ibud rich zhi la. 
Where do these live raspberries ky people, these inkuba? And I will answer N: according to Guazzo, some of them zemn ye, Wad Dra - gy - water, the third - vozdushn ye, the fourth - og-nenny, i.e. their bodies consist of the N ezhn ykh parts of one of these elements, and they live either in water, or in the earth, or in air, depending on the nature. Whether and x zhi shch and, therefore, are in that from ale - cops which mainly is a part of their t e l and; about of N e N of N y e and N to ub y, N and p r and m e r, n and k about d and N e and in ut in water or in the bog which are opposite to them and water cannot rise to upper air, so to joint stock company this area is too refined for them priro-dy. Same most it is observed also at people who, privykn uv to the condensed air, cannot zhi t at tops of the Alps where air slish a lump is refined for their N. 
Moline provides several certificates St. Fathers who can confirm us corporality of demons. And meya the resolution of Lateran Cathedral about incorporeal st of angels, we have to understand that St. Fathers meant demons - inkub which on the way to rescue, but not use of angels lyaty already. However, without going further, we will be limited to the reference on bl. Augustine, this great scientist Ts erk vi, we will also see, to joint stock company oh of degree his opinion meets with N ash and m of B of l. Augustine 

23 i 
speaks about a being of demons in the kommen tariya sle-blowing (to N 2, Chapter 17): "They know some truth or because their feelings are more alive or because their bodies utonchenny", and further, in to N. Z, Chapter 1: "Demons are beings vozdushn ye because they have similarity by the nature with vozdush N ymiy bodies". In the of the 115th ambassador - Scientific Research Institute K evreyam he says: "These air or f irny beings possess very much tone of feeling to them - mi". In "Ozhy" (to N.11, Chapter 23) he says about a hail of B: "The demon has an air body". In to N a yoke 21, Chapter 10 of the same composition p and highway et: "N ekotory demons have a body, to joint stock company philosophers, from dense and damp air which we dy highway and m think". In to N 15, Chapter 23: "N elzya re-highway and t whether can gela An, supplied vozdushn ym those is scrap, to feel passion which pushes them to wives - shch and N am". In the to ommen tariya to the 85th psalm it poucha-et: "Bodies the N ykh after revival is blessed will are similar to bodies of angels", and in primechan to AI to a psalm 14 dobavlya-et: "Bodies of angels more materialn y, than shower and". 

The XIX head. Still proof of corporality of inkub. M anna Jews or bread of angels 
The N ash e opinion can be confirmed moreover 
still the following certificates St. P and a dignity and I, to joint stock company was razlichn about it is interpreted iye which Tatars give them kommen. In a psalm 78, Articles 24 and 25, sk an adhan about: "Also odozhdit them in pishch at Mang N at and bread heavenly gave of An Bread Gaelic the person ate; It sent them p and shch at to satiety". David speaks about Mang to N here e with which he fed - sya izrailsk y the people all the time, p ok and wandered in the desert. About Mang of N e sk an adhan oh, to joint stock company about bread of angels. To rum Mang N y, An of a gela delivered to Jews pillars from a cloud and fire, quails, water from the rock, and the St. P ison iye not govo-rit - An pillar Gaelic, water of angels, etc. to P ochy N azvan and Mang N and, prepared with mediation of angels, bread of angels, but not the N azvan and water of angels which was too is called and from the rock at them posred-by N and h e with t in e? Z and t e m of N and d about z and m e t and t, h t about e with l and in Since century P and with and the N is also also told about bread, "bread of whom - nibud" always to N azvan "bread of that" which feeds on it, but not the one who prepares it. P Rimera of it are uncountable: And descent. Chapter 23, Article 25, "He blessed your bread and your water". To N of.2 C of arstvo, Chapter 12, Article Z, "from bread she ate him". To N of Tobit. Chapter 4, Article 17, "R azdavay your hleba at a coffin 

232 
pravedn ykh", at St. Onions and, Chapter 11, Article 3, "Bread of N ash on - sushch N y". Enough dock azyvat all this that bread • to - go-nibud" in P ison of AI is bread of that, to that with it feeds - sya, but not that, to that does it, I e bring or prigotov-l to t. And in p about l of N e e with t e with t in e N of N oh, of h t about in P with and m l e, N and to about t about r y y we refer, it is necessary pon to imat under bread of angels p-shchu not incorporeal angels (who have no need in a material pishch e), but angels corporal, i.e. ra-zumn ykh beings about whom we tell here which 
live in vozduhezyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP and which, on refinement of a body and 
endowments reason, so come nearer to besteles-ny An to gela that it even gave the same to N aimen ovan iye. From here I take out the investigation: being zhi votn ymiy, i.e. appearing through origin, and subject to decay, they have need in p and shch e to restore corporal substance which decrease occurs through expenditure. And z the N each being consists in assimilation and izverzhen AI of elements, 2 to joint stock company taught it 
Ettmyuller (" I n st. M ed. P h ys.", Chapter 2) 4. And so, if them 
bodies uton Chong of N y, is same dolzhn and to be also them p and shch and. If some substances are opposite to their nature and they avoid them, that is in the nature and such substances, to - tory they eat and enjoy. 
M of An of N and Jews consisted from razlichn ykh elements and, 
long before it is besieged iya, it was dissolved from beams of the sun. And descent, Chapter 16, Article 21: "when warmed the sun, it is t and I am l and". 
M and N of N and e in r e e in and m e l and N e about y to N about in e N of N about N e N y y with about with that in because contained evaporations of water and the earth which about t with about l of N e h N about about t e p l and r and with t in about r I am l and with and and with the h e z and l and. In about z m about - but that it - p and shch and beings about whom we speak and David not without p ri chi N y N azvat its bread angels. 

The XX head. As it is necessary pon I t Christ's words: "I have sheep who not this yard". R Apollo's azgovor with the emperor Augustus: end of B of og. Great Pang died. Christ's death announced 
Fauns, Silvanami, Satires 
Let's use for a reinforcement of our thesis slo- 
you evangelist I oan N and (Chapter 10, Article 16): "I have also other sheep who not this yard; and I should bring those: and they will hear the M voice oh, both there will be one herd and is uniform P astyr". If we ask, to joint stock company and e it can be sheep not of this yard and to joint stock company oh it is the yard, about 

2 3 3 
which Christ Redeemer speaks, all commentators will answer us that it is uniform stven N y Christ's yard - it is C erkov into which a sermon evan helium dolzhn and to bring I zych-N of ik, which not this yard, i.e. not the yard of Jews. For N their yard of Christ was sn the synagogue achat, so to the JSC Da-look says, P page 95, Article 7: "We are the people of its flock and ov-tsy his hands" because the obetovaniye was given to Avra-to an am and David that the Messiah will come from their sort, and It is expected the Jewish people, and was announced proro-to Amy who were Jews, and its coming, it - I am a N and I, it stradan iya, death and revival would be to joint stock company y and z about r and e N y r and N highway e in e r in t in about p r and N about highway e in N and I x, about br I - da, and in general a stump Jewish Zac it and. The N oh, despite N ash e is complied iye to fathers of C of an erkva and other scientists, this explanation does not satisfy us. Really, believe that with N of an achal of the world there was one C erkov true and that it and will exist to it c and the world. The head of this erkva C - And isus Christ, P osrednik between B about - gy and people. The belief in P resvyaty Trinity, in voploshche-ny Words was dug by Quality Department to the first person who taught the same the sons, and those, in turn - the descendants. Though bolsh aya a part from their N fell into paganism and pok in an ula true belief, but however mno-gy kept belief of the fathers and, observing estestven-N y Zac he, remained in erkva C vern ykh. It zamechan iye does to Arti to N Tole apropos And an ov who made - sya svya ty among I zy chn and to about century is scarlet. Though the B og granted the favor to the Jewish people for which It ustano-twisted special Zac it and ceremonies and which It separated from I zy chn and to ov, odn to Acre this Zac it was not obligatory for I z y for h N and to about in, and e in r e and N e with about with t and in l I am l and C e r to in and, about t of l and h N about y from church of those from I zy chn and to ov which professed belief in Uniform B of RSA and in coming of the Messiah. Between I zych-N and to and m and y l and t and k and e, k about t about r y e p r about r and c and l and p r and highway e with t in and e Christ and other doctrines of Christian religion, on - 
example, M of erkuriya, Trismegist, Gidasp 3 and sivilla, about 
whom speak to Lach the thane of c and y and B and r about N and y 4. H that I zychn and - 
ki waited for the Messiah, it is possible to prove several months - weary at And Sai and and especially in a prophecy of the patriarch I of joint stock company of an ov (B of a yta e, Chapter 49, Article 10): "The N e will depart a scepter from Both Uda and a staff from his legs, pok but rest, and to It humility of N are about to v*44 will not come. 
And also at the prophet Haggai, Chapter 2, Article 7: "Also I will shake 
all people when comes elayemy all people". To orneliya of Paws both dsk and y comments on it the following about - 

234 
at once: "Yazychn and to and which whether trusted in B of RSA and soblyuda-Zac it, waited and wished Christ, like Jews". Christ I curled and I announced Sebha, to joint stock company zychn and - to am, and to Jews because at the same moment, to joint stock company the angels announced Christ's birth to shepherds, so - 
4uzn Ali about it by means of a wonderful star volkh- 
in y 5, to about t about r y e t and to and m about r and z about m y l and p e r in y m and m e du 
I zy chn and to am and, to joint stock company shepherds among Jews, am called y on - to tend to Christ (S.F ulgen tius. Serm. 6 de Epiph.). I z y h n and k and p r e d e e in r e e in z N and l and about p r and highway e with t in and and Hr and with t and through a sermon (I do not speak about a sermon of apostles). About it the venerable sister M the aria by d'Arpega wrote in the "And zn And an isusa of Christ and P resvyaty Maidens Ma - a riya": "To an ogd the Maiden M the aria ran from St. And osify to Egypt from prosecutions And a sort, it remained with the baby I isusy in Egypt seven years; and at this time the B is false N aya the Maiden also I preached itself egiptya N am belief in and with t and N of N about go B about and and p r and highway e with t in and e With y N and B about in the h e l about in e h e - a sky body". By the way, at Christ's birth - the Leningrad Region is a lot of miracles not only in And udy, but also in Egypt where idols destroy by Ali s, oracles Ali broke off; in P Yim - seemed f ontan from oil, the are, the SPU was gold highway - with to and in highway and y with I with N of an eb of N and z e l m yu, p about I v and l and s r and with about l of N of c and and the extraordinary circle from shades of a rainbow surrounded t soln-tse; in Greece - Delf the Yeysk oracle, and Apol-of bosoms grew dumb, the N y is asked by the emperor Augustus, answered: "Ev-reysky di tya which rules over gods and Itself is a B about. M of N e p r and to and z and N about p about to and N ut m about y p r e about that l and with about y t and in an underworld. Whether now the N ash and altars broke off, and we need to leave". 
B y the Leningrad Region is a lot of also others zn amine y, vozveshch avsh them 
I zy chn and to am coming of the Son of B of an ozha I. About N of their story - but at B Aron and I ("C erkovn ye An of N are scarlet") and at To an orneliya ("To an ommentariya of N and Haggai"). 
And z all this it is clear that I zy chn and to and, to joint stock company and Jews, prin adlezhat to Christ's yard, i.e. to the same C of an erkva of true. Therefore, these words of Christ: "Me-have nya other sheep who not this yard", cannot - satsya I zy chn and to ov which in total with Jews had knowledge of Aage's B, hope of N and the Messiah, prophecies, a miracle - sa and is predicted iye about its coming. I say that words "sheep not of this yard" can be carried to ra-to zumny creations or zhi votn ym, about which we go in about r and m here. 

2 3 ^ 
We ustan wound that they are capable both to pleasure, and to use a lyatiya; but time Christ is P osrednik between B an ogham and people, and also and vsyak them razumn y mi beings (because through Christ's merits ra-zumn ye creations reach pleasure by means of those favor which It grants them), from here it is possible to lyuchit Zac that any reasonable being has to have at the same time belief in Uniform B of RSA, on - to a dezhd on Christ's coming, a revelation about voploshche-scientific research institute at the birth and the beatitude. 
Here sheep not of "yard" of people, and they should be given; there are sheep who dolzhn y hear to at its voice, i.e. in about z in e shch e N and e about E g about p r and highway e with t v and i and e in and N of e l with to about e uch e N and e or directly from his N, or from apostles; here ov-tsy which being, N of joint stock company he ets, are connected to people in heavenly pleasure, dolzhn y to carry out words about odes - the number the yard and about one P astyr. This explanation under - tverzhdatsya also by those, upomya in N uty vysh e, words St. And e r about N and m and about m and l e to N to about m of the h e l about in e to e, to about r y y p r about with and l with in I - that An tone iya to pray for t for it and to it similar about - to shchy B of regional public institution, To otory suffered, to joint stock company of people. And z it it is visible that they zn Ali about coming and Christ's death, e l and l and z and with l and t E g about m and l about with t, to and to B about and, and p r and e hl and to St. Anthony's help. 
Another f joint stock company of t, sluzhashch y a support to my conclusion, e that at p about m and N and N and e B and r about N and I about z N and m e N and I x, to about t about r y e in about z in e - shch Ali Christ's death. At the time of the emperor Tiberiya, in time stradan iya Christ, seafarers on the road from Greece in And a waist approached at night the coast, not - is far from the islands of Ekhin Ada. Suddenly everything hear Ali go-los, the calling helmsman Tramn and. He answered: "I here", and the same voice sk azat: "To an ogd you will reach the swamp, announce that It is big y P An died". Tramn it ispol-N silt, and immediately were heard loud groans and rydan and I. To the same it could be, to joint stock company not demons or corporal An of a gela, or razumn ye the beings living near these swamps, so to joint stock company they were, undoubtedly, vodyan ymiy du - be rude and, uzn av about Christ's death under the name of "Great P An and", N achat p varnish to at and sob? Also and among ev-Ray who were present at death's door Christ was mno go, udalya vsh and hsya with it is expressed iy burning. And z all this follows that exist it is created iya, inkuba and succubuses. which possess feelings and sufferings of holes of feelings are subject. They razmn ozhatsya through origin and mind dig through a decay iye; they can reach also pleasure 

236 
and p la's fate ti I; they it is more noble than the person, so to joint stock company have more distinguished body and if they can have a raft - the sky intercourse with the person, then they make such sin her, to joint stock company of people, having the intercourse from scotomas. N eredko these inkuba after the long intercourses with chelove-a lump or zhivotn ym kill the accomplices, and it speaks so: having sinned, they have to regret, so to joint stock company are on the way to pleasure. And a forehead - a century, having sinned with zhivotn ym, receives from the spirits - Ik's N command un to ichtozhit this animal again not to fall into a sin. Can happen, as inkuba, races - kaivayas, kill the person or an animal with whom sinned, and, killing the person, in this case inkub does not sin this murder, like that, to joint stock company also people not gresh it any more, killing an animal; the relation in-a cube to the person will be like the attitude of the person towards an animal. 

The XXI head. As the woman can become pregnant 
from an inkub. Why now giants are not born 
The eremennost from an inkub would not come from sperm, 
borrowed the person, to joint stock company it was mentioned you - she because inkub, to joint stock company the creation breeding through origin possesses natural sperm. 
Thus, it is easily possible to explain origin of giants to joint stock company result of the intercourses of sons of B ozhiy and to - a furuncle human. Gigan you, though are similar chelove-ku, but bigger growth and, having borrowed from an inkub it si-lu, have no N and his courage, its power. We see the same at the mule who occurred from a donkey and a mare - he is higher than the first, but has no is made - with TV and in t about r about y. 
Igda we did not read to N that giants made Wad Dra - gy giants; they were born from inkub and daughters che-lovechesky, i.e. are created from the demon and the person, forming an average between N and mi, but without having the power to reproduce similar, through origin. 
The m ozhno to object that sperm of the demon, by the nature being not so dense, to joint stock company sperm of the person, cannot mix up and make origin. To N about I will answer, ssy-being barked on vysh esk an adhan of N oye that origin depends on the Vital force of a character which it you - delyat. 
237 
It is possible to object that if gigan you are valid there were from the intercourse of inkub from wives shch also N am, about t. would be born and still because and now ecu of wives shch and N y, having the intercourse from inkuba, to joint stock company of races tell St. B ernard, P etr Alkane of tarskiya and others and in that r y. 
I will answer that, according to Guazzo, there are inkuba of fellow countrymen ny, water, air and ognenny6e, and to azhdy of? 
lives in peculiar to it e lemen te4. And zvestno that zhi 
cotton have especially zn achiteln ye the sizes, zyxwvutsrq the Czech 
the element in which they live is more. N an aprimer, fishes - many of N and x, undoubtedly, are very small, to joint stock company it is MI is visible also at terrestrial zhivotn ykh, but so to joint stock company water about a stranstvo exceeds terrestrial, that and to flog some. fishes are surpassed in size zemn ykh zhivotn ykh. 
It will be clear if we look at N and whales, skum briya, porridges of alot and some other viviparous Further, so to joint stock company air is more than water, and fire bolysh air, then inkuba fiery and air prevoskho dit terrestrial and water, to joint stock company in body size, so! • p about with and l e. M about e t y t, with to and at t, h t about p t and c y, about and that yu shch and e in air which is more than water generally is less rys and quadrupeds, but it proves nothing, so birds, flying in air, prin adlezhat to the earth where OHI have a rest; then the summer would need and to consider a sneeze of fishes, to joint stock company zhivotn ykh air that, of course, awaking> N ep Ravi Ln of the lake. 
Now it is necessary to notice that after a flood the spirit which covers N ash at the earth and water made a cart sya, thanks to humidity, more dense, than to a flood and t and to and to in l and N about with t e with t p r and ch and n and t of l e N and I, m about e in t to be, from it and zhi zn people it is not so long, to joint stock company in antediluvian times. The same density of air yav lyatsya by the reason that inkuba air and Ognjen of N ye cannot zhi t more in such dense air and whether it they go down sometimes, not for a long time, is similar lyu dyam, N yryayushch to them in depth of the sea. And so, to a flood, kogd <air was not so dense, inkuba went down on zemlk and had the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N, creating and m about r and z about m of and and N of t about in p about h t and t and to about about e r about with that, to and to about N and with am and Now have the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N in the dyany inkuba which are sometimes under a look malen to and x people. You confirm their water origin; that voluptuousness and humidity - elements, hundreds rushing among themselves. So, Venus, on mythology 

238 
\will be born from sea foam and it is natural that children its not giants, and ordinary growth. One more zamechan iye: when inkuba, connecting from wives shch and Amy's N, do not change the body, wives shch and N y do not see them or see, to joint stock company hardly noticeable shadow: such is a case, the N y by us above when kissed the lady inkub, and she hardly feeling - in is told and to l and e in t about p r and to about with N about in e in N and e. E with l and e, N and about about r about t, and N to ub y want to be seen by the beloved, they at - nimat a visible cover, and their body becomes osyazaye-my. To joint stock company and m in the way they do it - it is their secrets and, and we cannot open her. We know only that about - the lochka of an inkub cannot consist of one condensed air because its consolidation happens from szhiman iya, that is from cold, and the body created thus at touch will be ice; 
it would bring nep7riyatnost wives shch and N am, then to joint stock company 
occurs obratn oye4. 

XXI I heads. Value of sinfulness of "demonialitet" and "bestialitet" (demonolozhestvo and skotolozhestvo) 
Having considered distinction of incorporeal demons who 
have the intercourses with the sorcerer of a yama, and the inkub dealing from wives shch and Amy's N not the sorcerer of a yama, we need - to consider roofing felt weight of a sin in that and other case. The intercourses the sorcerer y with demons on circumstances which accompany them, to joint stock company that: retreat from ve-ry, worship of a devil and others bezzakon iya, about koto-ry we spoke vysh e, there is a biggest of all sins, to joint stock company oh the person can only make. If to consider from this point zren iya, then of course the demo - nialitt there is a biggest of all corporal sins, to and to about y t about l to about m about e t with about in e r highway and t h e l about in e to. N about e with l and r and with - to suzhdat about it, to joint stock company about a sin corporal, otkin uv a sin p r about ti in r e l and g and i, t about e t about t about l to about about with to in e r N e N and e. P r and ch and n and, very convincing, is that the devil having the intercourses with the sorcerer of a yama is spirit besteles-the ny, reached in term in o and use lyaty, and he any acts by means of the body borrowed or with - handed over by him and though it is given in dvizhen iye, 
N
about nevertheless not live; therefore, the person having 
the intercourse, commits the same crime, to joint stock company Having the intercourse with an inanimate body. Intercourses 
t
aky sort can have razlichn y character: if 
the devil borrowed a human body, that this ungodliness, zyxw, 
if the body of an animal, then is sodomy. 
As for the intercourses with inkuby, here N "in with tr e h and e the CU I am a N and m and l e y highway e go about with to about r l e N and I r e l and gi and, i is difficult sk the Azat why this crime would have to t grekhovny sodomy and the bestialitet. If to a bestialita! grekhovny sodomy because the person un izhat svo * advantage, connecting to the cattle, in the intercourses <inkuby the absolutely return: inkub on rationality it is equal to the person, and concerning a body - it is more noble than the person and therefore, the person not un izhat the nature, connecting with inkuby. R assmatrivy demonialitt from this point zren iya, we see that it not grekhovny a demon ti and l and a theta. 
The N about the general opinion inclines to what the demonia litt grekhovny, and here on to joint stock company oh of the reasons e. In all sno en iya x with the demon the people sin with highway against religion: quarrystone } t about l yu about in N y e with N about highway e n and ya and l and p r about with and about p about m about shch and, with about in e those or zhelan iye uzn to at through it the future, or to learn i hidden and last. M uzhchin y both wives shch and N y, skhodyas; t and to and m about r and z about m with and N to at and m and, N e z N and yu t, h t about e that and in about ton ye, but think that it is the demon, and sin either with us rhenium or from zabluzhden iya, and their sin from inkuba that k, to joint stock company if they had the intercourse with a devil, from this it follows that and weight of these crimes to the ode of N of joint stock company of an ov. 


















240 
PART SECOND 


N about N e t with p and with e N I 
in powers of darkness 
I I 'M ('" 
	j ^	,
1
L - *' 

, 4 and. H i" < 
") N! I \VI | - The 05th 1999-. 1 0 5 1 ^ 9 9 




L

•> J_7 °" ^ 7 - - 17 2 - 1 - '4 l 
1
 


,  
- - 1071W '0 01 il' 9" i 2 0 5 P 9 c> 
: s> 0.6 
4 to 4S 6 5 1 - 0 6 4 J-? 7 ('^ 
'i i  

 
v
ь: state of emergency 
21:06 1S" W  
,

U) l of 2 h" "0  
d

Q, (M * 999  
i

2" 08 199VzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP 
1 "i OL - 19Ch 9 

1.09.1999 

6 12 1990 9.02 2000 4.08 9 "199 
10.03.2000 26 03 9 L 99 
7.12.1998 25 0" 2000 
^5-iJ 59 
68-48G43 

- - 21, 67 - 81 - 90 38 - 26L9 62 - 26 - 70 "65 - 79-M 







92-75 
10.03zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ '\^' 


19 7 W 0	b^-~ T) 
- 02 P99 
Stanislav Pshibyshevsky 
With and N and go hectare With and t and N y 
H and with t p e r in and I 
SYNAGOGUE SATAN Y 

Two gods eternally protivopolozhn y, two creators and two misters, chasms achaln ye and eternal. 
Kind God created spirits, clean beings; its world - the world invisible, the world of perfection, not zn ayushch and y bor- and pains. The angry B og created visible, corporal and prekho-dyashchy. He created flesh and passions, the earth with its fight, its torments of Amy and it is desperate iy, an immeasurable vale of tears, created the nature which makes only pain, about t of the h and I n and e and z l of the lake eternally. 
Kind god is a norm, Zac he, humility and pokor-a nost. He says to the children: "B to an udta of N and shch and spirit because only this way you will come to my kingdom! B to an udta more children, than children, kill will, follow me! N e you seek to experience p ri chi N y and the purpose because only in me everything last and gryadushch it". 
The angry B og is a lack of rules, unitary enterprise rya my, clear vidcheskiya p a ryzhok in the future, it is temptation sokroven-neyshy secrets ik ov and titanic obstinacy which, not p ri zn avy gran and the c, subverts everything Zac it y, all norms. It - vyssh aya wisdom and vyssh y debauchery, sa-May of di to aya pride and the craftiest humility because only this way it is possible to fool the rule. He consecrated you - sokomery, courage and love of power - and the N azyvat it ge-r about y with t in about m; about N of N and at the h and l of the h e l about in e to and, h t about N e t p r e with t at p l e N and I, unless against his own nature. He consecrated curiosity, he N azvat his N auk oh, he forced a forehead - centuries to investigate own origin and the N azvat it philosophy, it allowed to spread godlessly all ins-oozes to kta in line with a floor and the N azvat it art. 
The Angry B og was kind, and you direct the good father - Lem: "You are sick, you want to recover? Look! Z emlya washing all abounds to and mi with injuries which can istse-pour you, also dangerous I abound to the lady, but you can force them to serve to you as medicine. 
Do you want to be rich, you and shch esh treasures? Oh, 
I
  I have one thousand means which you can 
to entice own soul your of a shelter that it Quality Department dug to you precious zhi ly lands. And bo your soul knows everything. At it and at me achat one N. 
24 5 
Do you want zaglya to utnut N in the future and to guess yours sudg bu? And di, monitor flight p ti c, prislush ivaysya to shelg Stu of foliage, look N and stars, watch in zerkaln ye stalla kr whether solve N and and hands and - in one thousand types.-, predsozdat your future, but also shch and, investigate, Vi's razgada because Zac it mine - sharpness and dexterity, the observer a nost and far-sightedness, creative curiosity. 
Do you want un and chtozh t the enemies and the N astign does not want to be uty the law of ohms? And di! N of an aucha I smother the from share from a body, and I will transfer it for thousands of versts what you is invisible satisfied an alchba of your heart. Иб^ your own benefit, your own development and bu a dushchnost yes will be to you vyssh them Zac he Amy. 
Did you lose wives at your, taken by death? I give a sostr to your love because love, prodolzhayushch aya your sort to me on heart. And di! Exchanges have thousands of means I, whether tysya chi Zac N of An and y to pull out expensive to you at death! 
Everything is promised by me to you, everything will be seen and will receive everything if we go mine p utya mi. N about my ways are difficult, ib <difficult anything is made iye". 
So told Z2 ly to B og, so told Svetonosets1 of i 
About Aton and - P Arak of years during that time when was not born ep yet 
great enemy Otrok of N azaretsk and y 3. Whether also many highways eg <putya mi whether also long works and torments Amy Issledova melt N y the sky and the earth, and prevrashch Ali objects so that poison became it medicine, water p ok azyvat IU future, and vulk An ichesk iye is evaporated iya, expiring and. z e m of l and, about t to r y in and l and and m with about to r about in e N of N e y highway e e e about those with TV about in e shch e y And dalsh e and dalsh e p Ron and to Ali they on the way of sozerets of N and I. To a rug which they outlined around themselves a row <z in uk about in, to about t about r y e about N both p r about and z N about s and l and v and z in e with t of N about y p about with l e vatelnost, dv of wives and I hands and - was already enough that svya to zat their shower at with everything mirozdan iy, razdv chick-pea all Zac it y space and time, and without barriers to behold infinite couplings of causes and effects of their emergence to otdalenneyshy sides of the future. 



Yet the Satan - Antichrist was not born in that time. The angry B og was dvuyedin. With and t and N and - about t e c, With and t and N and - with and m and and z and, With and t and N and - p about e t and f and l about 
sofas 4 zhi l in a proud, all-powerful and omniscient sort ma 
g. It zhi l in silent mysteries chaldaic 
temples, and his priests were Amy's hook of m (doctors), Hart> 

246 
(magicians), to azd of m and gazry (astrologers). Egot the Satan yas in doctrines ah of a mazdea zm7a6, and his children, magicians conducted - Kia, okhran the yawl a sacred Agon, descended to them from heaven.9 From Agura - M azdy8, Dobr0ogo of B of RSA, nauchils1ya Z aratustr 
to the mysteries of a plant from m a1; egipets1ky T about t 1, three times ve- 
wild, stated in 42-x to N and hectare x 2 secret zn An iye and on - 
the structure of a human body, and the horror knew izbra1n N ym - 
Nai Gek and that 3 N endowed the N of ik for nothing magicians is elected - 
chesky it is visible iya and creativity and, mainly, yes - rum of murder mystery. 
The N about N to an aryad with the Satan - Tot, the Satan - Hecate lived in m and re With and t and N and - With and t and r 1 4, With and t and N and - P and N 1 5, With and t and N and - F and l of l about from 1 6. 
He was god ying Steen of kt and carnal desire who is equally esteemed and vyssh them and N both zsh and mi spirit, he was an inexhaustible source zhizn en in N oh of joy, inspiration and op ya in N en and I. He taught wives shch and N at secrets am temptations, zastavlya yushch and m of people to satisfy с^ои lusts in vzaimn ohm inclination of a floor, he luxuriated in to rask ah, invented a flute and set in rhythmic motion m y highway of c y, pok and Saint Mang Iya did not capture sulfurs - dets and a sacred phallus did not impregnate the surplus a fertile bosom. 
Because P An was Apollon and Aphrodite odnovremen-but. He was god of a home and brothel. He created philosophical systems, he constructed the museums and luxurious temples, he taught medicine and the mathematician e and, at the same time, his temple was in Astarteyona, huge brothel in which guzzle c y in long unitary enterprises-razhneniye studied all ways, all various means of satisfaction of sexual passion. 
At this time, also take in an era of the emperor T I 17 when great resettlement of gods in P them began, during an era you - sew refinement and the most aristocratic on - a slazhdeniye zhi zn yu, the Kind B og, still c Arie Vsh and y in the hidden kingdom from enviable unperturbable Stew, saw, N of joint stock company it ets that the sin measure was executed, and sent the Son to the earth that he told poko-to lenye of Angry B of RSA the sad truth. 
And it came to the world, the Son of Kind B of RSA, and was at first poor, ugn etayemy, to slaves and poden shch ik am, - when not vk ush avsh and m of sacred pleasures P An and. 
- H that you are concerned about daily bread? To the same to the ode - 
in
and e t l and l and i p r e to r and with N e y sh and m and ts in e t and m and, in with r and in N e N and and with 
Kt otory scarlet and brocade - pathetic rags? To that pita - 
e
  p t and ts, k about t about r y e N e with it t and N e N at t? Z and h e m with t r e m and t e with 

247 
you to the benefits zemn ym, which skoroprekhodyashch? To Acre. yours matters and pride if the highest on zeml. there will be a N and zsh and m in the Kingdom of Heaven? And carnal n oxoi. yours, unless it not gates of hell? 
Oh, poor volition of flesh, poor lust, a source all to and x passions, an inexhaustible source of love zhizn and will to eternity zhi zn and; she had to be unichto the wife that the kingdom invisible set in on the earth. 
The teacher sk azat that you already commit adultery 
wives shch and N oh, if glya di of highway N and it with vozhdele8niyem; learn 
the N ik goes much dalsh e: the Saint To and p r and and 1 speaks to N 
to the girl capable to cause in men y a sigh the leader a flax iya that she is shameless and if it lit in whom is be, even itself not zn aya, love p lamas I, then it vooo shche already not the virgin any more. 
- en and! H that the general between me and you? - vopro 
the Teacher shat. N about many dalsh e Teachers ide9t the pupil 
"Tu es diaboli jan u a - to richit Tertulli of An 1 - tu e- 
arboris illius resign atrix, tu es divinae legis prim. desertrix, tu es, quae eum persuasisti, quem diabolic 
aggredi non voluit".*2 0 "Omnia mala ex mulieribus","" zha 
it lutsya St. Both ER about N and m. Yes, he claims even that wives 
shch and N and it is not created on similarity of B at all ozhy because in Svya shchenny AI is written nothing is told about soul at sotvo r en and and e to N shch and N y. 
The kind B og hated invisible terrestrial beauty \He hated everything in what About Aton and - P An I vlya the l from 
and coming to consider kroveniye because he preached pettiness this world. To azhdy zhelan iye, the slightest vozm> shcheny fleshes, was a sin which the N of joint stock company azyvatsya a dale gy years * repentances. Tertullian rages f anatichesky hatred against each strip Pur 
pura2.1, which wives shch and N and ok ouch mlya et dress. That varnish 
c and y p r about to l and N and e t p about e t about v and f and l about with about f about in, to about t about r y e z and in l with 
cabins of N eokhran yaemy the shower and in death, destroys zhi be cried out because "quod n ascitur, opus Dei est; ergo quoi' fin gitur, diaboli negotium". *** theater and circus steel 

You - a threshold of a devil, you - broken the ban in otno-sheniya of this tree (i.e. Eve. - sost.). You - the first neglecting the divine law, it you finished it which a devil of N> wished to pursue. - lat. (Hereinafter translation of the originator) 
*" All evil - from women. - lat. 
Everything that is born - is a fruit of work B ozhy, следователь^ what is represented, there is a work of a devil - armor. 


248 
"diaboli figmenta" *; Holy Fathers warn even against paints, against flowers because the demon, the angry enemy, more willingly all the N aryazhatsya in I rk and e2 luxury paints. 
And sav3ry And to about N about to last2 competes with Grigory Ve- 
and to and m224 in destroy by l en AI of works of art. Feodo- 
these I I p ri to azyvat destroy to at all temples and vozdvi- 
corduroy road everywhere crosses. Destroy the meaning of the finest works of poets or at all exterminate them, so to joint stock company 
demonolog To and p ri An learns that in stikhotvore0niyakh sokry- 
you are "varia daemonia"" *. en and Af give rise ta2 becomes 
public wives shch and oh N which to azhdy can zabro-sat dirt, and love - oh, Auger's B, love - "amor si vincitur, diabolus vin citur"! ***. All nature gets in p r about with to r and p ts and i, i, hl and in N y m about br az about m, and with c e I yu shch and I p ri ro - yes. the B og sent to l diseases to allow the person to atone at least for a part of his sins here, on the earth; a sin prepyat-to stvovat a divine P romysla. In krayn I eat a case still are allowed e to z about r by c and z in m y 26 obsessed, not for that is go, of course, to cure bolezny, but whether highway in order that I vi t power of the Kind B of RSA triumphing over Z ly. 
U bique daemon! """" P about And an eronima, all air it is full demons, shivers from them to ri to and and crying about the death of gods, in each flower, in each tree - the demon therefore 
that it - joy and p7lodorodiye, wealth and beauty. In 
quality Lyuts and f a2 he brings ER day and concludes 
its light of Venus casting magnificent, sladostra-stny sn y. P ervy centuries know only one religion - fight against the demon. 
N about bo r a ba y l and N e l e to and. In f anatichesky madness the church of N fell down on glu- 
bochayshy and svyateysh iye the bonds binding the person from the Universe. It violently tore off the person by nature, vesh aya him between heaven and earth. Confidential communications, du - shu, to joint stock company the absolute, to joint stock company a phenomenon, not zavisyashch y from a brain is uniform ivsh iye with the nature a human soul, were announced satan in sk by them, devil deception of hl and h. 
People of antiquity of N akhoditsya with the nature in intim - neyshy otn Osh en and I x. Whether they zhi directly with 

, * Tvorenyem of a devil. - lat. 
.** Various evil spirits. - lat. 
and pozh	In	N of l and t. 
**** esslyu du of an odeemod! et - lyuoov, pooyezhdat dyavot - lat. 

2 4 <) 
the nature and in the nature, they were a part it, a piece. a nerve, proyavlyavsh to them outside the slightest changes at }> <dy. And if all inventions of human spirit soup only of a projection its body of a-ism, then politeisticheska the cult was a direct projection of the nature to all its blagoslavlyayushchea and the destroying power. And zyxwvuts of kN 
soul projects mekhan a-ism of business, a rassmatriv outside <my it izn wipe, and the nature came to light in are powerful - symbols of a pagan cult. 
In mad fight church a piece behind a piece of a gap. 1 that artery through which blood of the earth flowed in chelch centuries. It un ichtozhat unconscious selection prir (dy, proyavlyayushch iysya in beauty, force and power; it okhrl N of the yawl all that the nature wants to reject against what she so powerfully rises: dirt, ugliness, a disease, to, to 1 lek, the eunuch. Most willingly the church castrated b the whole world, would turn off light, would give all earth the victim to a sulfuric rain; and I eat aspiration with its only thing, burning zhelan iy one was its - that it is promised ny strash to N y court the N of windows ets came. 
But the nerve, an artery did not give themselves so easily unicht, zhi t. Especially people, zemnorozhdenny, still kresh • roots in the earth. The m took the most scarlet opportunity oi to return to the favourite terrestrial gods. 
In krovozhadn eyshy Zac it ah Christians against I zy chn and to ov poured out the yarosm, but Dem about N 28, that is ze la, the nature, was a N erazrush it. He went to forests, conceal. sya in unapproachable caves, brought together the true there and the khan Ali celebrated wild vak and. 



N about strongest f An attic rage of hatred of N" p r and in l I am l and with p r about t and in With and t and N y - m and and, With and t and N y - c e l and t e l of l of B to an udta of N and shch and spirit and are humble, be obedient, on. give birth, do not think! Such is there was the supreme law ret>. Giya of dark masses. The N about the magician was proud because it protivit! N all Zac it am. P rotivyas to the law of gravitation, it pod matsya on air and did not sink in water. If he wanted, mozh1' was to throw him into fire, and it left are safe •>' the Magician was too proud to imitate. "I that p • 'I can obozhestvi2 tsya virtue" - sk azat the Feud 
from M op sue sta 9. The m ag despised N ishch to a spirit et because <•' 
experienced everything melt N y and solved all intimate. P to stars he defined N asledn ik of tsars and zn it is scarlet" 

2 50 
blowing all people. The magician was a stubborn criminal against all the law ov, zn ayushch it the clairvoyant. Christ democratized the doctrine. He made accomplices of the revolt against Old Z avet poselyan and slaves who were more children, than children. The magician on - sazhdat the doctrine only in the most proud and powerful souls ah. 
P rotiv this stubborn ti the thane and N the stiansky rage, hatred of N ishch their spirit, poklonni-recovered hri- 
k Zac it and and those who were not capable a bottom 0 of what, except 
podrazhan iya. Already Zac it y To it ti N and N alagat a camp tya- 
inhabited N of joint stock company an adhan and I for magic. And here, the law follows for the law of ohms, 3 1 one is more strict than another while at the emperor Valen those were not istreble3ny all philosophers, between 
n and m and i e N and and l N y y I am m in l and x 2, about t r and in and in highway and y with I in those m of N and - 
tse. Was to have philosophical kN to a yoke enough to endanger the zhi zn; avoiding this teaching - with t i, zh and t e to l and and m p e r and and with about of l and vs e to N and and. And in about t of N and h and - an elk terrible martyrdom of proud children of the Satan, in comparison with which prosecutions of Christians at N e-r about N e to and ut with I m and l about y z and and in about y. 
By this time the Magician became a priest. Around him with - r and l and with I z y h e with to and e about shch and N y, vs e about with t and t to and I z y e with t in and join h to magicians and. P a ravda, they lose the symbolical force, the contents. The N ikto not zn is scarlet that mean zn joint stock company and and symbols, but also here the magician found a way out. It attached zn to joint stock company am mystical significance, koto-a swarm small Pomala began to work to joint stock company powerful vnushe-ny. Words, zn achen iye which the N ikto did not remember became powerful magnetic tool by means of which go the magician ustan avlivat the intercourse between P ovelite-Lem and the souls oh. 
erkov saw c that N of joint stock company an adhan and I am m and and p ytk she can make nothing by Amy. In its ability to imitate and only to imitate she addressed "the return Uda - ru", this "choc en retour" which plays such important role in magic. 
Z and to l and N and N and I am m and gi h e with k and m and z N and to and m and z and m e N e N y 
Church obrya3dami. Whether m agichesky Zac N of An and I am couple - 
lizovat a mass 3, holy water expelled the Satan, and 
if the magician a name of the Satan collected a thunderstorm, then the Christian Mog to disseminate it zn joint stock company of ohms of a cross. 
N about what fight lasted longer, the more had to concede church. It was vynuzh4 a dena to mix 
pagan cult with the. Wa to ha N and whether and 3 at prazdne- 
25 1 
stvo of Cere3s5 Libera were transferred to processions on idle; 
Vakh D e in y, and till the thirteenth century the people together with svl 
shch en N and to Amy Prazdn an oval orgiastic festivals, prazdn ik a donkey, prazdn ik madmen; the remains fallichesko go a cult crept in church, capitals of columns from 
biloval pornographer iche6skimi f iguram, and izlyublen- 
the N about y 3, commiting adultery about the was a ny plot 
mi daughters. In particular hell. Auger's B! To joint stock company it is fine! 
Here to a poor brain tserkovn ykh scientists and theologians, to tory so willingly and so N aivn about the списыва3rd is already voluminous 
whether each other, not prikhodilos8 to apryagatsya by N. Ai d' 
very I strike kind E vsev 3. N at yes, sometimes and 
Maun can have good otkroven iya, but after all fish vitelno there was the fact that I zy chn and to and it is so good zn Ali hell. Rabanne of M and in r 39 in the opisa4n does not forget AI of hell even 
F a legetona, To the otsit i4 1C ti to sa 0, and during all averages 
centuries and prin imat the Har boat about N for the boat of the Demon. 

* zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ - to * 

P to an ovsyud Demon. About Aton and triumphs. P to a rezhda - only a scarecrow, means it is strengthened iya the authorities of church - - it becomes all-powerful now mister whom m and r about and the CU I and with t and r and e t with I mind and l about with t and v and t. P about h t and about I and with dysh to at l that the evil ghost was not installed in a body. In the четвер2nd 
that century the sect of a massala ev4 appears monsters of N aya. 
which consider themselves obsessed with a devil; they a demon p r e with t and N of N about yu t with I in about vs e with t about r about N y, to r and h and t, p l yu yu t, and z vivatsya in uzhasn eysh their convulsions that oborough to nitsya from dirty, a name, to which "legion". 
The Satan prin imat thousands of types. He becomes god a word, goes to the desert and torments Holy Fathers tempt teln with eyshy questions, it sows in a shower ah their thousands with - opinions and fluctuations, it goes to monasteries and excites the N y a brain of monks the most seductive a type of N and I mi is exhausted, he visits virtuous wives at night, from nimat their will and reason at N and forces them to besstyd-to neyshy debauchery; he takes root into a brain of many thousands true and cries out is wild iye use a lyatiya and blasphemies. 
erkov was almost unable not to defend with c from Sa the thane y. Ekzortsizma Zahn imat more and more place in breviaries. N and one mass there was to such p y highway of N about with t yu, to and to and no I and a m e l and m e about that p r and e to z about r c and z m and x; N e decide more predprin to imat religious tseremo-niya, without having removed a spell previously from all corners tserk- 
252 
vi. P ri to dad Siksta of V43 expel devilish charms yes - from the Egyptian obelisk, before that to joint stock company to put it in P and me. 
The N about what is conducted fight from church more furiously, the Satan becomes stronger. Obsession peresili-howls, the Satan scoffs at church roaring naked obsessed, he works wonders before crowds ve-ruyushchy. He opens svya shch en for N and to at his secrets ye sins, it predicts a thing and which really sbyva-yutsyatsya, it raises a body obsessed in air and seams - ryat it very much N and the earth, not p ri chi N I I to it the slightest harm. 
The c erkov catches for otchy N of N eysh iye means. With - vershenno truly assuming that all to aya siln aya passion contributes the person to obsession, it zapreshch the ayah of moths of highway and e proya vlen iya passions. To azhdy passion has the demon; if kill passion, kill the demon. 
M ir in otchy N and and. To joint stock company to oboronitsya from the Satan and his temptations? To joint stock company zashch and ti tsya from eternally, hourly pody-the ation toiling lewd gallyutsin, from thousands izde-in and yu shch and x with I, with m e yu shch and x with I go l about with about in, to about t about r y e With and t and N and the N and - pravlyat against B of RSA? To an azhdy thought - a sin; the maiden, unconsciously you zy vayushch aya sighs of young necks in love, sins and already with it odn it, according to the Saint To and p ri An and, loses virginity. en shch and N and which is fine, unconsciously sins because owing to kra- 
the cell it upodobilas4 to a sickle, which Satan 
reaps the harvest (An selm 4). M ona, which demon 
distracts from a cross sins because causes powerlessness in fight. The spouse sins if he to birth business to Uda - lyat more interest, than love for B of regional public institution. M it is Aachen I washing more than two times a month, gresh it. In total - du a sin, everywhere eternal use of lyatiye; one thought, odes - to them the only act you lose the right of N and paradise and you get to the power About Aton y. The same who time fell the authorities About Aton y does not have rescue. And bo even Saints prizna-yut that many devils despise e to zortsizm and with - all are not afraid of them. 


And in e t about in r e m I am m and with with about in about go p with and ho z and, z and r and z and t e l N about y and with - tero-the epilepsy extending from terrible - a stratum worldwide, at this time, when hourly expect to it tsa the world and live in wild AI is desperate before 

253 
blizyashch I am eaten With trash in N ym Court, vozn ika5et faith in P macaws 
the klet triune About Aton at - An ti hr sta4. 
And time when it had to set in, already bl zitsya. I n tem pore saeviet *, tells To and p ri An, and Lach - the thane of tion claims that time already prish the Leningrad Region. 
Whether most strash N y e p redp olozhen and I am Arie's c about t An i x r and s t and. About N of the h e l about in e by r e ha, about N with y N p about and e l and, without - z and to about N n and k, r an ugatel, p r the EU is stupid N and to. He was born from a pas - py and a bough to an uba, and whether from "m u n d issim a m eretrice et crudelissimo nebulone" **. A sin - its st hi I, but it is big in a sin. Everything what Christ taught to, it will overturn, any sin will raise to virtue. He will tower to heaven, will make entrance in okhra" and orders to rasslavit himself the house Gospo-. It p ri to azht to kill Christ's attendants and the village - zk and mi, gordymi6 with lips vosklikn et: "To rov them on us and 
children of N and highway and x" 4. He will make miracles, it is more which 
the Son of B of an ozha y did not make. And its power will be, to joint stock company that, about to a Torah sk an adhan about in to N a yoke And an ova, 41: "The N ichyyu the power of N and the earth of N e l z I with r and in N and t with in l and with t yu t about oh, to t about with about t in about r e N of t and to, h that is afraid of nothing; who sees everything vozvy4shennoye and to the kingdom - 
et N and d about in with e m and with y N and m and in y with about to about m e r and I" 7. 
And Antichrist p ri ate highway. material a domination leg, and Antikhr4 the east of spirit, pride also conducted N about not Antichrist 
chi I: divine M and N and 8. 
With and t and N e N and with to uch and l about N e and with t about in with t in about in and t in e highway e N with t in e e p and leptik ov, satiated it zhi t in libertinism monashe-sky dreams, is silly aya a game with e to zortsizm not of entertainments of l any more I am l and e of the lake of B about about m z and ho t e l about N with t and t, B about about m, r and N highway e, h e to be able to generate m the real An of the tikhrist. The B about gy in the kingdom of spirit, proud, di to and m P rotivobogy, to tory would push aside the Son of Kind B of RSA back to his kingdom of invisible. 
And so, sk azat M of An and, izvechn and sacred wisdom: there are two gods, is equal siln ykh, equally in power of N ykh and protivopo-lozhn ykh: N evidimy B og Dobra, c arya shch and y in heaven whether did not bake ushch iysya about the earth both zhi vushch and y highway for perfection of the and zbran N and to ov; also there is other god, B og the Sin, koto-ry rules the earth. N et a sin because the sin also prois goes from B of RSA, to joint stock company virtue - from another, bespech a leg of B of RSA who says: "not N apryagaytes, podra-zhay those only mn e". 

It will shortly rage. - lat. dirty loose woman and the most terrible villain. - lat. 


254 
Of N about z and with 4 9 and m and the N and x e y with t in about 5 0 r and with p r about with t r and n and l and s, to and to p about zazhigateln to ohm to a cord, on all Christian world, and for the first time vozn hiccups a question: church or attract - a heystvo, sk azk and about free will or reality of determinism, senseless podrazhan iye or most y t of N and I f and N of t and with t and to and m and with t and ts and z m and, p about to about r N about e r and with TV about both l and a proud sin in a name About Aton y-ying Steen of the kt, the Satan - priro-dy, the Satan - curiosity and the Satan - passion. 
Again won against church. In three-century fight the Satan was forced sdav5atsya. Its the first gran diozn y, An - 
Abijah's tikhrist of N o the N 1 was destroyed from awful cruel 
Stew, and Satan blasphemes in gloomy otchy N and and. 
- I am God of light! You, God of revenge, overthrew exchanges I because I was light. Your jealousy of my beauty, of my gloss and light was more, than mine mogushche-a stvo, but be afraid of exchanges I now, fear my arrogance and hatred of powerful. I, eternal light, do not sleep, and my children whom I raised eternal light, - when do not sleep. N about your children, N en avidyashch iye light, fight - shchiyesya light, your children, in N izk ohm servility I creep - shchy at your legs, your children tired with fight against me dolzhn y to fall asleep. Look! I to N I z among to N I zy, I treat N and mi, I p la of highway at N them. 
B e r e gi t e with! I sacrificed to m of an illiona of mine revenges, is still lovely - 
I will sacrifice lianas, one million more y I pozhert-vy willingly because one million y - only fertilizer for that is go the Only thing which will generate the Only thing. 



And revenge of the Satan p ri highway of la. It took root into the earth, and 
the earth became oderzhim2oy. 
In thousand godu5 the mankind began to despair 
in Aage's B. Miracles of the 5 zn amine iya on the earth came true. 
Otton Veli's army to oho 3 saw the dying-away sun. 
yellow, to joint stock company of highway af wounds. In P i4me a devil personally 
visited dad With and lvestra5; seasons changed 
the sequence: snow went in the spring, tya zhk aya the thunderstorm burst in N among frosty winter. "Sacred fire" devoured meat of people, the N is scorched by ymiy shreds it fell from bones, the earth raved, and people pre-rotated in animals. During the hunger which visited during that time all of the countries y began to eat human drop. Guo - lot on human meat became Mang Iyey. P renebregat 

'' 5 5 
meat zhi votn y x, did not even turn N and it a vnim of N and I. People dolzhn y were to devour people: so pozh1 l and l of m with t and t e l N y y With and t and N of ampere-second p e r in and N and r and with y in and l and with N and m I from children, then steel of Shari t those who died on pain shy roads, pok and, N of joint stock company it ets, not N was the person, re both vsh and y sya openly to sell to highway human meat. Whether also an ox to also appeared uncountable packs from the woods and a poyed of those who else remained in zhi you x. And great стра^ the N and the earth reigned that whether it will be highway en and the population. Whether It prelates is also older than highway and N y the cities gathered also an obsuzhda, to joint stock company, at least, to keep in zhi vy sil N e y sh and h, ch that y h e l about in e h e with t in about N e in y m e r l about! 
T shch e t of N about with t and r and l and with mind and l about with t and v and t B about and, t shch e t of N about z l e y shy enemies to la of foxes each other in "treuga dei" *, tshchetzh, kings, in a crown and with a scepter, sang together with choristers mi the prayers full otchy N and I - everything is vain. 
If the B og does not help, the Satan has to help! And on chal to abuse B of RSA, to defame his St. body, op to levyvat its sacred zn amine iye. The N achatsya a harvest of the Satan Long enough by highway it eptat, sneering, otchayavshy sya: "Look to joint stock company your B og is mercy! R an azv you not vi what it is already use lyal you more you zn wants to at highway?" 
N at, e with l and m y p r about to l I am t y, the t about d and N and h e about about l highway e N e p about can. Allons" *, we will indulge entirely in the Satan. 
Christ shed the blood for the benefit of mankind of He! B of a log?! H that for the benefit if it is necessary people on each other endorsee if the earth, to joint stock company heated zhel1 z oh, e by t of N about and, and h mind and of N about and m t I with about N and to about with t I x. 
P lips this benefit will be three times mocked! N and that on - the benefit which dolzhn about to come after that zemno.' hell; in to it tse a game of ts, this future benefit - tolyyu a dream, to joint stock company everything that was promised to B a log to N and fellow countrymen che here. And bo look! C erkov, the Saint bride of Christoff, hundred la rasputn an itsa, and I sell it myself, the leader Pozo |. neyshy trade. 
At this time, when was shame to be "without the earth" when there were no landless misters, the earth was what - t of N eotchuzhdayemy. It is indivisible, to joint stock company of people, and dolzhn to remain indivisible. It passes to the senior the son \ 

Divine truce. - lat. 
Well ZhR. - f river. 
H the same needed to be done to other estates? And here, for what there was a church? The temple of B of an ozha y became a synagogue About Aton y, that father to whom the N uzhn and is dirtier - highway aya passion to generate the evil. 
B the estimated children of barons and dukes became abbots and bishops. The people and here were convoked: "you - Bira or..." The N Arad never waited for it "or", he chose. To Otto - Verseyl tells, to joint stock company of six - summer reben ok 05 was chosen the highest adherent of souls of many thousands of "sheep". He got on a chair, murmured couple of phrases from to an atekhizis and was declared the bishop. And N about d and r e e N about to z and y in and l with in about and f r and z y. N at, t about d and in z I am l and on help of a pigeon who suddenly fell to it by the head: and it was even more favorable zn joint stock company of ohms. 
At the same time whole world the scan dalizovan was honored - 
ny preemn ikam St. P etr. D5v6e wives shch and N y Provo - 
dit the beloved in p and p7y. Destinies hristi- 
anstvo operate the son evr eya 5 and dven adtsatiletn y 
alcha m to. 
The m the ilostivy father of a sin is happy. Now he is confident in the fortress of the domination. C erkov thought again. Re-for5my churches! to ri chi t the whole world. And dad Grigory 
V I I 8 p r and with t at p and e t to r e f about r m and m. e N shch and N and, oh, about p I am t 
wives shch in and, dolzhn and to be un ichtozhen and church. With di - koy5 9 jealousy the attic monk - a pas proclaims f An - 
p and e z r and h and e. With and m m about N and x, about N in about with with t and N and in l and in and e m t about N and - 
Hove against secular clergy. The m ona throws the f and to e l y into N and r about d, and into t of N and h and N and e t with I with t r and highway of N y y t e r r about river P azrush iteln y ying Steen kt the people, this eternally naked dny animal, extends boundlessly. The B yl luchsh y a case to revenge the blood-sucker who raged against the people one thousand times worse, than the possessor deputy-? And the people rush on svyashch en N ik ov which with persistence otchy N and I refuse to release the Wives, they are driven from altars, souls at, crippled or torn to parts. The N tramples down Arad, profanes, oplevyvat what was held sacred until recently. 
P the nature is forced, the church pushes away wives shch and N at with about t in r and shch e N and e m, to and to N e h and with t about e and in about t of N about e, with and t and N and N with to uyu to a dragon, whether to joint stock company the embodiment eternal gib6e0 muzhch of N y. F ana- 
the tichny madman P etro D and m and and N also goes round all And that is 
Leah, and in uncountable sermons, falls upon the Woman: "C'est a vous, que je adresse, ccume de Paradis, amorce de Satan, poison des ames, glaive des coeurs, huppes, bijoux, chouettes, louves, san gsues insa- 

9-3400	257 
tiables..." *". Theologians declared that it is necessary far away to be neighed from wives shch and N y, so to joint stock company the earth is enough to nasa 
Lena the 61st all the same will die soon, and P etr the Pawnshop 
with to and y a mustache of t and N and in l and in and e t, to and to about with N about in N about e p about l about e n and e, ch that 
marriage is a sin, in krayn I eat a case, admissible. 



The church coped with the nature successfully. Svyashchenni-to and tore off from wives y that he indulged in inexpressibly hypocritical sexual beastliness. Its marriage was Rastar bend, and here it achin the ayah of N to leave N horns to men of the flock. N oh, to joint stock company already sk an adhan oh, the celibacy was carried out almost everywhere. 
T e p e r c e r to in and about with that in and l about with e shch e with p r and in and t with I with r and z at my. If wounds to a sha it was forbidden to investigate nature of B about and, then t e p e r, in about about shch e and in about in with e m, z and p r e shch and l and p r and e and t to r and z mind at. 
To an azhdy word corresponds to the idea, and to the azhdy idea there is a being. Therefore, grammat to and are logic, and logic - zn An iye. 
Got off with it reason. If the idea is sushchest-in, then nothing should be investigated. Once you behold the world in the thoughts, and already behold IS muddy and valid. 
B dew retted razmysh la t and with enthusiasm N and neskolko3 Arie's fragments of a stotel 62 began on to brasyvatsya, to - 
tory Garun of al P and highway and 6 just translated N and the Arab - 
skiya I z y to. And here, comment on poor Aristotle, write lengths of N ye kommen thorium on kommen thorium, Calais a chat otryvk and, do I z y chn and to and Christians in ohm, outposts lyat it with a subtlety dock to azyvat Slo va's divinity, to predict its martyr a game a rank at: in total si-to a stem of Christian dogma find developed and filosofsk4i proved at Aristotle. P abutment head 
Abijah of c en y 6 becomes to N I fellow countrymen of thinkers; two demon 
fetal a mule of steel both great scientists of church F about m a6665 razmysh la et about psychology of angels, and Dun1 
With to about t invents skazochn uyu "machina cogitationis" "*" • 
if the dream corresponds to life, then the word corresponds 

I address you, outcast paradise, sobchazn the Satan, poison d\highway a sword of hearts, dochgogrivy, prechestnitsa, owls, watchitsa, insatiable bloodsuckers - fr 2023 — Moscow, Rushia 
(or Huston, Tex. or Washing-towne, D.C…“lynch”-burg; Buffaloe Bayou; Sion, whatever they’re calling it these days; it was first very likably much different -C. Ser)



A note from the translator
GœnYe Up 2? 3 Publishing House Rushin’ DerZ-Neu
YeOldBattleAxe  “Encyclopædiæ”, 2023 Re-revised edition

- 1) This work notably went for the first time ever into Russian from English circa 1995/6, but, today, no copies of it existed in English, and that statement includes having looked in the cracks, crevices, and between the lines. This translation isn’t yet perfected, mostly because it isn’t finished, but, it’s better to have the info incomplete than not at all, IOO’nion, so we warn you; forsake truth to your own pair-ill. 2) There is no plain admission of the supernatural, spirits, nor angels in this book, however, there is very much a reason for the veil guarding this information away from the remnants of truth in history. Who were the whitches? Dead people burned or do they yet live? Why did Jefferson say the “reign of the witches” was over when the “Federalist” party / “Washing-ton” were no longer in power? Things happened, and why they happened, as opposed to the boring “history” we are taught as though it were not completely wrong; or that it isn’t inherently wrong to lie to anyone, much less to children, about the nature of things, is tended to neatly, leaving one free to connect the remaining pieces for themselves and their own truth. “Kids” comes from the “He” “Brew” (Man-whitch) word “Kedoshim,” and where Hebrew is likely just a slightly modified version of the Aramaic spoken and written by “Jesus,” who was also a “sorcerer” who raised the dead (Like Joan of Arc, Jehanne D’Arc) that is one word still kept correct and sacred; and it means the “holy ones.” We owe them, so, buckle up, because this perspective could shift how an average person views the realms above, and below. Hoping to remain,

Yours in Truth and in Service,  		Olivia Wright - Lane


ISBN 5 - 86004 - 021 - 0	1995. — You shouldn’t worry too much about that ISBN, unless of course you speak Russian; or perhaps you started trying to learn, only to realize it’s the same language as English almost, simply with different letters substituted, but the words are the same. Test it out for yourself. Put your keyboard into Russian mode, and then type a random Ænglische sentence. Translate it from Russian to English on the Great Googley moogley Translator.. If we be a lyne read ye nay an hard tru word beyarnd..]

D E M ABOUT N ABOUT L ABOUT GUI I IN THE EDS OF OHU AM REVIVED ALSO I 







And with t about r and to and, z and t r and and in and in highway and e in with in about I eat t in about r h e with t in e in about p r about - sy, the N ye is connected with demonology and vedovsky process - mi, explained blossoming of these is shown y at the end of XV - on - to the chala of the 17th centuries by the actors following f. Long vre-mya it was treated to joint stock company result usual umstven-ache backwardness and insufficient intellectual progress in uk an adhan of N y y period*. Others saw prichi-ny in economic, social political and du - the hovny crisis of society which captured Western Ev-to a rop without going, however, into details. The N aiboly often meets a statement that inflating of a demo - a nomaniya (and consequently, and development of its base, nauch-ache demonology) was the reply of the lichesky church besieged kato-to progressive ideas of thinkers of Renaissance and guman a-ism whose "to ritik and to amn I am a N and to and m of N e N e about with t and in l I e t... about t in with I to about y r e l and g and o z N about y m and with t and k and i mythologies" **. However still researchers did not manage to explain with deep arguments why in light Renaissance from it I rk about vyra-zhenny interest in the person and N auk am, during an era, bo-leu a front line, according to them, than the Middle Ages, was issued the system of vedovsky processes and there was a bulk antivedovsky and demonological tr and to that that century. 
Demonic representations (whether national, scientific) - the phenomenon very complex, incorporated everything mnogoob-razy societies of cultural tradition. Reflected in pamphlets, materials of some processes, the people - Nye demonology is alloy ustoychi- 

Whether such point of view dominated especially in popular - a teratura of XIX - the beginnings of the 20th century, see we will press.: To antorovich Ya.A. Sred - nevekiovy processes about witches. M, 1990; M.A. Orlov. And storiya sno- 
Highway <** y the person with a devil. M, 1991, etc. 
V.M. Boguslavsky. Scepticism of the Renaissance and Reformation.// 
Culture of Renaissance and Reformation. L., 1981, page 22 - 23 
howl dokhristian sky, pagan tradition, mainly, in the field of ideas of the good and evil, otcha-st zn akharstvo, etc., and some representations, it is reproached eaten thanks to vliyan iyu to N and zhn oh, hristi-ansky tradition. P osledny generally mention the moments defining f un ktsion irovan iye demoniche-with to about y with t r uk t Ur y (r about l B about e with t in e N of N about about p r about and z in about l e N and I, strength of demons, a devil, witches, etc. - all these pozi-tion are taken from area scientific Christian demono-to a logiya). Highway estn the adtsaty century really became that century, N and which the splash in national interest to demonic when "the N y to zhi z-by a social and political crisis, disintegration traditsion in N ykh public relations and moral principles is called had, rapid growth irratsion an alizm found the you - Russian iye in a demonomaniye of masses" *. P erelomny time always induces people to address irrational mu as they do not see an exit in a possibility of use of their means which are available for N of itsial-ache secular, or klerikaln oh ideologies. And here, to and to p r and in and l oh, in with e a gda in with t and e t in about p r about with about with about about t of N about highway e N and and a medieval and new, humanistic element in formation of demonology and development demonoma-N of AI. And investigators, izuchayushch iye Renaissance and izn achaln about convinced of its progressiveness on srav-to a neniye with the Middle Ages, usually prove that the Renaissance is not guilty in hunting of N and witches and that the demo - a nologiya is not a product Renaissance svobodo-a mysliya"", but is one of results of crisis of the Middle Ages, whose existence chronologists - chesk coincided with the beginning of a new stage in development of cultural, culture of the Renaissance ***. However, prini-May this thesis, it is hardly possible to be content with it to and to un and in e r with and l N y m about Kommersant I with N e N and e m. 
D e y with t in and t e l N oh, of m about N about and N of N about about in about r and t about to r and z and s e c e r to in and to and to about r and N and z and c and and (in m e N highway e y with t e p e N and about to r and z and - se its theoretical ideology), about a contradiction of its practical activities to Christian moral values, however in itself to rizis, religious 


A.H. Gorfunkel. "A hammer of witches" - the Middle Ages of a .ila of Vozrozh-a deniye? / / To an ultur of the Renaissance and society. M, 1986. page 169. 
** In the same place, lake 162, 170. 
*** In the same place, page 165. 
wars, etc. * can hardly be p ri vya Zahn y only to	to the Middle Ages. To rizis in church body of an ization 
the N of an acha of N aya since the 10th century, and all efforts to Leung Iyqiev, Grigory VII, And N of N ok en Tia I I I - l and to r and t to about in r e in m e in N of N y e p about r e z st. in t and t and m and N e p e r e about r about l and negative (from the point of view of Christian doctrines z) trends in this area is observed perman en by ton oh. However for all that that witchcraft, magicians I, highways abash were known to all general stvo, I vlen and y, similar to a demonomaniya of XVI-XVII ve-k, equally and so extensive antivedovsky literatu-ry, was not. And it when the belief in razl chn ykh representatives of evil spirit was if is not deeper, then is more organic, than in Renaissance. Otsutst-in about in and l and t and p with and ho l about and h e with to and I and t of m about with f e r and, to about t about r and I p about z in about - poured tserk vi and to the state, and also parts of society to issue accurate ideological (demonology) and practical (vedovsky processes) the system of fight against these I vlen and I mi. Conditions, podtolkn uvshy oprede-lenny (by the way, not so and big) a part of the people in embraces of a devil, were created thanks to efforts and the most Catholic tserk vi, and to influence ideolo-Giya Vozrozhdeniya, and participation in it of some deyate-leu P ef ormation whose religiozn aya the intolerance horo-sho is known. The role social economic and polity-chesky f actors is also enormous here. People, Zahn and - mavshiyesya vedovsky p cancer ti to oh were probably not satisfied what the alny church in the field of spiritual needs could provide to them ofitsi-; equally they were not content and with the Renaissance ideology and culture which on the whole was alien to them not only because carried, glavn ym in the way, the city - sky harak rubbed and, most likely, was it simply not - is known **, but also because Renaissance anthropo - destroy centrism in a root is scarlet privychn uyu for people of the Middle Ages the system of world order, disproving the main is put by iya all them mirosozertsa-ny. N esmotrya on the fact that these people instead of God put a Satan and all ceremonialism of satanic rites and a sabbath yavlya- 

, * In the same place, page 169. 
It is unlikely after all it is possible to agree entirely go the following Statement of S.M. Stam: "Renaissance humanity. was ideology 
Early bourgeois, that is anti-feudal, and it means - national", 1 
/ ^там S M. Humanity and church reformational ideology / zyxwvutsrqp 
Culture of Renaissance and Reformation. L., 1981. page 35. 
las peculiar zerk aln ym it is reflected iy, the parody, about t r and c and N and e m, those m of N e m e N e e, p e r e in about r and h and in and the N and I with and about those m y upside down did not occur - the person remained in the subordinated situation in ramk ah systems, vozglav-lyaemy only not B an ogham, and a Satan. People, zn joint stock company omy with ideology guman a-ism (the speech here dolzhn and to go, to - N e h N about e, about about r about and N and x) and with about z N and t e l N about and N and l and z and r about in and in - their highway it vozmozhn ye consequences, oshch ushch avsh and x N and myself all its vl I am a N and e, especially, if on mentality they wasps - tavatsya by people of the Middle Ages, could not satisfy transfer of the prices a Torah of all system is visible iya the world from B of RSA on the person. So to Arti N aln aya ref an ormation of bases mi-r about p about N and m and N and I am a N e and z e N about in y and in and l and h e l about in e to and and z m about - a rolled psychological track as in rezulta-those to it became N eyasn ymiy including many moral imperatives, which it rukovodstvoval-sya earlier and which in privychn oh to it a medieval system were everything uvya Zahn y with B an ogham. "In the fight for secular human culture" * (as if wounds to a sha it were not human), during which deystvi-telno occurred historically pozitivn y shift in the field of N auk about the person, especially natural, ide-alogians guman and a zma made this, at first sight, N ezametn y transfer of joint stock company of the prices of t, imevsh y far I go - shchy consequences. If before on AI a table is lingering - tiya human life decided harmonious, teolo- and h e with to and r and z r and about t and N of N about y with and about those m about y, on t e r by N e m to about that r about y with l at and l about B about e with t in e N of N about e N and h and l oh, that t e p e r e t about t with t e r - e N ub and r and l with I, and c e N of t r and l N about e m e about that z and N and m and l of the h e l about in e to. Haraktern oh, odn Acre that the ideology of the Renaissance could not offer society uniform, otvechav-Shuya to interests and inquiries of everything, the moral system of values; very quickly this ideology approached already the human crisis, the N who found vyrazhe-n and e, v h and with t of N about with t and, in t in about r h e with t in e to U.Sh e to with p and r and, M.S e r in and N - Teso, B.P ask Alya. P ri N of c and p An tropotsen a trizm, razru-highway aya all traditsion the N uyu a system mirovozzren iya, ob-ektivno promoted release of all cheloveche-sky potency irrespective of them harak a Terra though, without - it is conditional, in the track Tats theorists guman a-ism appealed to luchsh to it in the person, at the same time trying to create also the known system moral regu- 

In the same place, page 30. 
lyator. However as N alichy this system and e e r and about t and with t and v and l and s c e l and to about m in z and v and s and m about with t about t of the h e l about in e - 
it could not work. P the stop of the last at the center pushed into the background that oprede-lyalo (let and in the theory) spiritual and moral life of medieval society - B ozhestvenny. The N yn e is a B ozhestvenny spiritual would be put into dependence from and about l about gi h e with to about go about r and N and z in m and, h e in l about in e to and, h t about p r I am m about p r about t and - vorechit to christian teaching. Here it is possible even to speak about the known f the Renaissance ormalizm, i.e. about its address owing to action of it f the actor to outer side it is shown iya at his An by Alize and raskry-Tia, more precisely, to manifestation to joint stock company to that even if it also is result internal, sincere p r about c of the EU with and. And m e N of N about e t and m, n and N and highway in z of l I d, about Kommersant I with N I e t with I partly the interest of revivalists in all vnesh-to them, f to izichesky manifestations zhi zn and and activity of the h e l about in e to and and and N and l and z and r and about that with e t and h e with k and m and p about N I am t and I am m and in the annex to the person abstract, not concrete - to Nome. That is why it seems to us possible to say that the similar outlook which was not leaving me-hundred to the lyator standing out of and above the person moral regu-, a moral psychological support and, it is rather yes - its consequences, psychological conditions, that zhi-the teysky atmosphere that it was created as a result of times - twisting of society and impact of Cart-birth ideology on it, in own way promoted N an epriyatiya, narya-du with of itsialno-church, and these views, for - stavly to address the world of powers of darkness. Though, konech-but, action of it f the actor does not follow preuvelichi-in and t. 
Speaking about the place of Catholic church in business sozda-a niya it is also studied iya a demonic pantheon, and also fight against N by it, it is necessary to notice that it ideo-to logs prin is adlezhit by the leading role in creation of the system of demonic forces. If to look at that, to joint stock company with them lines national demonology zhi-allocates tel of the other world, to Arti N and this, on the one hand, will not be new and traditional, and with another - is surprisingly poor vizualn ymiy images and is poorly developed (especially in England). It is possible sk the Azat that the Church itself partly is a creator of that siste-we against which fought. P odavlyayushchy pain - the shinstvo of demonological treatises belongs 
pe 
R At church authors that is quite justified also 
because since XI I I centuries sorcery gradually nachi-aches to be treated to joint stock company religious crime and consequently, the church reads out the duty bo-rotsya from N and m of N about only in the 16th century in works tserkov-the N ykh writers appears in details painted hierarchy of demonic legions and their leaders (see N an aprimer the composition And ogan N and Weier "About the pseudo-monarchy of demons"), only then appear podrob-ny and colourful is described iya by highway abash and (M. Delrio, P. de Lang to p). A question of why the church so revno-stno addressed fight against witchcraft and magic of names - N about in e that in r e m I, about the h e N with l about e N Z and N about with I N and with t r and N and c y the compositions I rk and e to Arti N y activity angrily - mean demons, explaining them with intrigues everything, nachi-to N aya from radik the ulit and to it tea stikhiyn ymiy disasters, to and t about l and h e with k and e and p r about t e with t and N of t with to and e p and with and t e l and m e in N highway e in with e-go, N and N ash a look, also m e N of N about in e t about y about l and with t and i and m e N of N of t and to both m and means against humanistic outlook would think of need of N apryamy about r about t with I. Authors of many the track of Tats, creating them, whether often ime-in view of more public peace and an order in the state, than direct polemic with but - sitel of new ideology. P aradoksalno, but the fact - opposing at the same time and traditional the people - ny beliefs and customs, these writers kept in the is produced iya numerous folklore m about t and in y, with in I z and N of N y e with t e in m of N y m and s and l and m and, with y r and in t e in m with and - my a positive role in maintaining cultures - an inheritance leg. However abundance of similar compositions go in about r and t, k about N e h N about e, and about t about m, h t about with and m and c e r to about in in l and - tse some representatives tried to answer so them in the way with N and the questions raised before it the crisis situation which developed in society. Sde-lat it so, to joint stock company she wanted, it did not turn out; objyas-thread all failures and failures, proceeding only from tra-ditsionny a game of a tseption of the good and evil, it was not possible any more therefore the demonic subject to the middle of the 17th century an ear - dit in political and cultural zhi zn and most the European states of N and zadn y the plan. 
And nteresno and the relation of figures of Vozrozhde-of N iya to a witchcraft problem. It was most razn ym - from p ri I ti I (with izvestn ymiy reservations) to provozglashe-N iya it I vlen and I an invention ignorant and pre-stupny tserkovn ik. At the same time, some izvest-ny figures of humanistic culture gave Solid - 

8
ny it is given to a question of fight against sorcery. Here it is possible to call names and and N and B of Aden which published in 1580 "Demonomaniya of witches", the English king James I with his "Demonology" (the truth nearly at zhi zn and on - invited "the most educated fool"). Spraved-livo doubting in razlichn ykh to it to retn ykh the moments magical p cancer ti to and (flights to highway abash), all of them - trusted in kozn and a devil and it deya to N and I. 




P redlagayemy us to N and hectare aims before at everything - go pozn joint stock company to omit the reader from a darkness the track of a tatami which N and and about l e e p about l of N about and about r and g and n and l N about r and with to r y in and yu t of of l and in N y e plots and p it I ti I demonology of the XVI-XVII centuries, and not in her "scientist" varian those, but more likely in on - native, to be exact - to joint stock company were perceived the ideas coldov-stvo in razl chn ykh social groups of euro of that time - peysky society. And Menno therefore here not vklyuche-ny the translations of texts and x classical demonologi-chesky the track of Tats, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, "M an uraveynik" And an oganna of N Itera or the mentioned composition And ogan N and Weier. P redstavlenny the track Tats, dialogues, pamfle-you, letters give the chance to recreate to artin at on - N iman iya an image of the witch, a devil, B of RSA, demons, An - gel (with rare exception) at average, national level. It is promoted also by social composition of authors of these works - from the monk and svya-shch en to N and to and to the professional writer. H and concealing these compositions, it is possible to track easily dynes amik at treason - ny uk an adhan of N y x pon yat - from p ri zn An and I guilts of witches, their equalities with demons (And oann Trittemy) to otritsan iya their joint stock company tivn oh roles (J. Gifford) and full of N e in and N of N about with t and (F. f about N of Highway p e e, S.S and r and N about B e r e r and j), about t of categorical condemnation of one and all - monichesky forces to sympathetically positive otno-a sheniye to inkuba and succubuses (L. - M. Sinistrari). Ha - r and to t e r N oh, of h t about and z m e N e N and e p about z and ts and y with about in r e m e the N of N and to about in p ro - proceeds, glavn ym in the way, in the same environment, church that once again speaks about complexity of a task and impossibility of removal of categorical judgments on the matter. P ok azateln oh, that already to N of an achal of the 17th century in a number of the countries there is peculiar time - maintaining pon yat "witch" and "devil" when the world of subjects - 

9
ny forces it is investigated in a separation from p cancer ti to uyushch and x ve-a dovstvo. As a result, a diet an alistichesky 17th century f a joint stock company-tichesk Zac Ryvayet to vedovst-vu and demonology in the European N auchn ykh circles uga-sat this problem, and interest. So proceeded till 1830 when appeared "P an isma about sorcery" Walter Scott, laid the foundation for a new era in AI of this cultural istori-e with to about go I in l e in N and I is studied h. 

M L. Timofeev 
PART ONE 
"All earth 
it is full of demons... 
To * pr.t 1.14 KYUVICH 
, ovich 
! fiv of the H 
> r And gorevich 
Highway and D S VI of the H 
> with! si 1eich rorn h ') r with in and h 
i. i p) V P of H ii, i £ And Ch 


M AND N ABOUT VEE 1 
SHOUT H ABOUT T ^ P P AND H 


LU H of DrchVI of the H 
and M L I Yu VEE of the H 
about vi h 
"YUVI OF THE H 
ikgorovich 
f I S About VEE of the H 
Wa 1eryevich adsvich cheevn h \. 1skseevich about r about vi h 
Ioann Trittemy 
THE TRACK THE TAT ABOUT SILLY WOMEN OF N Y X LIU DIAKH 
AND ABOUT TO OLDUN AH 
Ioann Trittemiya, 
head of abbey Saint Yakov 
at Gvrbipol, is once eye of the abbot shpangeimsky 
the treatise about wicked men 
and about sorcerers 

(The III question to Maximilian I, 
to the emperor Roman) 
Question pervyy1: zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJ why angry people, bad and silly women - 
ny in relation to belief, to joint stock company of an ova that wives shch and N y, koto-ry we in a popular speech call witches, can pove-levat spiteful spirits when people good and re-vnostneyshy adherents of Christian belief not mo-gutnut neither kind spirits to operate, nor eternally angry? 
P to a rezhda with what to answer this question, I will tell so: 
about all deya and I x divine greatness am observed by N in
the invariable harmony of a sort and order of beauty, and this nekolebimost is reached corresponding raspolozhe-niy all steps and gradation. And bo without I correspond - a shchy order nothing stays in this world. P ri such order free will 2, which the Creator all - 
chesky gave to people, not isp3ytyvayet oppressions from - 
hundred-bones of the power to which let will remain less in 
that order which was apprehended from the master of the creations by the first person. That is why N ik that from kind decent smertn ykh, guided sobstven-ny zhelan iy, is equal also to N ikto from angry people, ostav-lenny N and an arbitrariness of destiny only because of them ho-a teniye, thanks to the Lord merciful is not a sinner. P in an odobny way we are excited just zhelan iy and kind spirits if podtver-zhday the works the pious faith in Christ which we carry in the heart. That is similar - mu, to joint stock company the following to good will makes good people equal on spirit to angels, and the perversity of angry people does them by similar to demons. That is why plo-the hy and spoiled people, than .portitsya more because of sob-stvenny spiteful zhelan and I, especially become on mood similar to angry demons. In turn, close friendship results from similarity simpa-tiya, and gradually results from it also mutual dove-ry. And z trust of the lowest to the highest the power, or N astoyashch aya, or feigned f alshivy is born. And so, at vicious people whose power seems to the similar power of demons it is result of them neoby- 
tea perversity. To an ogd ikh4 aspirations begin on - 
in a dobny way and sk to azhatsya, they or reject, whether - 
bo overcome the insidiousness of demons which is found them, or there are and mi, to joint stock company also they. Because - Mona among themselves are not equal slyness or Mind at all, but other in comparison with another much prevoskho-dit it cunning, speed a mouse a flax iya and nepraved- 

15 
nost of the passions. So, for example, those from their N, to - t about r y e p about t r I with and yu t about with N about in y z e m of l and, about l highway e with in I z and N y with e e the top areas also inhabit they caves and grottoes; others in comparison with them are much weaker, and it comes down that they are afraid of swords, rods and threats is frightening their their people. Concerning them it is possible for du - mother that it to joint stock company of times those demons whom we call energumena. Demons, N akhodyashchiyesya in bigger from - daleniya from the earth and thinner by the nature, face people less often. In turn, wicked men because of the tendency make affairs, the most half of ny debauchery, becoming at the same time extraordinary pokho5zhi- 
mi on demons who grant them the friendship. In 
communications with it, they become extraordinary impudent and accept top of demons whose similarity of the power they use, however not real, violent, but false. And bo demons constantly support time of the people subordinated to themselves in a condition of perversity, at - tvoryayas at the same time that their dominion is shaken, and they willingly submit to them, as if on kind in le with to l about N I I with to p about in and N about in e N and yu 6. And oh, p about and with t and N e, n and k the t about will not tower the power vysh e demons, besides a forehead - a century which belief in domination And Christ's isusa of B of RSA of ours becomes dolzhn ym image pleasant to B of regional public institution because so about truly believing in the Lord And an isus govo-rit 7P an ison iye: "And it gave them the power over all of the demon - 
m and". P to oety also similar operate demons it 
bad people whom friendship and communications with them do by slaves and a subrank en to N ymiy. So if who - nibud from ra-the b which are given rise in grya zi for a long time towers (that happens quite often) and, being connected by friendship, privle-repents to management, without objections receiving everything that is required further to approve the domination, at least and equal royal, then near it people bad and rejected, consisting in friendship with demons, obna-ruzhivat more impudent shamelessness and imitate them; I do not speak about those manifestations of the power which they show thanks to similarity bad ha - a rakter. P oety they also receive everything that they will demand from demons, in all meeting the N ykh is confused or, on the contrary, a matter of course except that there is forbidden by divine resolution - it they cannot find. However not everywhere the rejected and wicked men gather; do are those, with koto-an eye demons sign what - nibud the contract, and 
witches over whom also ustan the Devil avlivat the protection and those which communicate with demons and received in the people of N azvan iye necromancers. 
There are two types of people who are allowed for operating 
demons. 
First, are those which, thanking the sacred sta before the favourite Lord, prin the yawl from N his power to trample down the head of an ancient dragon, to joint stock company ovy in pervonachal-ache churches was it is given and to apostles, his followers, and also Wuchang and to am about which in the sacred Gospel State - pod says: "In 8 mya mine demons is rejected also to joint stock company 
z m to it at N and h t about and yu t". 
The second look consists of people to whom for the sake of on - a row in C of an erkva of B the ozhiya granted the right izgon yat of demons from bodies of people. And this action of attendants of exorcists happens in C erk vi B an ozhiya according to the order svya-shch en N and to and. 
Besides, there are two kinds of people, zhelayushch povele-to vat them demons who find it, Zac lyuchy the forbidden and harmful contracts with in N and mi. 
P the ervy most harmful family of these people consists of witches who enter with demons the agreement, solemnly declaring that they voluntarily from - are given them in property and arrive on constant service. To joint stock company oh this most harmful sort lyu-Tay can create degrees zlodeyan iya, any person, zhi vushch and y, about N aimudreysh y Caesar, in your empire will not be able to describe. And bo denying B of RSA to joint stock company a source of everything, both Christ's belief, and sacred he is baptized iye, they offer the mind and a body to demons, bringing into the yaniye upset sosto-the sorcery of people and the cattle, p ri chi N I I harm and even killing with it them. N et such disease which (with a permission of B ozhy) they cannot send N and people, so to joint stock company he and, observing articles aforesaid dogo-the thief, expose themselves servants of demons and do anything, wishing to be compared only to N them. P oety they are also not stood anywhere, but more likely everywhere they are driven by B an ogham, the creator of all real which orders the following: "e permit N to witches zhi t" 9. Whether some of them magical Zac N of An and I am m and call demons, Others attract them with entreaties and zhertvoprinosheni-to a hole, other cause them to the aid of the neche-a stiya by means of uzhasn ykh Dejan Iyy and ceremonies. Sle-dovatelno, it is not surprising that witches seem vla-stvuyushchy over demons with whom they became skho- 

17 
zhi a will ungodliness it is also uniform odushn ym vza mn ym obrashche-niy to bad in the human race. 
The second family of vicious people, zhelayushch and x to rule over demons, it t0e which we in a popular speech of N azyvay 
N e to r about m and N of t and m and 1. About N and go in about r I am t, h that with p about m about shch yu r and z N about about 
whether sorts Zac of N of An and y they can convoke demons in a circle, find them in a crystal or the corked vessel and to do them visible. These most harmful people, half of ny falsity and superstitions, make and e bad - la, to joint stock company and x the kind person will not be able to himself even voob-r and z and t. 
To attract to itself N and service of demons, they is-use, glavn ym in the way, the most outrageous zhertvop r and N about highway e n and ya and s about in e r highway e N of N about about t to r y t about z and to l yu h and yu t about N and m and the contract. They extend a set of a razla chn ykh mean to N and zhechek, poln ykh an ungodliness and a lie, with is entered - N ymiy in a deceptive way of names of Amy ancient filo-sof and Wuchang there ykh, distributing which, they enter in for - a bluzhdeniye of many careless and curious lyu-Tay, carrying away them in the zapadn yu. They would promise them nevero-I t of N y e N e y l and c y, a l mustache y highway and in to about t about r y e, l yu d and about m and N of N y m and become dependent in the way on their N. 
By means of rings, pendants, images whether zagovo-a ditch and Zac of N of An and y they, according to them, can he is clever sh to ityit angry demons and to squeeze them in a circle, in a crystal or another to joint stock company oye a receptacle, and those N and all questions will give them separate answers. All of them promise it, however ash e time will be in N a little people to whom uk an adhan of N y m will obey in the way bad and spiteful spirits because State - pod the fair decision does not permit that - inquisitive and inclined to new people preneb-regalia Christ's belief and if necessary stremi-foxes to receive the answer at demons. Nevertheless, to whom povinu-evil spirits yutsyatsya whether the N ye Zac is called by N of An and I am m and nekroman-t, without hesitating, accomplices of N and principles of the signed contract pass to them to joint stock company. The rest, koto-ry the obvious majority, evil spirits refuse on - to vinovatsya though those and were not afraid all this time Zahn and - to matsya by godless art of N ekroman comrade. And therefore in N ash and days of N achin at strongly to extend razn ye burden, and at many the love grows cold, and slish to ohm these proud and extraordinary false people amplify; and how many they would not be despised by demons for the early views, they manage to enter in zabluzhde-ny many firm people in belief. P over to me, Caesar, 

1 8 
that these of a lie to the Vyya people, zhi vushch and e in your sacred empire, an essence the most spiteful; they are that deep source from which appear but - the Vyya witches and the sorcerer y. They promise a lot of things and all of you - dumyvat. Because everything that them on them to N a yoke is promised, a lie essence to the Vyya vydumk and, and nothing they show I believe - shchy, except crimes, cunning and extraordinary is-kusny deception. To an ogd to it azhtsya that they op-in a redelenny way it is connected y with demons, by all hundred - it novitsya clearly that from participation in their affairs is necessary to joint stock company it is possible to run rather as if from terrible most terrible torments. And bo the N and Dejan Iya of these necromancers in mno-a zhestvo run together demons and to support them in on - a chat artful business, they if can, vow them. Whether to an ogd they are caused by means of Zack by N of An and y, they reject any comparison with people, however despite this abduct minds vyzyvayushch them them. 
There is also a N of EC and y a kind of people as silly, so and full of prejudices - I mean those which, without wishing to have the intercourses with demons, pol-zutsya, nevertheless, in the affairs razlichn ymiy fal-by highway the ivy receptions peculiar to demons, and absolutely unlawful. Because they believe that in the objects used by them it is concluded and conducted - Kaya and melt N aya force, and for the sake of it they make time - personal awful Dejan Iya against Christ's belief. P about - the truth, will lack time to estimate everything them be-zumstvo which they pursue us. 
eobkhodimo also in brief to tell N also about why kind and fair people do not try to obtain the power over demons. To joint stock company and m in the way similarity of bents of business - et bad and impious people ravn ymiy to demons, that is Kim in the way dissimilarity of bents at all from - talkivat from N their kind and fair. Between people on ustremle-to niya not mozheg to be not similar and opposite the N and to joint stock company oh of friendship, but is constant in about z N and to and e t r e z to about e p r about t and in about with t about I n and e and n e N and in and with t. The t and m e where there is no N ik joint stock company oho of similarity zhelan and y, is not present also close svya-zi; there can be no trust in the relation the friend 
to
  To the friend, mutual inclination by production che- 
go- or wonderful. Also and you, nice Caesar, I will be - chi a great governor, you bring closer to yourself that - or Friendly, but you resist absolutely protivopolozh-to Nome in your N to rava and other than your zhelan and I. °avno people kind and just, it is constant soprotiv- 
lyayushchiyesya to the most vicious zhelan iyu demons, not mogug to enter with N them into alliance as do not want and not with - Zahn N ymiy glashatsya to be svya, but in every way them from - run and refuse similar meetings. Here poche-mu that is false mn en iye on which say that demons just a subrank yatsya their authorities. Because communication if it is not preceded by similarity zhela-N and y cannot be strong; there cannot be consent between opposite styam; there cannot be a friendship between N epokhozhy. Aude - N of Acre demons will obey not all wicked and damned men, but, on krayn it a measure, that with whom they posredst-vy contracts and agreements unite in the union and to - tory they can consider not in to an acha, to joint stock company of the true. Having heard that they are called, they voluntarily hurry N and I will meet; odn Acre at atom they say that they to it prin are uzhdat. And so, there is nothing surprise - telny, the most excellent Caesar that the bad, evil and spoiled spirits sometimes, to joint stock company tell, povi-nutsya to people who, to joint stock company we sk an azalea, are brought together with them by unfavourable disposition and usual human rage. The N about anything of Christians in at cannot wish to be operated demons, leaning N and similarity in bad deya of N and I x. P oety if who in this zhi zn also wished to have in Kacha - a stvo of companions of harmful spirits, then in the future he bu-is put together with N them to burn in an infernal plamen and. N about so to joint stock company fair people cannot operate sacred An of a gelama of B of an ozhya mi, they of own will assimilate to them. And so, I think that, leaning on sk an adhan - Nov vysh e, it will be easy to answer N and questions if we remember about razl chi I x in representations of these people. Because no matter how there was much in C of an erkva of B ozhy resist - chivy people in belief whose piety much on - rescue can find, nevertheless, even there are today those which seek to receive from angels nagra-du, giving as the basis either sanctity, or that they are afraid of demons, or the close unification. P roiskhodit that N yn esh and e people do not manage N - because of sanctity - spiteful spirits and not zaslu-zhivat friendship of sacred angels. If who stremit-sya to yuy that gives the chance sover-to highway to at miracles in C erk vi, to joint stock company once did sanctity degrees Saints, then they can become more powerful and operate demons, and also have friendly participation he is blissful - ny spirits. And bo it is defined that sacred and lovely B of regional public institution people in initial of C of the Christ's erkva were sil- 

20 
it, promoting ustan ovlen iyu she is kind among mortal, using blessings of kind spirits, than an ungodliness of bad affairs. Whether the m can make-legged miracles pribega-yushchiya to Zack of N of An and I am m, but by means of angels of Saints any jealous admirer Gospoda of B of RSA can create similar. 
Question second: from where do witches possess with gol conducted - to about y with and l about y, h t about p about z in about l I e t and m with about in e r highway and t with t about l m of N about go different and surprising, besides at the same time what or how many any kind person could not sover-highway and t z and vs yu with in about yu and z N? 
E with l and m y p about e for l and e to m to r and t to about about t in e to t and t and N and e t in about p r about with, it is obligatory sk azhy that all power - from the Lord of B of RSA without whom and to joint stock company aya a creature of nothing to make N not 
will be able. And bo Christ speaks in sacred Evang1e1lii: 
• without M enya you will be able to make nothing" from where oche- 
it is visible that the power to do what - or is granted to any che-a loveka from the Lord of B of RSA, but not from somewhere whether bad people will make or good. And here what is told by great Augustine: "The will of B of an ozha I is the first and vyssh aya the reason of all f izichesky types and dushevn ykh dvizhe-niya, nothing else. And let the lichestvenneyshy and huge republic it will become clear to each creation in this ve-that not from secrets oh, invisible, and also umopostigayemy in y with highway e y in l and with t and and m p e r and about r and e that a mustache of t and N and in l and in and e in t with I and the l and is allowed to t, but on N eizjyasn imy justice of races - a predeleniye of N of fencings and N of joint stock company an adhan and y". That is why, about tse-zar, not dolzhn about to doubt that this power of witches through which (and with assistance of a demo - it is new) they produce uzhasn ye and N evidan N ye deya N and I is given them to resist from the Lord of B of RSA to whose will the N ikto not mo-zht and without vozdeys1tviya, which people 
even a hand twin to utnut not cm ozht 2. Draw conclusions 
Saint doctors, that neither demons, nor witches will be able though that - in general to make - whether to the person to do much harm whether to an animal - if the Almighty B og will not wish, will not agree and will not provide them the power to make that they durn ym zhelan iy the already decided sde-lat. If the B og does not wish and will not agree, then the °dna a creature will be able to make nothing; in an opposite slu-of the h and e, e with l and y y l about in about z m about N about t oh, h e go about N of N e e l and l and with what not soglash it would atsya, from this with need 
Settlement 
edut that the B og is powerless and cannot forbid that 
Becomes in spite of himself. N about so to joint stock company to azhdy a forehead - a century, being tvarn ym, it depends on B of RSA, nothing not 
also I thanks to which it and * does that - or, and can carry out the desirable can do without it zhelan. And so, everything that is done by witches, occurs with pozvole-N iya B ozhy without which will they can do nothing; because if the B og will not agree to make that they want, then and m, it will be allowed to demons because all power proceeds from the Lord of B of RSA under whom all real stvut and lives because It - the prime causes and all things, and from his N we prin imay free will, from his N also of m y m about e m p about l uch and t t oh, of h t about x about t and m; N about m of N about and e l yu d also consider that they not human art make 
they those the villain of N iya which make, but at sodeyst1 - 3 
the Viy of demons whom He made tone to them on p ri a sort 
and after long experiments for production mimoletn ykh miracles. N e are called udiviteln ye f f ekta, about - exhausted by witches, what they use at sorcery? These are the heads of the dead, toads, snakes, time - lichn ye metals, f igurka and so forth. The N about prois-goes it from created these zn joint stock company and the Devil who, having been filled with pride, aspires at least on vi-dimost sravn yatsya with B an ogham. And it is valid, to and to All - the able B og established in C of the erkva certain tainst-va, to joint stock company ovy dolzhn ym in the way with support prislu-zhi vayushch and x uk azyvat N and rescue and lead to advantage and N and the benefit of people, and the Devil who does not wish bo-l e e, to and to y t with about h t e N of N y m r and in N y m of B about at, about e in r about to and to a certain stvo of secrets established t in which he helps it you - zvan N y, or svya Zahn of N y with it contracts the worker and if the B og allows, then he creates the evil about which about - with and l; e with l and e the N e p about z in about l and t, about N, in about shch e m, n and ch e about N e will be able to make. Because the creator of all acts of witches and nekro-manti - the Devil who through tendencies of the on - central parts, is chosen as N ykh it earlier carries out in podvlast-ny to it matter zhelan in N oye Dejan Iye, sometimes real, sometimes only to azhushch eesya. The witches who are already spoiled by the zhelan iy and f the act of partnership Second World War-lek atsya through soglashen iye in the contract with Amy's demon, and 
poluchayut1 4 from N of their N what zn joint stock company and and symbolical 
about tm etk and. And x zashch and ton and to am and demons soon and predsta- 
yut. There is no N ichy in these harmful actions of demons stronger, than thoughtless trustfulness of witches which is multiplied by the contract and a solemn promise because however more demon of Amy, or them zn am and they will be seduced by joint stock company in their belief, that those will achieve bigger influence this cooperation. With Lish a lump zlostn aya 


22 

the perversity nastr1oyeniya witches plunges them nekoto- 
eye in the way in gn e in 5, so demons, gathering, sra- 
storages take control of their mind and bring closer to themselves, and, on - falling N and their N, mark if the B og permits that, their signs and sign contracts with them. P in an odobny way and P Lawton in the book "About Poetic Madness" said: "In the same way wives shch and N y-vak the khan to and, not zdra- 
to the Vyya mind, drink honey and milk from the rivers; zdor1ovye 
it is not able to be drunk". Lish ivsh is shower and 6, pokhi- 
shchenny the demon, and with the assistance of the last they a way - 
ny to bad business. We for certain know that ve7dmy 
sometimes drink in fast streams an animal of m aslo 1, to - 
tory the N and to joint stock company differently cannot appear there, to joint stock company only by means of demons. P in an odobny way if who - or draws N and himself hatred, whether the person, a horse, they just are eager for their death, without thinking of anything, but only about mshch en AI, take then privychn ye and izvest-ny to them for sorcery of a thing, call demons, - monstriruya at once established by them zn to joint stock company and and from - fermentations and if they that - because of absence sobstven-ache bravery cannot make then they to a trace - yut for and h1 8 rasporyazhen iya. Others which did not obey to demons and did not sign the contract with them Even if they also know suitable means for a stake - Dovstva, it is equal also a way of a deystvovaniye no matter how these zn showed joint stock company and, seldom nevertheless try to obtain uspe- 

23 
ha. P to atom no that among them zn the joint stock company of omy demons has - sya. And bo extraordinary N the administrator of N y the Devil with C erkovyyu Christ's aspires sravn yatsya, but, N ep ri to aya N, it cannot un ichtozhit the Christ's Body, to joint stock company and e znachi-telny words magic Zac of N of An and y it proizno-forces; and the demon will seldom meet such person, to - tory itself could ityit a subrank with the help to - go in about r and whether ho I p r and e in t about m and ch and t and yu in t with I r and z in l and h N y e with and l in N y e Zac N of An and I and are shown by t razn ye zn to joint stock company and and from - brazhen iya. And bo if he also meets people, is located - N ykh to it, but not Zac Lyuchavsh and x with it the contract, then it 
not 1obladayet and mi Amy's sorcerer on the rights sobstvenni- 
to and 9. He is the one who by means of impious arts 
convokes, using awful plots, demons in a round dish, in a mirror or in what - nibud other receptacle, but ik joint stock company oho the effect does not follow N therefore h t about l and about about N p r about t and in about with t about and t in l and with t and B about a, l and b about e D I in about l despise this inquisitive person who did not bring to it to la of a tva. And bo three things are necessary for sorcery without what also its implementation cannot take place: spiteful and vedminsky zhelan and I mi spoiled a shower and, near - which cooperation with the Devil, but first of all - bo-zhestvenny razresh en iye. And if one of these conditions does not coincide with others, then sorcery cannot take place. And bo if the B og does not allow, neither the Devil, nor the witch will be able to make that. And if the Devil does not move towards zhelan and I mi bad zh0en shch and N y, then she to N ika- 
whom sorcery not p swarms zvedet2. And N aprotiv, if bu- 
is put to be absent the witch, the devil will not make N ik and - whom sorcery. The devil uses bent of the violent witch as if the skillful tool for action without which it cannot the reasons ityit the evils. And to joint stock company the demons differ on force and refinement of tricks, and witches are allocated with force not identical, but to azhdy in own way; so demons meet big or exchanges sh to them difference in the nature. Because their childbirth and raz2lichayutsya they is numerous between 
myself on defined a step en I am m 1, to the nature of their month - 
tozhitelstvo, that is those places, where P ovelitel - whether N izvergn uta padsh iye gela An. 
P the ervy family of demons of N azyvatsya "ogn en by N ym" 22. They rush near vyssh their layers of air and to Judgment guo dn I N of an ikogd will not go down N the Izh, but constantly pre-will be in sublunary space. They have no nickname - whom the intercourse with zhi vushch and mi on the earth people. About - 

24 
the monk, zhi vushch and x near the moon y, Saint Augustine svide-telstvut in the work "About Christian Struggle" with d e I blow shch and m about brazo m: "the demon y N e Ob melt N and N to an eba where an essence the sun and stars, but all of them rotate in under - lunar areas". It about their N, to joint stock company I consider, Apulya told that this demonic movement is the movement of fiery beings because also Aristotle utverzh-gave that in the N ykh furnaces often is heated beings who all the age of Provo - dit on fire because on fire they are born see restless small zhi to the Vyya and on fire die, and to the place from where they occur, is-chezy, come back. They have no N ik joint stock company oho of the message with the sorcerer of a yama because if they are late on fire, then, on the reasons e the subtlety, they cannot make the body tangible or create it from sgu-shchenny air. 
The second family of demons of N azyvatsya "vozdushn ym". They, wandering on the sky, live already closer. If some can go down N the Izh, then, having created themselves those - the Leningrad Region from more condensed air, they sometimes are visible to people. H asto, with a permission of B of an ozha I, they privodya2t in nervousness air, excite thunders and not - 
weathers 3, and everything together unites on destruction 
the human race, moving property inclined sty passions human. They are allocated with great pride and envy, create continuously waves en iya; their bodies pok are dug than - that firm, and N akhoditsya they not in one place, and not one all of them have the form, but mno-gy of them often change, according to mnogoob-r az and I eat with about with t about I of N also I. About N and in y z y in and yu t with I z and to l and N and N and I am m and witches and are excited to confusion and the evil. And in general, they have temper cruel and rough, are stout is distraught iya, that is why they zamysh la yut a great number of N eozhidan ykh intrigues and when they make the N apaden iya, odes - seek to make to N it vtayn e, and others of the reasons yat violence openly. B lagodarya to cooperation with these demons, witches are so strong for sorcery as far as they can follow the main thing uchastni-a lump from them soobshchestva4. In zhi ti and sacred An tone iya my God - 
stvenny Af of An Asya y 2 said that air is full of a demo - 
us about what broadcast earlier and M of erkuriya call three times - shiya: "it is obvious that whether any part of the world of highway en and presence of demons". The Saint Amvrosi y 25 says: * the world of virtues of Saints because it ispor-is full of decorum is full". That is why and demons P Lawton and, restless 

25 
in air, in the form of the dense shining snow, also m r and with with to and z and to t about n and h are visible e to l and yu shch, e with l and those in t e e n and e and z in e with t - a leg of time will incessantly look h a continuous look in heaven of N and the sparkling sun, but I not zn ayu whether an object in air from real essence is caused, or am laid by N y the look represents f alsh ivy about - times, and not without prejudice to feelings. Nevertheless, it is easy for it to obtain the evidence from the N ykh is given it is frequent - ny experiments. 
The third family of demons we are N azyvay "terrestrial". They, in the h e m m y p about h t and N e with about m of N e in and e m with I, y l and n and z in e r of N ut y about the sky on the earth for the pregreshen iya. About their N svyateysh y the father and the Christ's martyr And gn at y ogonosets wrote B not - when in one message to zhi a tel of m of the Hilt so: "N et nothing luchsh6e, than to have the world in which unichtozhen7o 
all about ruzh e2 to joint stock company of heavenly, and terrestrial spirits" 2. 
And z these demons some stay in forests, and also in groves, arranging lovush to and okhotn ik am. Others live in Quality Departments dug p Olya x, and at night they force to wander travelers; some of them hide - sya in inaccessible places, and also in caves. Ostal-ny, less terrible and uneasy, enjoy that detain people in the dark. Also they are conducted not by one passion, but razn y mi, so to joint stock company all of them obu-razla revayema chn ymiy passions, odn Acre all of them pre-are executed by the evil. Some of N like constantly stra-highway to ityit them people is visible iya, others prefer zavle-to at slush ayushch them them predsk an adhan iya mi about the future, - bark to be surprising. N ekotory of their N act with and m diligence that people, N the Japanese yatn ym in the way brought to fury, or tormented melankho-with Leah, are frightened, upset health or umira-yu t, about with about in e r highway e N and and h e go m y h and shch e bonds of N and e m p about about p y t at. So, the Saint I oann Zlatoust in 28 the third to N a yoke "About about - 
vision, to the monk From a taga ri yu" says: "Excessive 
despondency is more harmful than any demonsky action because also the demon if in whom dominates, then dominates through un yn iye and if un ichtozhitsya un y by N and I, then and from the demon you will not tolerate N ik joint stock company oho of harm". This family of demons not - somnenno zn joint stock company of ohms to oldun yam because of changeability on - with tr about e n and ya and l e to about m y with l and ya, t and to and to about N and about l highway e l yu I t to force to shiver mn ogy, than to submit vla-what st - or wives shch and N y. And a nogda they zaderzhiva-yutsyatsya and promise mad wives shch and N am, being vyzva-N y z and to l and N and N and I am m and in z e r to and l e, about to and l e and l and k r and with t and l of l e. 

2 6 
to give them answers and if who is going to cause to them what - that evil on their way, they about it preduprezh-give. And this family of witches differs in rather much about t ostaln ykh because the fact that those send with on - moshchyo sorcery, these promise to cure. That is why the church forbids Christians access to them because svo-to them sorcery they deny a lot of things. 
The fourth family of demons is called "water", poto-mu that they, having plunged into moisture, live near the rivers and lakes, full of rage, alarms, concerns and to - varstvo. They excite storms at the seas and, immersing the ships in a water chasm, take away thereby life from many people. And these demons appropriate vi-dimy body, and they are more often are in the form of individuals of wives - a sky floor, in men's appearances meet less often because they live in crude places and, leading izne-a zhenny life, as a rule, it is very hard at - nimat images of others. That is why having in the ancient time published - on called naiads and nereids, water ни^ф faces not men's, but a female. At us nazvani-I eat with the general for water women the word "wasserfrauen" serves. Some live in places more waterless and droughty, and every time, being seen corporally to people, they turn into men. Others use lichi-us animals depending on by what passions they are captured. Sacred angels a state never change, but always are monotonously in the husband - sky appearances. And we will not be able to read anywhere that the kind spirit stays in a visible form of the woman, whether - bo what - that an animal, but always in appearances men's. And it is valid, demons are visible to a thicket at streams and istoch-nicknames in the form of women who sometimes drive a round dance, sometimes on female custom will let hair down, sometimes talk to people, teasing them razlich-in a ny way. And this family of demons is not accustomed to communicate with witches. 
P the yaty sort is called "underground". These demos - 
ny live in caves and grottoes and also in the remote Clefts. And here they - that in character an essence sa-my the worst. Most of all these demons attack those who dig out mines, extract metals and look for the treasures hidden in the earth. Wishing death to the human race, they arrange in the earth of a crack, a cart - Diymayut fire-spitting winds also loosen a basis - 
N	I buildings. Sometimes at the nights they, kind of groups soy- 

27 
dya from mountains, drive N and the field udiviteln ye and unprecedented round dances then as if ustrashas p ri to an az to joint stock company about go-that the leader, in the joint venture esh to e disappear to and to on a signal and in about z in r and shch and yu t with I in with in about and at e and shch and. P about in r e m e N and m with r e di of their N the roar zhern ov sounds; sometimes, including themselves spirits, they prin imat an appearance of people, ush edsh and x from zhi zn and. Ichy they do not want N more, than fear lyud-sky and p eyes the thane and I. The N am for certain knows that they sometimes brought N of what gawks into the potayen-ny, located in mountains of shelters and and there, I vlya I am surprised by N ym extraordinary shows e whether in roskoshn ykh zhi-shch ah appeared at N them in a deceptive way to joint stock company in the form of them zhi vushch and x N yn e friends. And z these 2 demons 
some I vlya yutsyatsya vozlezhashch and mi by N and juice of a rova shch ah 9, a cat 
r y e at p r I am t and l and in z e l m yu and l of the h N about with t h e l about in e h e with to and I, the N about about - but to people does not manage h vzya t to their N the Azat - they them skry-in and yu t, o x r and N I yu t and and N about d and p e r e N about with I t with m e with t and N and m e with t of the lake. And yesAnd yes to joint stock company and x the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N - witches usually has no this family of demons of N. 
Highway esty the family of demons of N azyvatsya "svetoboyaznen-by N y" because they extraordinary are afraid of light and nena-see it because in the afternoon they what - or obra-zy bodies to themselves cannot create, but do it a way - ny only at night. That is why demons of this sort of times - of st. and in and yu t in with at m e r to and x, N e p r about N and c and e m y e and and with about l yu t of N about mrachn ye, torn apart holodn by ymiy passions, covar - N y e, e with p about to about y N y e and r about z N y e. N about h N y m and and with and m and about N and N and - strongly hold h sluchayn ykh passersby and very much hour - that (with it is allowed iya to B of RSA) or dykhan iy the, or at - a kosnoveniye of whom - un ichtozhat that. The N about this family of demons does not meet witches whether also Zac N of An and I am m and them you - to call N elzya because they run light and voices che-l about in e h e with k and h, n about in that e in r e m I about N and r and with p about l about e N y to about in with I am Kim is shocked to iya of air and to razl chn ym zlodeyan to iya because from all others they the thinnest and sa-my reckless. N ekotory of zemn ykh demons, pre-happening N and more than a N and zk and x stupen yakh, to and to was sk an adhan oh, serve witches, but nevertheless they almost cannot make zn ach teln ykh zlodeyan y. And so, becomes ochevidn ym that all strength of witches thanks to which they sotvoryat so udiviteln ye a thing and, is given to demons ogran Ichang by N oh the Lord of B an ogham, and when It not razre-highway and t, N and h e about p r about and z about y t and N e m about e t. 
Question third: why Almighty B og, being 
fair and I vlya I s the avenger for bad postup- 

2 8 
to I, assumes that and e zlodeyan iya could sover-shatsya to the detriment of the human race at which tyazh-to 0 p adat N e that l k about r e highway of N and to and, about and m of N about gi e N show N - novny people. 
The N and this question, is recently set by N y me in prisut-with t in and and t in about e about in e in l and h e with t in a, n and k in t about N e about t in e in t and l. Vs e, h t about N also allows Almighty B og merciful and pravedn y, good and fair, he permits fairly because It is fair and the N of his severity do not have, but everything, what with - vershatsya that becomes and what is permitted, It judge fairly. P oety when we are asked why the Lord allows to be created bad, we answer that he therefore permits it that It is fair. Yes will not seem to your majesty, about Caesar that whether we prive-precede the ridiculous answer as the N ik does not give that - telny otsen ki divine justice before to it it is allowed on the most fair reshe-a niya to make angrily; that assessment DRT will be possible, 
if It does not allow in N yn esh to N I eat the world sluchitsyazyxwvutsrqponml yaur- 
to Nome. And bo if not to allow to be made bad, then the person will not be able to sin any more and will precisely be without - guilty that is not peculiar to his nature to which from the N of an achal the creator of all gave free will. That is why the person, I vlya I s a creature, but not the creator, neiz-bezhno am turned to joint stock company to good, and to the evil. 
It depends on the Highest creator of all creatures precisely of t and to e, to and to in with e z and v and s and t from with in about e y p r and ch and n y. T in about r and t e it is left to one B of regional public institution who is imperishable and eternal; He can ityit unfaithfulness as necessary any perishable which remains by kindness of the Creator until then, on - It will not allow a free course of affairs. nevoz-it is possible for it and not to the person to do so that the person on the nature of the nature was created bezgreshn ym; sob-stvenno, it is that and pleases the Creator of all, invariable go and eternal. Vsyak y time when it is said to a chetovek that he cannot sin, is denied free will, explicitly otn an opportunity to work imatsya, but the aspiration to good is confirmed. And to azhdy time when this gift is given to a creature, it does not show blessing - sya favor of the nature. Because P ison iye says that God from the N of an achal created the person and left it in a hand of the resh en iya. And bo it cannot, to joint stock company he tells din that the mortal person from the very beginning life than - that is dissatisfied, but let it have free will and not otva-zhivatsya on a sin. And bo svyateysh y head Avgu 
Steen says: "P the ervy freedom of choice was vozmozh-a nost gresh to ityit, the last will be more slavn aya - nevoz-gresh to ityit a mozhnost". And so, if the person is not able gre-to ityit highway, let him have no power over the will. P oe-however the almighty B og wished that that not - the Leningrad Region of a sin, odn It fairly allows Acre that lyu-di gresh or also made bad, because when there is a freedom of choice, the person meets with the deserts and for good deeds, and for voluntarily perfect bezob-Raziy and durn ye acts. The N ik that does not do good and does not sin contrary to the will. And so, the almighty B og fairly assumes that people to whom He from the N of an achal gave free will sinned and it is bad on - went. There are many arguments given recently svya by ty doctors concerning that, on oh of the reasons e the Almighty allows to joint stock company that so iye bad deya N iya were made with assistance of the demon. And x we one after another vk ratets will also bring. 
P the ervy argument is that superiority of B of the ozhestvenny power which only one is invariable and moreover for a long time lips - N about in l e N of N about y is shown. In with I to and I e and z m e N I e m and I am t in and r N e with r and in N and m and with N eizmen N ym the Creator. P oety in to N a yoke of Numbers sk an adhan about: "God does not deceive to joint stock company of people and the son human does not change to joint stock company". In to N a yoke of the prophet I Sayah it is told so: "God is sincere without excessive severity, spraved-Liv and is truly just"; in to N a yoke of Tobit of N it is described about: "You are fair, My God, and all your court praviln y, 
and all 0 your ways - mercy, the truth and pravosu- 
di e" 3. And in to N a yoke of the Saint I of an ov we read: "N et from 
B of RSA of an ungodliness and from Almighty N ep ravosud I" 31. And bo he returns business of each person to it and renders to everyone in compliance with his way. And bo to an azhda y who pra-vilno understands the ignorance and an infirmity, I vn ym about - at once prizn the ayah that nothing can be compared to his creator because the Lord arrives fairly, pozvo-I to the person gresh to ityit la that also his freedom of choice about - a dolzhala to exist, and superiority of great B of RSA became to the famous people. 
The second argument is that not uttered mud-r about with t about with p hey yeahhey yeah with t and N about in and t with I and z in e with t of N and with m e r t of N y m; about N and with p about - the aries iyu dobra from N ash and x bad deya-sobstvut vozn ikn N and y r and d and at m of N about e N and I in m and r e with about in e r highway e N with t in and, to about d and gr e x one in relation to another becomes prestuple-niy. And bo if It does not assume that it happened silly women - 

30 
jjo, t about to t 0 and z the N and with will understand that such good? Because creates 
and ustra Gosp od good howls, z l and He is a N e tvo r and t, n about 
it is known to It that the deeds impious occur N e besp orya dochn the lake of N and to about var a stvo lyudsk oye N e and met vl - I am a N and I am a N and p r about and z in about l e N and e B about e, n and s and m of the h e l about in e to N e m about e t to make what the B og does not allow. 
The third argument that the Almighty B og to - lets that bad affairs were created is his desire to stretch the mercy kindness on those who sinned and created pok ayan iye that nobody not smo-zht to find out if He does not allow a creature to sin. Because if will not be gresh N ik and, then the Lord will not be able to become a sozhaletel. However all of us in many respects oshibayem-with ya, i, p about with the h and t and in N at N y m with N and z about y t and, l and go y T in about r e c about the N and - ruzhivat the compassion at a meeting with the guilty person. That is why the Saint head Augustine says: "If the innocent person do not affect by diseases, the doctor not ishch ut; if the healer is not, then the disease not Zac chivatsya by An because where there is a lot of sin, there is a lot of also grace which only one separates saved from lost, connected by it from the N of an achal of creation in one weight". P oety the mercy of the Lord is the highest than his affairs. 
The fourth argument about a divine pleasure is that justice of the Creator forgive - rummages on those which sinned and did not regret because if all do good and the N ikto will not sin, then divine justice will not have those whom sle-the N of joint stock company the Azat blows. P oety let takes place spravedli-a vost and let a creature from a divine pleasure gre-a board. Because the Lord rendering to everyone on acts zhelan is fair and I am him. 
P the yaty argument is made by living conditions che-the lovechesky advantage because if God not pozvo-litas to sin to the person, then it will be even worse if okazy-^ to vat the violent pressure of N and his N rav. And bo if people and Lish en y reason, then they, however, have before themselves the free movement of the nature to which and a trace - yut; at the same time the person, most likely, rukovodst-vutsya by N of unfaithfulness of N ymiy aspirations if it, konech-but, has no free choice of will. God permits che-a loveka freely to dispose of the zhelan iy, over to about that r y of m of N e in l and with t of N y N and to about r about l i, n and k N I z I. 
Highway esty an argument - it an opportunity is deserved hva- 
to pour virtue of human constancy, that is 

31 
when we praise to what - to the person on a spr of a vedlivost because, having an opportunity to make that - he did not make it, but, the B encouraged by favor an ozhiya, it constantly keeps kindness of the zhela-a niya. 
The seventh argument of a question of why the Almighty God permits that demons made so awful affairs, is that those who are enticed prezren- 
ache also false isti2noy, it is entered into deception izobretate- 
Lem of a lie dya 3 are also overthrown by an ox deeply vn and h. Because 
it is inevitable that sorcerers, and also witches, I reject - shch and e need to follow the saving doctrine of Christ, are deceived by demons and N of joint stock company an adhan and e are fond of them in an underworld of N and eternal. They try to obtain approval of demons, enemies of all human race, and Christ Redeemer of the world to which to one they have to poklo-nyatsya, they do not respect. That is why it is fair, kog-yes the one who, on a spontaneous proizvoleniye throwing the truth, becomes the adherent of a lie, is fond of a devil of N and death. The eighth argument consists in proyav-l e N and and about e with t in e N of N about y in l and with t and, h I am m about shch and s and l and p r about with ti - the N and all tvarn y the world rummages. And bo when the Almighty B og once permitted to a devil bigger and that not pozhe-in l and l of m and l about oh, about N of N e with t and l with and m y m with and l N y m in r and go m r hey yeahhey yeah h e lovechesky and obeyed in everything divine Conducted - h and bb. And about D I in about l of N and h e about N e m about e t with about in e r highway and t with and m p about myself, but everything that it does, occur from a pleasure of about with p about d and B about and. And t and to, p e r in about p r and ch and n and in with e go, p about to about t about r about y the Almighty God permits to be made> to bad affairs - justice which izn achaln about keeps in neru-a shimy order freedom provided to everyone tva-ri. P to atom that, really, the power of any creature, zavi-syashchy from the creator, svya Zahn and is also limited; and sde-lano all this in order that the devil could not make everything that he wants and the person to be not exposed to temptation great zhelan iy. And if the will on most le is free, then force is limited certain and not - izbezhny barriers. Also, to joint stock company if demons could do everything that they will want, and the person when would not be in safety, and they would bring everything into decline. The held-down power of demons well on to and z y in and e t p r and m e r and with t about r and and with in I t about about And about in and, and to about t about r about e the Satan any more than N did not dare to fall down N though to it i; divine permission was given. And bo the N ikto presently as it is fair and was swept away by him was, not mo 

32 
zkt to resist anger of demons if they can vre-dit to the choice of people, using the power. Before, to joint stock company Holy passions were made, they much in pain - sew degrees, than subsequently, used pre-freedom brought to them, however iskupiteln aya the death of Christ crucified for us by N and a cross it it is strong p r and at m e N highway and l and. To and to With p and with and t e l about in about r and t in E in and N of e l and and: "The N Ng to N I z the world is expelled". And bo Christ's humility and resolution of Saints strongly ogran ichit impudence of demons; and therefore instigators of deeds of evil should on - be zyvat openly, the same concerns also others to them similar. D I in about l of N and in the h e m of N e a mustache and l and t with I p r about t and in N and with, e with l and t about l to about will not derive strength from N ash and x sins. P an isaniye ostere-zyvy gat us, p ri: "Resist a devil and he will escape from you". And again: "N e give places to a devil". P oety, zaversh aya the speech, sk an adhan of N uyu to explanation of the offered question - why God allows sover-to shatsya to deeds of evil - I with all confidence darling vlya yu that arguments were provided satisfactory. Because if the will of demons is always hostile, the power cannot be unfair as if who wishes to make bad, it has an option, and bad he can only make this with razresh en iya B ozhy. About the same, to JSC On treats the N making bad deya and I, already was sk an adhan of the lake of N about why vsemogu-the shchy B og assumes that demons of N fell down N and people, using witches, N and people, kreshch en ykh for the sake of the Holy Trinity and trusting shch them in only-begotten the son and the Lord, And an isus Christ? Falling down N on bodies and affairs durn ykh, bad and incorrect people, they refrain from access and the N of An is clear iya harm kind and believing lyu-dyam; really, the sentence allowing it, spraved-to Liv. However N yn e thickets e kind and pure people of wasps - lablyatsya bad Dejan Iyami of demons, whether by times - shayas zhi z in N and; it becomes in order that we silently transferred loss prekhodyashch their things that quite often undergo also bewitched; many at the same time nachi-ache to be afraid why the Lord Vsemogushchy allows with about in e r to highway and t vs e e t oh, About N, to t about N and h e about N e p about z in about l I e with about in ER - it is unfair to t to shat. 
P the redlagayemy question differs in nothing from those which I gathered at ancient devout Wuchang ykh so as far as I will be able, I in brief and one after another from - lay down necessary arguments. And the following will become the first argument - it is test of belief of Christians and experience not - 

2

- 34OO  

3 3 
perversity when those whom demons castigate the angrily deya N and I mi uzn at through stradan iya fleshes, to joint stock company uyu beliefs \and love for B of regional public institution hran I am t they in the depth of souls and. The N etrudno to be patient, zhi vya is quiet and happy, however when during adversities expect the help from Christ Redeemer in e r uyu shch and m with about y h N y t m e r p e N and e m, t about e t about about r and z d about in e with about m e e and about in about r and t about N and with t about I shch e y in e r e x r and s t and and N with to about y. With in I t e y - highway both y And ov, narrating about the muchen iya, tells, how constantly he trusts in B of RSA; and and before, zyxwvuts v 
with p about to about y N about y about with t and N about in to e, about N, N e to about l e l I with, with about hr and N I am l of the h and with Tautou of belief. At the same time it should be notedit should be noted what those, to go zlodeyan iya demons and whether people what - or images did unhealthy, and it and, wishing to return to itself zdo a rovya whether also m Zac of N of hotel of m and the sorcerer am went to all to and consulted on N them, or through other people, so iye people oppose instructions of B of RSA to church. P redpochity health of transitory flesh to the Lord, they ishch ut rescue not at Christ, but at a devil and egs servants. They prefer to address a name of a devil and to be healthy, but fruitless, than it is a little p r e t e r p e t in about and m I would be l yu in and Hr and with t about in about y and z and t e m in e h N about r and to be given with N and m. To the same i force zap reshch en also I do not address to the sorcerer am God's, preferring zhi t, soblyu Dai Lord's precepts, in scarcity and grief, indulged <to oppose his N, being the rich and corporally zdo rovy, that truly loves B of RSA and the most exact about at once finds purity of belief of Christians of sky. Among a hra stian, about svya teysh y Caesar, do not suffer bad mind of i, at to l about N and in highway and x with I from in e r y, to about t about r y e and z l e h and in and yu t about to about l d about van of N ykh by means of sorcery and through posrednichestv1 reveal demons to a passion and f joint stock company you adulteries which predict future on to am N I am m and a zerka of lamas. I beg you, not vyslush a willow of those who ignoring divine Zac it y, these servants of the demons saying that in your state they are useful because a zna yut to joint stock company ustran to ityit results of crimes with pomoshchv the villain of N and y. And bo so harmful care about bodies - leads to death of souls and, zastavlya I people to recede from B of RSA - the creator of all real and to be p ri vya Zahn N y in m; to the impious, receding from belief demons, from a cat an eye after death they are condemned by N and eternal torments and. 
The second argument why the almighty B og allows that sorcery did harm in anything v to people are not guilty, Zac lyuchatsya in umn ozhen by AI of virtues, a dub; h e r e z m uch and t e l N about e and with p y t and n and e and t e r p e N and e about N and z and with l at 

34 
and in heaven their worthy wreath of glory. Because tells l
Saint Augustine: "the person not zn the ayah that it can you - N e with t and, and h t about N e m about e t; and and N about d and about N a t mustache r and highway and e t of t with I about oh, that cannot do that it, after all, could sde-lat; when it is started by somebody rasprashiva-yushchiya, the person a delicacy ivat at himself what was p e r in about N and h and l N about with p r I am t and N about in N e m, and about N about t about m of N e z N and l". B of l and e N of N about y p and m I am t and and r hi and p about with t about l P e t r, to about d and N e about and - 
yaanno came it is tested iye, found skrytuyu3 hitherto 
disease, about which neither it, nor others not zn Ali '3'. And so, 
by the highest it is tested iy for the person is it is unexpected - Nov, as it is testified in Sacred AI is written: "Vessels of the potter are tested by the furnace, and just people - test muchen iy". Legk about to suffer prospering, on - to a skolk of souls but the N and to joint stock company and m and cares and though many pravedn ik and test muchen iya is not mentioned, State - pod N ash And isus Christ will exempt them from all these not - with the h and with ti y. 
The third argument of the divine permission concludes - sya in zashch and those media Wren and I as the person true and just is always afraid of B of RSA and never works on the courage or a reasoning. Here what tells P isaniye about durn ykh people: "they do not work to joint stock company people, and therefore will not castigate them together with people". That is why they it is captured y by arrogance, and they conceal the evil and an ungodliness, and believe that their adversities as if result because of reached. God regrets that from time to time he allows to bring down on kind and just people razlichn ye adversities; in blagopriyat-Nov time these people could not be un and wives y. One - to many, becoming un and wives of N ymiy in misfortune, vposled-stviya vozvysh atsya. The careful image of bad acts makes the kind person God-fearing, and he diligently appeals about the help that, having become stronger against attack of demons, he could ensure bezopas-a nost. And bo N ik that, seized arrogance and relying only on the forces, does not feel safe from crimes of demons as so they inflated °t arrogance of people are left zashch both by those B ozhya and it, out of with - opinions, becomes to available crimes of demons. 
The fourth argument consists in need the section - 
niya of kind and angry people. And bo tells P isaniye in - yaniye of apostles about people kind and lovely to God - <<che-the Cut many adversities we dolzhn y to enter C arstvy Bo of Zh and 3 4. the Saint P avet l, Christ's friend, in one ambassador - 

L1 
the scientific research institute says: "All who wish zhi t devoutly in Hri-to a sta let will undergo persecution". Also aimudreysh y the tsar Solomon in P ri tcha narrates N: "To otory loving the Lord abuses, he treats that as if the father with sy-N about m" 35. The N et is more nice than nothing for Christians in and, than for the sake of the Lord patiently to transfer adversities whether bad lyu-di of their reasons yat, or demons. And bo and him slu-din is given to a devil and the power of N ap an adat of N and good and pravedn ykh people, odn Acre those do not come to confusion, words - but the herd of old rams, but souls and them get on - ibolshy and certain is consoled iye. Indeed, kog-yes the just person lives well, without harming N iky and iky without causing to N damage, not p ri chi N I I am a N iky not - justice, and loves B of RSA of the very much, bo-itsyaitsya and reveres N and m, with all eagerness zashch and - shch aya it is ordered iya and, nevertheless, suffers from a stake - dovstvo whether harming a body, its affairs, and quite often to that and another, this person is truly blessed N y because he, bu-clouds is tested, will apprehend it a wreath zhi zn and which sou - poured the Lord of B og to that, to that loves it. Vsyak y, praved-but zhi vushch and y in a unification with belief Catholic hristi- and N with to about y c e r to in and and t e r p e l and in about p e r e N about with I shch and y in e that m of m and r e bad for the love of the Lord, carries N and himself determined zn by joint stock company, saying that it is at B of RSA in on - stoyanny favor. About bad and wicked men on - it is written so: "Inut impious, riches podder-zhivat them and create them a cosiness. Their houses are safe and spo-to oh N y, and there is no scourge of B over N them about zhi I; zhi zn they will see off the well and then in what - that the moment descend in an underworld". The N about is obvious p ri zn to joint stock company p la's fate ti I here: if so oh the person is successful and healthy, but lives badly, in sins and defect, he B of regional public institution is objectionable. 
P I you y an argument are that the Almighty Gospod 
allows good and pravedn ym to people to suffer from wicked and angry men for the sake of ochishch en iya from all ways of souls and. And bo to joint stock company tells P ison iye: "N et N and the earth pra-the prominent person who makes only kind and not gresh it". The N about as the Lord any sin not of wasps - tavlyat without punishment, He, from compassion, ustanavli-howls to kind people for their fault temporary N of joint stock company an adhan and I; impious and angry are punished by eternal court. And z with - sufferings It replacements yat rask aivayushch I am eaten eternal with N of joint stock company and - zany N and temporary to which they it is inevitable podtver- and yu t with ya and l and v e that m of m and r e, and l and p about with l e with m e r in t and, in the h and with t and l and - shch e. T and to and to, p about and with t and N e, p y t to and in the h and with t and l and shch e and with N y and 
z 
I Cela, the compassionate Lord usually clean those tya 
rask ayavsh ikhsya whom He loves, in this zhi zn and by imposing razn ykh corporal burdens and adversities in them - la. And bo bad deya N and I atheists are useful for to - bry and pravedn ykh people in quality vrachevan iya, and with - tvoryayushchy these deya to N and I - as condemnation. 
Highway esty an argument proves that the person, is bewitched - ny thanks to N atisk at demons, comes to races again - to a kayaniye and in the heart promises that it surely is-governs the zhi zn. P to atom that the Almighty God not suddenly punishes us when we gresh to them, but to in advance mustache - expects tanovlenny time when we improve. If we azyvatsya by Quality Department rask ayatsya, to us prikho-dit when we do not expect that, the avenger for bad which we, gresh of N and to and, in quiet time it is proud we do not recognize, in an adversity, N of joint stock company it ets, was late prinima-I eat. With in I t about y p r about r about to in l and c e B about and about in about r and t, v about with to l and c and I, the following: "If they neglect the law of ohms mine and my son, and do not arrive on is solved to my iya, and do not protect mine I am taught iya, ukroshch at their disgrace - the wood and sins by their lashes, and my compassion not of races - prostranitsya by N and their N, but I will not do much harm in my truth". 
The seventh argument why the almighty B og to - zvolyat that bad deya N and I suppressed demons to - bry and N show N of N ykh, what un ichtozhatsya by them with l and highway to about m about l highway and I in about z in m about N about with t r e highway and t is. And about e with t m of N about - go poor and weak, B of regional public institution ugodn ykh, kind both pokor-ny, and un and wives of N y x whom the scarcity and corporal bo-lezn keeps in love for B of regional public institution; also there are those which, being the rich and vozvysh en in N ye honors, were quickly overthrown from the offered sanctity in a chasm poro-. N e lead to rescue of all those who have health, honors and riches, equally to joint stock company more prodolzhiteln aya life not always does the person better. To rum of that, the Almighty Gospod, wishing to extend on it is elected - ny him the compassion, allows to subject time - to personal troubles of people kind, just and N evin N ykh. And, through demons, through bad people, posred-a razla stvo chn ykh It deprives of other measures and acts they are ky people of wealth and honors, to joint stock company ovy, on it to me - a niya, were badly used, while in poverty both uny-n and i, h r and N I with m both r e n and e, o in N and N e p about y in m ut, to and to, p r about and in and I in 
Sbtogatstva and honor, they in fact in a smaller epen also preserved themselves. Also It allows N to asylat 
N
aa. them many vet to both e illnesses and p ri chi N I t to them, obla- 
dayushch to them tsvetushch to them carnal health, the highest - sincere stradan and I. To rum of that, It allows dovo to dit the person by means of sorcery to death whether highway and t opportunities to sin those who nepra-vedno used zemn the ymiy benefits in this zhi zn and. Here what tells P ison iye about the just husband: "P okhishchen it, N about N e and z m e N and t of l uk and in with t in about r and z mind e oh, and N e about m and N e t p r and a tvorstvo of souls at it". 
The eighth argument of a divine permission is the fact that the people esteeming the mysteries of a stvo tserk vi of an oblad yut Dejan Iyy of the bearing malice spirits is great them courage in fight against all bad. And bo to the one who due about r and z about m p about the h and t and e t of t and and N with t in and and about r I d y to and t about l and h e with to about y c e republics vi, annoy in the N ap adk to Amy demons less often. And is very frequent we sla of highway of Ali from own prizn of An y sorcerers that it and, slush aya a mass and using in e shch and, l and go with l about in e N of N y e c e r to about in yu, z N and h and t e l N about about with l and l I power of demons. And bo not in vain glorified ong in RSA church B, and is among them and e so iye, kotorts for it is strengthened iya divine zashch and you show m about N and to m z N and to and a t mustache r and highway e N and I. N and h ut N e with about m of N e in and I with, m 'we can sk the Azat about alcha m to ah and children, to reshch en N ykh vs Christ and umersh them ever because of intrigues of the demon! or people that all this allowed to make bozhest wine providence for the sake of it is saved iya because it all obnovlya et to the best also puts terrestrial in order. Odnash often is and so that children perish owing to a dovstvo stake, and also because of crimes of parents. 
Interrogation and p ri zn An and e izvestn ykh witches 
in the H e m l with f about r d e in r and f with t in e E with with e to with 
before judges 
it to about r about l e in with to about about in e l and h e with t in and 
in 26 day and wriggling 1566 
Introduction 

N edavno to the city slavn y this, I talk About Chelmsford, P sent glavn ykh three judges That Zac it y to save. And zvestn y the Royal Court Became justice chi N and t, And three criminals are conducted That put them to eradicate. Three local ladies Satanoy Z and r and e N y p r e z N and ton about y l and 1, N about spirit of guilty business by the death the claim of an upila. H and t and y t e N and e in y about t about m About what they to court sk an azalea, And to joint stock company of paper signed, P ri zn avsh and s in the sorcery. To Dejan Yam spiteful look narrowly, You, dear friend, and pray That took away B og quickly From us these witches with suite only. Here I am a game to tea and I hope, H t about t y p r about h t e highway m about and with l about in and, And the truth, N of joint stock company it ets, uzn ayesh, To about a gd p about y m e highway, h that p r about the h and t and e highway. 











40 
THEIR INTERROGATION AND THE CONFESSION MADE BEFORE THE DOCTOR HOUL AND THE MASTER FORTESCUE IN THE SAME COURT AND LITERALLY REPRODUCED IN THAT DEGREE IN WHAT IT WAS POSSIBLE; AND AT FIRST RECOGNITION OF ELISABETH FRANCIS WHO TOLD THE FOLLOWING. 
For the first time it pozn akomitsya with art of witchcraft 
aged dven adtsat of years thanks to the grandmother who was called by m atush to and And in from Hatf ild P everill, ny-not the dead. To an ogd she taught her, advised devoch-ke to refuse B of RSA and Word B ozhy and to give the 
blood to the Satan (so it N azyvat it), k2otorogo it show - 
l and e y in about r and z e e l about go p I would be t of N and with t about about to about t and, N and at the h and in e e to about r - 
Meath its bread and milk that this girl also did, to r about m e t about oh, about N and N and at the h and l and it in y z y in and t e oh, to N and z y in and I p r and it a name - the Satan and to hold it in to orz of N to e. 
To an ogd this m atush to and And in gave it the cat Sa-to the thane, Elisabeth sn wanted an achal that this cat (and the N was azyvat by it his Satan) made it rich and zazhi-exact, and he promised it that he will execute it zhelan iye, having asked it at the same time that she wants to have, and it from - a vechala - sheep 3 (because, on it p ri zn An and yu, this cat razgo-in and r and in and l with N e y with t r and N of N y m of of l at x and m go l about with about m, N about t and to, h t about it pon Imola), and it immediately delivered N and its meadow of sheep in number of eighteen heads, black and white, to - tory remained with it some time, but then all about N and and with the h e z l and, p r and h e m with and m and about N and N e z N and e t to and to. 
Also, when she received these sheep, she resh silt to catch to herself in a certain Endryyu's husbands of B of Iles. Che - lovek this was rather well-to-do so the cat promised that all and will be, but, he told, at first she dolzhn and with - to be said by N and the fact that this Endryyu will offend it that it and made. 
And after that to joint stock company this Endryyu offended it, it not - nitsya by N and it, that is why she asked the Satan unich-to tozhit all his good that he immediately also made; one - to it, being not satisfied with it, asked it to touch Endryyu's body that there was at once ispol-N e N oh, p about with l e h e go with it a m at the h and N and with to about N of the h and l with I. 
Also, to an azhda y time to joint stock company it did for it that - - oud, she said, he demanded from it to apelk at blood which it also gave it, use alyvy to himself skin 

4 1 
sometimes in one place, sometimes in another. Where she gave similar injections, and kras-N y e p I t of N still are seen and. 
Also, when this Endryyu already died, it achat N to think and whether it has child. P oety she on - asked the Satan un to ichtozhit it, and he advised it to take a certain grass and to drink the infusion prepared on it that she also made, and her child at the very same time p about gi b. 
Also, when she decided to marry for the second time, it promised to help her with it, meaning Fran - a sis who is her husband now, but at the same time sk azat that it is not so rich, to joint stock company others, wishing to achieve thereby her consent to illegitimate communication with this Francis that she also made, in rezul-the Tat of what conceived the daughter who was born in three months after their wedding. 
P a donkey of that to joint stock company they got married, zhi zn take place them - la at all not so quietly, to joint stock company it would like; they on - stoyanno (according to her) swore and quarreled, here poche-mu she wanted that her cat Satana killed it reben-to and, being then at the age of about half a year that that and made. N about and then she did not find desired spokoy-a stviye and asked it to fill with lameness of N and F rensis, her husband, and it executed required. One morning it made the way in bash poppy F rensis, settled there as if zha-oh and when he tried to put on the bash poppy, the cat touched his leg. F rensis strongly was surprised and asked that it was, however it forbade the husband to kill him, and here F rensis were overcome so aya by lameness of which already N of an ikogd could not cure it. 
P a donkey of all this when this cat lived at it years pyatn to adtsat or sixteen, and, to joint stock company speak nekoto-ry (though it is incorrect), she was tired of it, p ri highway of la it to matush to e Waterhouse, the sosedke4 (poor wives Russian cabbage soup - not) when that fussed at the oven, and on - asked to give it pie instead of what she promised to bring it such thing which it will be serviceable slu-zhi t to it all it zhi zn. And it m atush to and Waterhouse gave it pie then Elisabeth brought to it it to from in f an artuka and N of an auchil to everything that I would hear in with in about e in r e m about t with in about e y and ush to i And v, s to and z and in, about about N and dolzhn and N to azyvat h t his Satan, to give it the blood, bread and milk. B to an olsha of N and it dozn AI An it anything N e with to and z and l and. 

42 
THE MOTHER WATERHOUSE FROM HATFIELD PEVERILL, SIXTY FOUR YEARS, BEING INTERROGATED ON THE SAME DAY, ADMITTED THE FOLLOWING 
First, she received this cat from wives y upo- 
myanuty F rensis in that order, to joint stock company there was uk an adhan about above, and that sk azat that it has to azyvat N the Satan and that if about N and there are you juice about c en and t it then he will make for it everything that she will wish. 
Then, having caught it, she (having decided to test its cart - mozhnost) asked it to kill own on - a dewdrop that he also made; and for works it gave it c y p l e N to and, to about t about r about about about N p about t r e about in and l from N e e, and t and to e to and - to a pelk of the blood. And this way she continued to act every time when she it that - for it did that - it about - kalyvat a hand or a cheek and to ap is scarlet this blood to it in a mouth; he, N apivsh is, laid down in the of baskets again at where it also held it; places where it pricked itself, are still visible to N and her skin. 
Also it sk azat that when it was offended by a certain father To ers, she vzya la the cat Satana, put in an apron and carried his N and the tree growing before it to - my, and p ri to an azal to it to ruin three pigs of this father Kersi; having made it, he came back and told it about it, and it rewarded him, to joint stock company again earlier, having given him c yp a flax to and and to aplyu the blood. It tsyplen-he ate without remainder so it could not N of an IT a uniform stone or p erysh to and. 
T and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t oh, p about with with about r both in highway and with with N e to about e y the widow Guddey, she asked the Satan to drown it koro-vu that he also made; it rewarded it, to joint stock company and r An sh e. 
Also, having quarreled with the neighbors, it under - killed a bny image at them three geese. 
Also it prizn atsya that as she N ik joint stock company could not have a rest what it very much needed, it on - asked the Satan destroy to ityit brewery. 
The t and to e, to about d and e y N e p about N r and in and l about with h e - that m and with l oh, about N and Did so that at these people cottage cheese was spoiled for two 
and


and
whether even for three dn I forward. 
Also, having quarreled with whom - that from the neighbors 
Sv t his wife, it popros5ila the Satan to ruin them posred-°m bloody pon the wasp why that men and and vprav- 
DU Died, and it rewarded it, to joint stock company and before. 
4zyxwvutsrq i 
P in an odobny way it prizn atsya that whether as with the husband they zhi absolutely peacefully, she asked the Satan to kill him that he also made years nine N the Azat, and since then it is registered as the widow. 
Also it sk azat that if she wanted, that it that - nibud for it made, then she dolzhn and was the other Tat "Father of N ash" a N and armor of N and. 
Also it matush to and Waterhouse prizn atsya that it turned this cat into a toad, doing it as follows. It held it in to orz of N to e, the filled wool, but over time, on poverty, it was you - 
nuzhdena to put it on use. Then 6ona begged in 
and m I About t of c and, and With y N and, and With in I t about go D u x a, p r about with I p r e in r and t and t 
cat in a toad, and immediately the cat turned into a toad so now he could zhi t and in empty to orzin to e. Also about N and with to and z and l and, h t about to and to - t about r and z, to about a gd about N and highway of l and in B r e to with t e d, also was it shortly before arrest, the Satan sk azat it that - she would hurry home because at it will be big not - pleasant things and that soon it will be hung up or with - zhzhen and; it is more than a N and this time it nothing not sk azat. 


JOAN WATERHOUSE, THE DAUGHTER OF THIS MOTHER WATERHOUSE, EIGHTEEN YEARS, DURING INTERROGATION SHOWED THE FOLLOWING 
First, that her mother this winter taught it to the 
to art, but she learned nothing; she did not remember also a name "this a thing and". She sk azat that saw it in hands ah of mother only once and that it was p about x about and N and and at, and h t about in about y d I with about in e r highway e N of N about in N e z and p N oh, it hear it is scarlet, her mother calls it for joint stock company that - that sde-lat, saying at the same time the name "Satan". Because she not always and not everything told to the daughter and never on to elements of a shaft it to this case. 
T and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t about to about d and its m and t p about highway of l and in B rekstead, she wanted some bread, but, not N aydya it, otpra-curled to the neighbour's girl and asked it to give it ku-bread juice with cheese. To an ogd that azat Quality Department to it and gave nothing, or gave slish a lump a little, she came back home and made so, to joint stock company mother did it, causing the Satan. It I in and l with I to N e y (to and to about N and go in about r and r), p about its m of N e n and yu, i z and highway of m of joint stock company and her mother which stood under the bed; it resembled N and a big dog and, I vivsh is, asked what she wants. 

44 
At first she was frightened, but then sk azat that ho-couples that it N apugat this girl (at the same time it on - called and mya); then he asked that it will give it, and it 
answered: "R a yzhy rooster", and 7on objected: "N et, you 
you will give me the body and a shower at"; it was so on - 
the pugana also so strongly wished to get rid of it that promised to make it. And then it went to this девоч8th 
to e, p r and N I in about l and h e with t r and highway of N about about p with and with r about hectare of m and N and about l about in e, 
and strongly the N apugat it, and even pursued it. N yn e these witches cannot (to joint stock company they speak) again to call him here because they do not want that it poyavlyal-sya. The B to an olsha, sk was azat by it, I did nothing, one - to this its act of Quality Department dug all the rest. 

THE SECOND INTERROGATION AND THE RECOGNITION OF THE MOTHER AGNES WATERHOUSE AND HER DAUGHTER JOAN MADE AFTER CHARGE WITH QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS OF AGNES BROWN, THE GIRL FOR WHOM THE EVIL GHOST HUNTED, SPECIALLY SAID BEFORE THE JUDGE SAUSKOT AND THE MASTER GERRARD, THE ROYAL PROSECUTOR, JULY 27, 1566, NOT LESS WONDERFUL AS ALSO TRUTHFUL 

P Agnes Waterhouse's recognition made in 27 day 
July in a year 1566 in Chelmsford before the judge Sa-uskoty and the royal prosecutor M. Gerrard. 

At first, being asked, guilty it or not of the charge of murder of the person brought to her, she confessed that wines ovn and, and then, after witness on - to an adhan y, the N y x against her daughter Joan Waterhouse is given, she is a darling vi la that it had a white cat which it about - force un to ichtozhit cattle at neighbors, and also that it on - ruined one person that that and made. To an ogd it had a need to move away from the house on Two - three miles, she began to deliberate, to joint stock company to it to treat a cat. Here the cat and it resh or that he, that is a cat, there are no hundred - a toad then it dolzhn and will be it to lock and to Give it milk, and it will eat it until the °na does not come back home. Meanwhile, her daughter was in one neighbour's house located nearby. There it on - 
p
R Agnes settled B raun, the girl of years dven adtsat, to give her 

4 5 
piece of bread and cheese, N and that upomyan uty Agnes otveti-la that she has nothing, and, besides, there are no keys that - to get all this from to ladovk and. P a donkey of what upomyan uty Joan p ri highway of la home, angry at this girl Agnes of B raun, and here it and remembered whether to joint stock company her mother walked up and down vzyad-on to omn to an ata forward and you to the Satan, the Satan is scarlet "!". It sk azat to itself that will try to make likewise, and then p ri N I las to walk up and down on the house and to call the Satan. Here to it I curled chern aya a dog and asked that to it nuzh-N of the lake. She, according to her, was frightened and sk azat: "I want you to frighten Agnes of B raun". Here he asked that she will give it, and she answered that she will give a red rooster, N and that it sk azat that it is not enough. Then she asked that in so ohm a case it is necessary for it, and he answered that to it N uzhn y her shower and and a body. In a game tse a game of ts, having been frightened of him also hear av such offer, she gave it the body and a shower u9. Here the royal prosecutor asked her: "To joint stock company you made it in the face of the Lord?" "Oh, state - podin - she answered - I believe that the Lord smilosti-it is necessary to curl mn oh", and then it sk azat "correctly govo-Riesch", and then it left her then it uslysha-la that it really frightened this Agnes of B raun. 
Then p ri to an azalea to cause upomyan I will conceal Agnes of B raun, and about N and in about highway of l and, and it with p r about with and l and, with to about l to about e y l e t, and about N and about t in e t and - 
la, that, probably, dven to adtsat then the royal prosecutor asked her that it can sk the Azat: and it otve-tit that in such - that day (the N azyvy at the same time is defined - ny day) it churned butter and here something approached it, similar N and a dog, but with f an izionomiy monkey. It had a short tail, and around a neck - a chain with silvering - a ny whistle (so she thinks); the head he was crowned by couple of horns, and in a mouth he held a key from the storeroom with milk, and here, my master (she told), I was frightened because it sk joint stock company is scarlet and jumped in razn ye the parties, and then took seat in kra-to beer. Here I asked it what he wants, and he answered that he wants oil, and I sk azat that I for it have nothing, and he answered that all - equally descends and will get, and for - that it rushed to a storeroom door to insert a key into the lock, but I sk azat that it nothing there will find, and it answered that that - nibud yes the N aydt. P a donkey of what he opened a door and the N and a regiment climbed and there put a key of N and fresh with y r, i, p r about y in t and m of N e m of N about oh, about N in y highway e l of N and r at, z and to r y the l and sk azat a door that it nasbivat to me oils. Then it left. Further the girl told about it to the aunt and on - sent for svya shch en N and to ohm. It, having come, p ri to azat her mo-to flow B of regional public institution and to appeal to name I of an isus. And I follow N about N - shchy day, my master, it came to mn e again, holding in a mouth a key from N ash to her to ladovk and, and here I asked it: "In and mya And an isusa what it is necessary for you?" He put a key and sk azat that, Wai's vza to it names and, I said silly women - ny words then at once disappeared. Here my aunt under - took to lyuch because they were its N and AI of two days and night is lingering, then we entered the storeroom, where whether uvide-a trace of oil of N and cheese. In several days it came again, but in a mouth it held a peel from f asol. Here to - the rolevsky prosecutor asked that it was, and other judges asked the same question, N and that she answered: "My master, I asked him in name I of an isus that it is v you, and he put all N and the earth and sk azat that I said silly women - ny words, and left. P to an ozzha it came here, again - a rzha in a mouth bread pieces, and I asked it that he wants, and he answered - oils, both again left, and since then, my state - 
podin, I not vi0dela it up to last Wednesday, that is 
To 28 and yu l I" 1. And why, asked royal to use - 
Rohrs, he was with you last Wednesday? He was with me, she answered. And what he made with you, the prosecutor asked. My master, she answered, he came with a knife in teeth 
and
  with p r about s and l, n e mind e r l and l and I e shch e, and I about t in e t and l and, h t oh, with l and in and 
To god, no, and here he sk azat that if I did not die, it 

47 
will pierce me with this knife right in the heart and will make so that I died. And here I sk azat: "In name I of an isus, hollow zhi a knife", but he answered that he will not throw a knife of the lyu-the bimy lady, and I asked it who this lady. And he nodded towards your house, m atush to and Waterhouse. For - that the royal prosecutor asked the mentioned Agnes Waterhouse that she will tell on it and that asked the girl to describe a knife form, and Agnes of B raun sk azat that it was the type knife to and N of a sting. Then you lie, darling twisted Agnes Waterhouse. P to ochy, the prosecutor questioned. Wash uvazhaye-my mister (that told), she says that to and the N reaped it, and at my place there is nothing similar, I have only a big N ozh. That is why she lies, my master, chest-Nov a word. Joan Waterhouse sk azat that she lies also in when she says that it has a person to joint stock company at a monkey because what came to it, was similar to a dog. The N at well, sk was azat by the royal prosecutor whether you can cause it now that it appeared before Amy's N. If with m about e highway, then m y with to about r about about t p r and in and t m e I and z t yu r m y. The B e z in e - ry, sk was azat by Agnes Waterhouse, I cannot because it can be done only with belief, to joint stock company it did I and my daughter; then I could call quickly him, but now I have over N him no power. And so, sk the royal prosecutor azat, obra-tivsh is to Agnes Waterhouse when it is your cat sucked at you blood? N of an ikogd, that answered. The N at all right, told about - a kuror, give - to and we will look, and here the jailer removed from it a scarf and N and the person ton were found in it razlichn ye p I and, one of which was even a N and a nose. Here the royal prosecutor sk azat: well, respectable Agnes when he last time sucked your blood? I claim, the ska hall it that in the last two weeks nothing was. P about - to the sla of what the court was removed N and a meeting. 

THE FINAL AND LAST CONFESSION OF THE MOTHER WATERHOUSE BEFORE DEATH MADE IN 29 DAY OF MONTH OF JULY, 1566 
First (having already prepared p ri N I t death), 
it prizn atsya frankly that she was a witch and used the otvratiteln ym sorcery on AI p I ton of an adtsata of years is lingering, and made a set disgusting Dejan Iyy what she sincerely and purely - warmly regrets and asks to forgive almighty B of RSA for the fact that it spoiled his sacred name the 

48 
sinful acts. She believes that she will be saved thanks to his inexplicable mercy. And being with p r about highway e N and p r and with ut with t in uyu shch and m and, about N and p r and z in N and l and with, h t about p about - banished the Satan to a certain Uardol, the sose-du, to the tailor (who offended her) in order that navre-to dit to it personally and to cause damage to its property. And this her Satan went there to execute it pozhelan iya, but then he returned, so to joint stock company could not make it zlodeyan iya. She asked him in what - the Leningrad Region, and he answered that Uardol azatsya ok so kre-pok in vere11 that it could not do it harm; later it again repeatedly sent it (but everything is vain) in order that reasons to ityit to it what - or damage. And, whether being asked, accustomed to go it to church to the general prayer or a church service, she answered on - lozhitelno, and N and a question what it did there, she from - vechat that did the same, as others of wives shch and N y, and with all the heart prayed, and N and a question of what she told, praying, she answered that chi tala of Father of N ash, B to Devo's ogoditsa, I Believe then they asked, on - Latin or on - gliyska An, and she answered - on - Latin, and 
they asked why she read them on latyn and, 1a not 
in English, zn aya that government 2 and 
according to ozha Word B I is established that all people a dale - zhn y to pray to N and English I zy to e and N and native on - r e ch and i, k for t about r about e about N and l uch highway e p about N and m and yu t, and about N and about t in e t and l and that the Satan of N of an ikogd did not allow it to say it on - and N of of l and y with to and, N about everything in r e m I am t about l to about N and l and t y N and; p about to and to about in about y to the reason, and also because of the N ykh by it sets of other crimes in which it prizn atsya is made, she grieves, regrets and asks favor of B an ozhiya and all - the general proshch en iya, giving and m in the way the soul and hoping to find to happiness with Christ, her Christ Redeemer, to - tory the highest price of invaluable blood to the claim - drank her sins. Amine. 
About the most spiteful deya N of AI of N of ekoy unusable 
witches, about similar to otory N ik that not 
hear it is scarlet in England many years. 
R assk elements it is howled about one person e, P icharda of B to an erta, the servant of the master Edlinga, from 
Vudholla, arrival P in N of ER, columns stvo 
M idlsek with that in mile for Harrow. 
With about in e r highway e N about in m and r t e 1 5 9 2 g about d and and e shch e r and z p r and z N and N about with about about t in e t with t in uyu shch and m p r and in d e D zh. B., 
m and and with t r about m and with to a mustache with t of century. 
Hexastikon 

Of witches of spiteful kN in this a yoke it will be a question, Of that, to joint stock company they influence ordinary people, To joint stock company that - muttering that, villainies make. Let's glorify the Lord who will beat them! The B og expels them, but immediately the Satan P brings new witches - and is not present them chi sla1. 
Levit 20.6: "And if aya soul addresses joint stock company to vyzy-howling the dead and to wizards that bludno ho- 
to dit following them, I obrashch2u the person My on that soul, and 
I will exterminate it from the people it". 


THE MOST SPITEFUL ACT OF A CERTAIN UNUSABLE WITCH CONCERNING A CERTAIN RICHARD BERT'S IDENTITY 
Oh, courteous and favorable reader! So long, 
as we live in this vale of tears and pathetic sosto-ash I eat yaniya of N, all of us, even the best of us, are not tired to repeat that we stay in a condition of continuous war, conducting a deadly and most dangerous fight with vra-gy. Enemies of N ash and against which we have to battle, an essence are as follows: world, flesh and Devil; two of them (they are whom a N ash e blind obstinacy) the most part of people considers as the friends, at that time to joint stock company of N and business they an essence helpers of our very enemy; at the same time they the multivarious friendliness deceive these people, and shch and in fact their corporal and spirits - N oh with m e r t and. 
With and m y m of of l and in N y m of N and highway and m in r and go m I in l I e t with I With and t and N and, the creator of all evil; in P isaniye we see many names explaining its spiteful nature. For the cruelty he is nicknamed by Avvadon, the destroyer because unlike what - nibud the ordinary foe it not udovletvorya-e with the CU I with m e r in t yu and p about and e in l yu in t e in l and, N about z and m y highway of l I e in t and about to about N - chatelny destruction of souls and, intolerably tormenting them about - them. Z and the ability it pozyvatsya by the thief because it from - bretat a set of ways, having used which, it mo-zht having contrived and to joint stock company accidentally to collapse the N and pious people. Z and he got the rage about - zvishche "Devil", the accuser because all the time, day and night, he is Zahn yat what accuses conscience of righteous persons. 
For the cunning he got a nickname of "dragon" because since the time of Adam, the N and is lingering AI of many thousands of years, there was no rather wise or wasps - the torozhny person who could resist to his tricks; it wounded and poisoned them to the smer-ti. For the power he is nicknamed lvom3 because like that, to joint stock company the huge body of a lion, so is full of force 
and
  in his tail the extraordinary force and power is. 


53 
The m y N and with to about l to about N e with about m of N e in and e m with I in t about m, h t about with it in r and, N ash Apollion, more powerfully is also rather strong to fight against and x cowardly cowards and unitary enterprise - rya my, but indecisive people, to joint stock company we are ovy. But to make the victory stronger and not to experience defeat in achievement of the purposes, he got used to use force of the tail - that is the bewitched slaves whom it oprede-poured to execute all the zhelan and I in the relation bezobid-ny people that already repeatedly and was made sa-by m y in m and r and z in N y in m and with p about with about and m and. The N about about chn about he N and to about d and e vyk azyvat N the dexterity, force and the power directly through the servants, but does it with on - 
moshch4yu kovarn ykh dealers in seeds false uche- 
N and I and Zahn both mayushch and hsya sorcery of witches; some with - 
blaznyat mind and soul, others attack N and transitory flesh, mislead and catch minds of people in the networks. 
I tell nothing about these lozhn ykh dealers, but I want, the Lord the witness, to tell about damned - a move whether about their rage and Zac to N of An and I x, hated to a look of B ozhy, N en avidimy good people and bringing - shch their harm to, p ok azyvayushch and x what power and superiority is received thanks to a pleasure of B ozhye-mu by the father of a sin the Satan over gresh N and to Amy, devoted m both rsk oh and z N and. 
N ekto P ichard with B ert5, the servant of one gentleman by the name of the master Edling living in Vudholla in at - the course P in in N of ER in M to an idlseksa, N akhodyashch I am eaten in mile for Harrow - it - ze-Hill, the N recovered on a barn of the hozya-Ina, located near ok rain y it goro-yes. It was accompanied by a huge mastiff. N eozhidanno he saw before himself the hare who rushed aside from it. R esh willows of N to poison N and him a dog, P ichard absolutely forgot about the purpose of the travel.6 However a dog not 
t about l to about about t to and z and l and with e and t z and z and y c e m, N about with t and l and p r y and t 
around hozya in and; at the same time it sometimes fell to the ground, letting out compassionate cries so to azhdy could ska zat that this game was obviously not for it. R ichard, having lit up, followed a hare and saw, to joint stock company that ran into the house matush to and Atkin with which already was from - spring as the witch. Then, having said a prayer and having appealed to a name of the Lord, it with confidence sk azat: "P roch, witch!" 
It was the first (that is the fact that it N azvat it - mine) that then and P ichard of B of the ert led to the tragedy. It happened so that a month later P ichard the B ert met her near the shed hozya and N and and told "good afternoon". However she to joint stock company unitary enterprise rya May of wives shch and N and, a dangerous wasp, races - prostranyayushchy an infection the witch, p ri highway of la in rage, Zawiya of his maidens, and, having inclined the head, did not pronounce a word. 
The N and the next day, that is on Wednesday, March 8, it came N and a master's barn again to work there and at the same time to flirt behind some zhivotn ymiy and as he did not want to come back that not pre-to ryvat work, it took with itself(himself) a lunch - bread, oil, cheese, apple pie and a bottle of kind beer. P having come to the place, he put a small knot with food and started to - lu. P rorabotav till twelve o'clock, it, it agrees the manager - to a day order, and having also felt an attack naked yes, decided to have dinner; however his lunch proceeded not - to stir this straw long as he saw the awful black cat sitting in straw napro-tiv it who suddenly began with strash N ym noise. 
This person, uzhasn uvshis, rose from the place. - a rzha in a hand a piece of pie (because this hungry poor molotilshch ik at did not want to interrupt so kind meal at all), he suddenly heard a voice, govo-rivshiya to it: "Leave!" "And where to me from here - to dit an ear?" he asked. In reply the spirit said the following: "And di, but leave all the things and N ozh here". 
N the eschastny gawk, continuing still - to neigh in a hand a piece of apple pie, approached to you - to the course from the shed when vn ezapn about felt what tore off it from the earth and incurred by air. P ronosyas over the fields lying below, he saw workers svo-his owner and, however he could not call them though with naked howl at it, it seems, everything was all right. So it to a share - bodies to Harrow where the N and a slope of one hill was zn achiteln ykh the sizes a reservoir; R dragged an ichard through this pond in which it left highway of la p at, become subsequently the evidence of his tortures, but it could not stop; tashch silt is higher and higher than it and vysh e. It flew over top of this hill, over high Trees at city cathedral. He remembers all this very much 
hgorosho and in process of that, to joint stock company carried him further, he, on 
e
about words, I where a mustache got to the certain place full ogn - 
the thane and I and rydan iya lyshat and e mournful p ri chi that. 
it seemed as if all damned demons of hell subject - with I p y t to and m in e that to m of L and m about 7. 
And t and to, in y at z N and l and, in with to about l with t r and N of N about e m e about that y l p e r e - not Sep of this P ichard B ert; whether it is necessary to highway to tell about from - lichiteln ykh p ri zn to joint stock company ah of this place. 
First, he says, was very much zhark about and is very dark, is more dark, than in the country to and mmer y than c ev8, disgusting aromas soared in air and from everywhere the stench proceeded; there was highway umn oh, from where - that reached to ri to and, and so strong that, appear, odnovremen-but tell one million y razl chn ykh voices, but nothing was visible around, behind an exception plamen and which caused in it in a mouth such intolerable thirst that, having remembered about foams of N and, remained with it in to Osh elk e, he began to look around searching pivn oh. 
P rislush ivayas however to these voices and thinking that some of their N address it, it sk azat: "There is no N about for me N and to joint stock company oh of work here". In reply it immediately hear it is scarlet: "N e think of it. N about you will be svobo-den Lish provided that sokhran look in secrets e and you will not tell all about this N iky when you return to - mine". N and that he answered: "About my owner spro-sit N where I was?" 
Here suddenly he felt that I z y to in a mouth was folded double, legs lit up, hands smoked, to urtk and sorva-las from backs y and fell in fire, and it, is prompt vospa-Reeve over to An of an avama and fences, I failed then to the swamp and r z, and with c and r and p and in highway and with p r and e in t about m about to and to and e - t about highway and p y and to about - lyuchk and so it had a look so oh that to watch N but not - go was and strash N about and at the same time zhalk the lake. 
Having returned N the Azat to P and N of N er9 where lived it ho-z ya and n, o N with N and h and l and N and p and l with I in about dy and z to and N and in y, and z and t e the m in such look went to one acquaintance who also occasionally worked for the master Edlinga. I, however, cannot sk the Azat whether it decided to go on there - to the fact that the house of his friend was closest, or on - to the fact that it was absent already four dn I in a row. 
And here, Sunday morning, to joint stock company it was got, it hozya in decided to go the same road to church. N e zn aya that unfortunate P ichard the B ert lost his sheep, he asked the servant whether brought to it what - nibud the person. "P ochy what - that - that answered - same your person, the sir, Richard!" "Wash a forehead - a century? - he asked. - It cannot be". And here, having inexpressibly been surprised, it was silently looked at it. 

5 6 
N of windows ets, he asked it to tell what, for the sake of the Lord, with N and m proizosh the Leningrad Region and though that could not speak, however, pomn I probably about what - it constantly uka-zyvat, doing to joint stock company iye-zn to joint stock company and, N and the house where zhi la matouche-Atk ying with, and all his being exhaled so much fear and rage that everything that and fell by N of it into hands, was immediately broken off by it in to lochya. 
Meanwhile the audience resh or that it is necessary on - to send a parish svya shch en N and to ohm which called ma-Smith, and the gentleman the master of B erbridzhy of P inner erased P ARC. P having departed to this dumb sozda-a niya whether they express the regret concerning his grief - stny it is put iya and, having surrounded it with care whether nacha-to work on N and m. They cut to it teeth whether otkry-a mouth, disconnected a finger from I z y to and and with big I rub - the house unbent it. P the ervy words pronounced by it were so ova: "In B ud use of the lyat matush to and Atkin with, be damned by m atush to and Atkin with, it bewitched exchanges I". P about - to the sla of what he did not calm down, but sk azat that also the t with N e y can even p about go in about r. 
M and with t e r B e r r and d and m and with t e r With m and t p about with l and l and z and N e y. To an ogd it p ri highway of la, this P ichard N about in also the l with I, p about to and N e r and with to r about in I N and l e y in with e l and tso snatched on her N and N e about with t and, sentencing at the same time that he does charitable serious work by means of which he will be able to recover. All and occurred what confirms also itself zhi zn because since then he definitely recovered and now ho-dit in church. 
Such is, vk ratets, the description of all those alarms and angrily - to l yu h e n and y, k about t about r y e p r and highway of l about with p r e t e r p e t, to and to go in about r and t - sya, fully, to this poor creature R to an ichard of B to an ert. All this occurred on March 8, 9, 10 and 11 this year, and 
these days it was absent, prove1dya them, to joint stock company already izve- 
with ton oh, in y highway e at p about m I would be a N at t y m about r and z about m 0. 
N about about with t and in and t m e p e r P and h and r d and B e r t and and p about go in about r and the m of N e-is a lot of about matush to e Atkin page. And z authentic messages from P in the N of an er follows that upomyan uty matush to and Atkins somehow time p ri highway of la to the house of the master of B of an erbridge for a small lump and happened it in that time when sluzhan ki z and N I am t y N and m and with l about about y N e, to t and to h t about e in l and e in m about about about N but could not receive. And to joint stock company only she went beyond a door, 
t
Ut slivk and N achat to rise and rage in a tub ah 
t and to, h t about in to about N of c e to about N of c about in about N and in y r in and l and with N and r at, r and with - those to l and with p about to ukhn e and p about p and l and in with l and in N about e about t in e r with t and e; t and to 
h
that all their economy this day suffered a loss because 

5 7 
everything spilled N and a floor and to make nothing was already a m not cart ozhn the lake. 
Oh, risen against the Lord! Enemies of a sort to a chelovecha of sky! Extortioners! N and you even fire to spend not ho-it chtsya! N and the account of this of wives shch and N y carried much razlich ny cruel and furious deya N and y, however we podve-that a result and Zac it chit everything and m in the way. 
Soon later the N ykh events upomyan uty - ma prish la of N and a certain Gregory's site To an ulson is described to ask it to help her (because she lives alms and mercy of kind people), however saw that it strongly Zahn yat the affairs - I think, it marked sheep; having said the request and seeing that it does not leave Zahn I ti I and wants to finish it to a game tsa, she from - belched from herself a smoke cloudlet. Through what - that time after that to joint stock company it ush la, and he Zac he chit the work, it released to the yard of two sheep. Suddenly they achat N very quickly to run back and forth, and rushed so until then, pok but did not die. 
George Gifford 
Dialogue about witches 
and sorcery 
Dialogue about witches and sorcery, 
in which it is openly shown how the Devil fraudulently enters 
in delusion not only witches, 
but also many other people, plunging them 
in a bad way in many great sinful acts. 

In N it is described by George Gifford, the servant of word B ozhy in M to the aldena. 
P to ochtenneyshy mister Robert To lark at, to one and z and r about N about in to and z N and h e y with t in and E e In e l and h e with t in and. 
Yours and favor! P roshlo several years since then to joint stock company I published one small track the Tat, - savshiysya vedm1, on purpose pok the Azat tricks of the Satan and all its artful deya N iya that ignorant lyu-di did not give in to his deception and were not seduced with pu-ti true. However delusions such okaza-foxes much bigger, and sins - to which it by means of witches declines many - more tya zhk and m and, than usually think of it. P odobny things slu-chatsya in many places and, to joint stock company I think, all this - the Leningrad Region very N eozhidan N ym for people 2. N esomnenno, odes - nako, that whether thanks to highway tyazhk to ohm to condemnation of Bo-a zhiya the devil collected in the hands ah so strong 
the power, 3 about which to me earlier - also hear that to at not dovo- 
dielk. And bo when people are clarified, hear and a voice 
The B of ozhiya addressing N to them they fairly otka-zyvatsya from devil lectures and do not follow his example. However N yn e about the Satan speak to N and each corner, about it slyshn about everywhere, believe in him. Magicians, sorcerers, vedmy4 speak about it. To his word at - with l ush and in and yu t with I. About N e z and m y with l and l with about in e r highway and t N e h t oh, and ash and dn and it is realized into N in zhi zn, it is followed. About the highest providence of the Lord Almighty and all earth of the master it is told about us in P ison iya x I follow - a shchy image: without his N even the arrow will not be able to fall N and z e l m yu. N and go l about in e N and highway e y with about with the h and t and N y vs e in about l about with y. D e - Mona will wound and kill people, izn ichtozhat live tny and other creatures, p ri chi I I f izichesky stra-am given them by N iya, however all demons of hell are held down and constrain - are howled by this vyssh it P rovideniye so they cannot do even p er of highway to and to tear out from to the poor fellow's snout kra-pivn ik and without special N and that the permission given them P r and in and t e l e in m in with it in t in e r d and z e in m of N about y. T I eat with N e m e in N e e, N and with z and - stavlyat to believe in what at the request of witches and for the sake of satisfaction their angry zhelan y, their spirits mutilate and kill to joint stock company of people, and zhivotn ykh. And for - to extend similar opinion in the general stvo, these kovarn ye spirits give them, forcing at the same time is opened prizn to avatsya that they make - whether all these deya N iya which never could sde-lat - at the request of the person - any demon. And bo 

61 
if they could make similar then highway would be to persuade needs them. And a nogda God gives - Mona force that that could disturb people and zhi cotton, the reasons to ityit them corporal stradan iya. If he can, he will make it at a request and on appeals of witches, however itself can absolutely not predsta-twist that their appeals give it the known force or that it will not do allowed it to make the house Gospo-until they do not call it and not N ash Luth of N and anyone. In a body che-the loveka and zhi5 cotton is a set of diseases, on - 
artificial and m, and with their help it leads up lyu- 
Tay to lameness and even to death. P ri it it - rzhit witches in to ulak e; it, it is possible sk the Azat, creates them. Ely Zack to repit fruits of the works, it to action - et by means of sorcerers of other sort whom in on rod6e call zn ayushch and mi people and wise wives shch in and - 
m and. Through N and x he shows multivarious at - 
ema, wishing that aspired to it and read him as if B of RSA. P odobny things take roots in the hearts of people, zastavlya I them, and m in the way, to be afraid of witches; they cause suspicion and excite rumors among a great number of N show N of N ykh; some are included in the category wine - vaty, sentence others to death - generally, innocent blood spills much. That is why I also want pok the Azat in it the track the Tat (moderately my modest opportunities) as skillfully the devil carries out all this. I made it in the form of dialogue in order that the conversation of N ash was available to ordinary people and not really Wuchang ym. I dare to offer this to kN and - to a zhiyets your ilost M, but not because I consider levers needing similar N AI because you a stra are stno betrayed to the Gospel is left and are so strong in belief in you - a sshy P rovideniye that it was joyful to me to see and hear to at how it is reasonable and correct postupa-your la and M an ilost in court when vozn similar situations hiccupped. That is why I offer you this book as the evidence of the gratitude for that of races - situation and kindness which you vyk azyvat to me, and I offer yours to it Favour prin its yat. If it on - serves to correction of minds of flabby people. that I will be very glad. 7 If I am mistaken in what - or, and z l about e N of N about m of N and e, I go t about in e t about and with p r and in and t. 
Your Favour obedient servant 
D about r d and f f about r d8 

6 2 
Participants: 
Semyyuel. Dan Iel. en and Semyyuela. - train M.B. - N y y uch and t e l. D about r and I e N shch and N and River. 
Sam: Here we also met, my old friend. I am glad that you vyglya dish is so good, to joint stock company and all your friends, zhi vushch and e in your village. 
Dan: N adeyus that all of them stay in kind zdra-in and and... P about to r and y N e y m e r e, about N and y l and t and to about in y m and, to about a gd I arrived here. However I am upset by another - you you - look extraordinary pale. You what, was ill recently? 
Sam: P speaking about the truth, no. Glory of B of regional public institution, with zdorov-I eat at exchanges everything is all right though it seems to me that in on - sledny time stirs up me from meat a little. 
Dan: And what, buddy? Did you decide to care for the whole world? "And bo the grief for the sake of B of RSA makes neizmen-Nov pok ayan iye to rescue, and the grief wordly makes death", 2 To a shouting.7.10. This is a great sin, I result - shch y from disbelief and doubt in B ozhestvenny provide-scientific research institute if the person wants to get up over wordly grief. 
Sam: I also really am concerned, but not from about what you sk azat. And bo at exchanges I, glory of B of regional public institution, it zhela-N and I in and z N and N e in about z N and to N e t. 
Dan: The N about can be this concern results from awareness of sinfulness? If so, then everything can do pe-r e m e to N and t with I to l uch highway e in m at. 
Sam: N et, no. P the reasons and me it is unknown. Dan: Then I will dare to ask you a question that 
e, in with e - t and to and, e t about t and to about e? Mind about l I yu, about t in e t m of N e. I e friend to you, isn't it? 
Sam: Yes - yes, of course, I always considered you ho-the roshy friend and I am sure that you will give me a beam - 
shy council, as suddenly vy9yasnilos that we 
we live in very bad derevn e. I even think, 
that in one of the worst in England. 
Dan: P to ochy? And I - that to myself thought that you are upholstered - eat in the beautiful village, in the fresh air and the UAV - the godatny earth. 
Sam: N and air... Air - that here at anything, here wicked men. 
Dan: Wicked men? Where the person zhi l, it carried - the N atkn etsyatsya by N and N and x. B ogokhuln ik, liars, swearers, tramps, p ya N and the c y, fornicators, idlers and, players in braids - ti, very sage arrogant men - they everywhere, and them is a lot of. 
Sam: N et, I do not mean them, put not in them Witches at all, these the old, enjoying support дьявол^ witches - here to that the m e disturbs N I 10. 
Dan: And what you made it that you think, budts 
you were bewitched? 
Sam: N et, no. I think that any evil ghost not smo zht to put me N ik with joint stock company oho of damage though I enough on hear An about that harm which they the reasons yat to people, they send on them lameness and kill them cattle Yes - yes, they pursue adults and children. They say that in this district there are not enough cities and villages, but in each of their N one will surely be found - during the pesh of their walks I see two witches then, there - I will tell you it to joint stock company to the friend! - what - that darlings of c and. Consciousness prompts mn e that it is the witch or what - that demons sky spirit. P Rich he always stares on me N I. And sometimes at myself in the yard I meet ugly las ku, highway mygayushch uyu there - here and in the shed - huge from a vratitelny cat. It to me too not to liking. 
Dan: N about you still any witch of anything not to food of l and l and, N e t and to l and? 
Sam: Z ayesh that, I cannot do it sk the Azat, but am afraid that can be and made N as in our city lives parochk too and and x, and I do not love them. Especially one of their N, old woman. To joint stock company I tried to please her as if to the mother, gave it everything that she wanted, and nevertheless, I think that she watches N all the time, - me frowningly. I have a swine ya which obychsh ate together with all others and, in my opinion, she was with vershenno healthy still yesterday. And so, whether this morning her N ash died. Mine of wives y had five hens and all of them died. So some neighbors suggested to burn: whom - nibud, a rooster or this pig; others soveto1vali to me to ask 2 helps at what - nibud the magician 1 ds 
that, to joint stock company about N and 1 reasons yat to me still that - or. Here yazyxwvutsr v 
I want to make, to joint stock company luchsh e. 
Dan: And is at you what here - nibud the magician, a cat ry and really helps? 
Sam: Is, tell, one here. He lives in dvadtsat; miles from here with B.'s town and already helped much. In two miles there lives one my friend from here. So he was largely not lucky: he lost two cows from three and four pigs. So he was not even given and 15 shillin g for a pig. The N at here he also went to that person and sk azat that he suspects one old woman in this district 

6 4 
He told me what that person pok azat to it in a piece of glass, sk elements at the same time that at that wives shch and N y go to improvised three or four cherten whom someone azyvat N spirits. And so, razraz their thunder, one is similar to a gray cat, the second to caress, and the third - N and a mouse! Al, that the village of N and to joint stock company will not get rid of them! To rum that is go, that person told it and what she intends to make. All this happened half a year of N the Azat and since then at not - go in the house all in poryadk e. To rum of that, in twenty five mi-the Pole from here, in R.H., lives alone very known wives Russian cabbage soup - on. To it all come when almost all hope it is already lost and. The daughter of my neighbor - and the girl of all - syat years - lameness overcame, and it was so hurt by a back that she could not even sit. He went to this wives shch in e and it sk azat to him that somewhere near them zhi-vt N the what bad neighbor for whom it dolzhn y were, according to the preliminary arrangement, to marry. Toch-it she promised to tell in case the father descends home and will bring that - nibud from her clothes in what it, that is the girl, previously dolzhn and to oversleep all night long. My neighbor came back home and tied the to - Cherie around a neck the small towel lying obych-but on p about l e. N autro he returned to this wives shch and N e, at - x in and t and v, e with t e with t in e N of N oh, p about l about t e N of c e with with about bo y, and about N and with to and z and l and to it that the girl is really bewitched, and the story - la that in this case it is necessary to do P oluchiv lekar-stvo, it cured the daughter during the same day and it ozhi-la, having become the ordinary bright little girl. L at other my neighbor of wives and it is constant about what - that worried; so it - went to same wives shch and N e and it sk azat to it that pursues his wife to joint stock company oh spirit. I do not know that it poso-vetovat to it to make, but his wives and suddenly povesele-la. I hear it is scarlet also, not, to Shai, the truth it or not that it constantly carries with itself the Gospel from And an oanna or what - that a part it. 
Dan: N about (you have plant louses so iye skillful zn akhar, then of what to you to be afraid? 
Sam: Z N ayesh, I even decided was give to drink in. but some advise me to go to that man in the town B., and others - to that wives shch and N e to R.H. I waste in a razda miya time, and meanwhile I can be ruined before, to joint stock company I will receive means to disposal. To oye-who in general advises me to beat this witch till it bleeds and to threaten her with the gallows. Oh, if I zn am scarlet, what is better, having so given - but would already make. 

3-3400	 
Dan: I think that glavn aya the danger is now that you sit on two chairs. 
Sam: It is the truth. If I knew N avern I to and at least about one of these people, then would go to it. The N about I is glad that today met you. P I dew ret, advise, what should I do. N adeyus, you are not Quality Department azhesh. 
Dan: Sees B og, I will give you luchsh and y council, mi which is capable and which, to joint stock company I think, the N and advantage will go to you if, of course, you follow it. I am very sorry that everything so developed, but most likely you are really bewitched. 
Sam: Bewitched? Do you think I is bewitched? N about at me N I hurt nothing!!! You speak strashn ye ve-shch and... 
Dan: N et, I do not think that this old woman bewitched you or your body. The N averny, is bewitched your mind, bewitched by a blindness and disbelief to take away you from B of RSA and to force to worship it (to a devil. - 
P ER.), addressing thus, m for p3 omoshchyyu demons. 
Sadly to me to see, to joint stock company dya in l1 bewitches tysya- 
chi people and they run behind it and even bring it Gers TV y. 
Sam: I N of an ikogd will not obey to a devil! P oklonyatsya to it?! Fie on it!!! I am a N en to an avizh his all heart! Du - you wash, I will look for the help at him? N et, we will find means against it. I think that it never hundred - ratsya to be good to people and never N iky helped. 
Dan: However, the situation is here not so, to joint stock company we imagine, but so, to joint stock company learns Word B of an ozha of the е14th though the person and thinks that he does not worship a devil and does not look for the help at demons, moreover, - when of it and does not think about what it constantly ubezh is given, we, nevertheless, by means of Word B ozhy of N and r at and in and e m, h t about of N p about to l about N I e t with ya and m and p r and e and e t to n and m, i shch and p of m about shch and. 
Sam: So zn you achit you think that there are no witches? Whether the N about N <' suffered the Lord, seeing that harm is done to persons of no character? And whether you think that so iye iskusn ik help people by means of a devil? I very much would like - to dit Ube you, but I slish a lump am weak in P ison of AI. However we have a teacher here; speak, he well knows svyashchen-ny texts in addition svedushch and in armor of N and. To stat, now it - and call him M.B. - has to come to msh home. And so, I ask you to unite yours and efforts 

bb 
in this N AI is put in order and to discuss the main point. You are people scientists. 
Dan: It would be not bad, odn Acre N and all needs vre-mya, and I was going to go to one place on an important issue. 
Sam: I beg you, agree! H to an etyra, pya t hours - in e d e t about t and to m and l about! 
Dan: N at well, I will go with you. 



Sam: en and, I brought the friend so I ask 
you, meet him to joint stock company it is necessary. 
en and: Very much to you I am glad. N about zn ayesh, the hubby, voob-shche-I strongly become angry about you and I hardly restrain about t t about go, h t about t y N e p about highway e l p about p r about with and t p about m about shch and p r about t and in y the old bitch. This night at us one more ku-died riyets. Others N akhodit means from it! To us M.B. came now and told that kind wives shch and N and R. all last week of N and to joint stock company could not shake up oil. It and worked without rest, pok but did not send the husband to that wives shch and N e in R.H.; when he came back, they threw a heat handful in slivk and, pronouncing at the same time certain words, to joint stock company was N of joint stock company an adhan about that wives - shch in oh, and at their N good, soft oil what they did wounds sh e turned out. And I met this old creep this morning. Auger's B, with to joint stock company to them expression - as if okhotn ik N and the victim - vzglyan an ula it N and exchanges I, and, departing that - there murmured that! I even rasslysha-la something. "Ah - sk she azat - your husband the honest person, but I hear it is scarlet that he despises exchanges I". You know, at me inside everything turned over. N about here I on - undertook courage and scratched it. P a ravda then I is-was frightened that could with it and not master - it so aya the healthy aunt. I want me to me at - highway of la kind wives shch and N and R.I to ask you, my dear, descend, please, to that of wives shch and N e. You dobe-rtsya for poldn I there. 
Sam: en and, I ask you, calm down. I asked mo-his old friend to talk on this subject to M.B. because he sk azat to me that we fell into a deep zabluzhde-of N and e. 
M.B.: N askolko allow me mine zn An and I and spo-sobnost, I think that the small reasoning on this subject can serve to us the known service. Word 

3

*  

7 
The B ozhy yavstven N about pok azyvat N am that witches sushchest-vut. To rum of that, it rules to sentence to us them to death. And from N of our experience we slish a lump well zn Ai about that set of the evils which they can us p ri chi N and t. And if who - suddenly has a way - a nost ok the Azat the help in fight against their N, to joint stock company we are m about e m in t and to about y with and t at and c and and about t to and z and t with I? R and z in e y N e we drink m when getting thirsty? R to an azva we do not put on warm clothes when to N am it is cold? Adequately regrets if who - that stands up for witches, it creations not devout. 
Dan: H I concern exchanges, I am not going zashchi-shch to at witches, and I do not reject at all that from them on - power the devil creates the deya N and I. And x really it is necessary to sentence to death. And we is valid dolzhn y the claim to at means to get rid of N and x. N oh, to joint stock company I already sk azat to my friend, the devil bewitches all by means of witches and conducts them from B of RSA to that they followed it, made it a sacrifice, worshipped it, a subrank yalis his ox, making a set horror - N ykh sins and being involved in various sinful deya by N and I. 
M.B.: If you mean that witches and sorcerers are fascinated by a devil that they refuse B of RSA and follow N and m, worship and submit to him, at - carry to him the victims and make a set tya zhk and x gre-Hove, then I agree with you because I consider that they decline the necks before N to them, otherwise it would be very difficult for it to work with N and mi. N about if you are du - drudgery that search of lifesavers in aspiration un to ichtozhit them lead to the fact that people seduce - sya and go astray a devil, then I will tell that your speeches are hasty and silly because these people passionately vystu-sing both against witches, and against a devil. They throw down it a challenge, resist it, wishing un to ichtozhit its tools. So if you were an erudite person, you would see that contrasts cannot real stvovat in the same subject, at the same time, in the same part and in the same otn Osh en AI: to joint stock company then it is possible that the person of a nen sees a devil, fights against it and his affairs, and nevertheless, follows it? 
Dan: I zn ayu that usually witches and wizards of a dream - Chala are led astray then they stano-vitsya by servants About Aton y: they prisluzhn ik and, and not vice versa, to joint stock company you noticed it. N about I is valid 

68 
I mean that many are under a delusion and avert - sya from B of RSA, N of an acha of N aya to follow a devil, - giving the benefit to influence of witches and sorcerers. And I tell it not about those against whom win piety, but about those who are turned by means of blind anger and wild rage. If I tell it hasty and thoughtlessly, to joint stock company you desired to twist darling and if you, in your opinion, know everything, zyxwvutsrqp of 
I nothing then I can be disproved with a bigger ease. To N about I tell it so is-krenno and so I will be able to justify the N oye by me Word B ozhy is told that your VSR zn An iye and ability will not be able op-to rovergnut my words. First, levers the wine logic will bring sobst-. "P rotivopolozhnost cannot sushchest-vovat in the same subject, in the same vre-mya, in the same part, in the same otnoshe-N of AI". Has to notice that you are blind and are mistaken about these contrasts saying that the first of them - hatred to a devil, the N his epriyaty persons and his acts is in them (people. - P ER.) when actually it exists only in their representation. P to atom that if people speak and think that they from - vergat a devil and it deya N and I, being at the same time bewitched through disbelief and deception and following for dyavo-scrap and ispoln yaya its commands, then really their speech and blind imagination will force things to exist real-but? What from this if the poor beggar - the tramp thinks that she is a queen, and speaks about it. H that, she deystvi-telno any more not than N and shch en to and also does not ask to herself some bread on p r about p and t and N and e? And in highway e y N and N e y about l highway e N e t? 
M.B.: Whether you know... If people frankly vystu-sing against a devil, do not accept him and his works, really you will judge their consciousness and govo-to rit that whether they accept it highway in imagination, worshipping and following it in fact? Whether the N e is a B og the only Judge of hearts human? And then: you, maybe, compare the people staying in zdrav5om mind to mentally ill people and are not absolutely normal - 
m and? 1 
Dan: I zn ayu, perhaps highway to the Lord is allowed pron ikn to utnut in depths of heart human, having reached what is hidden in potayn ykh it ugolk ah. But if these it is shown iya are before 1 all, to joint stock company it is told, a tree pozna- 
it etsyatsya on p by the Leningrad Region I will give 6. If person thoroughly ispovedu- 
et belief And Christ's isus, in everything following word B ozhy then N achin the ayah to build the zhi zn in a new way, 

6Q 
doing good, hardly perhaps to whom - nibud osuzh-to give it and to say that he is the hypocrite doing all this for the sake of vain glory. It is possible that the Lord, razlicha- 
yushchiya of secrets ye N ameren i1ya the shower and, sees also that sobi- 
whether rummages to do c I eat ER 7. On the other hand, if it 
proclaims N and words that also his Dejan Iyy, but at the same time when it attract to is-p y t and N and yu slo in m of B about and m does not accept a devil, v N e z and p N about about to and z y in and e t with I, h it is seduced, tangled a devil in network of delusion, disbelief and sinful Dejan Iyy, in to joint stock company ovy it carries out will of the Satan and glorifies it instead of the Lord of B of RSA whether we can sk the Azat that whether it is the good person highway because he pronounces and e words and has under - bny representations and that it does not accept a devil and 
his Dejan Iyy? "A grief of subjects, k1otorye the evil of N is azyvat good, 
and kindly - the evil", And page 5 8. Dolzhn about to notice that all 
they are in very bad situation, except those who will regret and will be averted from About Aton y. That is why I am about in about r yu, h t about in e r uyu shch and y h e l about in e to m about e t about highway and and t with I in to and - kikh-that from these questions on the reasons e weaknesses in belief and on ignorance. And Menno therefore does not follow spe-to highway and t with otsen to Amy here. P to an oskolk you find mine vi-well that I compare people of mentally ill people and holes - maln ykh, I have to sk the Azat that because of yours - go ignorance you consider that there are no two vi-Dov of mentally ill people: the first, it is N akhodyashchiyesya not in the right mind concerning affairs zemn ykh, and the second - concerning affairs spiritual and heavenly. There is and e which N apravlya-yu t with in about y r and z at m of N and about Kommersant e to t y e t about about m and r and, and t and k and e, k about t about - ry, thinking of objects dukhovn ykh, happen so N ep rava, to and to that N and shch aya brodyazhk and, a m of N I shch aya itself the righteous woman - the queen. R to an azva did not speak St. The apostle, that whether "they p ri N I love of the truth y, B og will send them strong 1z9abluzhdeniye so they will trust a lie", 
2 F e page 2. H t about e t oh, to and to N e with about in r and shch e n and e, p about r h and and about to about l - 
dovyvaniye the Satan of minds of people whom he conducts to about - Manu and zabluzhden to iya, forcing them to believe that they worship B of regional public institution when N and the business they poklonya-yutsyatsya to demons? 
M.B.: Do you think, St. P avet meant it? 
That is what About Aton and bewitches minds human, misleading people, and conducts them to a lie, forcing to believe at the same time that they worship B of regional public institution, at that time to joint stock company they worship a devil? 

70 
Dan: St. P avet really speaks about coming of great An of the tikhrist in strength of the Devil. So those who are seduced by Antichrist and worship him, think that they ok azyvat honors of B of regional public institution. However listen that go-cooks St. And oan N: "Also the whole world was surprised, and followed an animal, and bowed to that dragon who gave the power to an animal; and they bowed to an animal", About shopping mall r D Z 20. Yes then look in the 12th head of the Revelation and there you will find that this Dragon to which pases - p and with t y in m e with t about t about go worship, to h t about y p about the h and t and t B about and, e with t with and m D I - in about l. 21 
M.B.: Truly, your words very much were pleasant to me and I made sure that the devil seduces and bewitches minds human. As for that on - to look for the help against witches, magicians and witches, I do not think that it is necessary to treat them so strictly. Perhaps, I am mistaken, but one I know N avern a yak and: if word B ozhy specifies to me N and mine Osh ibk, then an emphasis - will not be stvovat by me, of course. Give friendly about - we judge this question and do not take offense on exchanges I, so to joint stock company I, in return, will speak about everything that I know or what I think of. 
Dan: In turn, I want to ask you vyslu-to shat all mine vysk azyvan and I. Also let's follow in all this business from one p un to that to another, ostanavli-being howled only where we will disperse in mneni-yakh. And let word B ozhy will be the only Judge among us. 
Sam: To me the N ravitsya. There is nothing to add here so I sit and I listen to you. 
Dan: And so, to joint stock company oh we will discuss an issue the lane - 
you are m? 
M.B.: I hear it is scarlet that you sk an azalea if, of course, I am not mistaken that there are such witches who act by means of a devil. P I dew ret you, tell, you think that it indeed? I zn ayu that some think in to an acha. 
Dan: It is so obviously confirmed St. P isani-I eat and appears from experience, that is that exist - we acting by means of a devil or, it is better ska to zat, the devil acts with their help that desire to prove opposite will demonstrate only fault-finding of the people wishing to make it. 
M.B.: I am glad that in it Poon to a kta we adhere uniform mn en iya. N adeyus, as further all bu- 

7 1 
is put to be in a similar way. And what you will tell about the following is approved iya: that witches have the spirits, some one, some it is more - two, three, four or even five; some of them act in one appearances, others - in another: in vi-a cat, caress and, la of grounds to and, we are highways and. To their witches ormit 
milk or in c yp la tam2i, sometimes allow them sli- 
to zyvat to apelk and to r about vi. 2 Witches cause them when 
who - nibud offends them, at the same time they incite du - to do Hove offenders harm - to wound them either to kill, or to ruin their cattle. 
Dan: The extraordinary delusion and great deception consists in it. Here the devil conducts ignorant people to gross blunders thanks to which he vver-gat them in many regrettable sins. 
M.B.: Then I have to say that you zabluzhdaye-t e with, e with l and about t r and c and e t e vs e e t and in e shch and, about in about r I, h t about vs e e that some illusions. Similar already repeatedly dokazyva-elk, at least even numerous p ri zn An and I mi sa-my witches. I, in turn, test disturb - a stvo in this occasion and I can, having given a set fak-t, to tell about similar cases. Within these five years I zhi l in one village also was at us one zazhitochn y the person there. And suddenly within ten days at it die three cows, his bull at the cost of 10 pounds went lame, shot it in a back, and dithat it in in about z r and with t e with e m and l e t about t p r and in and l about with in m and r and n about y. About N p about highway e to that wives shch in e in R.H. and she sk azat l to it that N and it the witch sent damage of N of EC aya. P ri it she added that in its town there live three witches and one sorcerer. She asked it which of N them he more suspects. N and that the N ash men and answered that to him one is suspicious old wives shch and N and. P a donkey of what he forced this old woman to appear before the wordly court and to answer everything vop-dews. N of joint stock company it ets, after long zapiratelstvo it sozna-las in everything. And what became clear there? It had three spirits: the first in a species of a cat which it N azyvat Legkonog, the second - in the form of a toad. It Lang h called Tre-of tiya the N and caress resembled and whether carried to chk at Hitroum-N y. She told to court that this Legkonoga to it proda-la sixteen years ago N of EC aya matush to and B of Arly from V., p about p r about with and in z and N e go l and highway p e h e N y y p and r about about to. P r and e it sk azat m that the cat will serve it good service and that if she wants, will be able to send it on the instructions. To atom it used it not for long, odes - 

72 
N and to about l and with to and and and and and with p r and in N about and with p about l of N I am l and about I z and N of N about with t and: the cat ruined a cow, caress and - horses, and a toad nasyla-la I spoil N and people. All of them it sent (on sobstven-to Nome prizn An iyu) against this person. Sentence her - whether to prison it is concluded iyu and there she almost at once and died. I can porasskazat to you a lot of things that is to about oh, the N about and t about l e e in e that m m e with t e I would be a N e with about and r and yu with. 
Dan: N at, about me you are mistaken. I do not say that these things do not exist; just I think that the devil by means of similar is shown y deceives and with - rotates ignorant people and conducts them to zabluzh-to deniye and regrettable sins. That is why let's check each situation, the N oye is stated by you, and you will see that there is nothing else there. 
M.B.: And exchanges of N about it I would also like hear to at. You, zn achit, prizn the ayah that they have in service of spirits who - one who - is more and that those exist in uk an adhan of N of ohms of appearances. Into what sorts of delusion are entered then similar people? 
Dae of N: First, we will consider that there is a huge set, and N ymiy words, army of demons that we see already in Evan helium. Many demons lodged in the person, that is why Christ speaks: "To joint stock company yours 
name?" and 23slysh it answer: "Legion, because us set", 
M and r to. 5. So demons exists extraordinary 
it is a lot of, and all of them are conducted so great nenavi-by Stew to B of regional public institution and so great zhelan iy to reach that, h that y E g about p about N about s and l and i N about z about r and l and, since about r and I p r and e t about m about t of mad rage and hatred to people that all of them connect the efforts together, helping and advancing each other in all the deya of N and I x. Even in P ison of AI it is saidit is saidit is said, that is the fact that they look as if one uniform Demon. Here words St. P etr: "P your rotivnik, 
the devil, goes, to joint stock company roar ayushch and y4 a lion, both shch ushch and y whom 
it could absorb", 1 P e t. 5. To 2 B 12 chapter of the Revelation 
all 2nd demons make that huge red drako- 
N and. 5 And With p and with and t e l N and highway I in l I e t, to and to about N and p r e in r and shch and yu t with I 
in one when says: "If the Satan is separated from the Satan or if Sat2ana demands the Satan, to joint stock company will resist 
its kingdom", M f. 12. 6 So now all so or other 
che has one result, svya Zahn and whether the witch, to joint stock company she considers, with all at once or with mn ogy: to azhdy of them works not one by one, but by means of others. That is why, if such men and or wives shch and N and keep up acquaintance to one demon, then it equals to that, 

7. 4 
to joint stock company if they had the friends one hundred demos - is new. The B is more scarlet than that, these demons - spirits, they have che-go-no that similar to a body, though can appear in N what images, to and to that magicians before eyes f araon2a7 when their staffs were turned into snakes made once, 
And with x. 7. That is why one demon can act in vi- 
four or p I ti, and four or five demons cancan azatsya by one is uniform stven N ym. All this is pok and * uniform in many respects and vice versa - tricks About Aton y. 
M.B.: Then whether you think that the more - mon, the Satan is more powerful? 
Dae of N: It so, but here almost nothing N elzya to distinguish because if the witch also makes that - that, so to her and one - Maun can be in ten images and vice versa. 
M.B.: N at yes, it is possible to agree with it. P I dew ret you, continue. 






















Dan: Now we should note, to JSC Sv. P the isaniye represents to us demons. These are powerful awful 
spirits, vlastn ye, angry and cruel, comparable with te2m 
huge strash N ym to rasn ym a dragon of ohms, About shopping mall of river 12 8, 
or with a gluttonous and hungry lion, which nachi- 

74 
aches to roar after a prayer, 1 P e tr. 529, and with N azvan N y- 
mi St. P avly to N ya3 zya m and, masters and governors 
darkness of this m and r and 0. And so, as they prin imat 
form and x zhalk and x creatures to joint stock company to Osh to and, we are highways, a toad and caress and, we see, how they artfully hide the tyrant iyu and the power which is carried out by them over sulfurs - dets weak. The B is most scarlet to us it is necessary zn to at as the strong enemy resisting to everyone and everything, we have. So the N should am be soared to the Lord of B of regional public institution that it allocated us with the force in fight against N them. 
M.B.: Well, but that - you mean by it? I do not deny at all that P ison iye really depicts N am these demons to joint stock company of powerful and evil spirits. Possibly, they really so ova, though are before Amy's N in the form of a cat or caress and. 
Dae of N: H I concern exchanges, I do not say that they are not powerful and not uzhasn y because appear in and x here images, but prizn ayu that a similar form of their appearance of N uzhn and to hide and hide their force and e f f EC tivn ye actions which they make in temn ykh human hearts. Also notice, please, ho-Roshen ko that strength of demons is exactly in the hearts of people. They harden hearts, blind spiritual zre-N iye; thanks to corporal lust both zhelan and yu they vver-gat them in anger, rage, envy and incite to cruel murders; they excite in N their pride, vysokome- 
ry and tshchetn uyu glory, conduct to 3b1uystvu, to libertinism and about - 
chy otvratiteln ym in e shch and m of N hell all this they I rub - 
ditsya constantly and with such effectiveness that without force slavn ykh stradan y and it is revived iya the Lord of our N And an isus Christ which we find in belief, they nevoz-can resist, that is why they also perform in ro-as l and N e to about e y p r and with l ug and, z and N and m and yu shch e y with I p about r h e y in N and p and t to about in, do them zhi r to N y by m and, do not allow cheese to cook, and to oil to get off, exhaust to Ur and pigs, N and lower people of N chilly - I weave, etc. 
M.B.: The N about can be they do not do all these ve- 
Russian cabbage soup at once? 
Dan: Perhaps, but I consider that p ok and they Zahn ima-yutsyatsya to rup by N y mi affairs, to and to, N an aprimer, excite tyrants or angry lyu2dey to pursue, wear also wasps - 
korblyat E van gels e, 3 plunging their N and c; to divide 
kings and the kingdom and razzh a corduroy road between N them wars and hatred, and disagreement and quarrels between the husband and - ache, introducing and m in the way a commotion and bespo-everywhere 

7 5 
the row, they, dolzhn about to be, Zahn imatsya and p ustya to Amy, but it they so N astraivat minds of people that those cannot see them and just do not turn vn and Mang and I for their role in all this. 
M.B.: I pon imat what you under all this podra-zumevat, but the N and to joint stock company is not known to me to what you conduct? R to an azva vi dya shch and e all deeds not prizn atsya by witches what everything mentioned by you - work of a devil? 
Dan: N evezhestvenny people, it is strong zap stealing of N ye - mom, in words really prizn you at all that, to joint stock company and sk an azalea, but the code it comes to the real business then all of them reject. And bo the devil constantly besieges a shower at 
the person, str3emyas will throw in it all the awful stre- 
ly, E f EU. 3 wishing to death both zran and t it with the help 
sinful villain of N y. "The devil goes around, to joint stock company of roar - yushch y a lion, and shch and whom it could absorb", 1 P etr.5. By means of deception, using at the same time witches, demons for - stavlyat blind people to represent that they N of an ikogd will not approach close N to them unless in case - we become angry also N ash Luth of their N and whom - nibud. So they can easily be taken away if to burn what - or live sou - a shchestvo, N an aprimer, a pig or chicken, or having beaten till it bleeds the witch. Dumayushch iye that from N them it is possible - to curl a log hut or in this way, or having poured a heat handful into milk, the N and the business is far and from pozn An iya spirits - ache fight in which we dol4zhn y to act under zname- 
it against dya in la.3 Iechtch e less they know Christ, to joint stock company 
primen yat weapon of B ozhy (to joint stock company spoke St. P avet) 5 for that is 
go to resist and defeat him, E f the EU.b.3 It mo- 
zht to influence N and their shower and even then when it it is simple slu-highway the ayah. They prin imat it not as it stands, but through its messages when in their bodies there is pain, and their good and property bears what - or a loss. 
M.B.: I do not deny at all that demons stremyat- 
sya, glavn ym in the way, destroy and t a shower and human. The N about (to joint stock company I pon the yawl) you prizn the ayah that they, being the ambassador - ny witches, also make all these is broken iya. And after all I do not see p ri chi N y why people cannot N of an IT of means get rid from and x misfortunes and izgn to at by means of what - that suitable these demons? R to an azva With l about in about B about and e z and p r e shch and e t of N and m and with p about l z about in and t and x? E with l and I am sick, unless I will not resort to the medicine help? And the EU - whether I suffer from thirst, unless I will not drink water? Yes, I agree with you though till this moment I never noted so definitely that the devil acts here 

7 6 
extraordinary izoshch Wren of N about - communicating with all to and mi pus-tya highway of N y mi Amy's thing, he hides the participation in more serious as if it is not here at all also nearby. But the thing is that I resist to it in these serious a thing ah; so unless I cannot ispolzo-vat that N uzhn oh, and what will save me from him in ve-Russian cabbage soup less zn achiteln ykh? I am going if, of course, I am able, to get rid of him in everything. 
Dan: Whether N about we yet p ri highway to that, to joint stock company of the witch on - banish devils and to joint stock company they put all these injuries. Here - that also is the main insidiousness of a devil by means of which he misleads a set lyu-Tay. However we is somehow accidental upomya-zero about means to get rid of it as (to joint stock company I already spoke) dumayushch iye to get rid of it vysheopi-do not know a sled image spiritual fight. Still me-it they know, to joint stock company yat all weapon of B of RSA is necessary podn to overcome the Devil. P an oryadok of N ash to it conversations before - p about l and and e t, h t about with N and h and l and m y go in about r and the m about t about m, to t about to about go p about - banishes, then about all corporal is damaged iya, koto-ry the devil puts, and then about those means, koto-ry are used to defeat him. So let's return slightly N the Azat if you agree about those m, about the h e m I with e y h and with go in about r and l. 
M.B.: I will make it with big hunting because and m about - at once we will miss nothing. However to me to it azhtsya that we is completely uniform odushn y that witches send the spirits and make a lot of evil to joint stock company concerning people, and in the relation zhi votn ykh. Says us about it N ash daily experience. And if you do not deny what witches show in the activity, then, I do not doubt, on all this vop-to dews we will reach agreement. 
Dan: I say that witches send the spirits. M.B.: So to us then N uzhn oh, to bring 
result on it p un to that, N and which we dolzhn y sogla-with and t with I? 
Dan: N at though we also agreed that some on - banish others, nevertheless, we can disaccord N and the one who whom sends. For N of an achal tell - those to me: who is a servant, the witch or the Devil? To that from their N orders and who submits? 
M.B.: To joint stock company I can answer N and this question? It is considered that it I vlya etsyatsya by her servant and when the witch than - that is not satisfied and also I want mshch en, she N of An imat it that - 

77 
he would make that to it N uzhn the lake. Witches neodnokrat-but p ri zn avals s in it, and as for exchanges I, I am du - to May that the N and to will not be able to disprove it. 
Dan: Vypoln yayushch iye will of B ozhyyu essence children and servants of B of an ozhya. Vypoln yayushch iye pozhelan iya the Devil and under - a rank yayushch iye6sya to it an essence children and his servants, And oan.8.44; - 
I am a N 1 3. 1 0. 3 N e p r and in d and l and? 
M.B.: N at yes! Dan: These demons are governors of darkness of this world, 
Eph es.6.12.37 
M.B.: The text slish to ohm is clear. Dan: Darkness of this world does not mean darkness of night at all, 
whether I vlya yushch eysya highway an earth shadow, but am darkness du8khovnaya, 
with about with t about I shch and I in N e z N and N and and B about and, N e in e r and i and g r e x e. 3 
M.B.: The N ascht it I agree with you. Dan: Whether you then so think that the devil has 
the seat, the possession and the kingdom in a fit of temper not - vezhestvenny and blind incorrect? 
M.B.: Has to with need notice that it indeed. To it I am brought also by ozha word B e; it it is valid to N I z darkness. 
Dan: And whether is in whom is nibud a bigger disbelief and darkness, than in witches, magicians and in other, have - shch them zn an akomstvo with a devil? 
M.B.: I think that disbelief and darkness would overwhelm them about l with highway e, h e in m to about about y that N and y in l of the lake. 
Dan: And now put everything about what you sk an azalea, together also look whether it corresponds to the fact that the witch is a servant of a devil, but not it it prisluzhn Ik. He is Mister and to Oman di r; she submits to it, you - poln yaya all gryazn uyu work. 
M.B.: Yes, it is.Yes, it is.Yes, it is. However though he and Mister, nevertheless, in certain cases it uses it. Witches prizn at that they call them and posy-bark where it is necessary; or N of An imat them to do much harm to whom - that lichn about or to spoil the cattle at the one with whom they were dissatisfied. 
Dan: I am very sorry, but you are deeply mistaken. P r and with to about r to N about to about d and to t about - l and about with about in e r highway and e t of t and to about about r hey yeahhey yeah about highway and to and, about with about e N of N about e with l and e t about the h e l about in e to uch e N y y and p r and z in and N - ny to teach others. 
M.B.: Words yours and x I odn will not accept Acre because if you deny also it, then to argue silly on what - or further. I firmly stand N and the point zren iya, on that, h t about I z N and yu, and with N e e m e N I am a N e with t about l to N at t. P about with l ush and y t e e 

78 
mee*nya. In one big city zhi la of m atush to and V. A at 
^ the spirit, vn eshn e resembled caress. To joint stock company - that time her somebody very strongly offended G.M. P having come home, she you is 
called the evil ghost who lezhal3 9 in to orzin to e with 
the wool standing at it under to ro vatyyu. P ozhelav on - 
to send a pestilence on this person, it sk azat to spirit that pre-delivers it an opportunity to kill this G.M.I still it sk an azala that will give it a rooster that subsequently and .sdelat; and the spirit ush ate. P ocht at once that man fell down in a bed, he was awfully hurt by a stomach, for not - how many days he sharply weakened and soon died. This - ma was brought and to court, is condemned and hung up. To with t and t and about in about r I, about N and in about in with eat p r and z with N and l and with. 
Dan: I already said to you earlier that do not wipe at all - to Cai of these a thing to her; and, nevertheless, all of you - deception - are howled about their essence. With to an azhita, unless govo-rit not the truth St. P etr - "the devil goes around, to joint stock company the roaring lion, and shch and whom it could absorb", 1 P et.5? 
M.B.: N at and that? Dan: To joint stock company that? N of an euzhela you are so ordinary that 
do you imagine as if the devil lies in to orzin to e with yarn, in a cosiness and heat and does not move at all whether unless highways togas - yes, when will ask him or for what - that N aynut? Such demons agree about the actions, they ener-gichna and N of an ikogd have not a rest, neither in the afternoon, nor at night. They N of an ikogd are not tired, to them the N of an ikogd is not cold, they do not need a soft bed. Exist, to - nechno, so iye silly highways utk and by means of which he deceives witches and bewitches minds of many to the boor - stvenny people. And the fact that you say as if who - the N of An imat him too deception. And therefore whether allow highway for - to give you two - three questions, or if to be necessary, it is slightly more. 
M.B.: And what questions are? Dan: You say that the witch comes home races - 
serzhenny. To that, except a devil, can soften and uti-to sew anger in her heart? To that fills her brain with rage, e l and N and e m y t about t about m shch e N of N about y, with t r e l m e N and e m with about in e r highway and t different dirty tricks, to joint stock company not a devil? Whether in N e he governs her heart? With to an azhita what you think about it? 
M.B.: Has to prizn at that the devil vozbuzh-gives in her anger and rage. 
Dan: So he does not lie at home in baskets ke at all 
with
  p rya necks, and N and to that not the N of An imat him. Therefore, 
the witch goes at it in poden shch ik ah, submitting 

74 
to it and it uk an adhan and I am m, and not vice versa. And therefore tell me whether the devil is similar to huge red drako-on, Otkr.12., the N of N who is burned with rage against the Lord, p r e and with p about l of N e about go to r about in and in about y, e with t about the h and y highway e y N e N and in and with ti against people? And unless not it is more ready for any evil - act, than to joint stock company oh of men and or wives shch in and? 
M.B.: The devil is more cruel than who - or from people. It is impossible to deny it. 
Dan: So if the N ikto does not deny it, and he makes the evil and anger in heart of the witch, then why to it it is necessary also to imatsya N of An somewhere? It excites her, and 
if vozn ikn et need, czyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV of l is able to avert it 
from zhelan and I to use him. So why to it to be in service? R to an azva it for whom - that goes, for a chicken - mi or for c yp la tami? It what, it is hungry, to it, perhaps, getting hungry? 
M.B.: There is no N et-, however it is considered that the devil before - accepts all this in order that dock the Azat, as if the witch prin adlezhit to it. 
Dan: P lips will be so. That you sk an azalea, are that - that so oye... N and the business he gets much more deeply because the truth is that he convinces the blinded people as if he almost does not interpose in their matter. N about even if to it that - charge or somewhere send, then and then in all this his intervention is shown. That is why all also attack on old women whom though somehow it is possible to suspect that they are witches as if they represent heads - ny danger to the world. It is possible to think that all bu-it is put well and all will appear in safety if them you are 
drive. Here 4pochemu from them also begin so thoughtlessly from - 
bavlya tsya. 0 I zvestno that many consider as if - 
ma, having own spirits there is something it seems a forehead of the century holding bad dogs. It can set them on foreign cattle and dogs will obey to it because to it - mu there is a tendency in their nature though they never achn ut to do to N nothing similar, unless to them only p ri to anut. So here all harm occurs from the person who has such dogs. People a thought - yut that the village will be able to get rid of all these spirits if there is nobody, setting on them or posy-barking them at business. They think that in that case both they, and their cattle will stay in safety. Alas, unfortunate it is created iya! To joint stock company they are mistaken! 

80 
With to about l m and l 0 they understand in the highest P rovideniye of B of RSA 
the Almighty reigning over all N of Amy. 
M.B.: So, zn achit, you think that witches should not be expelled? And whether you consider that it will not become better for residents of this village if they are able to get rid of them? 
Dan: As for izgn An iya witches, on this subject P isaniye speaks quite definitely: "You should not allow witches to live", however whether before p un to that we yet Dosch. Main thing here here that: whether the person can be quiet if to expel witches, to joint stock company of N and volume on - the stray and blinded people melt? 
M.B.: The person feels that pain and those wounds y which they put him even if people it is very much old - yutsyatsya izgn to at them. In it there is nothing surprising. N about it would be good if it was possible to clear of them all earth. 
Sam: Truly, M.B., I completely agree with you. I wish all of them were hung up the friend opposite to the friend. And then (I hope) we will not be so strongly bo-yatsya their spirits. N about izvin to an ita, I interrupted you. 
en and: And I wish those who will not be hung up will not be burned, straight would send to hell. If whether all highway one vya Zahn to and sick around the world appeared hundred, I and that would carry by her N and myself the whole mile whether highways would only burn this witch! Here! 
Dan: N at ladn oh, kind wives shch and N and, hold - the brushwood so far and do not trouble the shoulders. P ozvol it is better for us to discuss this problem a little more. P I dew ret you to allow me to ask you such question: whether the witch or a devil causes harm to the person and domashn to them zhi-in about ton y in m? 
M.B.: N at, the devil does it own Amy's hands though it has to prizn atsya that all this can look and so, to joint stock company you sk an azalea that is that the devil makes all this in the head of the witch, forcing it on - to banish it where it is necessary. 
Dan: The devil has the kingdom and there is it in darkness and not righteousness of a sin. At it is not present it is right, vla-st over creatures of B of an ozhya mi, it is not so strong to Kill a fly or utashch and t zern ysh to about from what - nibud a barn until it is not given for this purpose strength. You 
you know that when Christ and zgn is scarlet demons from oderzhimogo4.1 
about N and p about p r about s and l and r and z r e highway and t and m in about y t and in with t and to with in and N e y. 
Here and sk to an azhita to me who gives to a devil this power when it is sent by the witch who gives it strength to kill and 

8 1 
to send damage of N and people and animals? Whether the witch put it - et? And whether you think that he has force to create all these zlodeyan iya, but only when it sends it? Or perhaps in your opinion, force to it is given by those f to joint stock company of t what the witch sends it somewhere? 
M.B.: Really, over this question the back should - matsya. N esomnenno that the devil does not possess neobkhodi-wash with force until it it is not given. It not mo-zht to touch, wounds to ityit, to do much harm a nickname - to whom to creation; he is able only ush to at and tempt the claim. To rum of that, I am convinced that only the Lord can allocate it with such force from above, but N and to joint stock company not the witch. 
Dan: Let's unite then two following hollow wives and I: the devil can only harm, but the N ikto not mo-zht to allocate it with such force, neither men and, nor wives - shch and N and, N about t about l to about B about of N about t e p e r with to and and t e m of N e, N e y l and whether people are oddly entered into one cruel delusion enough? And bo if they assume that the devil is something like the executioner Gospodny and obna-ruzhivat that it has the certain strength given to annoy it, to harm and concern people corporally, or to and to and m - t about and N y with m about r and z about m, t oh, z N and I am a N and in e r N I to and, h t about e that proceeds from the Lord, they understand (to joint stock company it and is in fact) that the B og is dissatisfied with them for them about - mortars. And they aspire to N to it and timidly beg to forgive and exempt from this enemy, wishing to the thief to be to multipowerful weapon of belief in order that 
to beat off his N apadk and and proti2vostoyat to him, to joint stock company of the same is 
the Lord, 1 P etr lat. 5. 4 N et anything more the worst 
for the person, than to fall into sinful delusion, thinking that witches made all this, to the management - yas the anger, and not pon imy that there is this from human sins and disbelief. In it there is no N ik joint stock company oho yet - I n and ya, n ik to joint stock company is oho forgiven iya they will not implore to themselves, but will vspomoshchestvovat even more to a devil, using those means which it through razn ykh ordered probation - ny wizards, scraping claws and being scratched, ispy-tyvy I am eager from blood of the victims, burning with rage about tiv those whom they depicted as witches that for - frequent happens incorrectly, as people think that if usual sorcery of witches is absent, then not the dale - zhno to be also so many disasters and the evils. As if and but there was a N and to the earth of sins and disbelief, or disappeared spra- 

8 2 
vedlivy punishment and to the macaw of B of an ozha y or as if the N have it no demons, performers of his anger any more. 
M.B.: P oistin e, words yours and N agn Ali of N and me stra-hu because leaves, as I am guilty of all these priskor-bny a thing ah. P about to paradise of N to it to a measure, you depicted it quite so. However, at will of B an ozhiya, I more vni-will matelno think over this business. I spoke with many, the N aspiring to these iskush en ym to people, zhelavsh them to use their help, agrees oprede-lenny is ordered to iya that, by your words, is equal to aspiration to the help of a devil. This question we dolzh-ny now razresh and t as I firmly oprede-flew also about one place from your speech so I want to ask you: do you acquit witches owing to the fact that B og, but not they, give strength to a devil? Don't you think thatDon't you think thatDon't you think that demons will ruin people and their cattle if they are sent not by the witch? Whether P osledut all these the villain - N iya if witches are not? 
Dan: I sk azat that only B og, but not witches give demons strength to torment and exhaust people. It is so obvious, to joint stock company and the fact that there will hardly be a person, about - ladayushch y so oh by force. And prizn it is necessary to at it. However this statement does not rehabilitate at all witches because their sin is in connection with a devil and that 
they represent as if their spirits so4vershayut 
all these zlodeyan iya at their request and N aushch en and bb. 3 Because on 
the business a devil, having force p ri chi in N I t harm or z in N and I, h t about with m e r in t in l and about t I e in l y e about l e z in N and N and with t and of N ut and h e - a loveka, and zhivotn oye, enters the witch into an angry state and lines it to give it what - nibud an assignment. H concerns other your question, I say to you, we see in P ison of AI that if witches were not with - everything, and then the person everything is equally the devil would pursue, doing harm to his health and welfare. Concerning pious people the Lord ispolzu-et the Satan, the reasons yayushch it to them pain, or harming ma-terialno to check their belief and patience, to joint stock company that the N am enough clearly shows an example of the Saint I of an ov. B ylo nonsense and narrow-mindedness to say that witches of N poisoned on it 4 demons, wishing unichto- 
to live him and his children. 4 Moreover, I consider 
extraordinary nonsense if what - that the person thinks that N yn e the Lord does not punish the children for offenses by means of the Devil. To rum of that, there is no doubt that - Maun, having strength given to harm it, uses 

8 3 
all the umrny will also seek to make so that it was sent by the witch, and he will try to make it izve-stn ym so it to will azatsya proceeding not from B of RSA, but from unfortunate angered wives shch and N y. Obra-shch gya the vn iman iye on and x angry people, provotsi-rovavshy B of RSA the immoral acts 
and disbelief, unless we in P isa5n will not see AI that angry 
spirit b. the l is sent by God of N and the tsar From the aul, 4 which to - 
sazhdat and pursued it? The B y this spirit is sent to l by the witch? Whether I4, maybe, the witch sent those spirits in 
E in and N of e l and and, 6 to about t about r y e in about highway of l and in with t and d about with in and N e y and p about of N and l and 
them? Whether N e God gave them strength and sent them? N of an euzhela we will be so stupid to think that He not posy-lat a devil against neblagschestivy people to annoy and harm them? R An it I already said that in that, h yu the Satan is represented sent - mom, his big skill is. The N and most - le him sent B og and N and to that, except B of RSA, could not make it. P omimo it, we dolzhn y to assume that in bodies of people and zhivotn ykh there are natural p r and ch and n y, in y z y in and yu shch and e p r and with to about r N y e m uch e n and ya and b about l e z - N and, able to cause even death. And x elzya to hide N in secrets e therefore the devil knows them about N, especially if they conduct to joint stock company to them - that to consequences. Then it on - chinat to communicate with the witch, it angers her, it N asmat it, and after it the N y the person or an animal in N e z and p is given to N y by m and with t r and N of N y in m about r and z about m of N and h and N and e in t of the h uv with t in about in and t inconvenience, gets sick and dies. P a donkey of what - mu N achin at this to suspect, interrogate her also she at - is known that } beat it are the person or exhausted at that - that sk ogya N at, or jinxed. Here people usually stanovyatsyazyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC in Tong ik are also surprised, to joint stock company it is the witch 
could do to the person harm, having sent the spirits, on - to a skolk they prizn atsya that their spirits lie and si-ly to N and to joint stock company oh they have no, but that harm came following - stvy actions natural p ri chi N. For the same. that - to confuse even more people and to force them pove-to rit, chgo the countries of N ye and N eozhidan N ye diseases prois-go from witches, the devil puts in action other type of sorcerers, men and wives shch and N who tell it slo-you, and to them, to joint stock company you know, has to trust. They govo-a row, chgo the victims were bewitched that presle-fairies gave them and that around, at all - 1 oh, there live many witches, nearly in each city. 
M.B.: That you sk an azalea, without somn en iya, very much pra-vilno. I further and not zn ayu, to joint stock company to disprove it. Wasps - is only thawed to be surprised to skill of demons in these things, and also to the fact that, possessing granted to them vla-Stew P ri chi by N I t harm, they are sent by witches, words - but at the request of the last, and also to the fact that when harm of N and with t unitary enterprise and e t, to and to in y with to and z and l and, p about e with t e with t in e N of N y m p r and h and - to us, they represent everything so that to it azhtsya as if it was made it and. N about you really you think that all or, on to Rein to it to a measure, the most part of all evils, sover-shayemy now, work of demons if we govo-Rome that it is not witches? Though I also have to p ri zn at what witches cannot give to demons of N and to joint stock company oh the power, is equal to joint stock company and they cannot influence whom - or, on - banishing witches, but unless cannot be so what the B og gives a devil strength and the power much of thickets e exactly thanks to existence svya Zahn N ykh with N it witches what could not be if the last did not exist at all? 
Dan: Skill of demons such is that without Word B light an ozhiya even the wisest person on the earth will be not - will izbezhno deceive. M y zn Ai that there are nastol-to kovarn ye and lovk iye people that others can distinguish them not at once. It is so however more difficult to make it on from - to carrying to demons who zn achiteln about more skillfully and more artfully most lovk them from people! As for that question which you asked, it, in my opinion reason - a niya, is rather difficult. The N esomnenno odn what the Lord of B og, giving rather often to demons strength vre-to dit makes to Acre it because of witches as demons svyaza-ny with "tools" of this sort. And these actions - its result otn Osh en iya to incorrectness of people, which N e in z and r and yu t of N and and with t and N of N y y N e e with N y y with in et E go with l about in and. To and to speaks St. P avet, prophesying about Anti-Christ's coming, the B og gave a devil strength through Antichrist for that is go to seduce people by means of a lie vy zname- 
niya and chu7des that whether people p ri N I love 
and st of N y.4 I it is valid, I cannot sk the Azat that dya- 
the ox received this power only for witches, but for the sake of weakness of people who zhi zn yu deserved the that he received the power also from now on and with on - power of witches seduced them. Here we dolzhn y to draw the attention of N and one general delusion to which opro-metchivo the majority follows. Z it aklyuchatsya in sle-blowing: people of N ik cannot see in an oy way that God moves N and these actions their own pre- 

8> 
gresh en iya, providing, respectively, to a devil similar "tools", but address against witches as if those can make anything. 
M.B.: Really, I will be good if achn at from - to ritsat N that the B og grants to demons the power to harm and with - vrashch to at names of N about because of Ali's N chi I human sins. The N about after all me would like zn to at whether it can be become so what pious and N abozhn y muzhchi-in N and or wives shch and the N but will not be bewitched by any? The m y was seen that the devil has force, sufficient that spra-in and t with I with And about in about m. 
Dan.: P the example with And ovy does not approach in order that dock the Azat as if the pious person can be bewitched because here the devil was not connected with the witch in fight against it. However the N y an example dokazyva-e is given to t, h t about N e by t about l to about in l and about the h e with t and in y e, N about and about the h e in N in l and go h e - stivy people (k4a8 to the Saint I ov, similar to which not 
there was a N and z eat with le) can be transferred for is tested iya 
in hands of the Satan they were checked iskush en iy. And, to and to I sk azat where About Aton and possesses the power, the N oh is given it by B an ogham, to harm corporally even blagochesti-to vy people for and the joint venture ytan and I their beliefs and terpene iya, it bu-is put to covet that (especially if it is feasible) that sent it what - N ibud the witch, and also a post - rummages to give to this event general popularity. The N about right dolzhn y to turn away from this witch and obra-to tit the looks to B of regional public institution because from his N everything proceeds. To an ogd they will is tested y, the Lord good luck osvo-bodit Zawiya sya shch and x from N of his N and joy to them and N and glory as if brave soldiers. That is why also I have no zn achen whether the witch sends the Satan against a pious che-of a lovek, or it has with it no N and to joint stock company and x communications. P a reodoly devil, and you will overcome all. Indeed, the devil dominates among most nevezhestven-N ykh people who when he enters with N them a game - t and to t, in about with p r and n and m and yu t in with I to and e I r to and e with l about in and to and to N e h t oh, is told to N oye by the witch. And many N yn e achin at N to confuse - sya and to fluctuate; equally and their belief fluctuates. If it has the power (they think) over zn ayushch and mi P and a dignity and I, then than then the last luchsh e in a professional otno-Shen of AI? Hell of N and mi, to joint stock company and the witch is N above others. Thus, by it it can pok azatsya (that with N them, sob-stvenno, and occurs) that and on - power has to look for means to rescue in other place, than in P isa- 

86 
N and I x. That is why they also go to at the claim of the help where its claim should not be at. 
M.B.: Though I also made sure that it is useless to address these sly fellows for the help against witches, but, I ask you, give - we will discuss still here that. There is dosta-precisely a lot of razla chn y x I vlen and y which wonderfully convinced me to think of these people well, moreover, I began to consider that the B og gave them zn An iye and skill to make dobrodeyaniye. We see many people, N ash edsh them at them on - power and exempted from misfortunes, svalivsh ikhsya on them thanks to the demon am. That is why I first of all would like uzn to at, to joint stock company they can be incited against witches if they it is connected y with demons and, thus, too are sorcerers? To joint stock company then they can think of what - that good and mercy, about with - 
zhalen AI on otn oshe9n iyu to n and shch and m? And whether to JSC Satana 
pursues About Aton at? 4 Because they undoubtedly, expel 
demons from some people. 
Dan.: I would like to answer your questions kasa-telno zhelan and I to find the help at skillful men and wives shch and N, but before sk to an azhita to me here that: did you precisely op-redelitsya in otn Osh en AI of a problem of a parcel of spirits and that harm which they do? And that seems to me that you already turned to other questions. 
M.B.: I cannot sk the Azat that understood the meaning of everything that is go what you spoke about, but now I am sure that I very strongly was mistaken before, and in it I prizna-yu with now. N about e with l and in y p about e l and e t e, m y about with t and N about in and m with I of N and e that m in p r about with e e shch e N e m of N about of the lake. 
Sam.: P speaking about the truth, I and most want that - you would talk about all these questions more podrob-but because though I also attentively listened to everything told by you, odn to Acre the last, sounded in va-shy speeches, I could not pon yat. From your pozvole-a niya, M.B., I will set to the friend couple - another of questions. And so, approximately one lived in seven miles from here, in V.H., healthy men and, somebody M. All neighbors knew it excellently. However within half a year it dried from what - that diseases then died. In this regard his wife visited what - that suspicions; she went to one magician, not zn ayu, however, where, having decided uzn to at why her husband scone chatsya. That told her that he died because it was bewitched. Then he asked her whether she suspects whom - nibud, living on sosedst- 

8 7 
vu. N and that she answered what is one wives shch and N and, to - t about r and I to it N e N r and in and l and with, N e to and I am m and t at highway to and V.K and to - t about r and z she quarreled with her husband and in two days he got sick, h t about y about l highway e e N and to about d and N e p about p r and in and t with I. T of h and r about - Tay also the N y in a glass e showed it the image of this of wives shch, and it is so clear, to joint stock company we can see each other now. It was in the same clothes in which it was in that hour because it old red carried highway ap to at with at of l and m and, t and to at yu, to and to at yu about y h N about N about with I t e N shch and N y. In N e y it also appeared in it stak An e. The magician taught the dead's wife, to joint stock company and m in the way it is necessary to take this a stake - to a dunye to p ri zn An and bb. N at here, she followed his owl - that, p ri highway of la home and made so that that sorcerer for - was held and put before wordly court. Her races - asked so skillfully that eventually it prizna-las in murder of it of a muzhcha of N y. Then it was sent in prison, judged, sentenced to death and to azn and whether. Standing near the gallows, it expressed raskayan iye and about - strength of all to forgive her. It sk azat that it had one spirit in image yellow sulfur to about highway to and. It appeared at it, according to her when this wives shch and N and sat near ogn I; at that moment she quarreled with one neighbor. She zakho-bodies that vengeance of B to an ozhya condescended N and it and all his family. This to Osh to and asked it not to be afraid, sk of elements that not reasons it to it N and to joint stock company oho harm; it already served a certain lady in To an enta on AI of six years is lingering, but those are p e r it x about z I y to and at m e r l and both e with l and e t and e N shch and N and N e p r about t and in, she will serve it. And so to joint stock company, sk this azat to Osh to and, that men and angered you, I if you ho-chesh, N ash lyu I spoil N and it skotin at. en shch and N and sent kosh ku and that killed three pigs and one cow. Zapodoz-Reeve, that - that, this person burned alive one more pig, and this to Osh to and, according to wives shch and N y, more there nikog-yes did not go. Soon she quarreled with this M., sent to him to Osh to at which sk azat it that it allocated it with such disease of which definitely not to get rid. Honestly, this of men and died. And so, whether it seems to you that this wives shch and N and told plain truth? The N of an euzhela it will put forward in the address with m e r t e l N y e about in and N e N and I? R and z in e N e y l and e t and to about highway to and e e the servant? And whether it sent it? R to an azva not it killed these zhivotn ykh and this person? H that in general it is necessary to think of it? 
Dae.: You offer us a private example so 
give really vn imateln about we investigate in it 

88 
everything, concerning this witch, up to that moment, to joint stock company of wives and the victim went to this skillful mu to the magician. So you say that this to Osh to and prish la to her when that was in a terrible quarrel with one of the neighbors and swore, calling vengeance of B about - zhy N and the heads of his and his relatives? 
Sam.: It really so sk azat. I heard it own ush Amy because prisutstvo-a shaft p r and to and z N and. 
Dan.: Then sk an azha to me who inflamed it such dya-with the Volsk rage what it achat N to swear and send damnations, p ri zyvy vengeance of B ozhy to fall upon the heads of it of men y and his relatives? R to an azva not kosh-to and? 
Sam.: P speaking about the truth, I think that all this was made in N e y D by me in about l. 
Dan.: P rekrasno, so, you see that all this representation began with to about highway to and. 
Sam.: You are a N azyvayesh representation? For whom - that it was not a game at all. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, in the end the witch worked absolutely not so, to joint stock company was conceived in her play. However I utverzh-give that as the deceiver the Satan acts here. R not he offered an azva the services? R an azv not it lined it to send it with the purpose to do much harm to this person? And ska zhi to me, really it is so strong that on - to banish it, and he only also waits for it? And whether you prini-wash in vn iman iye what it reigns in her du - she, N ap ravlya I her on similar acts? 
Sam.: I am absolutely convinced that he dominates 
in her heart. 
Dan.: Then, if she is his slave, but not he is a servant to it, then there is no need to line it or uprashi-to vat because if it sends it somewhere to do what it to make not in forces, or he does not see, to joint stock company and m in the way it is possible I vi t for all the evil design, then he will be able easily to dissuade her from it. Look: this kosh-goes and kills the person, or, for example, a cow or a pig. So to joint stock company she will be able to prove that all this with about in e r highway and l and and m e N of N about e that to about highway to and? 
Sam.: To joint stock company she will prove? The N about and happened to it oh men which lost all the cattle. And she saw all this and hear it is scarlet. 
Dan.: This to Osh to and lies, isn't it? Because say that 
t and to and e to about t y and z in e with t of N y e l e c y. 
Sam.: To and I really do not trust the words of this to Osh, 
however in practice all and happened. 
Dan.: N about if this pig and a cow died, whether uve-Wren you that this to Osh to and killed them? Whether N e they could die on what - or natural at - a rank? You zn ayesh, as this of men and, and sko-oozes and it were absolutely healthy and suddenly suddenly died. 
Sam.: It is strange, however, that they could die of the EU - the testvenny reasons - all this happened after that, to joint stock company sent this cat. 
Dan.: It is not strange at all if prin yat in vnima-ny what I told you, and you easily understand it. In bodies of that of men y and zhivotn ykh existed from - vestny natural the reasons y pains, sufferings, lomo-you and even death, however they were so deeply hidden, as most opytn ym doctors did not manage to find them. The devil sees all this, and therefore mo-zht with ease to calculate that time when they prive-here to natural result. P a donkey of what he vstu-sings in a game, creating visibility that all this proizosh-the Leningrad Region is, allegedly, exclusive because of his intervention. The EU - whether at the same time at it is what - nibud the witch who can be used it excites to action opre-divided p ri chi N y, bringing her into angry consisting - ny, and then he can already act is sent to roles - N ik and, at the same time he says to her that he will make - and-. If it has no such witch, it all - equally ra-will light disputes between whom - or one and others lyud-mi, having seeded their seeds of suspiciousness among N, its greatest zhelan iye - to shed innocent blood. 
Sam.: However a question - that here in what: to joint stock company cancan Osh to and make all this? 
Dan.: I already said to you that demons live all together and can extraordinary quickly and skillfully it that is far outside people of chesky is reasonable for a proda of armor iya. And the nogda in hands of a devil renders sya the N aya is given it the power to harm and put mutilations lyu dya to m Let's say that it has this power given it and kills that cattle about which we already spoke; one - to now we face a question - who, your way, allocated it with force to beat and kill? The witch gave I eat \such force or the Lord of B og? 
Sam.: To onechno, the witch cannot give it takop si ly. 

M) 
Dan.: Or perhaps he received this force after that, to joint stock company it sent him? 
Sam.: I cannot do it sk the Azat. Dae of N: Then notice to yourself here that: at a devil was 
the power to give an inconvenience to this person, ispol-zuya property of the last. And he made it, but made fraudulently. The Lord gave a devil strength that vla-to stvovat over good of the Saint I of an ov. That acted by means of certain means too, having used saveyan which took away his bulls and donkeys. The devil used also 5 impudent persons who took away away his camels, 
And ov I 0. N about even in and x cases, having force 
to strike blows, it will be sent what - nibud - mine though he can make all this also without it; dey-stvuya and m in the way, it gets a lot of things that we, however, also will see when we speak about those means to disposal who are alnut by all people. 
Sam.: Strange, odn Acre, the fact that at this person, on - to the sla of that to joint stock company it burned a pig more than nothing not prois-went. 
Dan.: Whether Z N ayesh, the Devil does not take out fried meat, ogn I. He very much is afraid that, burning these zhi-cotton, can burn also it. If on it highways ipyashch iye krasn ye coals get, then they can damage so it that his sovereign will be able to manage also without not - go if she wishes that he any more never came back. However we will talk about all this on - that m, in with in about e in r e m I 5 1. 
Sam.: Judging by your words, the devil in general neoby-is chayno skillful. 
Dan.: He is so skillful, dexterous and resourceful that any terrestrial being will not be able to avoid that - not to be seduced by it if, however, at it che-the loveka does not appear heavenly B of an ozhestvenny word. Aude - nako let's talk after all about that person, koto-horns the witch, on own prizn of An iyu, killed with on - power of the to from. 
Sam.: N at yes, I think of it so; that magician the ska hall of wives shch and N e that her husband was ruined by means of sorcery. The witch prizn atsya in everything before death, and this cat told her that murder was committed. 
Dan.: Z N of an acha of t, all this to omp An and I - persons who can be trusted?! This magician warrants that that muzhchi-on was bewitched to death. And who told him it? 
Sam.: Its spirit which made so that the witch appeared in that glass. 
Don.: And whom, your way, was this spirit - An - gely or the demon? 
Sam.: Some magicians say that at N they are Mo's spirit - iseya, And whether and or what - nibud other Saint. 
Dan.: The devil itself can prin yat an appearance of an angel to a sva of t and 52. The same who think that magicians deal with - kim-that other spirit, but not with the Satan, hardly that on is nimat. The Satan demonstrates that this person was brought to death thanks to sorcery. 
Sam.: The Satan - that testifies and to trust him Nesle zya. Confessed to N about the witch to everything. 
Dan.: And who sk azat about it to that witch? Sam.: It to Osh to and which it sent. Dan.: And who this to Osh to and, the demon, isn't it? Togd 
remember a proverb - "ask about a stolen property the thief" All this business is based on p ok an adhan and I x demons, but they did not bring N and to joint stock company and x to la tv at all. If we not Dov Ryaem p ok an adhan and I am m of people until then, p ok and they not at syagnut, then to joint stock company we can trust the word of demons? 
Sam.: So zn you achit you think that this person was killed not by the witch? 
Dan.: It is possible that the Lord allocated the Satan with force to do harm to a body of that person then it under to and kim-that a pretext also was sent by the witch. N about CKopet of all his body withered and withered on what - that estestven ache the reasons e about which the devil not z N is scarlet, here pocheml to it azhtsya that, byv it is sent, he also made all this though N <! the business it had no force even to concern it And bo without watching N and that. that the Lord allocated a devil of a vl of Stew to put to some people corporal a povrezhda a niya for their mean sins, most of people of which death the witches think that it happened on them zhelan iyu and by means of their spirits in N and the business umi-digs from natural p ri chi N. 
Sam.: Then it turns out that witches of an obmanyv yut, them sneer at N if the devil forces ich to believe that he makes these ub4iystva though on 
business it anything of that kind not delayet5. So, having 
strength given it by B an ogham to harm people and zhivotn ym, it can do it and does without the aid of the witch, IS using it, and m in the way, in quality p ri to ry ti I for most merzk their acts. 
Dan.: I am glad that you correctly understood everything the N oye is told by me. P odumay-properly about all these cases and you will see that this is truethis is truethis is true. 
Sam.: However I interrupted M.B. P I dew ret you, prodol- and y those. 
Dan.: Business to which consideration we now on - whether Dosch, Zac lyuchatsya in the help and means, finding - shch ikhsya in hands of magicians, namely for them and people fight, opposing witches. So, ^гли you wish to offer yours and a question? l, I will try m of N and \au tv e ti t. 
M.B.: P speaking about the truth, I see that to object here is useless, however I would like to speak on on - water of those things which misled me. I see that the person looks for means to get rid of demons, and I think that it is just a gift of B of an ozha y when It gives it to those whom we are N azyvay magicians, for that is go that they made many good deeds. If at che-the loveka vanishes to joint stock company aya-a thing or, let us assume, that - steal, many people go to them and find the help there. I zn ayu one case when was vykra-a dena of bowls and for a participle. C erkovn aya the guards went to a certain wise man and he gave them uk an adhan and I, in to joint stock company oye vre-mya and where they dolzhn y to stand as to omp An and I, uk-ravsh aya this bowls at, dolzhn and was to come there. It poo-beshchat N avern I to and, and, really, all and about - izoshlo. And whether eshch e. One person had a daughter, devoch-to and five years; so to her there was misfortune. And her father, being in an inescapable grief, not zn it is scarlet what to do. Then who - that advised it to descend to wives shch and N e, zhivsh to it in ten mi of la x from it and to bring to it that - nibud from clothes in which this girl lay in a bed. So it also arrived, and this shch and N and sk azat wives that his daughter is bewitched and that if he does not address lifesavers in time, then he will lose the daughter. She on - asked it vzya t what - nibud old clothes, to dress 
in it the girl and to put to bed, zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV and N and morning sn yat and 
to burn. P ri it he has to look: if clothes bu-to burn with Dut chern ym plamen I eat, the girl means it was bewitched. And still it sk azat that the witch will undoubtedly come back home to them. He followed its advice and toch-but, p ri highway of la to joint stock company aya-that there the old woman whom he, sobst-venno, and suspected, and it occurred then, kog-Yes these things still burned. Then the man without special works threw over it the p Lush and began to scratch it 

0 3 
until then, p ok and at that on the person blood did not zastruitsya. Through two dn I the girl got up N and legs. I could pove-give you about many the countries of N ykh a thing ah, but about their N I zn ayu l and highway p about r and with with to and z and m, ho t I e t and m with about about shch e N and I am m m about N about p about l - a nost to trust. B y l here one mya sn and to, and he has a son, malchon to and by the name of John. And suddenly at it the boy and the set of painful wounds opened. R oditel on - to ladyval of N and N and x curative ointments, but N and one of N of their N e m about of l and N both about the h and with t and t and h, n and o l e of the h and t about l. To and to - t about time the father complained to N and it is to one friend and that suggested it to descend to one very skillful che-to a lovek. That and made also N and the question of the one whom he suspects, immediately received the answer - to it pok an azalea in a glass a certain old woman, zhi vsh uyu is lonely in the small house of highway to e N to an epodalek from N and x. The father John and told this magician that this wives shch and N and ush la from their district and that now it is difficult sk the Azat, to joint stock company it is possible to reach it. The N about that prompted to him, to joint stock company and m in the way also h is possible for her N and with t. In y r in and, with to and z and l about N, in about l about with about to and z go l about in y t in about e go the son, put it in clothes and burn all this. And I rucha-yus that she will hurry home so quickly, to joint stock company will be able only. N about burn e that, N e in to amine e, and somewhere a dream - a ruzha because if you make on the contrary, you can have many efforts. The m a yasnik came home and made everything, to joint stock company to it sk an azalea. And this old woman appeared very quickly - she is la's louse to the house, approached the boy and sk azat: "John, scratch exchanges I". It began to scratch it, not p Osh la blood yet and if before nothing could and z l e h and t e about about t about l I would be a h e to, t about t e p e r about N and with and m and and with the h e z l and. H the same dolzhn about to think to the ordinary person about all this? 
Dan.: Really, you told us about people, poluchivsh their help from hands of magicians, and there are no doubts that and x examples it is possible to bring great mnozhest-in. Who has what - was gone, who has that - uk a rally who - is disturbed by health. And here they come to N to them, carrying the diseases and losses, and there to them go-cook that it is necessary to do certain actions and that is to them in the way they are exempted from the sorrows and stradan y. However we dolzhn y pomn to ityit that they receive this help if, its game echn oh, it is possible to azvat so N, is exclusive from hands of a devil. So really you a thought - etet what the person can really resort to on - relics, ok an azyvayemy devil? 

94 
M.B.: N ap ravlya I s to these people, some voob-shche are not convinced that they look for the help at demons. They consider that this force - the gift of B of an ozha y, is given to N y by it in B an ogham to help others. 
Dan.: I am indeed inclined to think that many people really think in this way. N about why then all this occurs? Whether the B og by means of Spirit svo-opens it where is the N aya or the Uke - shch en by N aya a thing is lost? Whether the angel that heavenly or a shower and the certain died person appears in a crystal or a glass, showing shape to omp to An and and, uk ravsh her a thing, or after all it is the witch? 
M.B.: I hear rather yours and thoughts on it vop-dew, than chetk and y the answer to my words. 
Dan.: So iye demons force to trust I zy chn and to ov 
that they are gods, providing so to them in the way seb5e 
human worship and ok adhan iye acceptable p ochesty 5. 
B lagodarya to the insidiousness, they possess a large supply of means by means of which they cancan - stignut it: they prin imat razlichn ye masks y and, being in N and x, give razlichn ye answers if they about what - that sprash are ivat. P ri it they act very skillfully: when they cannot precisely sk the Azat that has to occur, they give it predsk an adhan iye in a foggy form so everything can be perceived doubly. That is why it is necessary to look, to joint stock company oh you hear the answer to an ita because it also discloses essence of these gods. If they know what will turn out actually, to joint stock company they know everything, belonging to kingdoms and to Maun of very holes of the whole world on is written to iya of prophets, or razn ye the data resulting from is predicted y soothsayers, to joint stock company, on - an example when the demon told Saul that he will be killed because he saw that God left it, and hearts and zr5ai ltya N, and f ilistimlyan e preispol-weakened then 
nitsya courage 6 then about all this they rasska- 
z y in and yu t about t to r about in e N of N of the lake. To r about m e t about go, p r and n and m and I about l and to the man or wives shch and N y, they open things, a dale - Goya time the N who were considered secrets stven ymiy, to joint stock company, nap0ri- 
died (and I am convinced of it), prophecies With and vi lla 'at 
yazychn ik ov. Whether it was same and devush to and in ö5 p p ah, 
which the N and I x ap ostol 8, prino-is mentioned in Dai 
sat down big benefit to the owners with pomoshch0yu 
sorcery - from it the apostle P avet izgn is scarlet dya an ox 9. 
devush to and the thing is scarlet about missing and the N ykh is stolen by BP - 
Russian cabbage soup and all very much hoped for it, deciding to titsya an obra to so strange person. 
M.B.: P to an ozvolta, I slightly will interrupt you. The devil not mo / Siberian salmons to stay at the same time in many places. To joint stock company g> it could, remaining in devush ke, to say that affairs the elk in places is remote by N ykh? To joint stock company the Azat the devil of t volume where are could sk the N ye or the lost things lezhashch iye is stolen not only somewhere it is far, but also and i a secluded corner? Whether to joint stock company and m in the way it could pok the Azat to a rank of the thief or witch? May itMay itMay it at the same time si put on the place and to see hidden by N ye in the distance things? 
Dan.: Yes, we cannot say that demosh can be in several places at once, or, nakh dyas in one place, to see something, created where - t in the distance. The N about in these actions they is eaten around яют^ to create the kingdom, stories by people z itself, zastavya to look for them at N of their help and poklonyats to them. To - from them is here, others - there, from everywhere they line with N non-believers to resort to on power of similar people, and then enter in business because they also go there and they know, for example, TOI of the thief which they lined on theft so it everything it is easy to them to achieve similarity in the person and clothes; vs why they also can sk the Azat where there are things, yu tory it sprya tala even if they also are neobychayn raspberries k them. Here to joint stock company and m in the way spirit, to joint stock company that to me, to a last resort, to azhtsya, speaks about words, is said ny and about the affairs created somewhere is far. To the Oroch p vorya, there are many people, Zahn imayushch ikhsya it, and he is prak tichesk and everywhere where similar things sluchayuts 
M.B.: Everything, as for this question, I udovletv Wren. You p ok an azalea, to joint stock company demons arrive with I zy chn and to, mi, speaking from idols, wives shch and N and men. 
Dan.: And Menno so. They put again and again and!' shchrenny wounds y in hearts of Christians. And spolzuya witches quality of the tools, they force them will believe! that they commit a set of crimes, p <slan N ye and mi. what there is no N and the business, but poskol they possess the power given them B an ogham to do др^ gpm harm, to will azatsya that all this they delan because of anger and just for the hell of it the witch, its message!' Russian cabbage soup, and business or anyway obnaruzh sya, or to will azatsya that whether by its force Zac subordinated himself N ayushch aya it, or he recognizes that ei p about with l and l and t and to about y - t about m h and N an and l and t and to and I am t about e N shch and N and, l 
bo the witch admits all this. That is why people also think over that, to joint stock company to escape from witches and run to kudesn to ika in order that uzn to at that it should be made that zashch and ti tsya for anger of the witch which it will bring down or already brought down them on N; to joint stock company to them a log hut - to curl from its spirits and to make so that it did not send once again, etc. Here to joint stock company aya to Arti the N and will open before dya-in the Leningrad Region m and t about a gd about N p about to and e t, N and h t about with p about with about bin. H e r e z e t and x he teaches magicians razn ym to awful nasty things and pono-a sheniya of name B ozhy; people force to believe that they possess the lifesaver from the demons sent by witches and that they are capable to cure of vedovsky charms. 
M.B.: I not zn ayu, to joint stock company of people can explain or claim that spirits, yavlyayushch iyesya to them in to ristalla, bo-Calais or in water, to joint stock company and m - that in the way the angels telling with them and pok azyvayushch iye to them all these a thing and, an essence sacred or souls zamechateln ykh people, and x, N an aprimer, to JSC Mo - isy, Samuil, David and others though I and hear is scarlet that sa-mi magicians prin imat them for those and think that they act with their help against demons. 
Dan.: N evazhn oh, what the Satan forces to trust svo-their servants in, resorting to the help of a razla chn ykh charms. All this is harmful to Christians in and, harmfully even to allow zaro-to get to at itself in the thought head that all this is made by force and the Holy wisdom of the Spirit, or by means of An - gel and kind spirits or that magicians do all this in peak the demon am. They act with the help is clever iya, received from evil spirits. They aspire to - to mona, and those willingly run towards to these talkers. 
M.B.: I also really made sure that they look for - mon, but I want to see also the proofs of it obtained from Word B ozhy. 
Dan.: To asayas all spiritual questions, to joint stock company, press - died, possession of force in fight against demons and zn An iye that, to joint stock company I want to avoid all dangers created by them sk the Azat that to us anywhere not uzn to at about it, to joint stock company only at the most blessed Lord of B of RSA of ours. About and from N him directly uzn to at N we nothing not smo-zhy, but only from his Word of the Saint because in it It N am shows all completeness of the will. That is why when the Lord directed through Moisey the people And zra-ilya, Vtor. 18, He said that they not dolzhn y, having come 
in
  this earth to learn to arrive, according to gnusnost 
these I zy chn and to ov, listing razlichn ye types of former 

4-3400	1) 7 
tools About Aton y which that used for a sovr shch en iya many people with the help proritsan y, study N iya times, p redsk an adhan and y, the deception created with on - power of demons, uses zn a6k0 omy spirits, before - 
sk an adhan y and addresses to mind of ER of highway and m. He also told 
and about means, pok elements, first, that it has to from vergnut from the people because they listened to these talkers and prophets, and sk azat that to azhdy, doing on - dobny, makes a nasty thing concerning the Lord, that is why he also wishes that his people not prislushival-with I to n and m, n about with l at highway and l of t about l to about E g of the lake Z and t e M m about and with it with to and z and l: "P a rorok the Lord of B og lifts yours for you 6iz 
brothers of N ash and x similar to me, him slush you will at" 1. 
M.B.: Then these words you prove that we dolzhn y to aspire only to the Lord, but not to those who act besides his words. 
Dan.: If you read this place, Vtor. 18, and horo-Shen ko you will note all N uzhn ye m esta62, you will see that its text not only shows that they aspire to demons, spesh ashch to them in turn to so them to magicians and the sorcerer am because prophets whom the B og lifted that about Kommersant I in and t with in about yu in about l yu, p about in e l e in and yu t of N and m of N e with about in e r highway and t p about dobny things, but also say that all of them preby-howl in a nasty thing before the Lord because of use and h, l and b about with t r e l m e N and I to N and m. 
M.B.: I see that it is not just a sin, but a sin horror - ny - to aspire to and m to people. Alas, many do not even think that they are N and the business look for demons, going to similar people concerning the stolen things, or wishing to find a certain help and rescue in fight against witches. 
Dan.: To onechno, many people refuse prislu-to shivatsya to a voice of B of RSA and his N is left to iya. They to a pra zirat the word Its and and m begin prislu-to shivatsya in the way to demons. Everyone, aspiring to dey-stvuyushchy by means of demons, equally and for the first time seeing their shchy N ap adk and, has to confess for it, and not to joint stock company for what - nibud legk y a sin. It is big midges - a nost - to go for the help to a devil; it means p about with t and in and t e go N and m e with t about B about and and p about the h and t and t e go, to and to B about and. P odobny things result from disbelief and mistrust of the help received from the Lord, to joint stock company we see on the example of the tsar Saul who, without having received the answer, is consoled iya from B of RSA, to which it so priskorbnozyxwvuts not 
obeyed, went to the sorcerer. Seius I zychn and 

98 
told: "F lectere si nequeo Superos, Acheronta monebo", 
if 63 I are not able to ask gods, I will go down to a demo - 
N am. 
M.B.: It is doubtful, however, that was not in general zashch ita for those who look for the help at people, it is connected - ny with zn joint stock company omy spirits. About I in addition have a N some more questions. N aprimer: to joint stock company these magicians, the EU - whether they deal with demons, use pravil-ny and good words, wishing all coming to N to them that they arrived so - and so - in Jesus' name, teaching them to use at the same time words and sayings and z P and with and N and I. 
Dan.: In it the great cunning of Sa-the thane y is shown too. To joint stock company he could seduce then people if he did not use all the art for prik ryt I the affairs, wishing pok the Azat that demons here words - but also at anything, and all evil which they the reasons or, it is possible to cure whether highway having mentioned a name of the Almighty Gos - sweat. In it also the m e r z about with t, in t about m of the h and with l e about with to about r l e N and e and and with N e y highway e e about from quantities e r N e N and e l and go with l about in e N of N about go and m e N and and B about e about and With in I shch e N - a ny P isaniye witches, the sorcerer of a yama, Zac of a lean of hotel mi and razn ymiy devil arts is. P odobny che-the lovek is accompanied by elves and spirits; whether it has to vn a tub to people Zac of N of An and I made of what - that f time alternating a name of the Lord or to carry with with - fight what - nibud a part of the Gospel from And oan N and or that - that in this spirit. P odobny things are used against thieves and against the demons sent by the witch. What can the Satan more wish, to joint stock company not of that sacred things would undergo abuse? It is very difficult to cause it in a glass, a crystal or in what - that tanks with in - that, with some difficulty to you will and connect it if you bude-those to ask it about any given thing a name and vla- 
Stew Christ. Z joint stock company of a lean the hotel connects him by name B4 ozh- 
them and the power of sufferings and Hri's revival stovykh6, for - 
stavly it and m as image to serve itself. And they are its own Dejan Iya because nobody forces him, does not oppress, but he seeks for blasphemy. About (gawks speak) that for kind wives shch and N and! It govo-rit about the Lord and about Christ and everything makes them for the sake of N; how to good words it me N of an auchil and to joint stock company oh harm can turn out from use of these words? Alas, neschast-ny! Into what situation did you get if began to study the correct words at a devil? N e pronunciation nuzh- 
ny words and not carrying with itself P ison iya zashch and - shchat parts from demons; the cunning of the Satan to joint stock company of times and zaklyucha-etsyatsya that all these sacred things are used by him absolutely incorrectly even if this person also will be to - in e r I am t p r about and z N about with and m y m with l about in and m and in y r and e N and I am m D I in about l at it is possible to resist, only vooruzhas the power of faith when the Sacred P isaniye is imprinted in your heart, and soul yours and is full of strength given them. And Menno from it the Satan takes away people by the own words, accustoming them to the help of other sort as the N azyvan iye roofing felt - to about l and highway and m e N and B about e go and l both p r about and z N e with e N and e in y with to and z y in and niya from P ison iya will not connect the Satan because it can make to TOZhR it together with Amy's N. 
M.B.: And to joint stock company and m in the way this demon can feel pity for people and ok azyvat the help got into trouble? And bo many receive the help from these magicians. The devil is cruel and he N apryagat all forces that sotvo-to rit the evil. And Menno it is pursued by many, and on - dobny things can be made even with the help si-ly Misters. 
Dan.: These demons so iye compassionate, to joint stock company and a hungry gluttonous lion who growls, having asked that - nibud as if uzhasn y a dragon, un ichtozhayushch y all around the rage and to rovozhadn ostyyu65. They, to - nechno, can pok the Azat that are good to people, pre-following, odn to Acre, the most severe and terrible purposes - they wish to entice people in depths of hell. Because if they can help though to a few their bodies, then it means the legend and a shower and and bodies to an eternal damnation. It is very strong to N of hell to be careful when the Satan predla-gat the help. It is worse than when it resists from - to r y to t about and I in N about with t r e m and t with I of N and N e with t and in r e. 
M.B.: The N about then turns out the countries of N aya a thing: they it is not connected y with B by ozhestvenny force, but resort to uslu-din of a devil, wishing to hold demons from zlodeyan y. To joint stock company one demon can izgon yat of others? N ash Spa - the sitel says that one Satan does not expel another 
Satan because then him ts66arstvo it would be divided and not 
could sushch estvovat. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, it is undoubted, the Satan does not banish Sata- 
well, because Christ Redeemer of N ash pok azat the reason of all this. One devil is always ready to continue work of another, but not pasture yat it at all and not to disturb it. 
M.B.: And Menno it also makes me think. We see that the devil leaves and does not come back; and 
100 
if it becomes not the power of demons, to joint stock company you about that sk an azalea then it has to happen by means of B about e to TV e N of N about y with and l y. 
Dan.: The devil is expelled where the magician treats both not by the demonic force, and not in B of ozhestvenny. 
M.B.: And z all that you sk an azalea, these words nra-vitsya to me least of all. And bo if the Satan is not expelled neither devil, nor B ozhestvenno by the power, what force which can izgn at it is? If you show me this third force, then very surprise me because about it I never also heard. 
Dan.: In order that and zgn to at it, it is not necessary for t r e to t e y with and l y at all, and bo about N in about in with e to N e and z about N I e to t with I. 
M.B.: I already said that we do not have sense to discuss this issue if you deny everything that podtver-zhdatsya by numerous certificates. P odobny 
cases were in many places and kazhdodne6v7 but we vi- 
dy that is expelled from obsessed dya in l and that the EU - 
whether it annoys people and torments them, or their cattle, they find means against it. 
Dan.: I do not deny at all that some Oder - zhimy the Satan and tormented with it, were exempted from it. And nevertheless, elzya to get rid of a devil of N that is Kim in the way. Whether it highway stops the figure - a nost on introduction of people to delusion, keeps most gresh N ykh from defilement of name B ozhy and worship of, at the same time Ron and to aya in N is even deeper p and x. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you, tell, to joint stock company there is the fact that he voluntarily Quality Department azyvatsya from the deya by N y. You so sk azalea? N euzhet it readily and to - to the vliya of N iyu brovolno allows to disappear, koto-a swarm it had N and people? R an azva he did not wish to do to people harm? 
Dan.: It does not allow to disappear to the vliya-a niya, on the contrary, of N and business and it at all, and harm, to them the reasons yae-m y y, at in e l and ch and v and yu t with I, to about d and in with e m to and e t with I, h t about about t of N e go at last got rid. In P ison of AI it is N azvan "an old dragon" - he taught sorcery, that is why izgn it is impossible to at it by means of sorcery. Nevertheless, externally by all to it azhtsya that the magician connects it; he can use even name B to an ozhya and force of the Passion of the Christ. To it azhtsya that the magician expels by this strength of a devil from the bewitched person whose body it torments and disturbs. And it voluntarily ceases to torment him That whether Zac by N of An and e it was realized in zhi zn, taking away and m 
in the way of the person from B of RSA, forcing it to follow and worship it and to look for the help at it. Yes - e e with l and h e l about in e to and with p y t y in and e t t e l e with N y e m at to i, l and b about e the devil brings down diseases of N and his cattle and he looks for on - relics at magicians and witches, following the way ordered by them therefore, it seems, it appears in safety also it, and it skotin and, nevertheless, the Satan does not recede under this N atisky, but prekrashch the ayah proiz-to drive all those torments and which he can with ease of the reasons I t to joint stock company to a body, and soul. And if vi-dimost it is not saved iya, then to joint stock company to force the person to look for the help at the people acting in this way? To joint stock company in to an acha will receive all these the sorcerer y and magicians a cart - a mozhnost uzhasn eysh to them to at in the way use of a lean and bogo-to hulstvovat in otn oshen AI of nice name B ozhy? 
M.B.: P it oluchatsya that they expensively buy this on - power from hands of similar magicians. 
Dan.: Yes, what can be bought more expensive tse-ache, than when the person forever loses and I smother, and a body, pok idy Misters and following a devil. 
M.B.: H the same then the person has to think carry - telno all that it is not connected about with a devil and has right ways of detection of witches, and all by them it is created - a leg? 
Dan.: Though all these people are also not operated by a devil of N apryamy, I mean that at them ne6t zn joint stock company of omy du - 
Hove which with N them razgovar would bring down 8, nevertheless 
move them devil cunnings which also an essence a nasty thing before the Lord. All those versions to oldun y which are listed by the Lord, Vtor. 18, it is not connected y by N Amy, apryamy with the demon. And bo some of their N on - blyudat behind time, zn aya about happy and neschastli-vy dn yakh and hours. If oi also go to buy or proda-to vat that - or, they vybirayutzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUT glya it the necessary time. 
Others conjure on a trace of animals, on flight of birds, on a meeting with a hare or a fox, on a hand and one thousand under - bny things. N ekotory use a chair and couple prya-my plates, pronouncing at the same time certain words. Whether N ekotory resort to Zack of N of An and I am m against a toothache, others - at fever, or wishing to stop bleeding from a nose or when speak about thieves or when oil and cheese when not on - ale is melted are impossible to N them. To it azhtsya that from all witches these and you - z y in and yu t with and l N e y highway e e about t in r and shch e N and e; in t about e in r e m I, about N and 

102 
work by means of a devil so therefore we and N azyvay their witches and to oldun Amy. 
M.B.: y we consider m witches of those who have the spirits, and we do not consider so ovy using to what these people of N were auchit by magicians. And bo it at all not zn achit that they do that - that by means of a devil. That is why we think that hardly them it is possible to azyvat N witches and to oldun Amy. 
Dan.: However the N azvan and e sorcery belongs to all - mu that it is connected about with the power of a devil, from his fish soup shch Wren and I mi. The B ez doubts, some types of witches is more awful than others, however even most "innocent" of N their essence a nasty thing before the Lord, to and to us Vtorozak learns. 1869, and nezna-ny it cannot serve justified iy here. For what then, on mn en iyu this witch, Moisey's spirit, p about I in l I in highway and y with I in m and and h e with to about m to r and with t was necessary and to l e, and r and z in e to N e to about l - Doon this person? Yours and the neighbor who has oil - will not approach joint stock company and which throws a heat handful into milk, pronouncing at the same time certain words and du - May what it does it by means of B of RSA, deleting with that a devil? R to an azva she is not the witch resorting to what her N auchit not B og, but a devil? R to an azva she is not a witch if ishch et the help at demons? The burning clothes in which their children lay to learn whether they are bewitched, or wishing to bring this witch here, ravn ym work with image with on - power and on N aushch en iyu a devil; the same and about c the blackamoor of An and I because the B og did not learn similar a thing am. So, they too sorcerer y? P about whose p ri to azu and thanks to what force the witch when N achat azatsya ok at home to burn down in about l about with y with y N and m I with N and to and, about to about t about r about m in y r and with with to and z y in and l and? Whether in N e all this was made strength of the Satan and on it naushche-a niya? And whether I vlya people, Zahn imayushch iyesya under - bny Amy's thing, Wuchang and to Amy of witches and, and m in the way, too Amy's sorcerer yutsyatsya? The same who whether also Zac of N of An resorts to sorcery and I am m whom they can be, to joint stock company not of the sorcerer - mi? I consider that wives shch and the N and which resorts to hectare - Denmark cuts off hair and Zahn imatsya other erun-by Da at whom the name of the Lord is inevitably offended, makes all this thanks to the effective help of Sata-ny. The B og provides the natural help, and this help apprehended from his hands, we can ispol-zovat against natural misfortunes, however he does not provide us anything supernatural. Here on - 


103 
to what smeshn y all these people, pytayushch iyesya to get rid of demons and diseases. 
M.B.: You say about a thing ah natural, and we vi-dy that the nature Zac Lyuchayet in yourself a set melt N: so, the N an aprimer, diamonds is firmer than iron. P ochy togas - yes in all these natural things cannot be - to about y - that with and l y? 
Dan.: The B essporno, in the nature exists much tain-stven N ykh I vlen and y. And Zahn imatsya by it naturfiloso-f y and most umn ye from doctors. Ozhno to suspend m that - that N and a neck and to get rid of attacks of malaria and likewise mozhn about to dress to joint stock company uyu-that a thing whether to otory will facilitate horadk at, etc. And exchanges of N about thanks to it About Aton and receives vozmozhn an awn osushch estvlyat the of the villain n and ya and u with t r and and in and t r and z l and h N y e x and t r about at m of N y e f about to a mustache y. T and to and to p r and r about d and I in l I e t of N and m of m of N about e with t in about t and y N, e to t and l yu d also do a special ring, privya zyvat to it, according to the provision of heavenly bodies, N an itka and lower it in a bowl or bowls to at with water therefore there dey-it is stvitelno possible to see a lot of things. P odobny obra-zy they say what should be made red-hot under - to a kov, to put it in a day nursery and to take them over fire that and zgn to at from there spirit of the witch. And that at whom zakol-dovan the cattle, burns alive chicken or a pig that and zgn to at a devil. Whether N about can these natural things and zgn to at it? H these witches do, burning what - and wishing, the yak of an oba, and zgn to at demons? R the Lord learned to do to an azva what - or similar? Whether they for the sake of about with p about and l and e, with to about r e e, e burn t about N and with t about I shch e e e r t in about p r and N about - a sheniye to the Devil? At the time of Z joint stock company it and the burned victims predn azn achatsya by B of regional public institution; the devil does the same for the sake of himself, but in the environment I zy chn and to ov. However now he, thanks to the intrigues, carries out the same by means of and Amy's hands of these people which, saying that they Christians e, worship and m in the way to it. It in turn prek rashch the ayah to harm them, their cattle, gaining thereby additional benefits. 
M.B.: If this is soIf this is soIf this is so (though I not in forces sk the Azat it), 
that turns out that in all places where we see vedov-a stvo and sorcery, their great variety. Because I see that many people in similar affairs resort to pomo-Russian cabbage soup and strength of a devil to whom they anyway aspire. To rum of that, I am surprised also to those raznoobraz-ny I vlen and I am m which vozn hiccup when people wait for the help of a devil. Give - now a little on - 

104 
we speak also about it. The devil knows about things last and N astoya shch them, but only B og zn the ayah that will be made in gr I am a shower e m. And if e ti z N and ha r and and the joint ventures olzut p about m about shch a devil and only it, then to joint stock company they can speak so precisely about a thing ah which will happen in the future? 
Dan.: Whether only highway is allowed zn to at B of regional public institution that will happen in the future. N about Lord through the prophets and and p about about that l about in I in and l of m of N about e with t in about in e shch e y, to about t about r y e N e and z e N about would will occur in gryadushch I eat. Whether the Satan can highway predpola- and t, to about d and with about in e r highway and t with I that and l and and N about e with about y t and e. About N - very much vn imateln y the observer as for a thing to it, can also guess a lot of things, oso-benno when it has strength given it tvo-to rit and make that - or. Here he can and will before - tell it. To the Oroch speaking, the Lord the spraved-the left decision gives it strength to seduce unstable. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you in more detail to light about what you sk an azalea. 
Dan.: Good. What do you doubt? M.B.: I pon imat so that the Devil guesses things 
predicted and vigilantly supervises after ways their wasp - shch e with t in l e N and I. The N about in y with to and z and l and, h t about it go in about r and t about t about m, h t about will be when he works that before - tells. P bring, please, to several prima - r about century. 
Dan.: The N about unless is necessary luchsh and y an example, than when you rassk azyvat about church watchmen, poshed-shy to that zn akharyu uzn to at about the thief, uk ravsh I eat them cha-shu. M ozhno sk Azat so: if that zn akhar asked them to go to it - that place in what - day and in such - hour, sk elements what there will come uk ravsh y this bowl, how the Azat the devil could sk if it was day or two later what this person will really come to this place in uk an adhan of N y y hour? P to a rezhda of everything, you have to for - to mark, to joint stock company oh the devil has force, directing thinking - mi of this thief. It lined it to steal this bowls at. It lined and tserkovn ykh watchmen to go to that zn akharyu. It N azvat the place and time to which it in oprede-will rouse lenny hour to come this thief. And azn and - ceremonious time he brings it into N en iya there because it, having forced it to steal, could also by means of a secret vn ush rouse it to come to this place. The devil sk azat, as that witch will very quickly come back home - I mean that that bewitched the son and mya sn ik and. It, possessing the power over her heart and having made her the witch, also 
105 
zn it is scarlet that will be able to force it to return hasty to - mine. It vypoln yat that aya the sick personality considers N of EC by unconditional act of it zn akharya. Vozmozh-but, that also can sk the Azat on a clothes smell whether there was in it a devil (if it pakhn et it z ap akho m) 70, and then he says that the N y was given the person is bewitched. "Take - those clothes in which the patient lay, and burn them; if black smoke goes, then, zn achit, indeed, and togas - yes this witch will appear here, but only so far they go-a row". And so, if the Lord gave a devil strength to torment and deliver f izichesk iye stradan iya to sick people and if it undoubtedly lined the witch of N and that it sent it, unless it will not be easy for it to make this flame and smoke chern ymiy and to force the witch to come to this place? If it has a force to torment, but there is no witch who would send it, then it velichaysh it zhelan iy will be to make the person guilty in proli-Tia of innocent blood. So unless it will be difficult for it, with a permission of B of RSA who fair at - a dialect gives it strength to seduce people, prislushiva-yushchikhsya to demons, and m in the way, to make p lamya cher-N ym, or, at least, to make so that it it seemed to that and to force the suspect of wives - shch in at to approach and enter the house though she can not be a witch? He creates thousands of similar cases and, to joint stock company skillful f okusn ik, can represent them here and there. 
M.B.: Really, at so oh moment to the house of m of N e p about in also the N of N y y e l about in e can h in about y t and n and v h e to. I with l y highway and l, ho t I also cannot sk the Azat, the N askolko it corresponds deyst-to a vitelnost that in and x cases occur razn ye in e shch and. N and p r and m e r, p about p r about with a ba z N and x and r I am l yu di in p and in and yu t with I fingers in bread and at that moment, pok and they so do, the witch comes, and in several days it turns out that at it all person it is scratched about N of an ogtyama. Still I heard about one old woman who here and so entered, and in several days she was seen all the N uyu as if whether it was torn through bushes or it overcame highway ouch is scratched. 
Dan.: Depth of devilish delusion forces the blinded people to become Amy's sorcerer and svyazy-to vatsya with N and m. In this case, N an aprimer, he knew about disorder of health which was shown in nebol-by highway and x pockmarks or in what - like it and if it can incline whom - to enter there especially as this person is ready to make it, what here strange if it does so as if everything happens because of nails? 

106 
M.B.: Yes, in it the big skill of the Satan is visible. Dan.: However we cannot present all from - 
shchrennost of its tricks, equally it is not given us to see that secret force by means of which it operates minds of ignorant people, vypoln yaya, so it in the way, all the enterprises. In it is velichaysh aya cunning of Sa-that N y. 
M.B.: Really, it seems improbable and neoby-chayn ym that the devil can operate minds of people, their messages to that are and to that are. They about it do not suspect meanwhile at all, thinking that they act about - tiv a devil. However I doubt here what. I at - know that it is easy for a devil sk the Azat where is sweat - ryan N aya or the N aya a thing is stolen, however from where it has the power to cure sick and suffering from an ulcer? Undoubtedly, the number of the people going to zna-of this sort to mugs is great. You say that it helps a body, but can ruin soul. It does so that people stre-to be rumpled to it, putting it and m in the way of N and the place Gospo-yes. Because usually the person thinks that to help him - not with forces of demons. 
Dan.: Yes - yes, everything validly and occurs and in all this we see extraordinary dexterity of a devil. You sk an azalea that many people receive the help, coming to zn akharya m. However I am sure that them by no means N e with t about l to oh, to and to in y go in about r and t e. 
M.B.: Oh, much. Is and so iye which never tell about it because similar things some not N r and in I the CU I. 
Dan.: Yes, and many come back home, is fooled - ny by insignificant talks as these answers - p r about about that e m about highway e N of N and h e with t in the lake. 
M.B.: It is possible that they come too pozd-but when to make any more nothing N elzya. If they come at once, then can help them. 
Dan.: N at yes, the devil says what can udovlet-cook these ignorant people who are ready to believe in everything that he tells and to dance to his tune. The N an aprimer when who - nibud comes to zna-a mug because of the child and asks, not smertel-N about l and about N about l e N E with l and that t z N and e t, h t about with m e r t e l N oh, of t about says that the child was bewitched, but that time left and to help already N elzya; the child will hardly live even one or two days. The father comes back home and sees that the child ALREADY died, or it dies during two - three 
107 
days. And the devil is trusted. Another is sick and is strong stra-gives. In reply it hear it: "The Satan (because he sent them) sees that a disease posh la on decrease and the reasons and, you - z in and in highway and I it, p about about those p e N of N about and with the h e z and e t. H e r e z N e with to about l to about days this person will come round". Here to it govo-a row any nonsense, he observes all these uk both I and all pass an adhan. P onyatno that everything would pass and so, without devil medicine y, however to the Satan begin dove-ryat even more. The N ekto is ill and chakhn et. The neighbor govo-rit to him that, perhaps, he was bewitched and that it would be quite good to send uzn to at that it. It sends, but a devil not zn the ayah whether the patient will be able to recover or not. He says that, it seems, it really okol-was given, and nauchat that should be done though at the same time and doubts whether will be what - nibud advantage or not, but irrespective of, this person will die or all the game - chitsya safely, the trust to the Satan will remain and will not be shaken. And it gives and x there is a lot of councils. To rum of that, we have to remember that chelove-chesky imagination - the thing extraordinary siln aya, - whether satsya that continuations of a disease or its easing. And the Satan deceives people because it seems that his drugs that - that is done though the N and the business is all Lish a fruit of imagination of these unfortunate. 
M.B.: To onechno, is and razlichn ye focuses, but to me - it zhtsya that you too exaggerate everything. I not vi-zhu, to joint stock company to it can help human f to An a basin I. 
Dan.: The imagination can cause a serious loss, it is known by all. So why it cannot help human consciousness, especially this person is encouraged, having forced to believe what he receives on - m about shch? 
M.B.: And nevertheless, it is hardly possible to prove that so aya the help ever was effective. 
Dan.: P to render - that it is easy because it is proved oh, that the devil can do the same, as the person. I heard about one similar case. In London there lived a N of EC y the husband - a rank and (to joint stock company report about that), which was the sign about Wad Dra - the gy person by the name of F ita. And here, at these F its there was a black dog on to lichk e B omelius. Soon that guy imagined that B omelius - a devil and that he feels his action in himself. Having strongly upset - shis, he complained to one acquaintance and that told that it has a friend who can izgn at B of an omelius. Then this of men and made a breakfast and 
108 
whether two of them prish to it. Treatment was as follows: this "doctor" forced it to undress and ordered to get up near strong fire and, without watching N and the fact that that was dostatoch-but the fat person, the N amazat hurting all body IAU-scrap and tied up to a stomach smooth to amine. This husband - a rank lightened and subsequently strongly thanked the healer. 
M.B.: I zn ayu that the person can invent a heap of any nonsenses and though one f An the taziya can from - drive another, without curing, so to them in the way, in practice the N of an ikaky disease, nevertheless, from this does not follow that the human imagination can help to cure the real disease. 
Dan.: N et, f a basin I do to An a lot of things, even where there is a N an astoyashchy disease. The person is afraid that he okol-dovan; because of it his consciousness stays in postoyan-the number nervousness that all body disorders, making in it big unfaithfulness en iya, and involves different misfortunes. And so, if his mind is saved from all these images, then and it f izichesky concerns, p r about and with t e to and yu shch and e about t n and h, i with the h e z and yu in t. The B about l highway and N with t in about with and t and - ninsky drugs has such origin. 
M.B.: N about exist still diseases which really are present at a body and which occur not on at - what rank - that fears and f An a basin y there. And x treat! But to joint stock company, tell me, it is possible to cure them by means of imagination? To onechno if all this appeared on at - a rank of the nervousness which arose in soul of the person, then from it - go it is possible to get rid, having calmed him. 
Dan.: Yes, but so sometimes it turns out also at corporal illnesses which reason not the imagination, but other passions is. I can give to you one example, about to about t about r about m r and with with to and z y in and l of N e to and y about the h e N at in and and e m y y and uch e N y y the doctor. Highway tuk at did this what - that the weasel - the servant. Business was in Hermann AI. At one wives shch and N y it is constant slezi-foxes of an eye and therefore she badly saw. As for sa-the my servant, he rented at her the room. Once he on - promised to cure it and made so: he hung up it on a neck what - that zapisk at and strictly warned that it under to joint stock company and m a look not sn Imola and did not read it because then already precisely nothing will help. en shch and N and believed in it and became so oh cheerful and self-assured that ceased to cry (because frequent crying and tears poisoned with it eyes), and gradually moisture in her eyes p ri highway of la in norm and g of l and z and and z in l e ch and l and s. About in about r I am t, h t about to about d and about N and p about t e r I am l and e that 

10Q 
note, having been upset, it zap varnish is scarlet again and gla-for ached again. To - this note of N ash ate, opened and read. There it was written in German so whether it to transfer N and An gliysk y, it will turn out so: "The devil pinches you for eyes, N ap oln I I them the stake". So, unless it was not means to cure her eyes? If the similar medicine has the effect, then le's eyes - it is not necessary to chit any more. However it is not necessary to think that the Satan has at the order less means, than all people on the earth together vzya ty because all of them - whether highway its Wuchang and to and. And where the person fails, he can make that N uzhn oh, using a disease of consciousness of these people. And you will hear, to joint stock company they speak, using to and kiye-charms that you dolzhn y to believe in what it pomo zht, otherwise in general the N and to joint stock company oh of advantage will not be. So, - whether it is good to EU to look narrowly, the most part of all these yours of their numerous stories just deception. 
M.B.: Well, let everything that you sk an azalea, will be the truth. However there are a lot more things in which demons help. What will you tell about malchi-ke which recovered in several days after that, to joint stock company scratched the witch, and before his disease was awful and was not treated at all? H you will tell that about that case when oil did not turn out, and from milk not Uda of l about with with N I am t with l and in to and? H t about in y with to and e t e about with about e N i and zh and v y x beings, N an aprimer, a pig or to Uri tsy, and a prekra shchen AI after that diseases? And, N of joint stock company he ets that you skazhe-those about the help to those people whom N avern I to and wear out a devil, p ri chi N I I tortures to their bodies? 
Dan.: The N and all this can answer in several ate Vakh: when it can do harm a forehead - to a century or cattle, milk or oil, it can on can, having just stepped aside; when he prekrashcha-et a course of disease, it, to joint stock company I spoke earlier, he barks especially willingly because, ustran yaya it, it does so that people direct to it and sometimes become yes - N astoyashchy Amy's sorcerer. If what - nibud the demon exasperates or torments the person and that wants to get rid a post and prayers of him, N of an acha of N aya at once mo to pour about this B of RSA, then he without special efforts leaves it, though without wishing it because it concedes to force State p about d and and p r about about N I e t with I And m of N about to about d and about N p r and ch and n I e t about l, to joint stock company was in the case told by you with the son of a myasna to and, and they ishch ut his help also follow it predpisani-I m, start-up aya, N an aprimer, blood to the witch, then it leaves, is- 

1 10 
pytyvy pleasure - I mean that it prekra-shch and e m t at the h and t t e l oh, p r and e t about m of N and to at d and to about N e h N about e, N e and with - chezy, but rather pron ik aya taking roots in a shower e even more deeply and even stronger. Here so all also occurs in ostal-ny cases. As willingly it will cease to exasperate ku-a ritsa because to give it joy, this chicken will be burned zazh in. Its help - not that other, to joint stock company prek rashch en iye in harming if, to - nechno, it has a force to harm. 
Sam.: Strange, odn Acre, if all this so. P it oluchatsya that in these parts of one thousand deceived. They say that to that wives shch and N e in R.H. in one week prish the Leningrad Region somehow with - fate of people, and many of N and x were at all not and mi as you told. The N about I prevented so I ask you, continue. 
Dan.: The devil can mislead milli-ona of people and even the wisest in this world if they are not N of an auchayema the Lord and not prin imat in vn iman iye his doctrine, Zac it N ym can become in the way uche-N of an ikama of a devil. 
M.B.: If all this deception, then, zn ach of t, the witch do not kill, do not direct damage, but, most likely, the devil skillfully ruins people and the reasons yat pain in slu-tea when the disease has natural origin, forcing the witch to believe that he made all this at her request. And when the Lord gives it strength, he podbi-howls it that it sent it, as if he cannot what - to make or interfere with what - or put until then, p ok and it who - that will not send. Considering that all responsibility lies to N and the Satan, probably, there is no N ikaky p ri chi N y to sentence vedm1 to death; odes - 
nako P ison iye p ri to azyvat to do e that 7. 
Dan.: The Scripture says that witches should be sentenced to death. Here you are absolutely right. N about if you think that word B an ozhya orders not wasps - tavlyat to their N and to oi m in the way in zhi vy because they ruined people and zhi votn ykh, N asyly the spirits because of what people became obsessed, whether and their bodies preterpeva-muchen iya, then you very strongly are mistaken because, of course, you do not recognize N of an ikogd from those who tested 
m
Uk and and who was tormented by spiteful spirits that the Holy Spirit 
stays also on witches. P ri chi N y on which them sle-Blows to sentence to death, so ova: they drive zna-a komstvo with Amy's demon, to joint stock company ovy an essence use lyaty enemies of the Lord; they seduce people, forcing them to follow 

1 1 1 
to devil and Zahn to imatsya satan in sk by them deya in N and I mi; at them 
in ra2sporyazhen AI of N akhoditsya unsteady in belief personally 
with ti 7. And though they are not going to kill N of an ikogd lyu- 
Tay or p ri chi N I t to them pain, but want to do good only, to joint stock company they think, nevertheless, if they contact demons, then for it and dolzhn y to die. 
M.B.: So, you think that all these znakha-yards to which very many people hurry for on - power as it is considered that they do good at all do not harm, it is necessary un to ichtozhit. About give N on - we watch what tells about it P ison iye. 
Dan.: Yes, they, dolzhn y to die because prino-it is sacred velichaysh iye misfortunes. It is considered that others - we which have spirits the reasons yat the evil because the devil, according to the instruction of B of RSA, creates this crime, p ok azyvy that it does it according to the proposal of the witch. And what, to joint stock company to azhtsya brings good, the N and the business brings the evil, and all this is made in many ways, to joint stock company that with ease can see any che-l about in e to. To h t about e to and with and e t of t with I e to with t and P and with and n and ya, p about to and z y in and yu shch e go that it dolzhn and to die, about it read at first the 22nd chapter to N and gi And a descent, 7s3tikh 17 where it is said: "N e on - 
zvol to the sorcerer and t". 
M.B.: This place speaks about the sorcerer ah which posy-bark at a deed of evil of the of spirit v74; others cannot on - be called to oldun Amy. 
Dan.: N about about the sorcerer ah it is when urge to sentence them to death and at the same time is-use the word M ecasshephah; it is about them and resisted to them in the face of the Pharaoh Moi - with e y, to about a gd in about about chi yu about N and p r e in r and t and l and zh e z l y in z m e y 7 5. And the Lord of all those who acts by means of a devil concludes in one sort. And bo sushchestvu6et their huge mno-a zhestvo of types and all of them are N and z in and N y 'in Vto7r. 18, and N elements - 
they are howled by "a nasty thing before the Lord" 7, and N and to joint stock company oh 
nasty things of N elzya to allow to remain among people State - sweat. The same and in that place where he says: "Yes not the най8th 
to pout at you such - and such -", listing all and h7. 
So it is necessary not only to wish that nobody not for - N imatsya by similar Amy's thing, but has to un ichtozhat those who do it. 
M.B.: I have to agree with what pronounce a sentence of word B of an ozha y to. However there is one more, trudn eyshy, a thing - to joint stock company to prove their guilt. 

1 1 2 
Dan.: And why you consider that it is more difficult - to zat all dock fault of the witch or sorcerer? I eat h, to joint stock company not dokaza-with telstvo, is defined vi by N and murderers? If sushchest-the real suspicion and this person during races - followings prizn vut the ayah a perfect act, then it also is the sufficient proof. If this subject denies everything, and. two or three say on wasps - N about in and n and i and z in e with t of N about o and m, p r and N about with I p r and e t m about r e with t in e to N - a ny oath that he is guilty of deeds, it the sufficient proof too. Concerning this State - pod prik azyvat to Moisey that whether nobody umertvlya-until then, p ok and he will not be opposed on men-necks to a measure by two witnesses, Vtorozak.19, Article 15. 
M.B.: I think that if this person denies everything, especially, when business goes about zhi zn and then, of course, it is necessary to do according to law B of an ozha and m that there were at least two witnesses. It is so possible to arrive with ubiytsam9i, thieves, but as for witches, I do not see 
you hoda7. They so secrets about communicate with du - 
be rude that them it is almost impossible to convict of deeds the claim - lyuchitelno at the expense of categorical p ok an adhan and y svidete-leu, saying directly that they hear Ali or vi-put, to joint stock company they sent the spirits. To rum of that, re-when the witch in general confesses. Because it is well-known that the devil has over them such power that not on - zvolyat them to do p ri zn An and I. 
Dan.: Then I pon imat why you consider that to - it is the heaviest to fight from the witch p ri zn An and I prick also witness p ok an adhan and I, and its own it is not always possible to receive. N, about what then to do next? 
M.B.: I consider that if exists to joint stock company aya - that veroyat-a nost, suspicion, well-known rumors to what is to - statochno satisfactory proofs, and still a beam - she if there is an act for which it is necessary to hang up, then it will be so possible to save from them this area. 
Dan.: So you think that their spirits will hang up together with them and and in the way this earth will be saved by m both from witches, and from spirits, and people and the cattle will begin to live quiet and z N yu. 
M.B.: I after all am rather clever that so not du there is mother though, to tell the truth, slightly did not make it. And bo I consider that if all witches I am pov8e0 Shena, then togas - 
Yes their spirits will not be able any more N of an IT of people who bu- 
DUt of N of An to imat them, or to send that they did much harm to the person or cattle. N about I understand own hl> - 
1zyxwvutsrqp \L 
post because the Lord only gives to a demo to us an opportunity to do harm and to test blagoche-stivy people, and also to disturb, torment and dosazh-to give gresh N and to am, and they will do it even if on - to weigh all witches on the earth. I know that it is not necessary for them that cared for them or gave what - that work. 
Dan.: Whether about you are afraid of N that if all suspects are hung up whether then among them there can be suddenly highway a little really guilty people? You see that many, to azn en N ye on a charge of a stake - a dovstvo, after death appeared innocent. 
M.B.: I will tell you everything that I think on it vop-dew. Witches lift storms, they do harm pose-to you and to fruit-trees, bear to people plague, and the cattle not I shch Ur. They send N and people of the spirits, doing them lame, kill children and domash N y the cattle; their du - Hove cannot be noticed, from them it is impossible to be fenced off by a door and walls, to joint stock company from thieves and murderers, but they at - go if they are sent, and the reasons yat a lot of evil. That is why I think that it would be very useful prigovo-to rit all suspects by death even if who - that from their N and is innocent because in that case already N avern I to and N ik that will not leave from N of joint stock company an adhan and I. 
Dan.: And you did not think, how it is awful - to shed innocent blood? 
M.B.: Yes, it so, but I think that there will be much a beam - she if whom - that to sentence by mistake, than to leave odes - well the witch who will kill people and to harm them. 
Dan.: So zn that is why you insist t ach that it is necessary to sentence to the death of all suspects (though could happen and so that among N them were and nevi-novny) with the purpose to avoid great concerns, on - to a skolk otherwise several escaped witches could torment and kill people. Luchsh e by mistake to sentence several people to death than if demos - ny torment, kill or N to asylat lameness on mno-gy people. And what, you really so think? 
M.B.: N e absolutely. You claim that evil spirits on - delyatsya by force to wear out people and zhivotn ykh, is exclusive from B of RSA. They are eager for it, they smot-a row when and where It will allow them to N to achat to work and where will try belief and patience with the help svo- 
it pravosu8diya, to joint stock company It did it with And ovy. It It on - 
banishes it 1 when the witch wants to send the demon; it 
whether all highway a pretext, it cannot give the demon strength and 
he will make that he wants even if it about it not du - m and e t. To about d and about with p about d e l and e t of N and with t and of N ut and p about to and r and t gresh Ik's N, It gives is allowed iye to the demon so all this occurs not at will of the angered witch at all, but own weakness of people is the reason of it, to joint stock company ovy also causes feeling of discontent in the Lord. Thus, they give weapon in hands to the enemy. 
Dae of N: Therefore, as there are these two provisions that is that the B og through the Satan harms nekoto-an eye in the way and tests the children (to joint stock company, utverzhdaye-those you, He made with And ovy) and that He uses it in Kacha - 
the executioner's stvo to torment and torment gresh N of ik, to a2k - 
to torment with the Leningrad Region when It sent an evil ghost the tsar With aula8, on - 
to stolk and zlodeyan iya, made by spiteful spirits, will not stop, at least and all witches and zaklin hotels in the world were hung up. P examine better on the reasons y, the EU - whether we azyvatsya by Quality Department from similar conclusions. If you bo-are eaten with B of RSA, and the Satan strikes you, then be firm in belief and patience and wait for the release from the Lord. If you overcome temptation, then will be blessed and will receive a wreath, And joint stock company.1.12. If your sins provoked Gospo- and the enemy touched your body or property, fall N its and be in AI is quiet, you ache also to a prayer, and beg the Lord to moderate his not arrangement; do not look at witches, do not look for the reasons where they are absent, do not look for the help at demons, be not a pupil the sorcerer y, do not make dreadful in e shch e y about with to in e r N e N and e m and m e N and about with p about and in about z in e l and ch and v and N and e m With and t and N y, N e and with p y t y in and y and d y p about to r about in both N e in and N of N y x, to and to it often happens. 
M.B.: I agree with all this; of course, to shed blood of N evin ovn ykh - the huge evil. 
Dan.: And z the text of the Scripture we see that shedding of blood of the innocent - uzhasn eysh aya a thing before the Lord Almighty's look; and it is very regrettable, kog-yes the earth is watered with blood of N show N of N ykh. Whether there is highway one special the reasons and when the Satan contacts witches: he seeks pron ik to utnut N in wines ovn ykh, N akhodyashch ikhsya under suspicion, and he thinks that thanks to it pomo-Russian cabbage soup to witches in all cities there will be many malware - ny sorcerers so it will manage to enter many into the angered state that all thought about it at - a sutstviye or direct participation even in the nichtozh-ny affairs. Here - that all judges will also be guilty - mi of shedding of blood in anything not guilty people, a wasp - their stars to joint stock company of wines ovn ykh on the basis of them to lyatven N ykh for - 

1 1 5 
vereniye. All these suspicions are based N and the vapoury conjectures and representations, illusions arising from a blindness, disbelief and fear of the Satan who lives in ignorant people. 
M.B.: If you assume that all this occurs thanks to skill of the Satan doing many lyu-Tay by N, guilty of shedding of blood, evin to N ykh even pu-that their uses to la of a tva what is most of all awful, what, in your opinion, all judges and courts when any person can be accused on podozre-a niya of sorcery have to do? 
Dan.: What will I advise them? I would wish them to be very careful and circumspect not to become in and N about in N y m and in p r about l and t and i to r about v and n and v than N e p about in and N of N y x people. And if to accuse, just based on firm proofs and the immovable bases because the presumption will not acquit and not izvin it them in the opinion of the Lord in case blood nevi-by N about in N y is shed x. 
M.B.: And the nogda turns out so - especially if about - the thief vinyatsya, the murderer - that the direct certificate from sutstvut, but certain specific circumstances even increase confidence of court that this a forehead - the century is guilty. To it azhtsya, given p cancer ti to and priderzhiva-yutsyatsya, mainly, concerning witches as their communications are very close and hidden; besides, considers - sya that the devil possesses so big power over - m and, h t about about N of N e p about z in about l and t and m p r and z in N and t with I. 
Dan.: You gave two reasons, that to and z and in what when determining guilt of witches the assumption and probability, apparently, are valid more, whether nezhe-in a case with thieves and murderers. P ervy, is that their communications carefully disappear; the second - that dya-in about l of N e p about z in about l and t and m p r and z N and t with I. D e y with t in and t e l N oh, h ate about - the century assuming that witches cause neoba tea stradan iya just burns from zhelan iya to hang up them, hoping that after that he will become free, and. having convinced itself so to them in the way what you already mentioned, he thinks that it is the best of all to sentence to the death of all suspects. That leu concerns thieves and murderers, let people will pay attention to that, to joint stock company they polaga-yutsyatsya on the assumptions until they not stano-vitsya real because we see that sometimes the court obvi-nyat the innocent that is absolutely bad, especially if it becomes on the basis of them klyatven the N ykh is stated y. 
1 1 
In the questions relating to belief of the proof dolzh-ny to be especially chetk them because here the cunning of the Satan wishing to ruin N evin N ykh is present much more, than at other cases. Here it is necessary to use special wisdom and so t. And what - satsya those who prizn atsya, here the Satan priobreta-et to himself is more than benefit exactly thanks to them prizna-a niya than if they are locked. He is rather for - puts them to reveal and prizn to atsya, than nastra-will ivat them on otritsan iye. 
M.B.: These things to me are not let know also I in them and I do not understand. Whether I ask you to explain with highway to me them so that I could understand that you put in it, and to see the reasonable bases yours of their statements. 
Dan.: Then it is necessary to dwell upon it vopro-se. Let's begin with the last. 
M.B.: If you begin with the last, then then races - tell also about those reasons for which the Satan of races - kryvat witches, brings them to prizn An iyu and obnaruzhi-howls them, but does not conceal and does not hide them deya N and I. Has to notice, however, that most of people thinks differently, being based probably first of all, on f joint stock company ta, on the one hand, and on razumn ykh the bases with another. 
Dan.: I zn ayu that people think quite so, to joint stock company you told, however I am strongly surprised, seeing, to joint stock company prakti-chesky experience and reason prove opposite things that I also will try pok the Azat. To an ogd it is about reasonable grounds, you consider that demons, dey-stvuya at the same time cunning and insidiousness, do that, N and that the N is put in order y their most intimate zhelan iya and a t mustache r e by l m e in N and I. 
M.B.: And for this reason the devil will not expose at all the witches because he should disappear to make razlichn ye the evil - acts. 
Dan.: Really, it could become the good basis for the proof that the Satan polucha-et the force from the witch or that he cannot do anything, pok and it will not send it or that to it neobkhodi-ma it zashch and that or that he does not interfere anywhere, but is invited only to satisfy her rage. However it is absolutely clear that all this nonsense, and he uses witches and zaklin hotels in order that from beliefs of highway to at eshch e bo lsh and e z l about I am a N and I. From here 
with
  N e and z e N about with t yu to l of N about with l food in and t that r and with to r y - 
1 17 
tiye of witches is more favorable to it, than an opportunity to keep all their Dejan Iya in secret because if about it to nobody not bu-it is put it is known, then to joint stock company then he will be able to force people to think that he commits all these crimes on naushche-a niya of witches? To joint stock company and m in the way it will manage to it to carry away then so large number of people for demons that they looked for at N of their help? To joint stock company and m in the way it will be able to line then them to resort to forbidden and whether in the N of An damned Zac and I am m, to sorcery, offending and m awfully blessed name B ozhy and his sacred word? And whether to joint stock company then he will result people in numerous delusions, forcing them even to be out for blood not - wines of N ykh? All this and still it manages - to do many other things peshno a mustache thanks to exposure of witches. 
M.B.: The N about to joint stock company can confirm this situation re- and l to N y with m and f and to t and m and? I, N and p r and m e r, N e with about m of N e in and yu with, about it do not wish h t that his lady (to joint stock company tell some) about N and r and l and. 
Dan.: You it is correct sk an azalea, externally he does not wish that his witch was found. The N about actually it only this way to azhtsya because he forces also it, and all others to believe - even revealing her one way or another - in the fact that it becomes him reluctantly and against him zhelan and I. 
M.B.: P I dew ret you, explain it to N and an example. Dan.: To an ogd of people feels that it is infected chu- 
mine also writes down it N and the account of the Satan, he acts this way: goes to zn akharyu and that shows it in a glass or a crystal shape of this witch. So, who on e t about t r and z r and with to r y its l? 
M.B.: It was made by spirit given zn akharya, but not spirit of the witch with which she deals. 
Dan.: N about you - that are not sure of it because it can be that demon, with which it svya-Zahn and; and he shows its reflection. N ik that another will not be able to make it better. 
M.B.: I do not think that he will move away from it so far. 
Dan.: Yes, but you have to remember that the witch, svya-Zahn of N aya with to joint stock company to them - that spirit, has relations not with one demon, but with many because the majority them objedinya- 
it etsyatsya together. To an ogd one iz8 3 them goes, bearing it is given - 
Nov the image z N akhar yu, the others remain on me- 
to sta. N about what occurs when it turns out so, to joint stock company go-you cook? That is when what - that other spirits of an otkra 

1 1 8 
howl their essence. You think, they do it protiv4 
will of spirit of the witch? Whether the N about is separated the Satan from About Aton y? 8 
Whether the Satan of masks at About Aton y will open to create to itself an obstacle? P omn to an ita about what taught N ash to Christ Redeemer - satelno this subject. 
M.B.: Therefore, if everything is so, then you do not consider the sufficient proof in case against the witch, even for court if she p ri zn An and guilty N and about with N about in and N and and with about with t in e N of N about go z and I in l e n and ya, k about d and to and to about y - the l and - bo zn akhar by means of the spirit finds it. 
Dan.: It is one of the most unsatisfactory of dock - zatelstvo which in general exist because even if it also tells the truth, having disclosed original essence nekoto-ry people that is confirmed also their own on - to an adhan and I am m and, after all it does it, conducted nepra-by the visible purpose. That is why his words of a lie you because the father of a lie wishes to accuse only N evin ovn ykh to have an opportunity to make this person otvetstven-ny in a spill of their blood and to force people to believe that around their N there is a great number of witches whether to line them to Zac by N of An and y and sorcery, but, glavn ym about is studied iyu - at once in order that to it had an opportunity stre-aim all bad people. And so, if it skillfully razobla-chit whom - to win to itself(himself) more dove-r and I, the m about e t of l and h e l about in e h e with to about e r e highway e n and e, o with N about in and N of N about e N and an oath to lean N and certificates of this sort? The EU - whether a devil comes to court and says that the person whose case he investigates, the sorcerer whether members of sou have to - yes to trust it? And whether follows them sk the Azat that it brought a tva to la and testified already on its basis? If it is not why they have to believe - mu what it sk azat to this sorcerer? 
M.B.: Yes - yes, I have no N and to joint stock company and x doubts carry - telno the fact that he skillfully makes all this whether having before itself highway disgusting and awful tse- and that to its certificate if it becomes kind is free, not dolzhn about ok elements to vat N and to joint stock company oho of trust. N about what you will tell about its witness p ok an adhan and y when to it p ri to azyvat and force ozhy to tell the truth in name B? Then he if wants to hide that he - or, then will not be able any more. 
Dan.: The magician who assumes that e go 85 og-the name and strength of the Lord ranichivat in actions, oblige - Shchiye him to tell the truth, strongly is mistaken. It 
in
e d N and to t about N e about r and n and ch and v and e t and about N r and d, h t about with l and in N e y highway e e 

1 1 9 
and mya Misters is exposed to so awful insult and h t about about N of m about e t p r and in e with t and h e l about in e to and in e that with to about p and shch e in with e x m e r z about about those y. 
M.B.: N et, I do not mean volshebn ik, but when the pious person tries to influence asks - in y. 
Dae of N: You probably mean the following: if men and or wives shch and N and are obsessed with a devil, let us assume, that it so (we will make it to distinguish them from numerous pritvorshch ik ov, to joint stock company quite often happened), then all these obsessed gather in one place and vzyva-yut to the Lord, zastavlya I the Satan sk the Azat to them for the sake of Hri-of hundred, to joint stock company he prish ate here and who sent it. 
M.B.: Just about, exactly I also meant it. N ekoto-ry obsessed really demand from a devil otve-t and, to t about p about with l and l e go, and about N p r and z N and e t with I, h t about t and to about y - the t about the h e - whether lovek was read by Zac of N of An and I and sent it here or that sent it to joint stock company aya - that the witch. R to an azva it is not convincing? 
Dan.: To an ogd who - nibud we will gain a devil, that forehead - vechesky passions, love, a grief are shown very much yar-to, p ok Wai's elements that people, popavsh iye in this trouble can make. They dolzhn y in the N ezamedliteln ym obra-zy to beg Gospoda you to the Azat the mercy and from - gn to at a devil. The doctrine St. it is written iya confirms it, but for people who will discuss his words and to argue with n and m, ya I do not see N and to joint stock company oh of a support in word B about - and e m, about with about e N of N about e with l both p r and e t about m about N and x about t I am t z and with t and in and t With and - to the thane to be removed. He is an executioner Gospoda whether the B og sent it and we can ask to clean highway Gospoda it, but unless we have a power p ri to elements to vat to it to clean up if the Lord sent it? 
M.B.: He agrees, the person has no power, odn people uprash ivat Acre and even demand from it for the sake of State - sweat to leave from here. 
Dan.: What I speak about, not necessarily occurs, however let's think over the following sravneni-I eat. P ri the N of c is dissatisfied with the subrank en in N ym for is shown - N about e by N e at in and e in N and e. About N p about with y l and e t about f and c e r and and r e with t about in and t e go and to put in prison. Whether B will fish it or who - or another to ask this officer a name prin tsa to leave it to N and freedom and not to interpose in this matter? Whether N e will be on - pravlen y their actions N and the pacification p ri N tsa that he gave the command to this officer to refrain from ispolne-N iya p ri to an az? So when the B og sends the Satan, the - go the executioner, the only thing that can be made, so it about - 

120 
with and t about with p about d and with m and l about with t and v and t with I, and bo in t about d and with e y in m at the h and t e the l will not work so long any more. 
M.B.: To joint stock company what you tell corresponds to what we read in Dai to N and I x apostles when the Saint 
P avet p ri to azyvat dyav6olu to leave certain sluzhan ku, 
and in highway uyu in F and l and p p and x? 8 
Dan.: Saint apostles and other members pervonachal-ache churches possessed the extraordinary power given them that izgon I t devils to cure diseases, and they used this power under the direction of and guidance of the Holy Spirit. That is why we not mo-zhy p ri N and mother all this for the uniform rule. 
M.B.: However we see that demons sometimes izgo-N I yu t. 
Dan.: Whether it turns out highway when you address the Lord with a prayer; in to an acha to us only to it will azatsya, h that about N and with in I z y in and yu in t with I of N and sh and m and p r about with and m and i and z about N I yu in t with I. About to joint stock company it is possible for N dock the Azat what the father of a lie can be svya-z and N and z and with t and in l e a N with p about m about shch yu in m about l and t in y in about and m I am about with p about and it to tell forces the truth? To joint stock company and e garan Tia is at us what from lips it we hear them the truth? We speak to him: "M y we call you, for the sake of the Lord, sk the Azat N am who on - sent you. To that sent you? And?" "M atush to and Joan, it she", he will answer. "N about we we call you sk the Azat N am again, for the sake of the Lord who sent you". "Here I on - was sent by the magician L.B. (he will tell)". Whether Dolzhn y we to think that he made it, being subrepaired by force? And whether members of the court have to be sure that he tells the truth? 
M.B.: The devil, N akhodya shch iysya in the obsessed person, sk azat that here his N put in order such - that the person. Z and it uk an adhan of N y y the magician was sentenced to death. To stat, it in everything p ri zn atsya. And still there was a case when the devil, zhi vsh and y in the person, sk azat that it sent N of EC aya wives shch and N and that the last, in the general - that, and p ri zn is scarlet. 
Dan.: Whether all this demonstrates highway to what I already do not deny. The Lord gives to a devil the chance to seize the person. The same that it is sent by the magician or - mine whether highway serves as a pretext here. And the person thinks that the demon settles in him at their request. N what tory at the same time consider that the similar state even limits a little actions of the demon as it Operates only their mind. However then the devil willingly exposes these people, pursuing a set of the Aims, aspiring, glavn ym in the way, to generate sorcery, whether sorcery and Zac of N of An and I, doing so that behind it on - 
121 
whether highway people and that it could force to achat them among all these disasters of N to care for witches and magicians, words - but those can p ri chi N I t what - that muchen iya and not to turn vn and Mang and I am a N and Misters so, exposing it is defined - N ykh witches and mosh en by N and to ov, he will be able to gain trust of people and it will begin to be trusted even then when it builds f alsh and the Vyya obvin en iya so it will be able oro-to sit the earth blood of N evin N ykh the victims. That is why everything lyu-di dolzhn y to turn vn iman iye N and that, to joint stock company, without regard to la of a tva, they pronounce sentences, especially in slucha-I x, to asayushch ikhsya zhi zn and and death, to joint stock company to it prin uzhdat them: all this is result of extraordinary cunning and art of a devil. 
Sam.: R azresh both those and me sk Azat something. You said that the devil willingly exposes witches and wizards, and does it for the sake of to their joint stock company - that the purposes. The N about I much sly-shat about proizosh edsh recently their cases which, in my opinion, tell about opposite, that is kog-yes about N with p r and with to about r and e m in about with p r and n and m and e t in e with t about t about m, h t about about N both p r and z to N and l and with and r and with to r y l both with in about and with e to r e t y. 
Dan.: N et, he only vn eshn e perceives all this to joint stock company a bad event. Let's look better at N and these cases and you in the accuracy of a uva of di of highway that he deceives and whether covers highway what does not correspond to its actions. 
Sam.: N at, I hear it is scarlet from people, completely be credible howling, to joint stock company not so long ago of one wives shch and N and hundred - la to suspect another that she is a witch and that what - that in the way already managed to do much harm it. She podgo-cooked one Jen Tlmen and to send for the suspect, and then, having accused her of his presence, it left her to it by Jen Tlmen at which, going near it, began to admonish it and urged Quality Department to azatsya from a devil, osta-this Viv gresh by N y a way. P ok and he so finished it, and it stubborn azyvat dock that it usual wives shch and N and, N eozhidan N about N and some distance from them poyavi-las whether caress and, whether cancer staring in their party. P inspect (this gentleman told), your spirit sits over there. Oh, Mr. (she answered), it - which - that hishchn oye animal, and them here everywhere visible not - probably. And here, while they approached this place, the sou - a shchestvo disappeared from a look, odn Acre it sometimes appeared and again watched N and N and x. To onechno (told dzhentl-exchanges), it is your spirit. N about it still absolutely denied everything and here suddenly sharply warped her mouth on hundred - Rhone. Then this gentleman of a few N azhat on it and 

1 2 2 

about N and in about in with I eat p r and z with N and l and with. About N and z and I in and l and, h t oh, p about with y l and I the spirit, harmed people and killed them. The gentleman Zhe, without being a member of the court, allowed to go home her, having decided to open this business for some of judges. To an ogd she podho-put to the house, to her other witch, obrativsha-yasya to it with and mi words met: "Ah you, cholera! That you did! You betrayed all of us". "To joint stock company to us now 

1 2 3 
in with e e t about and with p r and in and t (with p r about with and l and t a)? H t about with to and ut about with t and l ny?" "And you went the spirit and let it will concern this person (the girlfriend advised it)". Then it really sent the spirit and that gentleman suddenly saw near himself fiery vspysh to at. The N about he immediately turned the heart to the Lord and nothing happened to it. Having returned, the spirit sk azat that he anything - go could not make on the reasons e strong belief the last go. "And what - other witch asked - it has nothing what it would be possible to touch?" "It has a child", another answered. "So send du - ha - advised predydushch aya - and let he kosnet-sya this child". Then the witch sent the spirit, 
that concerned the child why he got sick and died. Ve7d- 
we prizn atsya in deeds and were p about vesh en y 8. 
Dan.: And for what you in general mentioned this case? Sam.: That p ok the Azat as reluctantly there is a devil 
on that witches prizn avatsya and told about the activity. N et and to joint stock company and x doubts that when that gentleman finished her, the devil to joint stock company would distract it, being afraid of N, to joint stock company it not prizn would atsya. And when it not p about with l ush and l and with, about N p e r e to about with and l e y r about t. To about d and e about N and p r and - zn it atsya, the devil of N azhalovatsya to other witch and and m about r and z about m of N and t r and in and l of her N and r e e by N to and. 
Dan.: Business here extremely clear - it very willingly exposes them. P a ravda, you, maybe, think over why it appeared in the form of certain animal go and even pushed it to p ri zn An and yu, having given a shatelstvo in the deputy and having given thereby to this gentleman the obvious proof, especially when it warped it a mouth. About why then he forced other witch to line with N her (in what it prizn atsya) to send that spirit? And he made all this because wanted to light even more this case and to bring both of them N and a public inspection. 
Sam.: N about what moved him when it exposed witches? What could he have from it? 
Dan.: Luchsh e ask what he could not obtain. And therefore yn che in all countries the people beat Menno with N tre-to a vog. Witches as if gave the command to the spirits uve-to chit and kill, however not they in fact do it, but the devil sending spirits. He knows about that power with which his Lord that it prichi-nyal suffering and torments allocated and; he acts through witches, he forces others to be afraid of them, that is why and receives - sya that witches can quite be accused of commission 
124 
all these crimes. And it finds time - lichn ye means to open all this. And Menno it podvignut those witches on that they sent it about - tiv it to Jen Tlmen and. Its opportunities are perfectly known to it, and therefore he comes back. And unless State - pod does not allow it to the power to harm sometimes the true? N about unless he can influence all who have no belief? If could, then for a long time the most part of the world would be him un ichtozhen and. However and x people - on sravne-a niya with ispovedyvayushchy true belief - fortunately, it is not enough. In that case it should on - be sent to degyam which have no belief yet, but unless not the belief of parents feeds B ozhesky guardianship, zashch and shch ayu-Shuya and children, and their? The skill of the Satan for - klyuchatsya in the following: he knows on some at - z N and to and m, and m e yu shch and m with I in about r and N and z m e r e e N to and, about in those h e - ny certain time he will get sick with h t and will die. N about will take him for the murderer of this child, and will be considered that it possesses such power, doing everything that will want. And bo it possesses the power given it B an ogham which and primen yat in this case. If it to joint stock company and m - strikes image the child, really you think that he makes all this only to give pleasure to the witch? And whether you consider that he is N of an ikogd of N and what similar did not think of, and Lish 
it pushed his N and it? R to an azva do not walk up and down tut8 
and there legions of demons, and shch and, whom p oglot t? 8 
R to an azva they do not wait when the Lord gives them the chance to strike a blow? N of an euzhela all of us are still so silly to think that this wives shch and N and has to ask or beg them the reasons to ityit a coma - that evil? Whether look at Gospo-yes, because these spiteful spirits play in our game everything ro-, misleading both witches, and all others. 
Sam.: I will tell you one more case, also about - isogoing recently. One wives shch and N at suspected in a stake - a dovstvo and of that, h yu it the silt reasons whose harm - that skoti-not. She was interrogated and she prizn atsya that it had a spirit which zhi l in an old tree, sitting in a hollow of which, it often conducted with it conversations. And to an azhda y time when who - that offended it, it came to this tree and sent it, asking to ruin skotin at the offender. And here it persuaded openly prizn to atsya in everything and to promise to be become forever races with such unseemly activity. But after that, to joint stock company she made similar prizn An iye, to it when it was absolutely alone, this spirit came. "Ah - told 

1 2zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfe •> 
it - you prizn atsya and opened everything. Look, I mo gu to tear you on pieces". She was frightened, however it having risen up whether highway took it. N eskolko not - del later she strongly became angry with one muzhchi-well. It goes to this tree and the spirit asks it: "Why it you prish la? To that made angry you?" "To akoy-that muzhchi-N and" - sk was azat by this witch. "And what you want you to make?" - asked spirit. "It has two horses - from - it vechat. - They went there. To osnis both of them or at least one of N and x". Generally, one horse fell in the same night, and another nearly died, but it eventually after all left, the truth it hardly ho-dit since then. I think, here everything is clear: he became angry N and the fact that it opened everything. However when it p ri highway of la to a tree, he for - was about the discontent and was readily off to commit criminal act. 
Dan.: You think that here everything is clear. Here deyst-vitelno everything is clear if to consider that communication which demos - ny usually use. N about you indeed you think what the Satan lodges in a hollow tree? To it that, pain - 
she there is already nothing to do? N euzhet it per8e9stal to be that 
l in about m, both shch at shch and m, k about about y p about of l about t and t? N e e l and about N 
replaced the krov9a0 vy and cruel essence of that 
awful dr and to about N and and Quality Department azatsya the reasons yat for people 
harm whether doing this highway when to joint stock company aya - that it is angered - Nye of wives shch and N and asks it to go and kill a cow or the Leningrad Region - shad? The N of an euzhela he so grew old what to the person began .pod to find force his skill or even to become more skillful, than it? And can be in all this and there is no N and to joint stock company oh cunning? 
Sam.: Do you think that in these things covar is - with TV about? 
Dan.: Whether I think so? Better - sk azh that you on this subject think. What it can be, to joint stock company not to in and r with TV about m. 
Sam.: N about his purpose was (in my opinion, this demo - 
ny want most of all) the reasons to ityit harm to people. 
Dan.: I do not deny it because all his ability of N and pravleno on it. N about what do you mean, go-vorya slovo*vred"? 
Sam.: You see that in this case it pogu-beat cattle of this person. 
Dan.: Perhaps, it was really made by him. N about 
from where do you - that know? 
Sam.: You hear it is scarlet that at its request it went and killed one horse and nearly ruined the second. 

126 
Dan. I would not risk to claim so. To that told those - be that it ruined one and nearly killed the second horse? 
Sam. The witch herself admitted all deeds. D e N. L e y to t about e that with to and z and l? Sam. Its spirit told it that it made so, to joint stock company it about - 
si la. 
Dan. Yes, personality worthy trust... And, apparently, very obedient. 
Sam. N at why, we see that everything occurred according to it p ok an adhan and I am m. 
Dan. What do you mean? Sam. N at, it prizn is scarlet the fault, this spirit rasser- 
got to on it, then she squabbled with that man and because of it his horse died. It prizn atsya that on - banished spirit. R to an azva here perhaps mere coincidence? 
Dan.: To an ogd it prish la to a tree, the spirit asked it: z and h e t m y p r and highway of l and? To t about r and z about z l and l that I? T and to? 
Sam.: Yes. Dan.: You that, you imagine that the devil lay there and 
knew nothing until then, pok and she not p ri also did not tell highway of la to it? 
Sam.: And why it needed sprash to ivat it if he already knew about everything? 
Dan.: P to atom that it is artful. He glanced it in du - shu and ignited anger there, having provided so to them in the way all incident between it and that man. To rum of that, it zn is scarlet that already at this time horses suffered from what - what had to cause them smer-ti. Or it is the Lord gave it strength to strike them. Then he wrote on her heart that it at - went again to a tree. In appearance he was angry because of the fact that it prizn atsya, but actually he wanted these things to become everything known. If he not zn is scarlet that whether the horse will die on natural the reasons e which action began to amplify, or thanks to strength given it, then it would not begin to do so that it at - went to a tree to this moment. Even if her anger, without its participation, brought her so far, it could give quickly to it necessary the N is put in order iye. And bo strength of the Satan, ma-nipuliruyushchy hearts and x people is big. 
Sam.: The N about I noticed that you missed. Could happen so that God sometimes gives strength to a devil, even sending the witch. 
Dan.: I said that the Lord in the justice Gives the Satan strength to mislead people because lyu- 

127 
di of Quality Department azyvatsya to love its truth. The N about from this not сл^ blows that the devil has an opportunity to harm because the witch is sent to business. It occurs on wines <the person because strength of a devil increases sins lyud sk them. The Lord is offended and sends (to joint stock company govorizyxwvu> 
the apostle P avet) siln y deception. Whether about you have a N still to the prima ry by means of which it is possible dock the Azat that the devil of t wishes that witches were found? 
Sam.: I hear it is scarlet about many similar cases, but t you say that all this cunning and that a devil zastavlyae1 people to think that all perfect evil - business of his hands. 
Dan.: The devil will force people to believe that he put et all this, only when he is able osushchest to twist it. That is why to him it is favorable when it does the harm, not to hold it in secrets e, but to proclaim in in with e a l mustache y highway and N and e. 
M.B.: And what you will tell N and it. One witch was detained and on the basis of strong suspicion and before became before court. It led business and m in the way that she, to joint stock company I hear is scarlet, prizn atsya. P ri zn An and e it was the following sort: it had two spirits, one in the form of la - a ska, another - m y highway and. P about her words, they did for it a set of things. To joint stock company - that time she even accused certain wives shch and N at, zhi vsh uyu in ten - twelve miles from there which it is (quite possible) it and not zn is scarlet, it nevertheless, N of an azval on names and, in sorcery, and at the same time sk azat that it has in a mouth such place from where her spirit sucks to r about in 91. 
Dan.: To a devil the easiest sk the Azat to the witch that so aya that e N shch and N an and l and t and to about y - t about m at the h and N and z and N and m and yu t with I to about l - a dovstvo also carry N and a body defined secrets uyu otme-oozes at. The N and is lingering AI of N of eskolky last years he accused by means of witches and magicians of people, a neoba chayn about religious and pious. People dolzhn to remember that they are based not N and him svidetelst-Vakh. He should not interpose in this matter, and any its intervention has to be rejected, so to joint stock company he makes all this with extraordinary insidiousness. 
M.B.: B ezuslovno, the certificate of a devil should not in itself be valid in court until then, pok and it not bu-is put is confirmed to joint stock company by them - that indisputable a dokazatel stvo. N about what you sk azht concerning the tea following a sl? aya the witch was condemned by N of EC and, already standing at hung tsy, she tells not only about what she made, but also and about that from whom she received the spirit. 

128 
it gave it with regret because was going pok in to utnut fellow countrymen - ny zhi zn. P olagat that whether in her words did not contain in a similar case to ap a lie or unfounded obvine-niya. It sk azat that this spirit brought it one wives - shch in and from other city. To stat speaking, it for a long time on - some neighbors ripened. Then she was arrested and to - put in court, odn Acre she stubborn denied that she shows - sya the witch and that once brought spirit another - me, N yn e accusing her. A question here in what: whether certificates of wives shch and N y are, made it before smer-tyyu, the sufficient basis for court that prizn to at that, the second, guilty? Here - that at their N in rasporyazhen AI any more not of the certificate of a devil, but wives shch and the N y, is reported - ny by her let and not under the oath, but in the face of death, h that, N and m about y in z of l I d, to N e in m e in N e e in e with about m of the lake. 
Dan.: P the odobny certificate can seem to - the statochny basis for court and she will be called guilty though business goes about zhi zn and and death. About if it is good to N to look narrowly at him, then we will see that it not so. 
M.B.: Maybe you want sk the Azat what it not with - all is indisputable as it is the only thing svide-those l with TV about? 
Dan.: N et, not only therefore, but also because this certificate of just the same person. 
M.B.: I gave this example because wives shch and N and rask ayalas. And let it wounds sh e was bad, but those are p e r - that e y m about N about in e r and t. 
Dan.: I did not mean that if she is a witch, so to it and in e r and t N e l z I. N about e with l and about N and N and to about d and N e r and with to and and in and l and with, that its certificate slish to ohm poorly because she sil-but is mistaken, thinking that he tells the truth though N and sa-my business it at all not so, but continuous self-deception. 
M.B.: Do you mean that the devil could force this wives shch and the N at to think that another brought to it spirit, and in fact it was not? 
Dan.: Yes, I also speak about it. M.B.: N et, me never pon yat, to joint stock company it can do 
p r about and z about y ti. 
Dan.: You should pomn ityit that the devil deceives Women razn in the ymiy ways, zastavlya I them to trust in ve-shch and which in fact do not exist. In Ger-manias and in others of the countries ah demons so mislead witches that force them to believe as if they lift storms with thunderstorms and moln and I mi. Demons 
in
go zn at when there are similar things - storms, 

5-3400	1 2 f) 
r about m y, and r and with p a mustache to and yu to t with l u x i, z and with t and I I about with l e p l e N of N y y m and r to believe in l that all these great deya N and I Lord's an essence not it, but a devil. And exchanges of N about on this the reasons e he is eager to be shown in N and x. So iye demons force witches pove-to rit that at their request they ruin people and live t of N y x, N and N about with I r and z l and h N y m and p at t I am m and in r e d, in that in r e I to and to a lot of things happen to m naturally, and to azhtsya, bud-that it was made it and. The same and for the rest, in the relation che-go they are allocated to use the force - they line witches, pretending at the same time as if are those send them. In some places so iye demons force witches ve-to rit that they get masks from wolves, I tear apart - shch and x and the tearing N and a part of sheep that they gather N and festivals that sometimes they are had by air, to joint stock company of ovy things of N and the business does not exist, however - Mona most 9s2trogim in the way keep witches in similar 
zabluzhden and and. The devil can deceive wives shch and N at even 
so, poyavivsh is in image another wives shch and N y, bringing - Russian cabbage soup to it we are highways or a cat. In the minds suffering from melan-holiya he can create very strong the N uyu by it to Arti in N is invented at when to it azatsya that it is that business about - izosh the Leningrad Region, and in fact this N of an ikogd was not. In similar cases of people has to be especially rassu-ditelen, in to an acha he will be very quickly deceived kovarst-vy the Satan and vverzhen in conducted to and y a sin. 
M.B.: If this is soIf this is soIf this is so, then to joint stock company the court takes out at - the dialect condemning the witch? P it oluchatsya that neither it killed, nor the devil did it at its request. 
Dan.: According to word B ozhy, the witch dolzhn and mind - to ret, but not because she killed the person because she cannot make it (if it is not those witches, which ubiva-yut with the help I yes, or received by them from a devil, or prepared according to his recipes), but because they svya Zahn y with a devil. So if the court will find dokaza-telstvo of the fact that it svya Zahn and with demons, then it can and dolzhn and to be p ri zn An and guilty of sorcery. 
M.B.: If it is revealed that witches are guilty that they had communication with a devil, but N elzya will be sk the Azat that they killed the person, then the court will not sentence them to death. 
Dan.: It would be necessary to wish that Zac it bo-leu was perfect in it otn Osh en AI, up to the fact that - this nasty thing would be eradicated. These magicians and a stake - Dong I which, being svya Zahn y with spirits and whether the N of An resorting to Zack and I am m externally do good, N and the business 

130 
conduct people to numerous pregresh en to iya. As for ostaln ykh, vodyashch their acquaintance to demons and using magic, all of them it is necessary unichto-to live that the others saw and were afraid. 
M.B.: You N ik an ogd do not receive such certificate of a devil which will accept court. And what you will tell then people? H there was who - who died now and before smer-tyyu sk azat that all of them it is bewitched y. And you to precisely ska zheta that it was made by those - and that are. A question to joint stock company of times and z and to l yu h and e t with I in e t about y p about ho e with t and. 
Dan.: They are bewitched actually because them sozna-ny zatuman en about a devil. And you will not hear from them anything except that for them people - nothing, and they do not doubt it. 
M.B.: The fact that you sk an azalea, partly, maybe, and truly, but I lichn about zn am scarlet wives shch and N at, which very many schi-a waist the witch. And it is valid when she was time - a gnevana, there were many countries of N ykh things. You do not consider the real proof? She, of course, denies everything, odn Acre all this occurs and the incident speaks for itself. 
Dae of N: You dolzhn y rassk to us and then we will see their Azat. 
M.B.: It happened so that she became angry N and one person, and at it was a swine ya which suddenly died - la. Another thought that not the N ravitsya by it, and at him the horse got sick. The third could not sit N and a chair in operating time. Generally, for nine - ten years and x was a lot of cases. Some saw a devil the size slightly more to Osh to and, with og-frame eyes. To - cooked beer, but it did not get denser. The third saw in her house something of the size of I gn en to and, I play - shchy near ok N and. One more often visited what - that spirit. N of EC aya starush to and, N akhodivsh ayasya in inconsolable on - the building, saw this wives shch and N at, standing near it all night long; according to her, it bewitched her. And x cases there was great variety so they cannot even be listed. And if she was not a witch, unless there could be all this? 
Dan.: I already sk azat that where the Satan has from - carrying with the witch, he does so that in all cases when it possesses the power received from the Lord, - it zhtsya as if it does not do anything, but the N recovers is-klyuchitelno at the request of witches. When we meet a disease, lameness or death, on - stepped owing to natural causes, it put - 

5 *	1 3 1 
et so that forces the witch to believe that this is her doing. And all this is only in order that it about - was broken. In the same place, where it has no opportunity svya-to zyvatsya with witches, he tries to seed gradually in some people strong suspicion in otn oshen any given AI of men y or wives shch and N y. So if it achat N, then will not give up on the, and will do it with all force and ingenuity. If the person suffers from a painful disease and nevezhestven on - with t about l to oh, h t about about t to and z y in and e in t with I about t in e r y in B about e with t in e in N of N about e p r about - vision, imagining as if everything is done by a devil, is sent - ny by the witch, then that, in turn, enters it into a bigger delusion, zastavlya I to believe that behind it there is this witch. The people suspected in a stake - a dovstvo, cannot appear here. To then does e t oh, to and to N e With and t and N and? To t about - t about about and t with I, h t about N and N e go N and t r and - Vit of a devil of people whom he suspects of Zahn I is Tia sorcery - and m in the way, it gives to a devil even more power over itself(himself) regardless of the fact that it will do - to cause whom - that harm or just I vlya tsya to it. And bo the Satan constantly is everything lyu-dyam, using any case, and it is not necessary to it that sent it to joint stock company aya - that wives shch and N and at all or what - and - be N men and. The same who thinks that the evil ghost prikho-dit and appears before N them from behind the fact that they races - annoyed what - that wives shch and N at, as a result sent it, are extraordinary blind. R to an azva the Satan if it possesses in about z m about N about with t yu p r and ch and n I am t z l o and l and z N and t, h t about p r about and z about y - is put, not in forces by means of the cunning to force to think the injured person that the one whom he suspects so he as a result will become to azat-sya as if all evil occurred because of the last is guilty? And whether here the person, with fear and a shower and y on the dark street, at - N the yawl to oten to and or a dog for an ugly devil. The N apri-died, one span Yale not so long ago, having swum for a while somewhere in in - with a chain of N and a neck approached to the doors of the house certain che-l about in e to and. To t about - t about z and m e t and l e go in t e m of N about t e and with to and z and l, h t about e t about l about N e h that, r and z m e r about m with e r e e N to and and of l and z and m and, in e l and h and - ache about a saucer. Then this person decided to approach on - closer and to ask, for the sake of the Father, both the Son, and Saint Du - ha that he it for is shown iye. And here the dog started talking - and she answered N and them I zy to e - and sk azat: "With uk". So hundred - the Leningrad Region know who it was. If the devil knows that deterioration in health has to astupit N owing to este-stvenny p ri chi N, it does so," that these people who - 

13 2 
that offends and all N achin at to suspect the person, koto-the victims suspect horns. Or he fraudulently generates in N their feeling of discontent and a thought, h t about about l e z N m about of l and p r and y t and about t t about y and l and i N about y p e r with about N y. If it actually torments the person, having seized his body, it does not have sense still to lie and govo-to rit that sent it to joint stock company aya - wives shch and N and. 
M.B.: But whether happens sometimes and so what he believes as if sent it to joint stock company aya - that wives shch and N and in what the last and prizn atsya during the investigation? 
Dan.: Yes, but I speak about those cases when it has no communication with witches, and he tries that all under - zreval of the innocent, doing thereby people vinov-to N y m and in p r about l and t and i to r about in both N e in and N of N y x. And N about d and about N go in about r and t the truth, but it is possible to trust it only when he lies. So let people in the simplicity do not think that he tells the truth, let and for the sake of durn ykh the purposes. 
M.B.: This - that from all the rest also seems to me N and and about l e e with t r and N of N about y in e shch yu, e with to about l m of N about go m about e t to happen to t, at least it and was sploshn aya visibility, because of discontent of the suspected person. N ekotory ve-shch and, I so think, the Satan - N an aprimer when beer, oil, slivk is impossible does and. After all podozrevaye-the my person is not a sorcerer. 
Dan.: Oh, sir! Cunning of the Satan in all these affairs of N e in e r about I t of N and. And I z N and yu, h t about about y h N about (to and to go in about r I am t) with the h and t and - etsyatsya firmly dock an adhan of N ym that the N y is given the person is a sorcerer if all results of his actions obnaruzhi-are howled at the same time. About for the skilled demon it is absolutely easy to make N. 
M.B.: So zn achit you do not think that public opinion is enough in order that court with confidence in y N e with p r and go in about r? 
Dan.: Experience pok azyvat as it is precipitate postupa-yut the people condemning any given person for a stake - a dovstvo of N and the basis of simple suspicion. Force, nali-chy which attribute to witches gives rise in many to fear, forcing them to be and mi trustful. Mno-gy come at the same time so far that if they can force children to accuse own ro-ditel, then they think that they made extraordinary good act. 
M.B.: You say that the certificate of a devil not sle-Blows p ri N and mother even if and it is known that he not - once told the truth because when he speaks the rights - 

1 3 3 
du, he does it, meaning the bad purposes. And you schitaye-those the devil certificate not only what he govo-rit when from it it is demanded, but also when magicians who cannot sk the Azat nothing act except vnu-highway e N of N about about and m of B about l e e t about go, e with l and I am a N e p e r e in and r and yu, in y with to and z and - whether that the certificate of the witch concerning many things made by it before death is not what - or from - lichn ym from the certificate of a devil because he deceived her, for - staviv to believe in nonexistent the thing and. P omimo it - go, you say that neither suspicions, nor public opinion and judgment can have weight to affect N and court, so to JSC Satana slish the lump is cunning and interferes with all this. Then to joint stock company to court to find the witch? To joint stock company and e dock - a zatelstvo dolzhn y they to have N and hands ah? 
Dan.: People dolzhn y to bring to a lyatv about having - sya communications and if their participation in sorcery then the speech about zhi zn and and smer-ti can go is found. It - most vazhn oye; from this it follows that dolzh-ny to be also the N corresponding p ok an adhan and I nadezh-ykh witnesses, or p ri zn An and e the witch. And bo if the certificate turns out f alsh and vy what is quite possible, so to joint stock company everything, proceeding from demons, it is necessary to suspect of it, or will be based on rumors, accidental similarity, to joint stock company ovy can azatsya ok rezul-by the Tat hitroumn ykh tricks About Aton y, to joint stock company was about pain - a shinstvo of people, what then members of the court State will tell - I will fall, being not sure but only leaning on an oath? P ostupy and m in the way, they can quite condemn also the innocent, to joint stock company often happened at us. 
M.B.: You are mistaken in one - prizn An iye witches guilty is not necessarily connected by court about with a spill to rov. 
Dan.: I am not mistaken at all, odn if court roofing felt - to determined by Acre the person by suspicion guilty of murder sk otin y, then he sentences him to tyu-to remny at once is imprisoned iyu, pillories and not only obescheshchivat it forever, but if behind it 
again will follow new podozren3iye and arrest, it will be 
ozn to achat inevitable cm ert9. So you see, 
as the tone to aya a side separates them from shedding of blood. N about even if do not kill the person and he escapes, preby-in an imprisonment or costing Wai at a pillory, and in a distance - neyshy N of an ikogd does not fall under suspicion again, unless is not regrettable and the fact that it was osuzh-den court for sorcery is not shameful? I speak about those cases, to - 

13 4 
tory are based by N and suspicion, or on the witness - the stvo proceeding from About Aton y. In these cases of people of m about e t y t and with about l yu t of N about N e in and N about in e N. 
M.B.: And the nogda turns out so that, leaning N and on - a dozreniye and public opinion, judges get on a right way and the person, not prizn ayushch iysya in sorcery during the investigation and is shown iya charges, at - is known when the sentence is already read. 
Dan.: Let's say that the court, being guided by certificates of the Satan, suspicion and a rumor, sometimes attacks N and a trace that, in my opinion, happens very seldom; however full confidence about An which sounded p ri zn and I and obna-the ruzhenny certificates after all is necessary for the people bringing to a lyatv in the face of the Lord, it not osno-a vaniye because they klyan utsyanutsya that N and a basis of rumors testify or. If whether the person is considered coldu-the number highway on the basis of suspicion, without vsyak their dock - zatelstvo, then the court will arrive more fairly if osvobo-dit it, but will not condemn because to joint stock company oye the basis is received by them as a result of made in this way prizna-a niya and to joint stock company they will find what is not known? 
M.B.: I consider that these people break Zac he, condemning the innocent on the basis of insufficient dokaza-of t e l with t in, about with about bin of N about e with l and y l and p r and N e with e N and t about r e with t in e N of N and I to a lyatv. N about if they are N and the correct way, let it become also N and the basis of rumors, I do not see why they dolzhn y the reasons I t to whom - harm: condemning vinov-a leg, judges do not do anything bad. 
Dan.: I do not say that members of the court should be accused of the death of all innocently died, or in nepravil-the number the relation to what - that to the specific person. I ask about what they will tell in the face of the Lord concerning the N condemned only and a basis - scientific research institute of rumors. P to a redstavta that somebody was accused in ugo-lovny crime; suspicion concerning it vi-novnost extraordinary siln y, however he can be and absolutely a N evin ovn ym. H the court has to do that in that case? Does it have toDoes it have toDoes it have to deliver N and the card zhi zn the person, proceeding only from suspicion? P lips he will be really guilty, but wines and him is known to the Lord, and any person will not be able to find it - go, that is why they will acquit him. And whether they will put forward what - nibud charges? Whether they will be able to find out what is not let to them know? In this case they will not be able to condemn the innocent person? 

135 
Sam.: P odozhd, give I I will think a little. I still not really well understood all these affairs, kasayu-shchikhsya disclosures and detection of witches. That you go-in about r and highway, to and e t of m of N with I e N e with to about l to about with t r and N of N y m. I with and m of m of N about - go time was in court when there heard cases of witches, and we prizn avals their guilty persons, relying on public opinion, suspicion and on such certificates which you reject. Really, it happened so that pe-red death suddenly we hear Ali that they are innocent, however it did not shake my confidence that they are witches. Because say that the devil has over n and m and t and to uyu in l and with t, h t about N e p about z in about l I e t and m p r and z N and in and t with I. 
Dan.: And what forced you to think that the devil does not wish that they admitted? You see that some admit during interrogation and at the moment to azn and. Perhaps, the devil has also the power and over N and and about l e e z and to about r e N e l y m and in about r and m and both ub and y c and m and? 
Sam.: Yes, it so, but he not really worries when thieves and murderers do the p ri zn to An and I as it does not affect him in such degree, to joint stock company prizn An iye witches. 
Dan.: H that, you he thinks does not want to be obesslav-lenny or does not wish that badly carry to it - foxes? So after all, what it is necessary to do if witches admitted? To an ogd the thief or the murderer admits the sins, it is, whatever you may say, the first highway ag to pok ayan iyu. However if the devil can prevent them or hold them from p ri zn An and I, then he will make it. It is absolutely clear that he just aspires to that witches admitted everything; to it it so vazhn lake. He will force a forehead - centuries to think that witches are a hundred times more here, than them is actually. He will expose them through the stake - dun and zn akhary. An olsh of everything it wants B people to think that it does everything - and storms, whether also unusual - horadka, and all diseases which collapse on lyu-Tay and zhivotn ykh. And Menno for this reason he outposts - lyat people to believe and even to admit what actually was not; that he made what he actually never made and could not sover-ityit highway. And will be if we, of course, do not become wipe - to tsat the authorities and providences of B ozhy over the whole world. 
Sam.: If the Satan receives so huge benefit, exposing them, then in what then is the reasons and is convinced - Nosta of people as if he wants to hide all the Dejan Iya and does not allow witches prizn to avatsya in made by them? 
13 6 
Dan.: All this results from wrong confidence and fear that witches commit many crimes and that at their request and aiming the spirits make all this. If 
the Satan is so kind and obliging, 94pochemu he not at - 
bears it though how many nibud den eg? It zn ayah, where 
they and in whose to Armand ah lie. He says to the witch that he can make so that the person went lame. He says that he can kill losh ad. And sometimes he says that he mo-zht and by all means (if she wants it) will kill the person. As if it within his power is to make all these deya N and I, only he lacks a request. And nteresno, whether all these demons can bring at least one penny from the house of that a forehead - 
centuries, 9 whose cows or horses they, according to them, pogu- 
whether bi 5. Whether Z joint stock company of N hotel, this demon says, can install 
in the person and to cause it from there. P lips he will try sde-lat so that this demon got at least into a chest if, of course, is able, and brought from there that - nibud. If demons are not able to make it, then be sure that they will not be able pok the Azat nothing in case on murder or a wound - a niya, to joint stock company they do in most cases or that they there still make. All this occurs only with on - a zvoleniye of B ozhy, and at all not just for the hell of it what - that witches. And for to joint stock company oh the purposes have to serve then all these tricks and focuses if witches hran ityit a pier - h and n and e and n and o h e m of N e about in about r and t. 
Sam.: And after all, for the sake of own satisfaction, I want simply and zlozh t some of my reasons about those cases which I happened to meet. N e so long ago in court which member I I vlya lsya, rassmatri-vatsya case on charge of one old woman of sorcery. N and a meeting prish the Leningrad Region eight or ten people, koto-ry also gave against it p ok an adhan and I. I, to - nechno, do not remember all details, however and their main certificates are not of great value. One wives shch and N and, having taken the oath, darling twisted that her husband on the deathbed told that he was bewitched because it davnym-was pricked with a needle long ago. And further it sk azat that his N avern a yak and this bewitched wives shch and N and. Generally he and in a penny did not put it and considered that she became angry about it because somehow time she asked for it as a loan five highways illin g, and it did not give it. This wives shch and N and, also under the oath, say - la that she is absolutely sure that that old woman - the witch and that it killed her husband. Then entered men and and told such story. At me were strong earlier 
and
  healthy legs, sk it azat. This old wives shch and N and posso- 

137 
it ritsya with me because of the child. It sk azat that rasschita-etsyatsya with me. Three dn I later at me the knee so ached that I just could not stand. And since then, to joint stock company only I on - think of it, me to azhdy time visits so aya pain. Then one more person, low growth, by sight very much chestn y entered. So it at once darling vi l, prin yav at - to a syag that she is a witch. To joint stock company - that time I angered her, sk it azat, but soon rask aya lsya because waited that that - that slu-chitsya. And here N and the next night I saw it ripened - shche whom before I happened never to see. Having suddenly woken up, I saw near myself a huge face, such huge, to joint stock company and e usually draw at saratsi-is new. It looked directly to me in the face. P a donkey of it I could not recover, probably, dn I two. Then entered one more wives shch and N and at which as a result of a serious illness the child died. P ri N I in the oath, it is darling vi la that this old woman killed her di tya. Then appeared men and, to - tory sk azat that though he also does not know N avern I to and, but to it to it azhtsya that once she became angry about it because it p ri to it to ask highway of la flowerpots, and it did not give them to it. And right after that he heard at himself in an ear the whistling voice, sk azavsh and y to it that he is bewitched. N and the next day at him the back so ached that he could not even sit directly. It sk azat that sent uzn to at to zn akhark e, and that sk azat that he is bewitched by that wives shch and - ache which came for flower gorsh to Amy. Aude - N of Acre, according to her, he had to recover from it, as happened within ten days. So it sk azat. P atom entered two or three respectable gorozhani-on which assured the audience that, on the general to me - a niya, it was a witch. Whether we are N ash her guilty because that could be made; she was condemned also to azn and whether. N akho-dyas on a scaffold, she achat N to pray, and after her death it became clear that she was innocent so all these charges were from it sn I you. Do you think, we a gait - whether it is bad? 
Dan.: And you to joint stock company think? You are confident that she was a witch? R to an azva could not be what it is innocent also t y p r about l and l of N e in and N of N uyu to r about in? 
Sam.: If she was also innocent, what to us - wasps - was tavatsya to be done? We arrived according to p ok an adhan and I am m of witnesses, prin essh their oath which swore that they unconditionally consider her the witch and that she made everything uk an adhan of N oye. 
138 
Dae of N: And if who - poklyan etsyatsya what they think so, will be enough that on the basis of mine to l I am t in y z and I in and t, h t about e N e t and to? 
Sam.: N et, you vi di of highway what they told about and that forced them to think and m in the way. 
Dae of N: But whether all of you could be mistaken in the otsen to ah, kasateln about all these cases therefore you thought quite so, to joint stock company thought, and considered that znaye-in what here business as these people swore to you? 
Sam.: If the witness brings a perjury, then the court everything is equally the adhan works according to it p ok and I am m; and he is free from N of joint stock company an adhan and I, so to and to these certificates also the N e with highway and m p r and with I is given y h e to l about in e to about m, p r at. 
Dae of N: If the witness accurately pok azyvat that, according to him, the situation was so - and so - saying at the same time to la a tva, the court will work according to it svide-telstvo until then, p ok but will not understand that it to la of a tv of beds - on. N about to joint stock company to make this certificate sufficient if the person only thinks and cannot vysk the Azat neobkhodi-the my basis to the explanations? Whether in all this ostayet-sya to see highway aspiration of the person dock the Azat that it is given - Nye wives shch and N and it is inevitable dolzhn and to be the witch. That wives shch and N and said that her husband prizn atsya by her before smer-tyyu that the old woman killed him because it not odol-zhi with l it p I t highway and whether N of g. The N about unless it proves that it bewitched him? Whether the m is ozht by a devil to kill for the sake of udo-a volstviye, only to give joy to this witch? Here it is necessary to think that he died from what - that the disease which arose from races - stroystvo of his body about which the devil knew and so led - la with any given old woman that it quite could on - involve suspicion of sorcery rather. 
Sam.: You vi di of highway that there was it that the N and to that, except a devil could not make. 
Dan.: In fact, that huge face, koto-a swarm, to joint stock company seemed to it, that saw men and whether there was highway the ghost of ohms of a devil. However unless it is enough that dock the Azat what the demon appeared before it after that, to joint stock company it caused discontent that wives shch and N y, and so, it she also sent it? The N about unless not a Satan constantly I vlya etsyatsya to people and if he received on that pleasure of the Lord, terrifies them with the help here and x ghosts? Especially if the person of what - that is afraid and about - patches siln ym imagination. And to joint stock company and e the bases you - sk that azat wives shch and N and, absolutely confident in as if 
this old woman killed her di tya, dock azyvayushch and e what it and was? If she only this way thinks, and thousands of people do the same whether highway relying N and it voobrazhe-ny, then unless to you it is enough that with might and main klya-stsya what it and was? H that to the certificate of that zn akhark and, sk azavsh to it that men at were bewitched and from it at it ached backs and as it to whom - there azat Quality Department in flower gorsh to ah, it is the certificate of a devil what I already spoke wounds sh e about. So zn achat the rumors based on and x reasons? 
Sam.: So zn you achit you think that we dolzhn y to reject all this, isn't it? 
Dan.: N at, I just would not begin to say so op-rometchivy to la tv. 
Sam.: About could be N and so that it was - m about y, ho t I p about with l e e e with m e r in t and with to and z and l and, h t about about N and t and to about in about y in N e I vlya las. 
Dan.: Yes, most likely she really was not a witch. Because what could force it to reject it vvi-du of death? That she is a witch she was accused by a devil because against it he gave direct certificates. 
Sam.: You want sk the Azat that the devil told a mustache - weary that zn akhark and as if this wives shch and N and - the witch. 
Dan.: And you think that it was who - that another, not With and that N and? 
Sam.: At that time I did not think at all that it is a devil; N about t e p e r I in and at, h t about e that y l of N and to t about and N about y, to and to about N. 
Dan.: Than N at, be cleverer from now on and think over what you already N opened. 
Sam.: Honestly, I will suffer very much if renders - sya that she really was not a witch. 
Dan.: If she was also a witch, then the bases at you to think so very little. The N about it was not her, and you otn the yawl at it zhi zn also disgraced her name. 
Sam.: P a donkey of that time I happened to be a member of the court again and at us got one wives shch and again N and on which pok azyvat that she is a witch though it also did not kill odes - N about go h e with l about in e to and. P r about t and in N e e in y with t at p and l and p I am t and l and sh e with t h e l about in e to. P e r in about y y l and N e to and I with t and r ush to and, with to and z and in highway and I, h t oh, to joint stock company she thinks, it angered this wives shch and N at and that two or three dn I later to joint stock company - that in the evening she stayed at home at the center and there was something, whether a toad, whether cancer, koto-a swarm of N achat to creep to her heart. She grabbed palk at and dumped it from herself, but suddenly her as if that - that squeezed. The itsa following svideteln sk azat that she 

140 
quarreled with N to it then her hens began to die one by one, and so proceeded until then, pok and it did not burn one to Uri c at zhi we twist. The third witness, m h and N and, and with to and z and l, h t about about N and to and to - t about r and z with and l N about p r about gn e in and - las N and it entered, and it had so aya temn aya a cow who at that moment stood N and p ri vya zi at their N in the house because was zi ma and he was afraid, to joint stock company to it there would be no what bad. And he in zhi zn would also not go there where it was, but whether, probably, because of her Zack of N of An and y, it entered it pome-a shcheniye and kissed a cow under a tail. P atom two more or three witnesses sk an azalea that, agrees to the general to me - a niya, she was a witch. M y considered her guilty and she - la is sentenced to prison is concluded iyu and shameful 
to column, though sama6 N of an astaa of a wave of N and that witch it 
N and to about d and N e y l and 9. 
Dae of N: And you are sure that you were? Sam.: I indeed thought that I was though many from 
her neighbors thought that it not so. N about to joint stock company could about - izoyt all these things right after that, to joint stock company she razgne-vatsya? To an azaelk that all this work of a devil. 
Dae of N: Really, he is so cunning that could represent all this. P lips really the devil was to that old woman in an image of a toad or cancer and, and it held down her body. The N about unless from this with need follows what he was sent by another of wives shch and N and? He cannot p ri N I t another of masks y until then, pok and the Lord will not give it N and it soiz-a voleniye to mislead so nevezhestven-ny people. The N and one witch cannot give vozmozh-to appear to it to Nosta before people in a visible image. To it it is granted to B an ogham, and the Satan gradually is angry all with and l N e e and s and l N e e, p about with l e h e go and p about I in l I e t with I, the t and to h t about to and - zhtsya as if p ri chi the N and is in it. 
Sam.: We see that he is to witches and zakley-a N and bodies I am m. 
Dan.: Yes, it so, but we not dolzhn y to think that it on the zhelan and yu can p ri N and what mother - nibud about - time to appear here. The fact that he is - whether mothers and Zac N of hotel of m becomes only on the reasons e gne-va Lord's, so to JSC On the Azat for - bludshy people, not vn imayushch them and not a subrank yayushch ikhsya wishes strictly N of joint stock company to the words of the Lord of B of RSA. And bo demons svya Zahn y mogushchest-by the venneyshy strength of the Lord and his providence, and in all cases when On weakens fetters, they move on - so much, the N askolko On allows them, N and inch pain - she. If the person loves darkness, but not light, then to the demon 
141 
is granted permission to make most here things are various". Ekotory it frightens N ugly images mi, another it zatuman ivat brains razn ymiy pictures and m and, t r e t and m in about about bshch e I in l I e t with I in about r and z e l and with to and, m y highway with or still what - nibud a small animal. 
Sam.: I thought that the Satan can be in that vi in which he will want or which will be pleasant to it if the witch sends it somewhere. 
Dan.: You strongly are mistaken. Because the fact that it on is banished by the witch does not give it N and to joint stock company oh of force. If \it is force, then it undoubtedly, will be everything and everywhere and m in the way and in such look, to joint stock company will be oh eat \is necessary. So if it is to whom - nibud, the CU let this person thinks that the Lord allowed a devil to reach it, and let him hope on trust to resist to it, and on destiny to get rid of deception and delusion. 
Sam.: N about unless sometimes he does not appear when it is sent by witches? 
Dan.: To an ogd he finds out that it is authorized to it to appear, it - if at it is the witch - does so. as if she sends it. If that is not present, it all the same appears and works so as far as to it it is given forces and the authorities. 
Sam.: And that you sk azhesh about hens of that of wives shch and N y / Dan.: And what I can sk the Azat if they are dead? Sam.: I mean whether you think that they - 
whether are bewitched? 
Dan.: My God! The N and one arrow will not fall to the ground without permission of the Father of your N ebesny. And than chicken of l uch highway e with t r e l y? 
Sam.: WellWell, I was satisfied what you told that the devil cannot concern anything - whether bo, neither to kill, nor to do harm if is not on that oso-god of a pleasure of the Lord. Witches cannot give it N and to joint stock company oh of force, though think that it they send it when it lines them on everything so iye postup-to and. Let's not say on this subject any more. To N about after all, unless it is not clear that it is a devil ruined those 
hens? P to atom that after that, to joint stock company 9 this shch and N and burned wives 
one chicken, case p rivers of a host lsya 7. If the Satan not - 
lat it, to joint stock company all this could stop? You are the ska hall that it, having force of the reasons I t harm, wants and mo-zht to stop it though similar Dejan Iya and osushchest-vlyatsya. So, if all this was made by the demon, not 
142 
whether it is necessary to think that this wives shch both N and and the truth was a witch, prin I in in vn iman iye that everything occurred on - to the sla of that, to joint stock company she became angry? P lips will be so that to do to Sa-of the thane, having received the power that he made it will be sent by the witch (using it as a pretext) and to make it obvious, it will seed discord between it and that wives shch and N oh to force du's people - mother that it to it has no N ik joint stock company oho otn Osh en iya, but, the N aprotiv, is used by the witch because who - that angered her. So nothing remains to us - lat, to joint stock company of N to azvat this wives shch and N at the witch. 
Dan.: N about this very weak basis for it with e r e z N about go z and I in l e N and I. D l I am a N and h and l and, N and m of N e and z in e with t of N about N and - a vernyaka whether really the devil killed those hens. Perhaps, they had to joint stock company aya-that an infection which - and he knew about it - could ruin them; it skillfully zaver-sewed business, having forced two wives shch and the N to quarrel (and sde-lat it was as easy as shelling pears). To an ura as a result died, and to people it could pok azatsya that they were for - coldovana. The N about you still asked: to joint stock company could happen what after burning of one chicken others did not die any more? R to an azva it not work of a devil? N at, and you mo-zht sk the Azat that if this chicken was not burned for - vividly, then all other N avern I to and would be died? And what if it he made so what any chicken did not die any more, and he lined this wives shch and N at on sorcery what - she would burn this chicken that could show - sya that means consists in it, with on - power of which it is possible to get rid of demons? And whether present that it had force un to ichtozhit all these hens, and it is unimportant whether he was and m an inept murderer or simply vypoln the yawl the work with laziness. It could ruin fast huge herd of pigs, to - whether Christ gave it N and that p r and in about 98. R an azv it could not if this wives shch and N y had five thousand hens, poubi-to vat them at once? So, he is so silly and stupid that he kills them in turn and, without having managed to kill all of them, is already expelled? If he had a power to kill already before, to joint stock company burned this chicken why it did not kill the others when these people decided to burn it? Perhaps, it and not zn is scarlet that they are going to do, and lay to itself(himself) in to orzin to e with ER highway with tyyu", and, having come to kill Others, felt this smoke and was frightened. 
Sam.: Z the N achit, you think that he did not kill these hens. 

143 
Dan.: And from where at you so aya confidence that it was made by him? You came to this conclusion to wasps - novaniya of the oath recited to you; for the same reason you are sure that it was sent by those wives shch and N and, but I put hundred against one that it never had such force, h t about y x about t I y p r and to about with N ut with I to N and m. 
Sam.: N at, and that you sk azhesh concerning other guo? This person whom the back at to about ro you forced to kiss? 
Dan.: I think that he just strongly loved the cow. P lips this person will learn to learn Gospo- and will expel from the head all these f taziya An that the devil did not possess N ik joint stock company oh the power over in N any more it because it tvo-rit the deya N and I in f An a basin I x, the people born in minds, and especially it manages it if people are afraid of it, to joint stock company was and in this case. The Satan creates in them go-lavas a set of silly representations and to force the person to believe that it is bewitched, it embroils it with the one who can be suspected in coldov-a stvo. Thus, your court, prin imy these display - N and I, condemn a great number of innocent people because you believe a devil and what witches can do though actually they it to make not in forces. 
M.B.: I also heard about many cases when lyu-di were condemned for sorcery, and before death go-cooked that they are N evin ovn y. And against many of their N much less serious charges were brought, than about what you today upomin Ali. 
Dan.: Yes, I spoke about it. The person very seldom thinks of supreme authority and Lord's providence over the whole world. People give very big znache-the ny authorities of a devil and to anger of witches and is so strong boyat-sya them that the last even manage to show them what can be made by means of tricks of the Satan misleading them. The only way for the person to avoid all traps placed by a devil, all it ukhishch Wren y and zlodeyan y so it vn to imat to a voice of B about e m at, uch and t with I about t of N e go E go and in about t in about r N y m with l about in about m, p r e and with p about l of N e N of N y m of the h and with t about go with in e t and, to about t about r y y r and z about l and h and its t also will disperse dark fog, N apushch en N y the Satan by means of whom it forces down the person from a way of the truth - 
leg. It will arm the person with belief that prot0ivostoyat 
to devil what also the Saint apostle P e wished t r 10 and to descend 
from this way which conducts to strashn ym zabluzhdeni-holes and to dreadful sins, leading up so it in the way a forehead - 

144 
centuries before full death. N at, and now I have to with you p r about with ti t with I. 
M.B.: I am satisfied what heard on all these questions, and now I see, how deeply zabluzh-was given. And though you were already going to leave, I, that not me-it, I hope that we somehow will meet once again. God bless you! 
Sam.: Has to thank you very. Z you at N if suddenly there is an opportunity, come to N am. We will be glad to see you in our house. 
M.B.: And I - that thought that the devil is not capable N and such artful zlodeyan iya, able to bring to such sin, to joint stock company it nearly became with me. 
Sam.: To onechno, it is strange to see, to joint stock company thousands of people are led astray and are exposed to deception, but after all many understand in what here business. 
M.B.: And for the wisest a devil too hard, 
e with l and t about l to about about N and N e p r about with in e t I am t with I with in e that m with l about in and B about e of the lake. 
en and Semyyuela: Hey, the husband, goes kind wives Russian cabbage soup - 
N and River. 
Sam.: I wanted it to hurry. Kind wives shch and N and R.: N at and with whom you sit here? en and Semyyuela: I so wanted that you prish la 
a little a bit earlier, because there was here one person who sk azat that you are a witch. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: There was who - the one who sk azat what I am a witch? So check. 
en and Semyyuela: Yes, however, he said sover-to highway en N about sulfurs ez N of the lake no. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: I am a witch? Yes it is a lie, at least it was told by the Lord of B og. I would like that I in - am general all witches of N and light hung up and their spirits in addition to N and m. 
M.B.: That is you will be glad to have clothes, is decorated - ny with skin of the hung-up witches and their spirits in addition? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: And what, they have fur clothes? 
Sam.: en and why you told as if he called to - bry wives shch and N at R. the witch? He did not tell anything similar. 
en and Semyyuela: P oslushay, the husband, I very much vnima-t e l N about with l at highway and l and, h t about it about in about r and l, i it with to and z and l, h t about about N and the witch. 
Sam.: Yes he does not even know it. So from where he could tell that she is a witch? 

1 - I"> 
en and Semyyuela: N at and that from the fact that he did not know it? N about unless he did not say what she made precisely, to joint stock company the witch when vzya la a handful of heat also threw it into cream when oil was impossible? 
Sam.: Ha, precisely, you tell the truth. It sk azat that to it it was taught by a devil, likewise, when szhi-gat chicken or barash to and and so forth. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: This sorcery? The N averny, it told you what - nibud a scientific cracker. So it is taught by a devil? et, to it my husband that kind taught N wives - shch and N and from R.H.Z and year we received from her so much horo-shy how many similar zn and will not make the attacks for all the zhi zn. 
M.B.: And to that, your way, the N auchit to it that kind 
wives shch in at in R.H.? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: Yes it gift of B of an ozha y. I am du - 
to May, to it she was taught by the Holy Spirit of our Lord. 
M.B.: So, you do not think that to it it on - the devil taught? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: That is I dolzhn and to think what to this her N was auchit by a devil? And you sometime heard that the devil taught what - nibud good? 
M.B.: And you are sure that it was something good? Kind wives shch and N and R.: About unless it is bad to N - izgn to at it 
evil spirits from my cream? 
M.B.: Do you think, the devil was frightened of your piece of coal? Kind wives shch and N and R.: I zn ayu that it was banished also with 
that time we got rid of it forever. 
M.B.: And whether coal of the reasons to ityit to it harm could? Kind wives shch and N and R.: Yes, could; it and the witch can 
the reasons to ityit harm. I am sure of one: more it will not come. R avn about and it will not be able to force it to return - sya because fire put to it wounds y. It not smo-zht to force it to return N the Azat because also it suffered from a piece of coal. 
M.B.: And zvestno what spirits it is possible to strike only with spiritual weapon so your coal cannot - which image of the reasons to ityit harm to the demon. And to joint stock company and m, ska zhi-to and, image it could damage to the witch? You do not think that she sat in your slivk ah, isn't it? 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: N ekotory people think that she exactly there also sits therefore when they throw these pieces of coal, they say: "P lips ztot coal will get those is be in an eye". 
14 6 
M.B.: N at if she visited your slivk ah, then TV about e m and with l about N e about the h e N - t about the h and with t about e. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: You just like that say yes, M.B. I zn ayu that you think likewise, to joint stock company and I, though you ask me these questions. I am sure that - who will not advise more hotly to address for on - m about shch yu to z N and ha r I am m, than in y. 
M.B.: I so thought, but now change my opinion - an elk, so to joint stock company I saw, to joint stock company and m silly I was. I am very sorry that I so strongly was mistaken, advising lyu-dyam to go to these devils. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: P to an oslushayta, M.B., who it chi-tala to you today lecture? I am sure that still yesterday you thought absolutely in a different way. 
en and Semyyuela: Just about, dear R. I think, as my husband began to think in to an acha. Here one talked to them hour three or four umn and to. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: So your husband thinks other che too? I would oitsya that you will lose all the hens soon, and on - volume it poshleg the spirit against your ducks and geese and will ruin you soon. You that, zashch and shch Ali of witches? 
M.B.: Yes anybody we not zashch and shch Ali. Kind wives shch and N and R.: N about after all very many for - 
shch ishch at them. I think, they can conjure so (not in with e, to about N e h N oh, t about l to about N e to about t about r y e), h t about the h e l about in e to p r about in and l and t - sya to hell that N to apugat thereby others that they zashch ishch their Ali. And your cavils, M.B., I think, will stop soon; let's look whether you will be delighted, having received the same help. 
M.B.: P I will ask omoshch... Yes I will take away them to the smith that he looked whether he 0 1 is not present on them what - 
nibud a puncture or to l e y m and 1. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: You joke. If you have la likhoradk and, to joint stock company happened to some, then you togas - yes so would not judge it. 
M.B.: You think that the devil can kill foreign cattle, N to asylat lameness on people and zhivotn ykh, and all this for the sake of the pleasure. You think that if the witch causes and sends it, then it obediently vypol-nyat her p ri to an adhan and I. And if she not N sends it, then it vmesh will not ivatsya. You also think that when it comes, you can izgn at it by means of a heat handful, or having burned alive chicken or a pig. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: N ik you do not tell an ogd to me. that I so think when you so think. And let 
147 
they say about what they can do, and all zn the attacks and P ison iya in the world will not convince me of the return. 
M.B.: I am surprised - not to that, of course, that you are so ignorant in this question - and to that, as I thought likewise, without seeing own delusions. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: Delusions? To joint stock company it suddenly you became so wise? I zn ayu that their spirits somewhere hide, so to joint stock company of the witch cultivate them; and when what - nibud the person angers them, they cause these spirits and send them. Also look what they ask them to make, N and that adjust: when so aya the witch razgn evan and, this spirit asks her: what to me - lat? Such - that the person caused me troubles, go-she cooks. P oyd also kill his cow; it goes there and does about what it was asked. And di also kill hens at such - that wives shch and N y, and it goes. N ekotory of their N are not satisfied what is made so neznachi-telny zlodeyan iya, and then they say: go and sde-bark so that such - that the person limped, kill his or his child. So they are always ready to ispolne-a niya of any p ri to an adhan and I. And I think that people will be happy if they learn, to joint stock company to get rid of them. 
M.B.: If I begin to discuss this issue with you, proceeding from ozha word B I, then you will see that all ska zonal you is incorrect. The devil cannot kill or on - to harm whom - that, even most zhalk oh chicken. If he possesses the power, then who then will be able to escape from not - go? And, your way, he cares for that it nastro-silt and N poisoned to joint stock company aya-that wives shch and N and? It - wines ovn ik all evils and misfortunes. 
Kind wives shch and N and R.: H you tell that to me about word B ozhy? R to an azva not word B to an ozhya says that to a being - yut witches? And can you think that the B og will stand wicked men? You that, renegade? P groves to an ayta, me pain - highway e N e about the h e m with in and m and r and z about in and r and in and t. 
M.B.: It indeed unitary enterprise rya May. Then I will go too. Sam.: Thank you for to ompan iyu. 
TO IT ETS 
The extraordinary message about six most 
thorough sorcerers, which the devil acts 
ruined more than four hundred 
juvenile children. Besides, put 
harm to other people; which for these and another similar to them crimes 
were executed in the princely city 
Munich in the Top Germany 
26 And wriggling 1600 
I am sure that there will be no it Christians in and, to - tory will be softened with heart, or delighted will turn the look to heaven, or will not be surprised, uzn av about the villain - N iya of six most otjyavlen to N ykh sorcerers, about koto-ry it in general ever hear the ave Because they (having betrayed those - la and a shower and to an eternal damnation) committed very many brutal murders, it is a lot of uzhasn ykh to a passion, robberies and N arush en y public order, spoil - whether cattle and a harvest, caused a hail and a storm and to that similar troubles among inhabitants Herman of AI that I think that this case is necessary zapomn to ityit that the shameful end of these villains served us ho-a roshy example to grief pious and to ustrashe-a niya durn ykh and the people stagnating in a sin. And exchanges and these otvratiteln ykh prestupn ik, and also transfer of their crimes follows N and. 
P e r in y y, P and at l and m p e r l e and l and P about p p e N ha m e river. The second, An of N and Gamperle, wives and mentioned P aulya. 
T r e t and y, With and m about N of and m p e r l e	"Scientific Production Enterprise, I 
 	THEM	iblH U bbJi u
H e t in e r t y y, I to about and m p e r l e P I you y, Ulrich Seeltibaum, oruzheyn ik. Highway esty, George Smaltes, tailor. These six people whom there are already a lot of years podozre- 
bring down that they Zahn imatsya by sorcery though for this purpose and there were no sufficient proofs, nowadays with - all undertook together near the city of Dettingen in to and to about y - t about p e shch e r e, the State Duma e about N and m of N about about to r and t of N about in with t r e h and l and with p about - a dobny image and till this moment. Thinking that still nothing is known of them ok ruzhayushch to them, they began to imatsya Zahn by the privychn ymiy affairs and the UAV - godarya to the sorcery lifted such storm with vet-rum that all cities and villages suffered from it a big loss. 
N about B about, N e e l and I, h that y e t and about t in r and t and t e l N y e p r e - stupn ik remained still N ezamechen N ymiy, shed light on all them deya N and I. lagodarya I would howl dogs, sbesivsheysya because of this awful storm whether some from zhivsh them in the district prish to the mentioned cave or a crevice where all of them were arrested and next day, that is on Jun 24 I, presented before the governor M of a yunkhen who, having considered them on the basis of inquiries by guilty persons, sentenced them to a prison zaklyuche-of N and bb. 

151 
However listen that here happened: when a forehead - the century (or the secretary) the governor took paper in a hand that - to give p ri to az, suddenly both feet were taken away from it whether and there was all this because lodyzhk and at it vysh from sheaves so through three dn I he died. 
Then the governor p ri to azat to officers to search them, whether also those N ash sprya the thane of N in N, ymiy under clothes, and a body sacks with pork manure which, being taken y, izda-bring down such stench which any person could not take out. And N and breasts at P aulya Gamperle (who was at their N glavn ym a ringleader) whether they are N ash devil kN to a yoke Zac of N of An and y and the image of the person holding a roll in hand made on a tin plate or the kN to a yoke on which there were N is described y three words "M Agoll, To Umat, Hellbeza". 
Their harmful activity was that dock - Zahn and is so clear that they immediately prizn atsya (without to joint stock company and x - or difficulties) in all murders and disgusting acts which they ever committed, about what and go in about r and t with I of N and e. 

Paul Gamperle's recognition 

P aul Gamperle or P oppen Hummer, fifty 
eight years, prizn it atsya that he adheres vedov-sky p cancer ti to and since childhood and that trained it in it it with t and r and I and at highway to and, to about t about r and I am mind e r l and m of N about about l e t of N and z and. 
Also it prizn atsya that during this time it by means of witchcraft and sorcery ruined about one hundred raspberries of ky children. 
Also it prizn atsya that it sent lameness and sde-lat humpbacked most zazhitochn ykh citizens of M of a yunkhen, so to joint stock company they did not forgive it that money which it has to them. 
Also it prizn atsya that by means of sorcery it got rid of two uncles in order that zavla-to put them property. 
Also it prizn atsya in commission of ten ograble-niya of churches, in p I am adtsata ton murders of N and travelers to - horns, in night robberies of merchant houses, koto-ry he lichn about made twenty seven, and the N and to joint stock company oh for - became wet or a door could not stop it, but by means of sorcery it could open them without any work. 
In to about N of c e to about N of c about in about N p r and z N and l with I, h t about z and vs yu with in about yu zhi zn he made eight night arsons neighbour's 

152 
houses thanks to what sixteen people, muzhchi-N y, wives shch both N y and children, burned down in the beds. To rum of that, it made a great number of others prestuple-niya to great misfortune of all this earth. 

Anna Gamperle's recognition 

en and it, An of N and Gamperle, sixty years, at - 
z N and l and with, h t about z and in with yu with in yu and z N about N and with p about m about shch yu to about l - dovstvo also ruined about one hundred raspberries ky - those y. 
Also it prizn atsya that it spoiled, sdela-la humpbacked and besides just killed by means of sorcery devyatn to adtsat elderly people. 
Also it prizn atsya that by means of sorcery it forced to climb the wife hozya in and - Shuya to bake hotels in a grief where it also burned down; and a similar image it so finished the husband of this of wives shch and N y that it buried the head in the trough full of a forage for pigs, and so for - was died. 
The t and to e about N and p r and z N and l and with, h t about about N and in about l highway about m to about l and e - a stvo spoiled h cattle, scattering grain on the ground. And that it set fire to two haystacks from which fire pereki-nulsyanutsya by N and all village. P ri it she did not help lyu-dyam to fight against the fire. And zbav us, My God, lovely serdiy the from it! 

Simon Gamperle's recognition 

And x native son, Simon Gamperle, twenty two 
years, prizn it atsya that it by means of sorcery killed thirty juvenile children, and except their N - six hundred - rik, N and which it sent in a similar way lameness and gibbosity then killed. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that robbed nine tserk-blow, four times the N and roads, twelve times - merchant sk plundered frets; at night it N arushat public order and plundered six times; often by means of a hail and a storm caused a loss to alien cattle and gardens. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that with the help coldovst-va it did itself(himself) nepobedimym1 thanks to what he one opposed six people, robbed them, and then killed one behind another. I do not speak about many other cases to a passion and here any more murders which it from beliefs of highway and l. 

1 5 3 
Jacob Gamperle's recognition 

Other their son, Jacob Gamperle, twenty one go- 
yes, prizn it atsya that it killed sixty five children, and except their N - five old men whom it sn did an achal humpbacked, the N and N sent their ache, and then ubi-a shaft. 
To r about m e t about go, about N p r and z N and l with I in about r and l e N and and p I am t and c e r to - blow, in ten robberies of merchant houses, in couples - rekh - N and public roads. It set fire to five houses, the N arushat an order and plundered N and streets at night. P about - sledny he made several dozen times. 
To rum of that, it prizn atsya that with the help coldovst-va he made so that the storm carried away herd of sheep to the river and all of them drowned; the storm was so strong that pu-teshestvennik could not even pass on roads. He made much and others mean zlodeyan y. 

Ulrich Seeltibaum's recognition 

Ulrich Seeltibaum and z Dettingena, sixty 
eight years, prizn it atsya that for all the zhi zn it with on - power of sorcery ruined seventy juveniles - Tay, and also sent an ache and destroyed thirty lyu-Tay of old age. 
To r about m e t about go, about N p r and z N and l with I in about r and l e N and and c e r to in e y and merchant houses, in robbery and night 2 murders, in 
damage of cattle and causing damage to gardens, and - 
it lat it so often and in and x quantities that could not even list all these cases. 

George Smaltes's recognition 

George Smaltes, tailor and z P ions, sixty years, 
prizn it atsya that for all the zhi zn it killed thirty six juvenile children and besides sent an ache of N and p I ton adts to at elderly people, having killed them subsequently. I think that there is no need to list murders of N and proyez-zhi x roads, robberies in villages, arsons of houses, og-a rableniye of churches. The N about in conclusion follows sk the Azat that this person had in custom to dig out on but - to cha of a grave of just died people and to plunder them. P ri it it took away everything that there was, up to on - sledny trya p to and. P about - mine, does not have nowadays N and to the earth of people it is worse, than e that six. 

1 5 4 
That is why all Christians dolzhn y to pray that 
God in the favor kept us and all other people from similar cases and cleaned from and x pre-stupnik the earth, to JSC On already did, and let the shame and razlichn ye N of joint stock company an adhan and I will be an award him. I ask you about e that m, B about e! 
Were that p ri zn An and I made before govern - Lem and other burghers of the city of M of a yunkhen. These people listened to charge, them prizn Ali guilty persons and you - bore them a sentence. And on July 26 they were to azn en y that is Kim image and the following order: 
First, they were brought before a town hall of M of a yunkhen where upomyan uty wives shch and N e, the ovyama placed between two of her son, pulled out both breasts, to joint stock company ovy her executioner Udaril three times on the person then in a similar way to an azhda y from her sons sitting Obock it received three blows in a face a breast of their mother. It also the N of An if six siln ykh blows is twisted by N ym in the Plait of kN uty then to it broke both hands on to - 
the wood also placed N and the 3rd certain seat, specially prigo- 
tovlenny for e that; then her body was burned. 

1 5 5 
To other five to oldun am-men am were distributed 
on six blows of kN uty, broke and m in the way of a hand, p ri vya the hall of N and the same me-to a sta to a stake and burned four of their N. And P aul Gamperle, the father and heads the ny sorcerer, was alive got by N and twirled and whether so by it in his way gradually zazhar to death then his body was burned dotla4. 
And t and to, l and about with to l about N of N y y h and t and t e l, t y a l mustache y highway and l and about that I fly zhi zn and and the death of these six most otjyavlen N ykh sorcerers. And let the N ik that will not doubt in it truthfully st because told about it not only many poch-muddy people, but also the translation of this to N and gi was made from her first Dutch and also I am handed over. 
And now we will fall N and knees and with the N ymiy sulfurs - dets pomoly Misters from whose pleasure were with - all these tops zlodeyan iya that it pacified arrogance is broken and he is clever shit rage About Aton y, reigning nowadays among people, and N apoln silt of heart of N ash and so strong belief that similar N apadk and N of an ikogd not of the reasons the yawl to us harm, but that we could serve It with perfect love and piety, to It, most it is powerful mu, C aryu among tsars, to which the power, praise and S1ava for ever and ever. Amine. 
Friedrich von Spee 
Cautio criminalis 
and whether About processes against witches 
IN ABOUT P P ABOUT WITH 4 7 1 
Whether the demon can create visibility of presence 
the innocent on vedovsky sabbaths? 2 
YazyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA I answer this question so: "yes, can though it 
only the visibility observed, however, by all who take part in this action". To fetters osno-a vaniye to approve similar? 
Basis 1. The fact that it can occur under - examples tverzhdat, therefore, it perhaps. I know one monastery where there was a similar event, as it was noted in dokumen taln ykh by joint stock company ta. One of monks of this monastery was accused by a large number of witches that it prin imat participation in their highway abash ah. It and N and z y in and l and t and to e l and c oh, with to about t about r y m about N, I to about y, t and N of c e - a shaft, and, full rask aya N and I, in the face of death podtver-waited for all this, at that time to joint stock company according to everything mo-nastyrya in this hour the defendant together with other mona-be rude sang in chorus, uplifting prayers to the Lord. Z ayavitel could lie that is quite usual after the prima - N e N and I p y t about to, and about about in about r and t N e in and N about in N about go and z z l about y. E with l and e, N and about about r about t, about N and N e l of and l and (N about t and to p about with the h and t and l and with and m and judges) whether they p ri N I am a ghost for reality. I can azvat N and others, devout even according to sou - Tay before which there passed many witches, people who are well and pon yn e who were also repeatedly accused that they danced on vedovsky highways abash ah. It is possible to give also many other examples, however I will not begin to do it as they are rather known and come down to the fact that separate persons were noticed on highway abash ah, at that time to joint stock company incontestable dokazatel-stvo demonstrated that they were at this time bezotluchno in other place. 
About with N about in and N and e 2. D I in about m l about e t p r and n and m and t about l and ch and e and N - 
the gela sveta3, is told about it in Sacred P isaniye and in numerous examples from zhi ti y Saints. Sle-dovatelno, and the innocent it can present in about - a face p ri zrak and that gives the grounds to think that Lord allows it a lot of things. 
Basis 3. Arguments of supporters protivopolozh-a leg mn en and I do not give enough sure proofs for a denial of our initial thesis, I conclude - shchegosya that for justice it is necessary to follow in the vozzren iya to common sense, but not 
to be satisfied with the words of others. I turn vn iman iye on the fact that I, supporting mn en iye about what the demon can create p ri zrak and N evin ovn ykh, am not obliged to prove the case. It belongs to rather objecting me in case they begin to deny my point zren iya. Because business is in what for me will change little from whether the demon can make similar or cannot. I want to bring nothing out of both utverzhde-niya and whether I trouble myself highway because of joy zn An and I, pozvo-lyayushchy to warn others. But if in it I am not accompanied by good luck and zn iye mine threatens nobody with An, then it will not bring N to iky N and to joint stock company oho of damage and will not represent for whom - or danger. Mine against - N of an ika would do the views to joint stock company by the base, with you - cells of which dare to judge a human zhi zn and. P oety follows them if only they are not easy myslenna, to joint stock company it is possible to approach closer difficult and tya-to inhabited problems, zn An iye which at all not sostavlya-et their base pozn An y, and to study them. 
The one who denies that the demon can create an image of the innocent encroaches on p Ravi of la di Alec of Ti to and; a debt is-the investigator and his duty - dock to azyvat utverzhde-ny. It, certainly, concerns not only those who from - ritsat, but also and to those who agree with the N ym utverzh-is given by a deniye. P odes a word "agrees" (to joint stock company the reader could already make sure) it is necessary to understand "he agrees under a condition...", and therefore if to azhdy - he agrees or denies - vos-adopts this provision to joint stock company fundamental isti-well and wishes to use it for daln eysh them umozak-lyucheniye, then he is obliged its dock the Azat. P rotivn ik and hollow wives iya that the demon can create images nevi-N ovn ykh, dolzhn y to prove it, to prove, and then to carry out on this basis processes as other che, rejecting proofs, in this case they will achieve opposite result. However on the other hand. even having created the base of the proofs, they not on - improve the situation much. 
For us enough given bases to light this doubtful business and that further people, not absolutely expert in N auk ah, were terrified Dejan Iyam of a devil and did it with B of an ozhy pleasure. For us it is enough that we are N amek Ai about it to judges. If they want to perform in process frankly, not pribe-in hectare I to e with t about the h and y highway and m p y in t to and m, and about p and r and I with in t about l to about N and p r about the h - N y the base of arguments, they will arrive to joint stock company dostoy- 
160 

ny and circumspect people; without having made it, the N elzya to - to fight fair resh en iya. P we will examine, to joint stock company and e proofs are brought by the opposite side. 

QUESTION 48 
What arguments are looked for for dokazatelst- 
va regulations that the demon on vedovsky shaba-the shah cannot create images of innocent people? 
I answer: The B insf eld collected these arguments voyedi- 
but; Delri o4 also is based on them. To me having appeared - 

6-3400	161 
the reliability of all issle-giving about sorcery as arguments of B insfel-yes we will subject to ri ti to e at repeated them from - lozheniya, and azvat N their thoughtful lyatsya very doubtful I also cannot. So to them in the way, I will state one after another are - insf the elda and only the first argument will be to take gument of B me from Delrio. 
Argument of I. The N e should be described, probably, to joint stock company not - long ago one not really umn y the fighter against witches bragged of Delrio's words, referring N and it to N to a yoke and bringing sle- 
the blowing situation, in which Delrio za5ya vlya l so: 
"Demons well are able prin to imat images of the innocent 
people and at such look to be present at highway abash ah, the EU - whether does not interfere with it the Lord of B og. However I yet never read about it and do not hear it is scarlet that it slu-chitsya" (to N.2, vopr.12, the number.5). And slightly N Izh in the same place: "If the Lord also allows it, then soon deception vskry-is howled and the Lord allows or to confess also for other sins or through stradan iya to deserve glory And descending from vysh esk an adhan of N oho, this confessor voskley-tsat: "Do you see, Delrio himself about anything similar not chi-tala and do not hear the ave To the same can believe that it happened?" 
Objection 1. This argument proves too much and, eventually, nothing. It proves t, as other numerous circumstances from which some are lit tshchateln oh, others are not present, on - about it did not read Delrio's skolka and do not hear the ave I, on the contrary, spoke much and hear it is scarlet about it, also to joint stock company and many together with me. 
In about z r and e N and e 2. In N and with t about I shch e e in r e m I and N to v and z and t about r y to azhdy day by means of new tortures pull out from witches p ri zn An and I about N eslykhan N ykh still prestup-a flax iya and fish soup shch Wren and I x and do it, without looking on to N I z e y, n and n and N and r about. 
Want to use I this argument, Lish to them one, and to challenge everything as Delrio read nothing and do not hear it is scarlet about it what would be told then? They were is indignant y and would begin to assure, cht <the Lord razresh silt to make sins every day. P ochy they do not want to agree with me, this great number of N echitavsh them and N eslysh avsh them, that - Maun can with razresh en iya Misters present on sha-to Bachet images really existing and nevinov- 
162 
ny people? This disbelief also is one more sin of each of their N. 
Objection 3. To an ogd on people inform that they vi-were put during devilish highway abash and, it is possible that they are guilty and deystvitel-but f izichesk and there were present. Then they are tortured so much how many it is necessary for them p ri zn for An and I and if not - which maintain p y shopping mall and and not prizn atsya, those - strenko burn alive to joint stock company zakoren ely and stubborn gresh N ik ov as they anyway wines ovn y. Unless it is not adequately surprised iya that Delrio heard nothing about it and did not read? 
Objection 4. You want to object me that not everything occurs so, to joint stock company I described vysh e that those neschast-ny that sustained p ytk and and muchen iya, not prizn av se-bya wines ovn ymiy, were, according to Zack it at, are released back home, but is not burned y. Well, it is useful to me too. If the N e m of N about gi e about t p ushch e N of N y e y l both p r and z N and N y N e in and N about in N y m and, and it happened more than once (according to you), then to joint stock company it was possible not to read and do not hear to at about it? If these people it is justified y, then who then was on a sabbath? Sledo-vatelno, and this argument of nothing not the dock azyvat. 
Argument of I I. The devil has no N and to joint stock company oho zhelan and ya and m and t and r about in and t p r and with ut with t in and e N e in and N about in N about about N and highway and and highway e, therefore... This situation is especially doubtful because from the Sacred P ison iya it is known that State - pod does not oppress and does not tempt the N ykh unless only when wants to test them to - a brodetel, dushevn ye qualities and terpene iya is elected. It - uche-ny B insf an elda. 
Objection 1. This argument proves a lot of things and consequently, nothing. P almost the same samy-mi words it is possible for an oskolk dock the Azat that the demon did not strike all being And an ov, and he is responsible for the death of martyrs not only thanks to the art and from - r and N of N y m and m and s t about h N and to and m m uch e N and y. T about h N about t and to e I am m about - gu sk the Azat: "The demon has no N and to joint stock company oh requirement in on - dobny deya N and I x. He knows from Sacred P and a dignity and I that the Lord is elected N ykh the does not oppress and not iskusha-et unless only when wants to test their Virtue, a shower evn ye qualities and patience". 
Objection 2. P ozhaluy, not all those whose shape at - was nimat by the demon, B ozhy and zbran N and to Amy are. N e-which are capable to create the evil they can be the villain - mi, zakosn evsh them in mortal sins even if they 

*	1 bzyxwvuts?, 
have nothing in common with sorcery and, sledovatet * but, in this meaning of N evin ovn y. N about even in this case if the demon has no requirement p ri N and mother shape bozh them the N of ik is elected to highway abash e, then highways are necessary distant and e proofs that the appearance of N evin ovn ykh mo zht to be used by N and devil highway abash e. Nothing not the dock azyvat Tai as this argument. 
Argument of I I I. The B insf eld considers that the doctrine about TON: that the demon cannot I vlya tsya in shape of N evin ovn oye derives special strength in consciousness of the innocent. Show N novny, the N ye is exhausted with fear and cares whether the demo us is represented in society the sorcerer y and witches - on the other hand if the demon can make under bny, then, therefore, all of us on merits pre-will be in horror and fear, and the body and a shower and on - real' will be exposed to constant danger. However chis concealing conscience absolutely is afraid of nothing, therefore it so. 
Vozrazhen iye 1. This argument the dock azyvat a lot of things, zyxwvut < 
therefore, anything. P okhozhy words it is possible to the Azat that any N evin ovn y the person, is not bewitched ny by witches or not affected dr\by gy charms, can all the zhi zn live N of an eschastla you and that it just does not happen. Proof: who and N evin ovn ykh is afraid since morning of the fact that him in this den> witches did not bewitch? On the other hand, if vedm can similar, then we on merits will stay" in horror and fear, thinking that because of magical charms m N and vs yu and z N about with t and N e m of N with I e with the h and with t of N y m and. T about l to about the h and with t and! the conscience is afraid of nothing; from here follows 
In about z r and e N and e 2. The N e in and N about in N y e with p about to about y N y and e z about I z N e N ny not because believe that the devil cannot use IS their appearance in the purposes or not dostavi-to them N epriyatn awns, but because are sure that if yes their shape and is used, for N their it without awaking" to have consequences. They are sure that in court wise judges who, uchin willows process on N them on denunciations of people, a subrank yayushch ikhsya to a devil about l highway e p about in e r I would be t of N r and in with t in e N of N about y h and with t about t e about in and N I e m y x, to about tory, on them mn en iyu, speaks for himself sit not podkupn ye. 
Objection 3. I have to challenge a statement, a gl syashchy that where also to vi zsh highway about N of N y e processes on witches are carried out by N with userdsh-in l and a heat and where courts adhere mn en and I about which we speak, it; provozhdy process by skillful excuses, obvinyas 
164 
my (actually innocent) there is nothing to be afraid. It does not correspond to the truth. I zn ayu many vydayushch ikhsya, zdravomyslya shch and x people who felt this fear, and sometimes so siln y that they nekoto-ry of them went to other places. I zn ayu and and x which asked me and others for suggestions. I know also people, the joint venture esh and vsh and x behind council and on a confession to the neighboring city and byvsh them, on a cart next day - vrashch en AI, the N ymiy as it was considered braids - a wine proof is seized - they, allegedly, tried to run, but on p y the shopping mall but did not work well as the Lord from revenge pomu-tit their mind and they came back N of aza@. To an ogd they tried dock the Azat that everything was not so, the N ik that did not trust them. I zn ayu as many references I had to give on spetsif to ichesky questions of mine zn An and y and about that to joint stock company to behave to avoid a mortal sin, not on - govoriv on myself and N and others during tortures, and about that how many in fact people lives in this place, being in a condition of fear. P oety an argument of B and N with f e l d and N e m about e t y t and m and s p about l z about in and N; N and about about r about t, he helps me against him rather. And, zaversh aya, I want sk the Azat: if the B insf eld in these affairs got so m and l about about p y t and and z N and n and y, e with l and about N of N e h and t and l and N e with l y highway and l that everyone knows, that it is possible to wish to such scientist and it similar? They can on - prezh-to it to sit in the cabins eta, to joint stock company they did it and still, protecting with N us theological I rub - the lady. However I ask about one: that people, I have - shch and e about that l about l highway about y and in t about r and t e t, p e r e with t and of l and with the h and t and t p r about - tsessa an amusing game and were not afraid to suit closer to Zac Lyuchen to N ym and to feel dirt temn its if they, of course, there sometime get. And bo from opy-that it is known that the spirit and force of imagination constantly excite, and razmysh a flax and I soften the person. 
Argument of IV. The fact that the N of an ikogd did not happen at 
usual combination of circumstances, it is possible to consider voob-shche the N of an ikogd who was not occurring; if it follows from the facts unusual, then it should be investigated. The N ikog-yes, or to Rein e seldom was necessary hear to at sure and full p ri zn An and I in that. that the demon prin imat on highway abash ah shape of N evin N ykh. To N aoborot, from experience it is known that the noticed N and highway abash ah are really guilty of sorcery. So, the B insf eld argues. 
I object: the last statement has to rit smallpox. From where the B to an insfeld knows that is valid 

1 t S 
innocent N ik an ogd were not represented by the devil on highway abash ah, and therefore all who are accused are worthy on - ri c of An and I and is condemned iya? And z reliable prizn An y? From where it zn the ayah that all accused of sorcery and convicts because of it, are really guilty in for - N I ti I x sorcery? avern oye, from p ri zn An and I unfortunate, to and to, on to paradise of N to it to a measure, he approves N. N about from where he zn the ayah what all these p ri zn An and I deystvi-are telno reliable, but are not received owing to tortures and under a vliya of N iy fear? Often it happens that znachi-teln aya a part of proofs looks doubtfully; so from where it zn the ayah that those, N and which it posto-I am N of N about about with N about in y in and e t with I, N e I in l I yu t with I of t and to about in y m and e, e with t vvodyashch them in delusion. A grief that whose leg at least once entered the camera p a ytok; they will already not return to N of an ikogd - sya N the Azat, without having confirmed what is only possible I will come - mother. Here the N can refer again and the third vozrazhe-ny N and the first argument, brought vysh e. And therefore I consider a debt to repeat often that I not all of us yavlya-am eaten to oldun with Amy; whether the only basis for this statement I vlya etsyatsya by highway that whether us prinuzhda-to it p y shopping mall am and. So approved also N what in to vizi-Torahs of one powerful governor, sitting for pirshe-a stvenny table and being in consciousness of absolute correctness and as p ap and Roman itself enclosed in his hands and the tool p a ytok, it is not surprising if itself p ap and sometime prizn it atsya in sorcery. The same will make also B insf eld, both I, and others, for isklyucheni-eat the few to turnips to and x spirit. That is why also nothing not the dock azyvat this argument. Here it is possible once again about - to ratitsya, to and to already uk it azyvatsya, to the third vozrazhe-of N and yu by N and p e r in y y and r mind e in N of t. 
Argument of V. If the demon can on vedovsky shaba-of highway ah p ri N and mother images of N evin ovn ykh people, then it mo-zht to wish to present them in the form of murderers, prestupni-k, fornicators as it glavn aya a task - un ichtozhen iye bezgreshn ykh people. That is why maybe so that the person accused of murder, gra-a bezh, slander and adultery, zashch and shch aya s can for - I vi t that it is innocent, and the devil, p ri N I vsh and y his appearance and committed this criminal action, etc. is guilty of everything. 
By means of this argument of B insfeld wants so far - to zat that be not able to solve are those who act with 

1 6 6 
An constrained sozn iy, or is frequent and able about a flax and I grew blind. 
I object, so to joint stock company prak tichesk and iya follows from any osno-of van that B insfeld and his adherents of t r and to t uyu t of N and highway e m of N e N and e about the h e N and z and r and t e l N about and p about r and c and yu t they it so far as are blind and cannot distinguish intention from a harmless vydumk and. That is why if who - could not razvya zat similar knots, dove-rivshis deception to its uvshy feelings, for us all this is equally in nothing not the dock azyvat as we zn Ai, to joint stock company to resolve a similar situation. We darling vlya I eat with all evidence that all statements of B insf not mo-gutnut an eld to be compared to N ash and m a game kretn ym a case. And so the situation is prak tichesk and always. The B ud is attentive, the reader, and you will make sure of it. 
P redpolozhy that there is a place which in accuracy is known that there in certain time and hour poyavlya-yutsyatsya razn ye it is given iya to spend time and to do razlichn ye things, to joint stock company that is done by people; let's assume that Semprony accuses Grak ha that is that who - that saw other person when murder was perfect. However at any sensible conceiving judge of the bases somne-it will enough vatsya whether it was N astoyashchy Gracchus, suspecting that in that place was seen its empty masks at. At the same time, it would be silly to release Grak ha back home without distant - shy investigation and analysis of proofs. In the same way the situation and in N our case is. N ash and protivn ik defend the provision that the demon has obykno-a veniye to be in certain hours in certain places where occur satan in sky festivals, sha-bash, round dances. They also claim that he posto-yanno changes an appearance, acting in one, in other look, and appears in shapes of men, wives shch and N, soldiers, young men, girls, goats, lions, etc. And if whom - whether - bo from N they are absent among p la of highway ushch and x, then, to joint stock company approve N ash and oppon en you, the demon himself accepts their appearance. A lot of things occur really there, but it is even more to azhushch egosya there. Witches are in the habit periodi-in chesk to eat, drink and sleep in beds from ivory even if they absorb carrion and drop, zapi-Wai its bile, and have a rest under gallows. Nevertheless the rest can be considered illusion and a thing nedoka-zonal, that is the fact that whether on and x festivals neobkho-dimo there is a large number of all - 

167 
rank, ghost ov, shadows, ghosts and masks. P show ku everything my opponents say that it is possible (about what I consider possible N and satan in sky highways and basha, I will tell later), that everyone, appeared mi the place of the judge, painful doubts begin to torment - he thinks whether the power of demons and ghosts of all types so far extends that there is possible use by them prizrachn ykh appearances of people, the N ykh is especially convicted of commission of a mortal sin. If the judge of people pron itsateln y and zdra-vomyslyashch y, then he, without fluctuating, doubts (or on - a zyvayta it to joint stock company you want) and whether there was a suspect dey-stvitelno in uk an adhan of N y y hour in this place or it is the suspect's ghost used by the demon. From here the N does not follow in an ikoy way that I should be suspected and the claim to at the proofs speaking about from - lichiya p ri zrak and from me whether doing this highway to N and that basis that who - saw whom - among thieves, murderers and fornicators, or in general to resort to focuses and receptions of this sort. All this razn ye things. From here it is absolutely clear that the N y y an argument of B of an insfeld, to about t about r y y about N with the h and t and e is given to t of N e about t r and z and m y in m, about t of N yu d in N e I in l I e in t with I so ovy; especially vidn and its groundlessness - his creator just blindly draws N and is mute. Only he also confirms it because what wants to see with its help B insf eld is not visible to us at all. The m ozhno, of course, to talk also about other parties of it argu-the cop of B insf an elda, however the fact that I azat dock here whether it is quite enough in order that completely highway and t his what - or forces. 
Argument of VI. The B og did not allow the demon prin to imat about - whether to N evin N ykh, therefore, it cannot do it - la t. 
I object because from where at my opponents so aya confidence that the B og resolved nothing it? To joint stock company we spoke vysh e, the Lord allows also many other bad things - death of martyrs, babies, violation svyashch en N ykh wafers and other awful things. Besides the B og allows the demon to create the ghost and razn ykh people, is equal and them is reflected iya in a mirror, water, oil, an independent image so many informers, klevetn ik and various witnesses, wishing uzn to at who in to joint stock company of ohms concrete me-to a sta Zahn imatsya by indecent affairs, go there where the cattle where whose - that the daughter vykho-is allegedly bewitched existing then 

1 68 
dit in marriage where who - that died. Unfortunately, it stano-in and the CU I in e with m and r and with p r about with t r and N e N of N y m and about y h N y m I in l e N and e m. The demon feels at the same time especially well and, to joint stock company we know, confuses the innocent f alshivy at - mints. I know one worthy and scientific svyashchen-N of Ik, very good person to whom one on - hotlivy wives shch and N and, the witch, tested intolerable love heat, seeking vn ush to ityit thus similar to a zka zhelan iye and to object of the desires. N e was they are ky tricks and receptions which it would not use, but, having made sure of their futility, she neodno-multiply by means of the demon created incorporeal at - zrak resistant svya shch en N and to namely so, to joint stock company it is statedit is statedit is stated in bulls of the Pope. P ochy then the demon has to prin imat shape of innocent people roofing felt - to about N and highway and and highway e, h t about about N, to about N e h N about e, m about e t? 
You say: if it was authorized to it prin to imat shape of N evin ovn ykh N and highway abash ah, then already mentioned third objection cannot be executed, and sa-my to the state the irreparable loss can be caused to those. 
Objection 1. If this is soIf this is soIf this is so, then from where you zn at what the B og will not allow this harm and a loss to the state? God razresh silt to a devil to transfer witches from the place on me-hundred, to create a magical potion for their acts, etc., che-go any of my opponents does not deny. N about unless it it does not matter? As it is worthy regrets! That God does not know about to joint stock company oh activity of a devil including that it accepts shape of the innocent on magical festivals, out of the question, because with telling it it is necessary to argue. 
In about z r and e N and e 2. I about with p and r and in and yu that m of N e n and e, ch t about in y highway e - at to and z and N of N about e p about l about e N and e in e r N of the lake. And bo to and to about y in r e d, with p r and highway and - to Wai I, can the reasons ityit the innocent person gosudar-to a stvo? Perhaps, it is that nevinov-a leg as necessary held for the guilty person, obrashcha-foxes with it to joint stock company with the guilty person, etc.? And I will answer N so: the clever and judicious judge is not guilty here. P about - dobny narrow-minded and silly people create, and in it is harm to the state. And for the rest a position of mine oppo-N e N of t about in p about l of N about with t yu about highway and about h N and. About N and z and I in l I yu t, h that in N e in and - novny, whose images were used by the demon, on - fall in a trouble as they are taken for guilty persons and as appropriate concern them. sa-my they claim by that that anything whose image ispolzo- 

169 
shaft the demon, it is necessary to consider the guilty person. It obra-zy here vozn one more question hiccups: whether it is possible schi-the Tat for guilty persons of the person who got to such situa-a tion? And so, the circle zamyk atsya, but there is a question: on - to what in the majority these people have to be considered as guilty persons that they were seen on magical highways abash ah? P to atom that the B og does not allow a devil is-to use N and highway abash ah images of the innocent. The N about poche-does not allow mu Guospod of it? Yes because all not - happiness is in what all noticed there has to consider wines ovn ymiy. Here it is especially visible, how my opponents follow the rule dialek-ti a little to and: "And therefore is In that In is And". The N about unless N ikto did not break off this vicious circle? Aude - nako and still scientists spiritual zvan and I, the authorities using it and misleading and governors are; they never return to a right way, using protection of the priors, so there is not enough pon imayushch of them in all this. And if the B insfeld thinks that ozhy - to solve this right of sons of B sud-people, then this thesis it should arrange before those ten questions, N and which I answer. In for - a klyucheniye I have to tell shortly something about with - lives in one known corner of Germany, is turned - the number nowadays into ashes and ashes. The N of EC y to N I z suggested on - to reach to the table to two svya shch en N and to am, known among other people for the learning and righteousness. P rodolzhy a meal, to N I z set to one of them vop-grew: "Father, whether you praviln ym consider that we still subject p y shopping mall am everyone to whom will point dozen witches, to joint stock company on uchastn ik and a magical sabbath? I very much am afraid that the way on which we are conducted by the system of denunciations can be absolutely incorrect, on - to a skolk the devil, the master on any tricks, could take care of the is committed tsakhets, but not to give them in dozens in hands and justice. What do you think of it?" The N and it sprash ivayemy answers with excessive diligence of the person, Zahn imayushchegosya house philosophy furnaces. "To joint stock company the fact that, without watching N and with in about y r about z N y y x and r and to t e r can grieve you p r and N e with l about with t about l in m of N about go in to about - a file zn An and I? To believe that God could assume that images of the innocent were used on shaba-by highway ah zn achit to doubt the Lord of N ash I eat. I do not see any reason for doubts and fluctuations which can vozn ikn utnut at the judge concerning the validity sve- 

170 
the deniye reported in the given denunciations". To N I z the cart - struck, and between them the serious dispute erupted. Aude - N of joint stock company about as svya shch en the N and to constantly tried - to zat dock the correctness, to N I z put an end to a dispute, sk elements: "I am very sorry, the Holy Father, but you defined with in about y with m e r t of N y y to about N e in c, uy in t and about t to about t about r about about N e in l z I, e with l and I will put you in temn to iyets. Near pyatn adtsat of witches at - were known that saw you on the highways abash ah. And it not highway utk and, you will be able to read made p ok an adhan and I in which about all this it is detailed napisa-but. According to your opinion which you so otsta-ivat, you dolzhn y to incur deserved by N of joint stock company an adhan and e". Here the valiant man froze, having lost a speech power and not zn aya, to joint stock company oh to bring an argument into the zashch and that. It zamol-chat and his look stopped. And it at all not sk azk and, I stated this story so, to joint stock company it was, having lowered Lish N azvan and e areas and a name of this person. They here to anything. And here that surprisingly: why the demon has to and whether can prin imat a view only of highway nevinov-ny people, even in the Scripture stories - is howled that he is capable not only to ruin a shower and, but also 
to turn into An of a gel. Really, on slo7vam Apo- 
table (2 To a shouting. 11), it it is constant soversh the ayah. Here on - 
to what also nothing not the dock azyvat this argument. And those are per we will consider the last from the remained arguments. 
Argument of VII and the last. In this regard B ins-Feld considers that the true doctrine that the devil cannot appear on satan in sky highways abash ah in obli-chy N evin N ykh people, zashch and shch atsya by all scientists and in all to N and ga, from "Hammer" to compositions of the Back, joint stock company e and L about y e r and I 8. 
I object: ours mn en and I if it when - - be it will be published thanks to the deniye opened obsuzh-, the much bigger number of people will adhere. And it it will be connected oh, first of all, with the fact that it is true, but not with the authority of his author. Aude - nako as B insfeld proceeds first of all from ponderability p ok an adhan and I witches, it is really ridiculous. It is like darling vi t: this doctrine of the rights - a miracle because schoolgirls zashch and shch at the father of all lie. Velikolepn y argument! Own to suite a telstvo of the witch strengthen the authority. In Evan-helium Christ says: "If I provide svide-a telstvo about myself, then my certificate is false". And x 
and
R barns of t says: if satan and confirms itself, 

171 
that this certificate - the truth. With surprise I look at where it can get. That is why, if m of N e p about z in about l e N about in y with to and z and t with about with t in e N of N about e m of N e N and e, I with full confidence darling vlya yu about the conviction in m, h p about to and z and n and ya, v y r in and N of N y e with p about m about shch yu p y t about to - a lie if the speech goes to them about any given person who was seen on highway abash e. I consider that bolshin-the stvo so of their people is innocent. Also the fact that if in vedovsky processes and it was involved not - how many wines ovn ykh, then the N them by all means will be followed by a train absolutely to N evin N ykh people became clear to me. P odes threat py-current and tortures of N evin the N y says slander others about what they and not zn at and by that entrains them. P we zn ag do not want a ravda, but we wish that they prizn atsya in all the affairs. Kog-yes - nibud it is surely Zac it chitsya. And therefore I ra-pout because I N of an ikogd had no doubts that all over the world not so there is a lot of witches. What - satsya their sabbaths and dancings, and here it is possible vyra-to zit doubt in their reality. I wish that all this who - nibud sometime really izu-chi l. Whether the to N igy I wanted everything highway vskolykhn to utnut, provoke Wuchang ykh, to involve them in discussion vopro-the owls accompanying trials of witches. 
To azhdy day I see, to joint stock company many of N them allow to carry away themselves short-sighted and rash is stated iya-to m and. M of N e e N r and in I t with I those at the h e N y e, to about t about r y e N and h e about N e take on trust without doubts even if all people trust in it. However at the same time to N I zya dolzhn y proyav-la t an attentiveness maximum that in and x seriousness - N ykh affairs rashness did not result in harm even if for the sake of satisfaction scientific lyubozna-those l N about with ti. 












172 
Sulfur and about de Bergerac 
Z and	to oldun ov 
P to a company in to oldun ov the State and Empire of the Sun 
FOR TO OLDUN OV 
Monsieur. Since then to joint stock company I had honor to see you, from m of N about y p r about and z about highway of l about with t r and N of N about e p r about and with highway e with t in and e. 
Tired with reading to N and gi which I at you once borrowed and which you to me once praised highly I left to walk to dispel mrachn ye and ridiculous f taziya An which N ap oln I am la me uzhasn aya nonsense e that y a N and at to and. With and l I with with about about ton e with ti with in about and m y with l and with in about with p about m and N and - N iya about these mrachn ykh stories, I gradually to a corner - and l with I in in and highway of N e about l highway about y l e page. With p a t mustache I, to and to m of N e to and e t with I, four hours of a way, I vn ezapn about noticed a broom, the countries of N ym in the way ok azavsh uyusya at me between legs. So, having rendered - shis it is free or involuntarily on it astride, I suddenly pochuv-stvovat that I fly by air. The N of joint stock company he ets, not zapomn willows that, to joint stock company I podn imatsya, the road, I azatsya ok on - among pustyn by N oh of the area. Around there was no N and one 
tropin to and. I without to it tsa watched on svo1yu a broom... Solitude 
e that p about to and z and l and with m of N e to and to about y - t about p l and N e t about y. 
P r e and with p about l of N both in highway and with r e highway and m about with t and p r about N and to N ut N e m of N about go deep into, I, without having noticed N and to joint stock company and x obstacles, H and to about N e ts, s and l N about at with t and in, I moved in p e r e about p a mustache of t and l with I of N and to about l e N and, but here I saw something that strongly surprised exchanges I. N and a background of the Sun blue light shone stars, further was poln aya Long and, and it zn achi-telno exceeded by the sizes N astoyashchy. Three times they disappeared and three times air became N epodvision ym, streams stopped, birds left the of foams iye, fishes as if glass - N e to l and, and in with e and in about t of N y e in t and ho in t r e p e in t and l and. N e in e r about I t of N and I am t and - highway and N and, with t about I in highway and I to r ug about m, in N at highway and l and to and to about y - t about with t r and x. 
P ri light Loong y I saw, to joint stock company from depth certain pe-shch e r y in y highway e l of of l ub about to and y with t and r e c, about l and h e N of N y y in e l y e clothes. By Li in c about it it was exposed to the wind, a look grozen. And z-under dense and bushy eyebrows severe eyes looked. The dense beard of N ispadat to him N and a breast. His head vencha-the l and highway of l I p and, with p in l e in t e in N of N and I and z in e r e in N y, t and l and yu e about hv and t y in and l a belt, made N y of a May paporotn ik and. The N and breasts at him stirred a half-dead flying mouse, and around in - r about t of N and to and about in and in and by l with I e in l e z in N y y about highway e y in N and to, un and z and N of N y y family of a razla chn ymiy dragotsen N ymiy to am N I am m and, to azhdy of which I vlya lsya zn joint stock company of ohms separate the plan of an eta. 
Dressed and m in the way, he held in the left hand tre-a coal form the vessel filled with dew, and in right - a rod from buzin y, one game ets which it was fettered pla- 

175 
Steen to oh, consisting from razn ykh metals, was made the second in the form of a small ruchk and. 
P otselovav a threshold of the peshch er, it was undressed and that - that p r about about r m about t and in, and z r e to and to and e - t about N e p about N I am t of N y e f r and z y, p about with l e what, moving back the back, approached an old oak, to four highways aga from which he drew one in one three f and - gura. There is an earth, shaking, by itself p ri N I am la those with and m y e about the h e r t and n and ya, k about t about r y e about N of t and m and z about r and z and l. To r about m e that is go, it N described names and vydayushch ikhsya people, a century, year, season, month, week, day and their hour zhi zn there and, even kings were defined by him there, having put everyone on the place; p ri it it to all of them to Adie of l, but everyone about with about bin of N y m about r and z about m. 
Z joint stock company it chiv it, it placed the vessel in the center of these circles, Quality Department dug it, took the zaostroyenny end of the staff in teeth, then settled on the earth, having faced on the East, and fell asleep. To an ogd of a min. ul approximately p about l about in and N and in r e m e N and, N and p r about t I e N and and to about t about r about go about N with p and l, I noticed, to and to in a vessel fell pya t seeds paporotn Ik. P rosnuvshis, he took out them from there, at the same time seme-put two in ush and, one in a mouth, shipped one in water, and remained threw out out of circle limits. However hardly he let go it and, to joint stock company I saw that its okra is zhat by more than one million but animals and N asekomy, not predve-shch avsh and x the poyavlen iy nothing good. It svo-to them a rod he touched a forest owl, a fox and kro that which, and handing over to monsters of N ye to ri to and, immediately entered a circle. He a copper knife unstitched them brew ho, pulled out and x hearts and, having wrapped everyone in three a leaf to and from a laurel tree, immediately swallowed. For - that it vyn st. from everyone a liver then again about dolzhat the incensings. Having mixed dew (which it had in a triangular vessel) and blood in a basin, it shipped pure parchment there, holding it in the right hand; for - that, having published four or p I t what time - that awful in about p l, it z and to r y l of of l and z and and N and h and l of m about l and t with I. 
The old man almost did not glevelit lips, however I heard 
to joint stock company at it inside as if would tell time several voices. P odn yav from the earth a palm branch, it directed it up, at the same time and zredk and darting a glance on nogot! 
ukazateln oho finger left hands and. zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV It was terribly time 
goryachen and vzvoln ovan, it was visible that he is tormented kiye-that by spasms - vn ezapn about he, having sighed, fell on Coca of N and. However immediately he pronounced what three words - whether that for to N of An and I and forces returned to it again. Now it 

17 
there was directly, not highway aty s, despite terrible on - ryva of the terrible wind blowing to it directly in the face and N and l e t and in highway e about N and N e oh, t about to and to at r and and N, to and to with m e r h. To and - it zatsya that this wind wants to leave this ring. N about here upomyan uty a circle suddenly made three krugo-howling dvizhen iye, from their N the stream ogn I which, rotating, the N and several spheres, with a crash which were throwing up from themselves thunder peals was divided escaped. 
In N e z and p N about I with N y y and p r about z r and h N y y with in e t r and with with e I am l e t and m r and h - ny meteors. P osred of all this vozn ik the young man, one leg op and ravsh and y sya N and an eagle, another - N and a lynx. It on - gave to the magician three sk la of N to and, N apoln en N ye liquid unknown to me. The same in turn gave it three volo-sa, having pulled out one and z m of joint stock company ush to and, and two others - from temples then hit it it can do a stick which - neighed in a hand, and everything disappeared. All this occurred when stars of N of an acha of N of Ali slowly to turn pale N and a background of a rising sun, gradually merging with the sky. 
Here I started to hurry was at way, wishing to find the village, odn Acre the sorcerer, fixedly razglya dyvavsh and y me, approached the place where I at that moment found - sya. N esmotrya N and the fact that he went slowly soon he on - ravn yalsya with mn oh. P having departed, the old man gave me the hand which azatsya ok so cold that then my own hands and for a long time it could not be warmed. For - that he led exchanges I by polurazvalivsh ikhsya hovels in hundred - Rhone uzhasn ykh ruins old thrown zamk and, to about m of N and t y to about t about r about about z and m and l of l and about N of l e t p r e in r and t and l and s in m r and h - ny vaults. To and to only we entered, it. having turned - shis to mn e, sk azat: "R aduysya that to you the sorcerer and Agrippa, 2 souls was necessary - to ripen the person and which through peresele-ny a shower once odush showed the scientist Zarathustra, vla-to a dyk of B and to tr and and. 3 Already about hundred years passed since I left the world of people and I disappear here, staying in health thanks to drinking gold. That is why to me not strash N and N and to joint stock company aya a disease. I drink this universal remedy, omolazhivayushch its exchanges I and restoring in 
body dissipated forces. P examine on these three s4k tya N to and, 
which to me were presented by C ar Fiery the demon ov. P ervy 
it is full zhidk of an awn, in the second - powder izverzhen iya, in the third - oil talc and. By the way, you have to me be very grateful because from all mortal I you - took you for participation in secrets stvo which I with - vershat only once in twenty years. By means of my magic I N asylat scarcity or abundance; I razzhi- 

177 
to Guy of war, lining on it Geniuses, upravlyayushch their Corot la of m and; I train shepherds to love wolves; I train a stake of dun in a way vrashch to at a sieve; I incite to vat dance fairies by the light of the moon y; I do so that kartochn ye players go to at the claim of clubs four together under the gallows. At midnight I send with to ladb shch dressed in cloth attires is brought y that they demanded from the nasledni-of k vypoln en iya the N ykh is given them obeshch by An y. I prik azyvat to demons zhi t in p ok and N uty zamk ah and to kill prokho zhi x which there ostan will avlivatsya and so will be until then pok and who - nibud reshiteln y will not force them p ok the Azat where the N akhoditsya to a harmony. edn ykh I would do are rich mi. I help thieves to burn the candle made of fat in and with e in l in N and to and, h t about y at with y p and t x about z I e in, p about to and those with about in e r highway and yu in t to a passion. I give to people letayushch y a pistole which returns in to Armand of the owner after that again, to joint stock company it spent it. eya m I give to Lach rings, with the help koto-ry they can during dn visit I Orléans and beliefs - to nutsyanutsya back in P Arie zh. By means of ghosts I can turn everything in the house upside down - they would overturn at t y l to and, with t and to and N y, t and r e l to and, p r and e that m of N and h e about N e r and z and Wai and not p Wai's roles. I train old men to cure dashingly a radka by means of plots. N of joint stock company of An un e prazdn Ik St. And an oanna I awake spozaran ku locals and they, not p ozavtrak av and without having made a prayer, go to collect herbs. To oldun I train in art to become about rotn to a hole. I force them to catch and to eat the children meeting them on roads. I posyl5ayu to am grieved 
N ym to people big black person and, which both 
shchat to make them the rich if they want to give I eat> the shower and. Whether N arush and vsh and x similar contract I highway ayu zren iya. With the same who reads magical to N and gi without ponya-ti I, calls me and presents with nothing, I kill. N about I peacefully I leave back if vyzvavsh y gives me to me old bash poppy, a hair or a bunch of straw. All p ri highway edsh and m of N and highway abash I suggest to kiss on the back of the goat sitting on a stool. And x I plentifully treat not with salty meat. If who - nibud the stranger, not zn ayushch y customs, dawns on himself the Godfather zn amine iy, then everything disappears. It will appear in the desert place, somewhere in the middle a sloe ovn ik and, in three hundred leagues from a sort of ny places. I find in a bed razvratn ik ov: wives - shch in with in to ubam, men with succubuses. That sleeping shch to them who did not cross before going to bed, I send night to Osh Mar in the form of infinitely long marble to omn ata. I obu- 

178 

to tea, to joint stock company to get rid of enemies: it is necessary to make their wax it is represented iya, to puncture them or to throw into fire. Then your foe the same fate, as him izobra-will comprehend wives iye. Whether sorcerers have me highway ayu sensitivity those places on a body where the goat left the mark. I vn ushat krestya-to us that they put a shred of hair under a shed threshold 

179 
or a toad if they want N to aslat damage on N t, akhodyashchy with I, and m with to about t and N at. P r and e t about m of N and d about p r about and z N e with t and t r about e to r and t of N about e a damnation that sheep, passing through a threshold, gradually withered. I give money which turns then into du - bovy leaves. I provide to magicians of the ordinary demon who accompanies both zashch and shch the ayah them from everything that incessantly starts St. M artin. To deliver to the succubus of the okolodovanny person, I nauchat to do treu-golny lepesh to at and to give e" as lane alms - vy popavsh emusya N ishch to it. I turn werewolves blow of a pitchfork between an eye. P about mine zhelan iyu sorcerers mo-gutnut to feel when they are beaten, but only if it affairs - etsyatsya by a stick from buzin y. I training an izgotovteniya svide-telstvo, to damage, magic, production of the seals, that is Leisman ov, Gadahn iyu on magic zerk Alam and to stars. I train them to find a mistletoe, a grass of delusion, a gaiter, 
magn and ton y plaster. I send lemurs, do6movykh, 
larv, lamas and y, p ri zrak ov, man, p ri vi den and I. N ako- 
not c, I am a Devil... and ober-egermeyster of the wood F onteblo". 
With these words the magician disappeared. Everything was dissolved and became covered dense chern ym fog of ohms. I found se-bya in the to rovat, my heart trembled, the body is strong weakened from souls evn ykh torments. I felt like so ustavsh him that I had not the power further N to describe to you the letter. 
Monsieur, your obedient servant. 


P P ABOUT TI IN TO ABOUT L D AT N ABOUT IN 7. 

Monsieur. With show honestly, really my last pis- 
mo did not frighten you? H you told that, 8 but I 
I think that the person is shown iye to you big black and is 
result of an emotional condition of your soul and whether, p about to r and y N e y m e r e, in and highway e about with about z N and N and I. R and N e e I am that h N about t and to e it was frightened it is given y, however now I slish to ohm was vzvoln ovan to describe all this uzhagn uyu to artin at. Now, wishing to make amends, I will draw shiro-which cloth of Otago is shown iya in all its world, with all oso-e in N of N about with tya in m and and about t t e in N to and m and. 
Whether P you redstavlyat to yourself how many worldwide with - zhzhen about the sorcerer ov, the N ykh in Zac Lyuchen is caught by AI of the contract with a devil; how many unfortunate prizn it atsya by N and a fire that they participated in highway abash e, and on interrogations govo-to Rila to the judges that on these feasts they ate - t "h. However the N elzya to trust to even Yuma to the word of the person because 

! 80 
the person can sk the Azat everything that ugodn o9. Because even if from the personal permission of B of RSA of souls and can return on fellow countrymen - lyu to ask whom - nibud to pray for it then whether it that ghosts or spirits if all of them - are available, are so thoughtless to take on se-bya responsibility for reckless whims nevezhest-a vein dereven shch in y, or to appear in the field when in the silly head of the rural shepherd amplifies at - mortars black Milan holiya, or as if a falcon on a hand impatient okhotn Ik to give in on priman ku and on a whim of this contemptible person to execute everyones clowns - sky p la sk and. Yes, I do not believe in sorcerers at all though neko-tory great minds adhere to other mn en iya, and I will not concede N ik to joint stock company to ohm to the authority whose judgments will not be coordinated with arguments of reason or do not proceed from B about - hectare. The N and Aristotle, more expert, than I, neither P Lawton, nor Socrates will not convince me of anything if what they tell, is not coordinated with reason. Because reason - only wash lords and to which I voluntarily submit. And then, I know from experience that very often happened so that greater minds receded before bo-leu of N and zmen N ymiy, and falling from big height always with and l N e e. In to about N of c e to about N of c about in, and about c t y in N and highway and about highway and and l and with, about highway and - we batsya by N yn che and we, and N ash and descendants would will be oshi- and t with I p about with l e N and page too. 
The N elzya to adhere to any given mn en iya Lish only because this judgment of the great philosopher. As for exchanges I, I despise those pedants who to the speeches give not are as the proof - gument, and refer on vysk azyvan and I authorities as though these it is uttered iya are more reliable, than Wad Dra - gy arguments. Nevertheless, I could believe also them if provided me philosophy which basic provisions could not be called in question and where everything would be among themselves coordinated. Otherwise, everything that you will want because obych-N about with about about t of N about with I t p r and N of c and p y with in about z z r e N and I am m and, and N e in about z z r e N and I with the principles is possible p ok the Azat. To rum of even if to concede avtorite-that these it is big their husbands even if prizn to at that these principles are formulated by former philosophers, not - obkhodimo to mean also that this ancient, like us, wrote not everything that thought. Very often Zac it y and religion of their countries y p ri N uzhdat them to conform the suzhden iya with interest and requirement p Olya Ti to and. 

181 
That is why I will not believe in sorcerers until do not prove me their existence. 
If who - nibud is able to prove me an ego, the Volga Military District dya more reasonable and serious arguments, than mine, then do not doubt, I will not tell it: "Oh, the monsieur, you the one for whom I waited. I renounce the views and I accept va shi!" Otherwise, to joint stock company the trickster would get the best N а^ the fool if he thought the same that the fool thinks? He has to be able to cope with crowd, pretending at the same time that it concedes to feelings of the majority, dab> not to oppose to general mood. N aprotiv, fit sofas has to make to itself idea of the inhabitant, but not judge to joint stock company the inhabitant. I am not so reckless that, having got rid from the tyrant of AI of foreign authority, neo bosnovanno ustan to avlivat own. That is why I also report the motives which induced me to tell about priv deniye and to get rid of this chimera, it is necessary to turn on a lot of things vn iman iye. 
P to a rezhda of everything, in all stories told mng about sorcerers the fact that their action usually takes place for three - four hundred leagues from given places to Nosta guards. I suspect that similar remoteness of races with the h and t and N and N and t oh, h that y about t and t e l and n and e and v about z m about N about e ™ to make sure of reliability of told. P add is that the band of people disguised as cats, Naha ditsya in the middle of the field where of course there is no N and to joint stock company and x a sva of detel. What belief - nibud one old woman in so unusual incident has to cause under - sight because in rural areas it is simple to swindle k where to joint stock company is lighter. She is poor - the need forced it to lie for the sake of money, she is old - the age stirred up her races - day, over the years she becomes talkative - and here she invents this sk azk at that Zahn yat a conversation of the with the horseman, weakens sight with age - and here she prini-washes a hare for a cat, years do it timid - and here fifty people instead of one came in dream to it. 
Give - we will look at these sorcerers. You will see the rude yokel who lacks mind to untangle me-shayushchy to it thread at which danger size ubi-howls ability to think which cannot justify - sya which will not even dare to answer N in an adlezhashchy way because of fear that the devil tells it a mouth. The N about turns out so that if he does not speak words, then kazh-dy shouts that he is caught by the conscience, and it is thrown immediately into a fire. N about really devil, which prezh 
182 
could turn into a cat, it is so silly what cannot turn him now into a fly to give it the chance ule-aunts? The N oh, are spoken by them the fact is that sorcerers, hardly on - fall in justice hands, at once lose any magical force. Oh, I swear honor! It is charming to - waters. P it oluchatsya that meter and Giyo's N, having bought dolzh-the judge's nost for twenty thousand ECU, acquires also the power over a devil. P to the oistena, the devil has great respect to mosh en N ik am! 
I am t and to e z and m e t and l, ch t about vs e e in t and in about highway l e n and k and s in t r e in m I in t with I to be the N both shch and mi as if Dee ogen y 10. O B Auger! Whether it is possible that the person, and so doomed itself to eternal torment of hell would wish besides zhi t in N ishch you etet, hunger, constantly being afraid to be at the same time erected on a fire on go-the rodsky square in front of all population? That og- 
to take care unfortunate from pra1vosudiya, the Satan had to 
to give it not leaves duba1, and pistoles for purchase a dale - 
zhnost. However you see that still demons okaza-foxes are so silly that could not guess similar cunnings. And for what you condemn the poor shepherd, koto-horns locked up recently and N un e burned Akan? For the fact that he was convicted of as if he said a prayer of "Pater Noster" in relation to a wolf. Ha! P you raise to it that he without game tsa repeats it, see in it a full nonsense, besides more harmless, than carrying amulets and ve-ra in their force for which, however, yet nobody was burned. It to azn and whether, say, also that it, allegedly, okol-gave herd whether having made it whether by means of Zack N of An and y, whether with the help melt N ykh what properties - nibud poisons. I do not think that twenty four letters Alf of Avitus comprise melt N y intention, and harmful properties of poison, at is-p about l z about in and N and and to about t about r about go N e l z I am a N and about t to r y t r t a, n and s and t jaws, N and to set I zy to ohm, can or infect sheep with plague, or cure them of a disease. You object me that it could be made by the contract with a devil. I did not meet in chronology of date when he concluded dogo-the thief with mankind on which when pronouncing op-the redelenny words stipulated in the agreement it has to destroy people and cattle, and when pronouncing - gy to cure Wad Dra. 
Perhaps, you a soglasitel with me that magical words have no N and to joint stock company oh of force, and all wizards, about - iznosya them, actually use poisonous svoyst- 
in
and herbs with which infect the cattle. In that case, 
why not to burn them to joint stock company of poisoners, but not to joint stock company a stake - 
183 
dun? They admit (you object) that they were nl a sabbath and urged demons to seize what bodies - that people who and the truth were obsessed. As for a travel of N and highway abash, I am convinced that the ointments used by them for N atiran iya bodies still v2o 
wakefulness time, to joint stock company of times also cause vi den and I 1 
when by it to it azhtsya as if they take off on a broom through a pipe and arrive there where have to feast, the thane tse in and t, z and N and m and t with I lyu bo in yu and c e l about in and t to about z l and N y y z and d These visions so strongly blew their mind that even so iye details, to joint stock company the broom clamped between legs the field over which they flew, a goat, a feast the ladies dreamed were perceived by them after probuzh a deniye to joint stock company real a thing and. 
As for obsessed, I will express you the opinion with the same frankness. First, ten thousand wives shch occur among them on one man and N of N euzhet a devil so oh razvratn ik what with so it eagerness tries to obtain connection from wives shch and Amy's N? N et, it not so, but I solved the reasons at. en shch and N and - it is more credulous and impudent, than men and, therefore, by the nature more slope of N aya to pretense. It immediately will get a false idea of itself excessively, it needs to achat N to torment itself latyn yu, grimasn to ichat, jump, prin of May razlichn ye shameless poses. To an ogd the deception will be found, they will begin to hope that these whims will be attributed to some suffocation matk and and, N and thin to - not c, will forgive to joint stock company an illness of genitals. You, maybe, object that similar deception has nothing in common with those who are really obsessed. 
Let's stop N and it and, without offending views of an obyv of tel, sk azhy that obsessed existed to joint stock company prezh, and now. I do not doubt at all that they sou strode before because Sacred it is written iye assures that fortune-tellers are haldeyka by means of a magical iskusst va zagn Ali of the demon in a dead body prophet Samuil, and he started talking; Whether David Zack of N is scarlet by means of playing a harp of Sa of an ul who as a result became obsessed, and the savior of N ash, And isus Hristo1s, izgon the yawl of demons from Jews, the shelter yaya them in 
herd of a sva of N to it 3. The N about should think that to joint stock company only God at 
went to the world, the power of a devil stopped. 
That is why I do not trust in obsessed N ash their days and I will not trust until the church orders it - lat. In that case I have to trust in the N repenting gresh obsessed with a devil and to and Goffridi, nuns 

1 84 
from Luden whether the maiden from Evreux highways only because they to uvyrk atsya, grimaced and jumped". To joint stock company! They could talk only on latyn and! N ekotory from - vechal it is even quite convincing, trying - torturing these itself - to repeat f times from the breviary after ek-a zortsist, chi tavsh and m its text with pathos. You see their pretense, listen to their church service and you make sure that, not zn aya vespers, they begin to bawl, hardly catch at "G loria P at ri". 
H I still find that very much zabavn ym, so it is that putani-tsu which occurs at vypoln en AI obsessed those or in ykh p ri to an adhan and y the exorcist. Every time for - to l and N and t e l, p r about and z N about with I with in I shch e N of N about e and m I am a B about and, p about in e l e in and e t to kiss the earth. A devil, N akhodyashch iysya gain inside - my, obeys, and everything looks very piously. To about a gd e p r and to and z and N and e p about in t about r I e t with I, e with to about l to about in and the N y x is expressed to N about N also I x, N eopytn y obsessed, without understanding bogoslovky tone bones, reddens and swears to those sa-a my time, pok and the exorcist will not calm him more pon yatn y-mi words then it continues uveshcheva-ny again. I had to observe also it: in process of that, to joint stock company svya shch en the N and to povysh is scarlet the voice, the devil strengthened with in about y of N e in, p r and e that m with l about in and m about l and n and ch e about N e z N and h and t whether the N about to act with highway owing to that, to joint stock company the exorcist proiz-carried them - at the top of the voice or on the contrary; so to them in the way, for - to a lean of An iye evil spirits directed horror on I am present - shch them, so to joint stock company the exorcist, to richat the charter, gradually pe-rekhodit N and ominous whisper. In reply obsessed or very strongly to ri chat, or from them it was impossible vytyan to utnut N and words even for the whole day. However at - the tvorstvo seemed to me slish a lump rough. And why I am obliged to think that all this obezyanichaniye is made by a devil, at that time to joint stock company of people can make it more skillfully: to be bent by a wheel - I often saw it in 

* Louis Goffridi, the cure of church in the neighborhood of Marsechya, bych is burned as kochdun in 1611, by means of a dyavoch to whom it Was given, he sobchaznich the 16th chetny maiden, his parishioner to an imine emy Madchen de Demandoch - Nuns from Luden, from the monastery Ursulinok in Ludena on which the cure Urben Grandye I spoil a slander also was sentenced to burning in 1634 - Decho Madchena in B ovan, Maidens from Evreux, is put absolutely recent Matyuren P ik are, the cure, and his Helper of Volume B to an uchya by dyavot tried to fascinate this Nun and it podru1 from Luvye, and bp are burned together with it according to the Decision of the parchament of Rouen on August 24, 1647 It decho borrowed • public opinion during five couples - primas avt 


185 
execution of c y gan; to jump - who cannot do it, kro me p shouted ti to ov; to swear - it meets N and to even house of highway Aga. 
If demons, to joint stock company you claim, are capable to do not probable, let they will convince us of it. P lips they pe renenut bash N and cathedral P arizhsk oh B of an ogomatera in Seong - Dae and at the same time will dance the Spanish saraband. Then we and p about beliefs and m. 
They say that a devil uzhasn y the ribald, but it when did not incite obsessed to talk scandal about Wad Dra; friend. N aoborot, they tested mutual uvazheniyezyxwvuts \ 
N e m about of l and p about with t unitary enterprise and t and N and h e, t and to and to p e r in and I e about with to about r l e Nye's N of N arush and la would melt N at. P ochy, the venerable father, your court does not consider those zlodeyan iya which are created by a devil? A devil (you speak) - the father of a lie. Whether P ochy the nanosecond <dn yakh burned the sorcerer and all by highway for the fact that he on was called a devil? P to atom that, I answer, imitating all, a devil - the father of a lie. P rizn aytes, admit, mine to a pra P ODOBNEY Sh I Y THAT the DEVIL TELLS the TRUTH OR the LIE of PS/ 
measure of that, to joint stock company it is necessary for your slyness. N oh, about Auger's B, i I shudder p1ri a type of that, to joint stock company of this devil throw i 
sacred in du 4; really it is so sacred thing, cht ( 
it cannot stand her without horror? I in general am surprised to joint stock company he in that case ventured to put on chelovechesko> weight which the B og created on the similarity, B og, a way ny to see from inaccessible height, uzn ayushch and y the re a benka thanks to acquired by a baptism to a vozrozhda a niya, obozn achayushchiya unction the temple of the Holy Spirit and gifts of wounds iteln itsa of sacred relics. To joint stock company it, a devil, the poem to enter this place, more sacred, than water, over a cat the swarm is just said by several prayers? However at on. the good result is available - I mean the cross, wearable to it, raging a floor at a look obsessed with an extraordinary image. Oh, monsieur exorcist, you bespodob ny1 However whether you know that in the nature there is nothing what would not have a cross, so to joint stock company everything has length and breadth well. So, a cross which you hold, in effect HI a cross, and an ebony; and that, another - not a cross, and sereb ro. Nevertheless, both of them are crosses because in them pe plant louses of N and and highway and ri resekatsya by N and. And so, if gain this my already has hundred thousand lengths and hundred thousand latitudes which are crosses, then why present to him but the Vyya? Nevertheless, we see wives shch and N at which washes prin N y a look when to her lips bring eshch (one cross is puzzled. To joint stock company oh deception! About however many sentence N 

18 
bring down obsessed to it is tested iyu by water, to daily hundred blows by a lash, not to cure it and this is N of an ikogd not pre-to r and ti the CU I. 
It at all not ozn achat that I doubt in mogushche-a stvo of the Creator and not prizn ayu the authority of church, but all 
these I am great iye coldovsk5iye deya N iya the N would azvat foolish 
chatter or with r ed o 1 of those who slish to ohm strongly trust. 
I z and m e h and yu, h t about m about e p and with m about N e with to about l to about z and t I am N of st. about with, however it is really that question which induced me tshch ateln ym in the way to finish this sketch. Du - to May, odn joint stock company oh, that you izvin iteit similar importunity to the person who vowed to be to death yours it on - Korn the eyshy servant, the monsieur. 


STATES I AND M P OF ER AND AND A1 C SOLN. 
(fragments) 

The N of joint stock company he ets, ash the ship pok azatsya by N in gavan and Toulon; having rendered sn achat gratitude to winds and stars for the benefit - a poluchny travel, we embraced and said goodbye. Concerning exchanges I to ap and the thane at did not remain nothing else whether to joint stock company to be content highway with honor to ship the person who fell from the moon as in a lunar mi-re from where I arrived, money is estimated in N ebylitsa. And so, nothing prevented to go to Toulouse to one of mo-their friends. I burned zhelan and I eat it to see, predvk ush aya that joy which will be given to it the story about the p ri to lyuchen also by me x. e I will be N annoying, narrating about what happened to me in p ut; I was tired, had a rest, suffered from thirst, wanted to eat, and I drank and ate directly to joint stock company those twenty or thirty dogs who made rack of my friend. And though I looked shaky - thin and on - blackening from suntan - he nevertheless learned exchanges I. 
From delight it hung on my neck; trembling from ra-dost, kissed more than hundred times and carried away me in the for - became wet where immediately enthusiastic tears gave way slo to you: 
- N of windows ets-that - wax a face of N ut it - we zhi you will also be zhi t, without watching on to joint stock company and e accident, koto-an eye the fate diversifies N ash at zhi zn. N about gods mi-lostiva! Z N of an acha of t, that hearing is incorrect that you burned down in To and N and d e in about gr about m of N about m to about with t r e in m e about those with and z about r e t e N of N y m in and m and the mechanism. Among those who brought me sad news were two or three deserving trust 

I 8 7 
persons - they saw and touched this wooden pt tsu, carried away you, and told that, unfortunately, in! entered inside when brought fire, zyxwvuts and 
speed of rockets, szh gavsh and x all around, podn the yawl птиц^ is high, and attendees lost sight of you. They assure that you burned down, whether and in fallen mash in e vmep <you N ash only raspberries a ky small group of ashes. 
- These ashes, monsieur - I answered it - was about - mekhan a-ism because to inut fire of N to me did not damage. Furs the nizm was attached sn aruzh, a sledstviye of what the heat of highway could disturb me. 
T and to z N and y t e e, h to and to t about l to about with e l and t r and to about N of the h and l and with the carrying power of rockets did not support that any more wave well, and it fell to the ground. I saw, to joint stock company it fell, s was going to fly head over heels together with it, but chre-i was vychayno surprised, having felt that I rise to L \not. Nevertheless it is necessary to explain the reason that all at N the yawl for a miracle. 
In day of the incident I rubbed the deniya of a part of a body hurt at a pas with marrow so when a pier the box rose over clouds, Long and, being N, damage, zhadn about soaked up the substance which impregnated mine flesh, and the body obeyed to it prityazhen iyu. Uverya you, it continued to attract me to gekh a time, on I, N of joint stock company he ets, did not land in that world which at shi N and z y in and yu L t un about yu. 
Then I very in detail told everything circumstances of a travel; The M To Olya of N I to, delighted is heard by N y m, mind about l I I am m l e N of N and p and with and t about with t about l N e about y to N about in e N of N y e things, I long enough opposed, being afraid of visits which, perhaps, will follow later is published iya this work because I love rest. He reproached me carelessness i to its requests. And I, am shamed by N y, N of joint stock company he ets, decided to follow his advice. 
And here I picked up a feather and when he added a notebook, is passionate zhelayushch y my glory (it did not give I eat \rest more, than its own), went to Toulouse \to present this work in most and zysk to An of N ykh a meeting I x. P okhvala of one of the most educated people svo his time made me known. Already the engravers never seeing exchanges I cut out mine to an izobrazha ny; the city of N and each intersection rustled with the become hoarse drinks, Wai's zaza: "Here a portrait of the author "The states and the empires of the Moon "1" Among people, chi tavsh and x I wash kN to a yoke, many ignoramuses who only its Perrelet met 

188 
styval. They applauded, to joint stock company and others, imitating highly educated minds, and were zealous in hlo-a pannier after each word not to be trapped, and in places, to them at all not pon I am ton ykh whether it is joyful vosklitsa-: "To joint stock company aya charm!" But the herd instinct disturbs zdra-vy sense; all of them without maleysh their remorse will prefer to refuse rather reputations of the philosopher (also improper to them, to joint stock company and it is bad ssh ity odezh-yes), than to object the standard opinion. 
Here the medal back in relation to those, a lump \* are sung iramba diff. It appears, the composition which was given it zn achen iye, according to other readers is, no more, than mix of ridiculous stories, a lot of incoherent tales for an ubayukivaniye of children, like "Wasps - Lina of highway to an ura"; it is clear, that the author went crazy. 
The difference of opinion increased glory. Not - 
much vremen2i later hand-written copies were on sale 
from under p ola; and everything, from noblemen in and to the monk and even 
wives shch and N y, bought this composition. Judgments were about that l r and z in l and h N y, and with t r and with t and N and with t about l to about N and to and l and l and s, h t about to azhdy family and all city were divided two groups: lu-N and t I am a N and and N of t and l un and t I am a N. 
Business reached firefights; one morning I saw, to joint stock company to M.'s bedroom To olin a yak and vo3shli nine 
or ten bearded men in lengths of N ykh p latya x also told 
to it: "The monsieur, you know that there is no among us who would not be yours and m an ally, the relative or the friend. Therefore, all shameful, happened to you, casts a shadow and on us. We know from a reliable face that you cover the sorcerer in the lock". 
- To an oldun! - M. To olin I exclaimed to. - Oh, gods! You azovit N to me and mya, and I will give him to yours of hands and. The N about should beware because it can be slander. 
- Monsieur! - interrupted its one of is most honored - ny. - R to an azva is available what - nibud another parla-the cop understanding sorcerers is better than ours? My dear p lemya N of N and to, we will not hold more you in not - popularity: the sorcerer whom we accuse - the author "The states and the empires of the Moon y"; he cannot deny what is the greatest magician in Europe and recognizes it. To joint stock company it rose by Long at? And. nako-not c, tell me what it did on the Moon? 
- That for a question! - another interrupted it. - - He with - biratsya to participate in a sabbath which, perhaps, with was stood there that day; indeed, you see that 
1 8 h 
it had communication with the demon. Whether costs after that having fished - lyatsya to his words as if the devil brought it to this world? So many the moon and travel by air divorced that, between you and mebetween you and mebetween you and me (with these words it bent to his ear), I N ik an ogd did not see the sorcerers who were not dealing with the Moon. 
P a donkey of this good advice they ceased. M To Olya of N I to stunned with their general wild behavior not MOI to say words. Started talking the honored numskull, before being silent: 
- We zn Ai that forces you to be silent; the sorcerer - h e l about in e to, to about t about r about about in y l yu and t e, N about N and h e about N e about y those with, only give it to us in hands and; from it will be complied iya to you everything decently; we, for the love of you, swear our honor to subject it to burning without scandal. 
P a donkey of these words M. To Olya of N I to who was propping up sides to ulak Amy could not restrain; the laughter shaking his body offended visitors much; and to the azhdy paragraph of their solemn speech he answered N only ha - and - and - and and ho-about - about - about; they left strongly indignant, but also the N ye because their shame already on the way to Tu a billiard pocket dissipated is not really shamed. To an ogd they left whether I zatashch and M.'s l To about N I to and in an office, Zac dug a door and sk azat: 
- P ozor! These ambassadors from lengths of N ymiy hair are similar N and comets having a tail; I am afraid that highway mind which they will raise will be more dangerous than a thunder and a lightning to me. About a vineniye ridiculously is also result of their nonsense; and I will not remain in zhi vy from the fact that, seeing, to joint stock company I under zharivatsya who - that will tell as if my judges - fools; then already N and to joint stock company and e arguments in favor of my innocence will not revive exchanges I; my lifeless ashes on will koitsya in a tomb or on a dump. That is why me with about l and z N I e m t y with l about with t and in and t in e that y p r about in and N of c i and l and sh e l e dy the stay; and to die for what I to apelk also do not trust in, silly doubly. 
The m To olin a yak hardly waited for windows a tub iya a t monologue. began to play a trick on my fears; but having put uv that I perceive everything seriously, exclaimed with is pugan N ym a look: 
- Oh, damn! The N ikto will not touch even to kra your clothes, pok and I, my friends, servants and all those, kts respects me, before will not die. nevozmozh but to occupy my house without p ush to and; it it is very favorable raspolozhe and it is well strengthened. N about I not the madman, that bo r about t with I with mind and N y m of r about m about m. 

140 
- It at times is more dangerous, than a thunder heavenly - in about z r and z and l I. 
From now on we told only about priyatn ohm; hunted, made walks, prin imat guests and put vi zi you; but always any entertainment we wasps - tavlyal before it managed to bother us. 
M arkiz To yussan, the neighbor M. To olin I to and, known for the kind acts, usually accompanied us; to prolong N ash and friendly meetings, we proguli-fall from To Olya of N I to and in To yussan and back. These bezobid-ny pleasures made a smaller part of leisure; they could not ityit replacements what finds mind in iskani-yakh and a talk; ash e society involved with N many scientists. We connected reading to a conversation; a conversation with horo-PWM by a table, fishing, hunting or walks; in a word, we enjoyed ourselves and all what is created by the nature for the sake of N ash their pleasures, ogranichi-Wai the last the mind. 
Meanwhile, my popularity, mesh avsh aya to rest, extended on neighboring villages and even goro-ladies of pro-wines of a tion. P odes a pretext to see the señor, the N and the sorcerer wanted to look at everything and. To an ogd I went out of the lock, not only children and wives shch and N y, but also men y that is r and shch and l and s a N and m e N I to and to N and e with t and yu, o with about en N about p and with t about r and z To olin a yak who whether the ave. of cunning, whether on glubo-to whom to ignorance was Zac a la my ty enemy. Under simplicity it in soul concealed rage and vindictiveness, as regards slanders could surpass any Norman, and the love for a slander at it grew in the main passion. He hated the señor because of powerlessness; having started with it a long lawsuit, he was afraid to sweep also in order to avoid it in about z N and m e r and l with I about m e N I would be t e N e f and ts and y 4. The N about p about that m and z m e N and l the intentions or only delayed them, having solved nane-st M.'s blow To Olya of N I to at, using mine and mya; however as it masked the plans, but frequent it on - ezdka to Toulouse caused suspicion. He told one thousand ridiculous stories about my volshebstvo; a voice of this angry person, joining chorus of gawks 
and
  N e in e d, N and in l e to and l p r about to l I am t I N and m oye and m I. 
About me spoke to joint stock company about new Agrippe5; because of about - 
claims of the cure all were incited against me. About it we were warned by the people close to M. To olin to a yak and the marquis; rough customs of it to paradise surprised us and ve-lodged, but I was secretly frightened, deliberating over the most probable consequences of similar delusions. 

1')] 
This fear, undoubtedly, vn was ushat by the good genius, oi clarified reason that I saw an abyss where m e t. wanted stolkn to utnut; but, being content silent to an owl volume, he decided to warn more noticeably. 
In one of the uneasiest nights which ever followed one of - whether p r and I am ton to it x days, a prova day in To Olya of N I to e, I got up from the dawn, and that rasseit, concern, zatuman ivsh her my mind, left in a garden where greens, the flowers and fruits created by people and priro that fascinated soul and vzglya d; immediately I sweep up., Mark Iza, thoughtfully walking alone ps to the big avenue dividing tsvetn ik into two equal hour ti. I was much surprised, having seen him against an obyknova of N iya so wounds about; it forced me to accelerate highway ag, chtob-uzn to at the reason of so early awakening. It to me with sheathed about N epriyatn ykh the dreams tormenting him and having forced shy to rise much earlier usual; he wanted to disperse the harm done by darkness light. I told it and <own alarms, the mesh avsh and x me to sleep. And' the detail did not manage a zlozha of t - we noticed M. To Olya of N I to and, going big highways of an agami along a fence. Still published! about N in about with to l and to N of st.: 
- You see the person who just a feather 
lived the most awful vision capable to stir up to Russ dock. Having dressed N to amzol, I went down to tell a shaft; about it; but you were not in komn to an ata. Then I ran out in a garden, guessing that you here. 
The N the eschastny count really was out of himself. Edv, he calmed down a little, to joint stock company we asked him osvobo to get to from warm weight. 
The B an esedka from a zhasma of N and very opportunely provided us a shelter and a cool; we entered it and neprinuzh denno settled down; To olin the yak continued M: 
- Twice or three times dreamed me mn oh absurd at night: prin imat a dawn for twilight, came in dream as if dear visitor stood between the marquis and me, l> he strong obn was imat. Suddenly appeared black hugely! the many-headed monster wishing to pull out it at us. I even think that it was going to throw the guest in pylav a fire shy nearby; it already shook it on, a flame, but odn6a from girls, similar to the Muse, chtg' 
E vterpy are called, rushed on knees before the guo 
pozhy, begging about rescue (this lady had vn eshn y vi; and attributes which serve N ash as it hudozhn to dl ika; images of the nature). Hardly madam listened to npocv 

19 2 
sluzhan to and, to joint stock company the last with exclamation: "uvp JT O one of my friends!" - Dong Ula under legs of my dear guest brought to a mouth something it seems sarbak An a7 and so that threw it to the sky and by that zashch and ti la from zhes-tokost of a stoglavy monster. I, to joint stock company to me to azhtsya, a dale - go to the mooring to it after, begging not to depart without exchanges I. Then a great number of podgy angels, N azyvavsh and hsya children of a dawn, podn the yawl me to that country to which, kaza-an elk, it departed and where I saw the most ridiculous a thing and. About them I do not undertake rassk to azyvat. 
We long Rush also bring down unitary enterprise, and it sk azat: - I p olagat as if N akhozhus in the Sun and that 
The sun is a m and river. From it zabluzhden iya exchanges I am a log hut - twisted rzhan iye losh Adie, banished a dream; having woken up, I found out that I lie in the bed. 
To M.'s ogd To Olya of N I to Zack it chi l, Mark and z asked: - Monsieur Dirk it and, to joint stock company ov was your dream? - My dream - he answered - the most ordinary 
also it is not remarkable. Since then, to joint stock company I exist, 
I am constantly dreamed peshchery8 and fire. P the reason is simple - 
I and ho l e r and k, i m e l and N x about l and to. 
In youth, in a dream, I easily rose under obla-to avoid rage of crowd of murderers, having pursued - shy exchanges I; after otchy the N of N ykh efforts to me was possible pre-to overcome many obstacles, but always came across - kaya-nibud a wall, and I was unable to get over through it. To an azaelk, I direct directly up and already long I swing Amy's hands in the sky, however still the earth was near; illogically I not oshchu-shchat neither fatigue, nor the weight; to my enemies to - with t and t about h N about y l about l and highway p r about t I am a N ut r at to and, h y with hv and t and t me for a leg and prityan to utnut that to the earth. Since then, to joint stock company I remember myself whether I dream highways similar sn y, for isklyu-cheniy this N eyes. To joint stock company usually long flying, I neskol-to time avoided the persecutors and, N of windows ets, on - lost sight of them. In clean and yark about the lit sky I, incorporeal, flew on N also light is put in order iyu to the palace, izluchav-shy warmly. B ez doubts, I well razli-would chit also another: but, flying in a dream, I drew near edge of a bed and fell down between a bed and a wall; it is frightened - ny, with vytarashch en N ymiy eyes I examined naked and in about t, and z m and z and N of N y y p about e l to about y. In t, m e with e, with about N, N and in about z - a niknoveniye of which, I think, lines of my character affected; it differs from prezhn their dreams Lish in that. that I flew in the sky and did not fall. After all, N ash and 

7-3400	1 () * 
zn An and I about dreams very fog of N y, about much at is gone to build guesses. 
- P rizn I atsya - picked up To yussan - you are right, it is mixture of all those thoughts which dawned on us while we were awake, monsters of N aya a chimera; soyedine-ny vague f An basin y, N eupravlyaemy reason; in that N e m e N e e m y with the h and t and e its m p r e and with p about l of N e N of N about y and with t and N of N about about sense also we consider dreams to joint stock company oracles, predskaza-a future body; sk the Azat on the truth, sn y, it is equal to joint stock company and the Orok of an ula, usually p it I am ton y. Judging by my not outstanding dream, it is not worth a pin for the rest too. Dreamed me as if I very much was sad and everywhere I I about its l r and with - a pike perch a florid explanation of everyones dark zaga-met D and r to about N and, in z y in and yu shch e about to N and m of N about N e at t about l m dock, I will reveal to you briefly their truth N y sense. P in To Olya the N I to e dream an oskolk slish a lump bad sn y, I can assume what in To the yussena will feel better us. 
- So we will go there - the count told - if everything here so disturbs us. 
We decided to go on the same day. I persuaded friends to leave wounds to a sha of exchanges I because I was glad to a case pe-to repravit there a little to N and. They agreed and sra-the storage after a breakfast and started at way. 
I those m in r e m e N e m at p and to about in y in and l to N and and, to about t about r y x, to and to me to an azaelk, did not get in library K of a yussan, loaded them N and a mule and left about three hours N and a quick trotter. However the library demanded prismot-ra, at the same time there was a wish to admire the surrounding nature, and I had to go pesh to ohm. P atom about - and z about highway of l about z and and in N about e p r and to l yu h e N and e. 
P reodolev four leagues, I came to be in the area, to - tory, undoubtedly, was to me zn joint stock company of ohm. This landscape concerned imagination; I am a N ap rya p amya t and remembered that this area dreamed me last night. P odobny coincidence Zahn would imat for a long time exchanges I if not strange vision. P an osreda are expensive on - the ghost (on krayn to it to a measure I it prin the yawl for that am kovy) was and seized my horse by an occasion. He was ogrom-a leg of growth and N elzya to understand - is beautiful or ugly, so to joint stock company the long dress sewed from rolls for a church p en and I hid its figure; the face was hidden behind a leaf with inscription "In N to an Achala..." 9. 
- Devil! Satan! - the ghost with horror - whether Zac of N ayu you a name of almighty B of RSA exclaimed... 

1 94 
N and these words he zapn ulsya, in embarrassment repeating: "Almighty B of RSA" - he in vain looked for the pastor that that podsk azat to it continuation; from a fright it strongly began to tremble why a half of teeth dropped out, and pain - a shinstvo uk ry vavsh and x its countries its were curtailed in papil-Quality Department and. Nevertheless he addressed to mn e; in his empty eyes I noticed doubt: it not zn is scarlet, to become angry or reduce zap is scarlet: 
- The N at well - sk was azat by it. - Whether Z joint stock company of N ayu you ime-the B of RSA and monsieur Zh of An of ohms is mute - do not prevent me to act; e with l and t y highway e in e l N e highway N about go y and l and r at to about y, h e r t in about z m and, I those I r and with p about t r about highway at. 
I tried to pull out at it an occasion whether but raspirav-highway y exchanges I laughter of highway is scarlet forces. At this time near polusot-countrymen seemed because of a fence - costing on to olen I x, it and, N adryvayas, sang L and that N and yu 10. Four most siln ykh men came nearer, and, having washed hands and in to ropiln to an itsa who was held by the servant from to - 
ma the pastor, they seized me by a collar. Here zh1e1 giving to drink - 
in and l of m with I about N with e N about r and N, about N with about r in and l with in about yu e p and t r and x and l and it 
with in I z and m l e N I p about r at to and m and N about and m; p about that highway m at m of N and I am t about l p and wives shch and N and children, without watching N and my protests, zash and la me-nya in a huge cloth - dexterously turned, hardly vidne-las the head! In such look also incurred to Toulouse. One kri-chat that, not svya zhi they exchanges I, I would fill with damage on fields, and all would be expected by hunger; another complained of sheep smallpox which N fell down N and a flock after one wax - resny evening when I slapped it it can do. N about nesmot-rya on these a zlok lyuchen iya, one circumstance brought me to laughter - to ri to young to restyan to and, to ri to, full of horror for the wives and ha (it he in an image of a ghost from - nyal at me sk joint stock company un and, took seat on it and already to joint stock company of the at - shporivat very much): 
- N eschastn y - it is shrill to the mooring its cart - lyublenny - really you went blind? R to an azva you do not see that a horse the sorcerer and is more black than coal? Same the devil, koto-ry will carry away you N and highway abash. 
The m uzhchin and in horror fell down from a horse and that at once 
mustache to and to and l and. 
About N and p about with about in e t about in and l and with and r e sh and l and v z I am t m of st. and; r and with p about t r about - sewed a bale and Quality Departments dug the first sprained book - "F to an Izik" D EC and r that 12; having noticed circles which this fi-losof noted dvizhen iye everyone the plan of an eta, all in one го3rd 
the Leningrad Region with z and about r and l and, h t about e t and m I to about y in y z y in and e t with I In e l z e in at l 1. 
Derzhavsh and y to N to a yoke with a fright threw out it; unfortunately, 
7 * 
Q5 
p ady, it revealed on the countries to an itsa, razjyasn yayushch to it properties magn and that; exactly here was pok an adhan about dvizhe-ny to magn to an it become shallow highway and x metal bodies, izobra-wives of N ykh in the form of hands. Z ametiv it, one of contemptible for - about x and l, z and I v and v, ch t about e t about and m e N of N about t and and and, about N and r e N of N and I in 
scoop e 4v to it yush N e it to uzen and, because of which his horse 
sdokhla1. P donkey of these words even the most impatient 
put hands and N and a breast or thrust them in to Armand y. Monsignor Zh and N hysterically warned about danger and did not advise prik to asatsya to what - nibud supposedly all these to N and gi - magical, and a mule - a devil. The crowd was frightened and left a mule alone. Odn Acre I saw, to JSC M of an atyurin, sluzhan to and monsieur cure, gn is scarlet an animal to a house shed svya-shch en N and to and, being afraid, to joint stock company it would not come N and the cemetery and N e about with to in e r N and l about m about and l y. 
At seven o'clock in the evening we arrived in the city and me for - t and shch and l and v t yu r m at. To and to t about l to about t yu r e m shch and to r about with and m l e N I in this mrachn uyu a cave, I sk azat: 
- If you give this cover from to am to N I in quality p l and t I, t about d and about N and with l and highway to about m of highway and r about to and; e with l and e that m about and l and, it slish to ohm uzk and. Here it is possible to consider only but - chi; from pya ti feelings at exchanges I will remain two, sense of smell and osyazan iye: one to inhale prison zlovon iya, another that shch unitary enterprise to at it. P ri zn to atsya, I thought that I am in an underworld, not zn is ouch reliable that N evin ovn ykh do not let there. 
N and the word "N evin ovn y" mine tyuremshch and to raskhokho-tals I: 
- To lyanus honor, you from N ash and x people. Guilty do not get here! 
P a donkey of it to omplimen that the softie quickly me about highway and r and l. E go with t and r and N and I y l and N and p r and with N y, t and to and to p r and a meeting with a ghost I thrust gold into highway the thane y: and likewise, to joint stock company I nearly died of fear, he nearly died of a grief, nothing not N aydya during the search. 
- And! Devil take it! - with foam at a mouth exclaimed prisons - shch and to - I from the N of an achal pon the yawl that it is the sorcerer! The B is uniform, to joint stock company a devil! Ladn oh, think till tomorrow of the conscience. 
It z and r I would be c and l with in I z to about y to l yu h e y, about t y with to and in and I am a N at N y y about my t to amer. Ely to cajole him, I is quick vyta-shch and l tr and p and with t about l I and with to and z and l: 
- Mister p ri vratn and to, here one pistole; I did not eat eleven hours, I beg to bring a piece of bread. 

196 
It it is polite p ri N I l a coin and assured that sochuvst-vut to my distress. I pon the yawl - am gray - his dets was softened - and continued: 
- And here one more for trouble which caused you. 
It was all vn and Mang and e; transferring the third coin, I begged to send whom - nibud from his assistants for kompan to AI - Zac Lyuchen N ye most of all are afraid odino-h e with TV and. 
R astrogan N y my generosity, the jailer promised to grant requests, to ritik an oval existing for - a game y, assuring that at once pon I am l - at exchanges I am enemies, N of N about I e p r e m e N of N about in about with with that N about in l yu with in yu h e with t, about N e h e r e z three dn I will wash mine Mang Zhetk and. I is very warm on - thanked him for courtesy; having snuggled me in to embrace - I x, the new friend locked a door of N and two bolts. 
In deep Milan holiya I lay on a heap small solo we on which ran to a rysa. With - oruzhena from six tombstones as if in N azidan iye about with m e r t and and h t about y I would be a N e with about m of N e in and l with I in with in about I would eat the arch, walls and a ceiling p about r e e with N and and. Whether cold p to and e worms and toads crept on my person, 
Don imal vsh and. I think, was not enough for me li5sh wives y and 
broken gorsh to and to resemble on And about in and 1. 
In two hours a gnash of a big key and la zg for - vapors of a door distracted me from these sad thoughts. P ri light of lamas p y I noticed mighty men at. It on - put a bowl between legs and sk azat: 
- Hey, there, do not grieve, here soup from to an apusta. They say, and z N e go N e in y l about v and l and n and k and p e l k and zh and r and. 
He put the hand in a bowl, p ri glash aya and me to make the same. I followed its example, not - bark to irritate the merry fellow. Laughing, it vosklikn st.: 
- You quite good guy! They say, at you is zavist-nicknames? P redatel! P lips will only come! 
Seeing this naiveté, I hardly constrained laughter. The destiny, to azhtsya, give la acting through this contemptible an opportunity to be released therefore it was important not to lose him horoshe-go arrangements to mn e. It was not necessary to choose - arkhitek Torahs, stroivsh y prison, Dov made a little vkho- and forgot to punch at least one exit. All these soobra-e N and I z and with t and v and l and m e N I p r about in e r and t t yu r e m shch and to and: 
- You are poor, my friend, isn't that so? - Alas, monsieur - the yokel noted. - Hold - sk I azat, is a pistole. 
197 
I enclosed a pistole in a palm - it so shivered that it is hardly her Zac Ry of l. Such beginning seemed to me bad p redzn amine ovan and I eat; but p y lx and e thanks convince - whether - the yokel trembled with joy; then I continued: 
- If you helped me to carry out one plan, then 20 pistoles (besides rescue of soul) would be a naver of N I to and yours. Z the N ouch, for a quarter of hour before your arrival pe-redo me appeared an angel and promised to report the truth about my business whether highway tomorrow I would serve a mass behind a big altar in city cathedral. I explained that I cannot in y y t and, to N about about N p about about e shch and l p r and with l and t h e r e z t yu r e in m shch and to and h e in l about - a century which will be accompanied exchanges by me. It has enough p ri to an az to lead me to church and back to prison; he has to obey without objections under fear not - otvratimy and fast death; his possible doubt I will disseminate p it I ton ymiy to it zn joint stock company am and because he is a fellow - the monk. 
For the reader I will report: through a hole of a shirt of the yokel Maun Ash esky clothes flashed. It - that also induced me-nya to an invention: 
- To onechno, my kind señor - sk he azat - I will execute will of an angel. The N about should wait for nine hours, at this time the N ash the owner will be in Toulouse a N and the son's engagement with the executioner's daughter. They say, given to the daughter will drop down for vyk UPA of the king, be taken prisoner it. N of joint stock company he ets, she kra-Siwa, but the poor young man will get neither that, nor another. Alas, my kind master, it is necessary that you zn Ali... 
N and e that m m e with t e I p r e r in and l p about t about to about t l about in N and. M y t shch and - telno considered the action plan, and the yokel said goodbye. 
N and the next day in N azn achen N y hour it prishele for me. I dressed up in tatters - about it we dogo-in about r and l and s as N and to and N at N e. To and to t about l to about m y about to and z and l and with N and in about l e, I counted to it the promised twenty pistoles. He watched N and their N with greed and surprise. 
- To lyanus, they are golden and heavy. - E, monsieur - he answered - not I think of it. 
The house of the senior Mase is sold together with the earth and wines ogradn by Ik. I to would upit it for twenty f of wounds of k; for execution of the transaction of N uzhn and week. My kind master, I want to ask if there is on that yours and in - la, to make so that before transaction the senior 
Mase kept yours and pistoles in the s1u6nduke, not prevra- 
they titsya there in oak l and with tya. 
The N an aivnost of it mosh en N and to and was made laugh exchanges by me. Aude - N and to about in with to about r e m y p r and highway of l and to c e r to in and. H e r e z e to about that r about e time the solemn mass began N; having seen that wash 

1 98 
okhran the N ik rose from the place to make pozhertvova-a niya, I in three p ry zhk and jumped out N and the middle of the temple, and then quickly got lost in the distant small street. In this mo-the cop I was overwhelmed by different thoughts, and I followed odes - ache: to reach Toulouse to which there was a half-league and to locate there. Soon enough I reached the suburb; m e N I with m at shch and l and p r and with t and l N y e in z of l I d y p r about ho and x. P r and - ceremonious their surprises my N aryad because in vop-dews of N ishch eta I was ignorant served, the bearing and gait were not combined with clothes, I looked in tatters of the countries - but, resembling N and masked more, than the poor. 
N of windows ets, I overcame shame, pon imy that general vn iman iye threatened with dangerous consequences. Having noticed whose - nibud a look, I immediately gave a hand, begging about mercy. N about to joint stock company it is frequent instead of following cautions of Destiny, we ignore them, razdra-zhy this arrogant woman! Led me to such conclusion on - the event following it; having noticed the person standing to me a back, on clothes of the citizen of an average to - a statka, I address it: 
- The monsieur, if the compassion can touch... N e I managed to pronounce the following word, to joint stock company this che- 
lovek turned the head. Holy Christ! It was my jailer. M y y l and p about t r I with e N y in with t r e h e y. About N p about and r and m l e N I am hl and z and - mi; I attentively watched N and him. N of joint stock company it ets, the general in-those r e with, ho t I and with l and highway to about m r and z l and h N y y, in y in e l of N and with and z about c e p e - N en and I. 
- And, what I unfortunate - cried the jailer - 
really I was spent? 
This exclamation guided me N and the thought to use cunning: - Hey! N and the help, misters, to the aid of justice! - 
I shouted, passing N and squeal. - This thief stole Wad Dra - gotsennost the count of an ina de Mousso; I look for him year. State - sweat - I continued, being more and more excited - hundred pistoles to the one who will arrest it! 
Hardly I sk azat it, to joint stock company the rack of villains snatched N and t yu r e m shch and to and. And z mind of l e n and e, v y z in and N of N about e in m about e y h r e z in y - tea impudence, so it struck that long time it was in a state of shock because I could not, like the deity escape, having got through walls of prison, N e r and z r ush and in and x. N and to about N e c, N e with the h and with t of N y y about p about m of N and l with I and, Wishing to undeceive crowd, prin yalsya ubezh-to give all that he is very dear person. However dozen of dealers greens, footmen and porters, - layushch them to do a favor for my money, Zac dug to him a mouth, 

19 9 
having given on teeth; besides they imagined that pla-y it will be equivalent to insults - to azhdy ran up to kick it or a hand. 
- P examine on dear person! - zloslo-twisted this crowd. - And he dares to speak so after that, to joint stock company was identified by mister who caught it! 
The most amusing was the fact that the jailer dressed on - festive, was ashamed prizn to atsya that the m p and l and and and in about z in r and shch and e t with I with p about m about l in is h with in and that to and, about p and with and I with to be beaten even more if learn about it. 
Having run away into the heat of a fight and having provided Spa - Senja to legs, soon I found freedom. N oh, unfortunately, the eyes turned in my party caused former concerns again. Any of gapers and could allocate me from crowd of beggars, appear, that at me on a forehead napisa-but - here the run-away prisoner. To an ogd of people took out a hand from a coat, it was represented by the sergeant, sobirav-we shitsya me to arrest. Even ravn odushn ye passersby, I convinced myself, pretend to be, and are ready to snatch for me behind. To an ogd saw the dealer entering a bench, was struck for fear: "It will unhook alebar-du now!" In populous quarter I thought: "Here I under - am steregat!" Having met an obstacle in a way, razmysh la of l: "Blocked streets, surround!" The N of windows ets, fear absolutely paralyzed my mind? to the azhdy person saw arrows - a lump; any word - "you hold", and maleysh y noise - not - about those r p and m y l m I z about m z Aso in in t yu r m y. 
And z m at the h e N of N y y p and N and h e with k and m and s t r and x and m and, I r e highway and l p about p r about - highway the Ainu to ichat to cross the city rest without suspicions; but for fear to be uzn An of N ym on a voice, on - chat to represent mute. I pok azyvat a finger under podbo-a rodok, then it is necessary a mouth and, yawning, opened it with nechleno-a separate sound, giving pon yat that unfortunate about - sit alms. I was sympathetically patted it can do, put in a bread crust fist; I hear it is scarlet, to joint stock company of wives - shch and N y highways eptatsya supposedly probably, I am a martyr for belief from Turkey. To me the truth opened that the N ishch the et is a kN of a yoke which teaches us to customs of the people better, than opi-Sanya of all great travel To an olumb and M of an agellan. 
Mine vydumk and could be come to a bad end. The N about to oh of other cunning to resort to joint stock company? The sucker dressed in zhalk and e - motya, to JSC Arlekin, I nevertheless was not sure that Uda - stsya to make the way N euzn An of N ym on such big goro-du, to JSC Toulouse because on an engraving with a portrait me bonds - N any dealer is scarlet. 
Ludovico - Maria Sinistrari About a demonialiteta and a bestialiteta 
inkub and succubuses 
The I head. P the roiskhozhdeniye of a word "demonialitt" 
(demonolozhestvo). Than this crime 
differs from "bestialitet" (skotolozhestvo). 
M neny St. Thomas Aquinas 
P e r in y y and in t about r, to about t about r y y, N and with to about l to about I z the N and yu, and z about br ate 
the word "demonialitt", there was Juan To aramyue l1 in the • The main divinity", and the N ik that to it, to joint stock company to me - zhetsyag did not distinguish this crime from "bestialite-that". Really, all theologians are moralists from St. my Fo-at the head understand as the name bestiali-a theta "any carnal intercourses of the person with - 
kim-nibud object of other sort ili2 look"; it on - 
long it is expressed iye St. F ohms. To ae the thane in the tolko- 
vaniya on this matter ranks the intercourses with dyavo-scrap as a sort of "bestialitet". 
However it is known that St. F ohms, mentioning this vop-grew, had no owing to the intercourse with a devil at all. R az - the dialect about a sin against the nature, "when happens sno-a sheniye to an object of other sort that is called "besti-alitt", assumes under this N azvan iy a being of other look and a sort, than people; therefore it not mo-zht here to use a word an object or a subject in about - shchy sense". Wanted to define St. F ohms snoshe-a niya of the person with zhi a vy object of other sort here, i.e. with zhivotn ymiy, and did not think of the intercourse with a devil at all. 
And so, sn oshen iya with a devil - demonialitt, be it inkub or the succubus, differ from the bestialitet and do not represent what - or a special type of it on - sledny, to joint stock company To ae the thane as whatever ancient writers and To aramyuel told, sins p r about ti in p r and r about dy about the h e to N r and z l and h N y mistakenly thinks. 
This doctrine and opposite opinion were osuzh-dena dad Alexander unitary enterprise 3 because each of these sins has the special ungodliness opposite to chastity and interferes with reproduction of a sort che-lovechesky. The m ozhno to refer for enough izvest-Nov the doctrine of moralists established on "Cathedral of Thirty" and "A meeting of the H etyrn adtsat", recognized by theologians that on a confession it is enough to tell about circumstances which will define a sin sort. 
If demonialitt and bestialitt - the same, though special type of, then repenting enough, the EU - 

203 
whether it had the intercourse with a devil, sk the Azat to du - a hovnik - "I sined the bestialitet". 
N about it a lie in, because these two sins not odina-a kovy sort. 
About e in t y in t, with to and at t, h t about about with t of t about I e in l with t in and with N about highway e in N and I with a devil dolzhn y Quality Department to be dug m to the confessor because of wasps - a korbleniye which they put religions; deystvitel-but, this insult comes whether that will be from poklo-N en iya, turned to a devil, or from the victims and a pier - N y, addressed to it, or from the contract signed with it (St. F ohms, question 90). To N oh, to joint stock company it will be visible vpos-to a ledstviya, there are inkuba and succubuses to whom nothing from this concerns. 
To rum of that, on p ri zn An and yu all theologians - morals - st, the sin of the intercourses with a devil is much heavier, than similar Dejan Iye, made with what - nibud in live ton y in m. 
The N oh, in the same special sort of a sin, one sin cannot be more tya m zhela, than another, but all odi-nakovo tya zhela: the same - to have the intercourse from wasps - l and c e y, with with about and to about y, and l and with to about y l and c e y. 

I I of l and in ampere-second of N about highway e N and I with and N to at and m and and with uk to ub and m and 
there is no fruit is imagined iya, but deystviteln an awn, 
to joint stock company testifies the N y Augustine is blessed 
Having defined distinction of words "demonialitt" and "besti- 
alitt" that it was possible to estimate all weight of this crime and to define N of joint stock company an adhan and e which it deserves (that for us the most important), we should investigate, sk olk and mi razl chn y mi in the ways this sin can be made because the devil, in the form of an inkub or the succubus, unites not only with chelove-to about m, N about t and to e with and in about t of N y m and. P about m of N e N and yu N e to about t about r y x authors, all this not other that, to joint stock company a fruit of the upset imagination. P odobny things, they say, meet - sya in stories about to oldun ah; at N avazhden AI a devil people think that are present at night gatherings and have the carnal intercourse with a devil; actually they imagine all this, to joint stock company that also was ustanovle-but two cathedrals. 
To an olduna and the sorcerer really prisutstvu-yut N and N ochn ykh gatherings also have plotsk iye snoshe-N iya with dya an ox. It mn en iye theologians and to atoliche-sky lawyers, "Compendium which is extensively stated in 

204 
M aleficarum" and whether "List of witches" F ranchesko-M aria of ua c of c of the lake. 
ets to resolve this issue, we have a N of windows av-toritt blessed Augustine who said so ("About a hail of B ozhiy" To N.15, Chapter 23): "Very much rasprostrane-N about m of N e n and e, ch that with and l in and N y and f and in N y, about y to N about in e N of N about N and z y - in and e m y e and N to at and m and, h and with t about e with p about to about I t e N shch and N E with t t and to - devils whom Gauls of N azyvat Duzi I mi koto-ry indulge and m dirty sn Osh en in iya. It zasvi-detelstvovano and m and numerous the authority - mi that would be impudence them wipe c to at" 4. Are that on - lengths of N ye it is expressed iya bl. Augustine. 

The III head. Attitudes towards a devil of sorcerers and 
sorcerers and ceremonies at their dedication 
R azl chn ye authors teach us, and them mn en iya podtver- 
zhdatsya by numerous examples that the devil has two ways of the intercourses from men of Amy and wives shch in and - mi. P ervy concerns sorcerers and the sorcerer y, another - men and wives shch and the N alien to sorcery.5 
In the first case, the devil unites with Amy's sorcerer and to oldun ya mi only after the solemn contract by which these unfortunate human beings indulge in it. N ekotory authors give judicial 
p ri z6n An and I to oldun y, am pulled out by N ye at N and x in time py- 
that to. 
These stories are collected F ranchesko-by M the aria Guazzo. Such contract is followed by 11 ceremonies. First, examinees dolzhn y Zac to lyuchit the contract 
with a devil or with the sorcerer acting from it ime-to which it and, in the presence of witnesses, a post - N sing and service. Devil, in return, garantiru-et to them honor, riches and N aslazhden iya. 
Secondly, they recede from Catholic belief, wasps - vobozhdatsya from poslush by An iya in B of regional public institution, Quality Department azyvy s from Christ and zashch and you are B ozhy M of an atera and all sacred C of ER - to vi. 
Thirdly, they reject from themselves a wreath or beads of B ozhy atera M, a rope St. F wounds of c and sk and Assisi, or a belt bl. Augustine, N ap lechn and to an armelitok - depending on that, to joint stock company to ohm to an award they prin adlezhat; a cross, an incense to and and everything that carry svya shch en N and to and, they top chutnut agami N. 

205 
Fourthly, they to la of N utsyanutsya to a devil in obedience and povin the aries of AI, express it respect and humility, having put a hand of N and special black to N and gu. They obyazyva-yu t with I of N and to about d and N e in about z in r and shch and t with I to in e r e Hr and with t about in about y, N e to arrive on divine precepts, not to do - to joint stock company oho a good deed, but to obey one devil and p r and l e N about p about with e shch and t N about h N y e with about r and N and I. 
Fifthly, they promise to care and use all efforts whether to enlist on service to a devil of other c. 
Sixthly, the devil gives them something in a sort impious to reshch en iya, zastavlya I their Quality Department to azatsya from the godfather and mother and from to it f and rmats and, N azn achy by it others vos-priyemn ik to which charges to train them in sorcery art; whether they atsya by highway names and which had, and receive new, thickets e all a clownish nickname. 
Seventhly, they cut off a part of the clothes to offer it to a devil in zn joint stock company is honored iya, and he carries away it also with about hr and N I e t. 
Eighthly, the devil draws N and the earth a circle and hold - howls in it examinees that Zac to repit everything to la of a tva which they give, to joint stock company sk an adhan about vysh e. 
Ninthly, they ask from a devil vycherkn to utnut them from to N Christ's yoke and to enter them in the. Then that Part e r is N and I to N and and, to about t about r about y about N and p r and t r and and in and l and with whether to about a gd and zjya vlya the humility, and the devil brings them and m e N and svo and m to about of t e m there. 
In - the tenth, they promise a devil to sacrifice opre-divided time - to azhdy pyatn to adtsat days or, on exchanges to a shy measure, to an azhda y month to commit what murder - nibud the child or to create to soul terrible sorcery and to weekly make other deeds of evil to the detriment of mankind, namely: on heats, storms, epidemics, etc. 
In - one N adtsaty, the devil marks their what - nibud zn an eye and in particular those which hardness to it on - a dozritelna. However, this zn joint stock company not always one for-we and look: sometimes this image of darlings of c and, paws of a toad, spider and, raspberries of a ky doggie, squirrel. It puts zn joint stock company and on more sk the dug parts of a body, N an aprimer, under centuries, on lips, shoulders or somewhere in other place. P to echat this is not nothing and N ym, to joint stock company zn joint stock company of ohms of a claw of a devil. To about d and vs e e t about with about in e r highway e N oh, of t oh, with about of l and with N about N and with t and in l e N and I am m of those which trained examinees, these last that - the dock the Azat the final address, is promised 

206 
to despise evkharistiyu7 and especially the Maiden M the aria, top t and t N about and m and and p about N about with and t with in I shch e N of N y e and z about r and e n and ya, k r e with t and r e l and to in and and; N and to about d and N e uch and with t in about in and t p r and with about in e r highway e N and and sacraments not to execute svyashch en N ykh ceremonies, unless roofing felt - to for fortunetelling; not pok to azyvat and hide the otno-Shen iya with a devil. In return, the devil undertakes to azyvat ok him always quick help; to execute them zhelan iya N and this light and to make them happy later with m e r ti. 

The IV head. The tricks used by a devil 
to get to itself a body 
Can ask, to and to a devil who has no mother - 
and l N about about t e l and, m about e t and m e t with N about highway e N and e? The N and e t about m about N about to answer that it sometimes borrows a human corpse or forms to itself a body in other ways. If wives shch and the N e comes f An a basin I to become pregnant from a devil (that whether there can be highway from her consent and on her - Lang Iyu), then the devil turns previously into wives shch in at (succubus) and unites from men oh, or causes in men y what - nibud voluptuous sno-vision during which abducts at it sperm and transfers it to a bosom of wives shch and N y as generates zacha-tiye. So Guazzo claims, bringing for podkreple- 
N iya the mn en iya lot of exiles i8 primechan y, zaim- 
stvovanny at a razla chn ykh Wuchang y x. 
And the nogda a devil, in the form of an inkub or the succubus, soyedi-nyatsya from men oh or from wives shch and N oh, not ok azyvayushch and - mi to it special respect and not prin osyashch by them to it the victims which he ordinary demands from sorcerers and the sorcerer y, to joint stock company it was sk an adhan about vysh e. This is just passionate lover who does not have other purpose except possession of the person whom he loves. The N and it is the mass of examples at razn ykh authors and, by the way, the story about M to an elippa Luts and and which, after that to and to long vre-mya zhi l from one wives shch and the N oh, wished N and it wives to itsyaitsya, but N of EC y the philosopher who was present at a wedding p-ru sk azat M to an elipp that he dealt with kompuzy, i.e. with the she-devil - sukkuby - and the bride immediately with groan 
unitary enterprise and l and in about m about r about to. 9 
e to t about r B about e t and at with r and with with to and z y in and e t of t and to e with l uch and y, p r about and with - 
going with one young man whom pose-shch it is scarlet throughout several months, despite densely Zac the dug doors and ok N and to omn ata, the she-devil - a bough - 

207 
cube of captivating beauty; caress and, kisses, embraces, entreaties - started up everything it and in the course to incline it to a sin, but could not defeat the virtuous young man however. 

The V head. Inkuba attack 
not only on women 
M about N about p r and in e with ti m of N about e with TV about p r and m e r about in about e N shch and N and x, 
tempted by a devil - inkuby which at first also opposed he is experienced iyu, but were inclined on his requests, tears and caress soon and; this is the mad lover, koto-rum should concede. And the nogda it happened at what means - nibud the magician whom the devil used to and to the intermediary, but quite often, however, he acted itself, to joint stock company it describes Guazzo. The devil with - edinyatsya not only from wives shch and Amy's N, but also with a mare mi; if they concede it zhelan iyu, it showers them for - boats and Amy's caress: braids a mane in braids which cannot be untwined then; but if they soprotivlya-yutsyatsya, he breaks them, awards sapy, harms them vsyache-sk and eventually kills them, to and to it the m is proved about and z to N e by N of N y in m about p y that. 

The VI head. Spirits of "folleta" which are not afraid 
spells 
Thing wonderful and nearly a N the Japanese yatn aya are inkuba, 
which N azyvat in F wounds of a tion and in And a waist and folleta-mi, and in And span AI - duendes whether also which will obey Zac to N of hotel of m, whether Zac N of An and y fear and, at at a blizheniye svyashch en N ykh objects, not vyk azyvat N and the slightest fright contrary to devils, mu-chayushch to them frenzied because to joint stock company these evil spirits are persistent whether to and to are stubborn in the unwillingness povi-to novatsya to commands Zac in N of hotel, prikazyvayushch his wasps - to tavit a body obsessed - enough, however, proiz-to bear P resvyaty Both m I And an isusa or Maidens M of the aria, or several verses the Sacred P ison iya whether to assign re-to vi and, glavn ym in the way, a particle of a tree of the Saint To the rest and whether to bring closer svyashch en N ye images that - immediately would hear to at, to and to they will begin to roar a mouth besnova-that, and to see a gnash of his teeth, nervousness, a shiver - a word, all p ri zn joint stock company and fear. The N about N and follt nothing similar has N ik joint stock company oho vliyan iye: if they and pre-krashchat the prosecutions, then only after dolgogs 

208 
\time and when that z akho tya t. To 10 It I witnessed ^лично and I will tell one improbable Real ri yu. 

The VII head. And N teresn aya history 
si N o r y Both ER about N and m y 
About twenty five years of N the Azat when I was about - 
divinity fessor in the monastery St. To the rest in P aviya, in this city zhi la highly moral zamuzhn I I wives shch in and about which all who her zn are scarlet, and, the main thing about - at once monks told only good. She was called Also eronimy; it zhi la in arrival St. M of an ikhail. Odnazh-dy this wives shch and N and kneaded bread which charged then to bake to the holder of the public furnace. It brought it finished bread and big lepesh ku very strange for-we, made of the Venetian test and zamesh An of N uyu on oil, like pie. 
It azyvatsya to take Quality Department this flat cake, saying that not 
did nothing similar. 
"The N oh - answered the holder Arn baked and - at me se-godnya, except yours, there was no other bread. Take this lepesh ku; possibly, at you bad pamya t". By B of an uducha it is convinced, kind wives shch and N and p ri N I am la flat cake and ate it with the husband, the three-year-old daughter and sluzhan which. In a trace - yushchy night when they with the husband fell asleep, it suddenly about - snutsya from a sound and, similar to silent by N ezhn y whistle which whispered to it on an ear very much vn yatn about: Whether "The B yl is tasty pie?" And spugan N aya wives shch and N and N of an achal to dawn on itself a sign of the cross and to call names I of an isus and the Maiden M and r and and. 
"N e be afraid of nothing - said a voice - I do not want to you the evil; I am ready N and everything whether highway to you pon to ravitsya; I p l e N e N of TV about e y to r and with about t about y, and m about e with and m about e about l highway about e e in l and N and e - to enjoy your embraces". At the same time she felt that who - that kissed her in shch to an ek, but is so easy and gentle, the down of the thinnest cotton wool touched joint stock company as if to it. It resisted, nothing not otve-h and I and about r and n and ch and v and I with m of N about about to r and t of N y m p about in that r e N and e m with in I - shchenny names and the Godfather zn amine iy. The temptation prodol-pressed close about half an hour, then the tempter left. Ut-rum of wives shch and N and posh la to the confessor, the person sedate and clever which supported her in belief and Convinced to continue courageous resistance, Pozo in e that in and in z and p and with t and with N e with to about l k and m and s in I t y m and r e l and to in and I am m and. 

2 0 e) 
In the next nights repeated same iskushe-n and ya, s kisses, the N ye wives of tires oh is firmly sustained. Tired with these tyagostn ymiy and long it is tested by iya, it was solved, on the advice of the dukhovna to and, about r and t and t with I to z and to l and N and t e l I am m, h that y and with p y t and t whether highway she is obsessed with a demon. Z joint stock company of a lean hotels, without having found anything what uk would azyvat N and presence of an evil ghost in Hei, consecrated the house, the bedroom, a bed and enjoined inkub-to end the harassments. N about everything it is vain! And to a sk the sheniye proceeded: the sly fellow pretended that he dies of love, p varnish is scarlet, sighed to soften the woman who, odn Acre, on favor of B ozhy, remained nepo bedimy. Then inkub unfaithfulness silt the so ti to at: it showed sya to the beauty in the form of the young man, extraordinary beauty, with golden curly hair, with a white chicken the beard casting gold, with the gray green eyes, hair similar I blossom ln and, and to add is fascinated iya, in clothes izyashchn oho the Spaniard. It did not cease pok to azyvatsya by it, at least it and find - las in society; it, to joint stock company it is done by lovers, a pla to is scarlet, sent it kisses, say, used vsevoz mozhny means prelshch en iya to achieve her UAV of a gosklonnost. She one saw and heard it, for others it remained N evidimy. But kind wives shch and on nevertheless stayed in surprising hardness; nako not c, in several months is enraged by N y inkub at run to other sort of prosecution. At first he stole at it a silver cross with sacred relics and is consecrated - a leg vo1skovogo "P the apsky Innocent person" blessed dad 
P iya V, 1 whom it always carried at itself; then 
the turn of rings and other jewelry, koto-r y e it p about hi shch and l, N e t r about and I z and m to and highway to and t at l came to and. And to about N e he began it to beat N with c cruelly, and after each it slu-tea on her face, hands and a body blow traces were visible! and Xing I to and which remained day, two and suddenly sraz\disappeared, then to joint stock company natural Xing a yak and decrease, gradually. And, at that time, to joint stock company she fed a nogd. a breast the little daughter, he removed the child at it with to a flax and put it on the very brink to rysh and or hid ku yes - nibud, but never the reasons the yawl to it N of ikaky harm. That it overturned upside down all economy, razbi-the shaft gorsh to and, plates and other ware, and a moment restored them in the previous form. One night, when she slept with the husband, inkub was her in svoyet; a usual state and strongly begged her to concede egs 

210 
, to makings; it resisted, to joint stock company always. It removed-> sya enraged, but with huge cargo the fireplace of N ykh tiles with which residents of Genoa and Liguria cover the houses returned soon. And z these kamn to it he constructed such high wall around a bed that it reached bed curtains top, and spouses would have to take lest-Nice to leave it. However, this wall was constructed without lime; destroy it or, and to amn and put in a corner where they remained throughout two days, and z and those m and with the h e z l and. 
In day of St. Stefan the husband invited to them home not - how many friends, brave military, and arranged in honor of the guests paradn y a lunch. At that time, to joint stock company on custom, before that, to joint stock company to sit down at a table, washed hands, the table, dishes, bowls, to ush An ya, all tableware from to ukhn and, all to uvsh and N y, bottles, stak An y suddenly disappeared. P to a redstavta to surprise of guests! Among them there was is-panets, to ap and the thane who exclaimed: "e be afraid of N, this delusion, but, devil take it! There was a table, and it still here. M to an inut terpene iya, and I will find it". Having told it, the man of courage walked about the room with the hands given forward, trying ashch to upat N a table. Certain guests, vi-dya that it finds nothing whether began to laugh and vysh to the hall to leave, to joint stock company suddenly heard strash-ny noise in the dining room. They returned uzn to at the reason and, having run into the dining room, saw the table forced races - koshny ware with to ush An ya mi which earlier not - the Leningrad Region. The wall had a big buffet with crystal, se-r ebr I am N y m and and z about l about you of m and gr and f and N and m and and h and highway and m and, N and p about l - nenny To anarsky, Rhine, Cretan and other wines. In kitchen there was never an abundance razlichn ykh to ush An and y in bowls and N and dishes, before N evidan N ykh. N e-which of guests fluctuated at first to try these to ush An and y, however, encouraged by more courageous whether se-at a table and were accepted to a lunch, which whether N ash pre-voskhodny. To joint stock company only they took seat before a fireplace of ohms on - to the sla of a lunch - everything disappeared at once, and the old table with dishes which were prepared by owners was; but all guests were so full that the N ikto did not want uzhi-to nat, and it proves enough that the changed dishes were real, but are not imagined. 
P the resledovaniye from an inkub proceeded already 
several months when wives shch and N and addressed 1s mo- 
Lithuania to blessed B to an ernardin F eltrsk to ohm, 2 mo- 
Which Russian cabbage soup is based in the St. Yakov's church finding - 
21 1 
sya near the city. She vowed the whole year to carry a gray cassock of Minorists to whose award prin adlezhat the UAV of wives of N y B ern ardin, in hope - to voboditsya by his protection of wasps from prosecutions of an inkub. 
Really, September 28, in Christmas Eve temple prazdn ik and St. The archangel M of an ikhail, it and put on on both that cassock and N and other day posh la in church. B ylo okol of ten hours when the big crowd of N recovered to a mass. N about only chasms yazhk and joined N and a church porch, to joint stock company suddenly her clothes fell N and the earth and disappeared as if une-with e N of N y e in e t r about m, about with t and in and in e e with about in e r highway e N of N about N and uyu. To with the h and - Stew, among crowd was two elderly people, to - tory, having taken away the incident, the hurried sn yat pla-shch and that prik to dig nakedness naschastny, and, having seated her in the carriage, saw off to the house. H concerns clothes, uk-radenny inkuby, it was returned only che-r ez to highway e with t in m e with I in c e century. 
I could tell you many another stories, even more zabavn ykh, but to all there is a limit. 
It is necessary eshch e to add that throughout many years inkub iskusheni-I persistently pursued the victim mi; but, N of joint stock company he ets, having made sure of unsuccessfulness of the efforts, he was forced to leave. 
In the case given vysh e, to and to and in many - gy about which it is necessary sometimes hear Wad Dra to at, inkub did not concern religion, but only chastity. The investigator - but if concede iskush1en iyu, then sin not bezbo- 
zhiy, but evozderzhan also I eat with N. 3 

The VIII head. People born from inkub 
Proved about theologians and philosophers that from the intercourse 
the person with a devil people are born sometimes; and mzyxwvutsrqp 
in the way, to joint stock company many scientists claim, 1 will have to 
to be born An a tikhrist (B ellarmin, With uarets, 5 M of an aluand and 
other). P ri it they notice that, on quite estestven N ym p ri chi N am, the children born from inkub obykno-are venno very high, siln y, are furious, proud and angry. 

The IX head. Inkuba are not spirits, they give rise, 
therefore, have own substance. 
Several words about giants 
However, not the N arush aya is complied also I to and m conducted to and e 
the scientist, I do not understand, to and to their opinion can vyder-reap to ri ti to at. Really, Alexander Makedon- 
''1zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC 2 
sk AI, N an aprimer who, to joint stock company we upomyan Ueli, was born about t and N to at and, y l of m and l e N to about about r about with t and. D and l e e, ho t I am l and c and, z and - chaty under these conditions, ordinary and surpass other people, but not always by perversity, but sometimes also and virtues, even highly moral, N an aprimer. Scipio Af Rick of An sk y, Augustus, the philosopher P Lawton which, according to Tit Li vi I, people of excellent qualities were Sveto-of N iya and Diogenes Laertsky. R avn ym in the way, we find in the Sacred P ison of AI (To N of B y ti I 6.4) that An y is big were rozhde-ny from sn Osh en iya sons of B of RSA with daughters of people; so of l and with I t with l about in and with in I shch e N of N about about t e to with t and. To N about e the t and in e l and to and N y y - whether people of big growth, to joint stock company is told by the prophet Varukh (3, 26), and in many respects surpassed other people. To ro-me the huge growth, they still differed in the force, indulged in robberies and were ti Amy's wounds; and these crimes of giants should be considered the first and heads - ache the flood reason, in opinion To an orneliya of Lapidsko-go ("To an ommentariya to kN a yoke of B y ti I"). N ekotory utver-zhdat that under a name of sons of B ozhy is necessary for a pony - mother of sons of Sif, and under a name of daughters cheloveche-sky - daughters To ai N and because the first were is-polnena of favor, belief and other virtues, then to joint stock company children To ai in N and differed in all opposite properties and defects; but, not N arush aya due uva-wives iya to Zlatoust, To an irill, And a lariya and to others, it is necessary prizn to at that it is in disagreement with ochevid-N y m with m y with l about t m e to with t and P and with and n and ya, t and to and to about t with about yu z and in y highways e - whether upomyan uty c were born people of enormous growth. And so, clearly that these giants were not before and if their birth was result of this connection, then not - it is admissible that it was possible to attribute it snoshe-a niya of sons of Sif with daughters To ai to N and, which, being 
obyknovenno1g6o growth, could give birth only this way and x 
children. Therefore, the union, from which 
p r about and z about highway of l and with ushch e with t in and and and N of t with to about about r about with t and, N of N about r and with - with m and t r and in and t N e to and to about y to N about in e N of N about e with N about highway e N and e m h and N y from wives shch in oh, but to joint stock company business of inkub which by the nature can easily be N azvan y sons of B of RSA. That is to about in about m of N e a N and e f and l about with about f about in - p l and t about N and to about in and F r and N of c and with to and - e about r - hectare from Venice, and it does not contradict opinion And an osifa F laviya, F Ilona Aleksandriyskogo, Yustina - the martyr, To limen that Aleksandriyskogo and Tertullian which about in about r I am t, h t about e t and and N to ub y y l and and N of e l y in about p l about t and, in p and in - shy in a voluptuousness sin. Really, to joint stock company we it 

213 
let's show further, here, under the guise of a contradiction, skry-the same thought is howled. 
Though, according to the general opinion whether in cubes and proizve-these "giants" with the help zhizn en the N oh of the energy borrowed the person, it, odn by Acre is not - vozmozhn ym, and we come to that zaklyuche-a niya again that gigan you are born not from a human seed; and consequently, inkub to bring forth offspring, uses a seed, the N oye is not borrowed the person. N about to and to about e e? 

The X head. N e all An of a gela are incorporeal 
To joint stock company the representative Ts of an erkva and to joint stock company Wuchang y, I katego- 
hairstyles darling vlya yu that inkub in the sn oshen iya from wives shch and Amy's N makes the child absolutely samostoyatel-but. Many will find this statement heretical and ma the Leningrad Region judicious, but I ask my readers not osuzhdat7 it so soon because, to joint stock company speaks 
C els: 1 "N e it is necessary to say condemnation, not races - 
smotrev it is comprehensively put iya, and also nespravedli-in to condemn mn en iye, without having weighed and without having disproved its arguments". Therefore, dock the Azat mine is necessary to me zaklyu-a cheniye, and for this purpose I have to enter some podrob-to Nosta. First, I am based N and an article of belief that there are creations purely spiritual, not having - anything materialn oho, to joint stock company it was ustanovl1e8no Lat - 
r and N with to and m with about bo r about m p r and p and p e And N of N about to e N of t and and I I I. 
These are the N ye An of a gela and the condemned N and eternal tortures devils is blessed. 
P a ravda, some scientists dock azyvat even after Cathedral that spirituality of angels and devils not of ustan Lena an article of belief, others, going further, whether an utverzhda that to joint stock company of An of a gela, and demons - teledreams; from here B onaventuro B Aron Zack of a l lyucha that there will be nothing - logical in if to attribute to angels and devils double essence: corporal and spiritual. I, osno vyvayas N and formal razjyasn en AI of Cathedral that Boi created from nothing all existing, to joint stock company spiritual, and corporal, angelic and terrestrial - claim what hardly blows prizn to at existence of some creations chis that dukhovn ymiy - to joint stock company of an ova of An of a gela vyssh their rank ov. Mno-gy theologians prizn at between gelama An so big difference that some An of a gela an essence pure spirits, therefore - the highest nature, and others - 
214 
teledreams, are not so perfect and some differ from others with the essence, corporal and incorporeal. It 
the doctrine has that advantage, 19chto reconciles reshe- 
N iya the seventh ecumenical council and mentioned earlier 
L and those r and N with to about go. 
Deystviteln oh, of N and zasedan AI of the second N of IKEA Cathedral was the N ap and a dignity of N aya against one pagan philosopher where he speaks so is shown and to N and hectare And oan to N and F essaloniky-sky: "As for to angels, arkhange-fishing and forces as which I rank both N ash and a shower and, To atolichesky the C erkov learns that it is spirits, but not with - vershenno incorporeal whether highway en as N ye bodies and invisible sous - shchestvo, to joint stock company it are approved by you, I zy chn and to and. C erkov in them prizn the ayah, N aprotiv, a body distinguished, created from air or ogn I, so to joint stock company sk an adhan about: "He made du - Hove by the An gelam and of the flaring fire on - slan N and to and"". And further: "Though they are not teledreams, to joint stock company we, i.e. are not made of four elements, but however it is impossible sk the Azat that gela An, demons and a shower and besteles-ny because they were many times invested with a body by that to whom the Lord was kind Quality Department to dig eyes". And p about with l e about go, to and to e t and to N and and y l and c e l and to about m p r about the h and t and N and before the fathers who were present at Cathedral Tarasius, the patriarch To it a camp of oozes Opole, offered t it on odob-rhenium of Cathedral in and x also I am expressed x: "And zjyasn en iye the dock azyvat the father I of an oann that can be An of a gela izobrazha-ema because their form ogran Ichang and, and they were in the form of a human f of an igura". N and that the cathedral edinodush-but answered: "Yes, Lords about". 

The XI head. About sushch estvovan AI razumn ykh beings, 
to the person and and meyushch and x I smother similar also a body 
And so, by this approval of cathedral it is established polozhe- 
the N and e about t of N about with and t e l N about those l e with N about with ti and N of e l about in, t and to and to N and to e y - sky cathedral a slope was eaten to opinion Platon Ikov, predpola-gavshy corporality of angels, and cathedral Lateran sk y, with the NAO - borot, followed the authority of Aristotle who defined in 12-oh to N a yoke in M etaf izik and consistence of spirits of incorporeal - judgment which made great success At many Wuchang y x. 20 N about to coordinate opinions of two Cathedrals, it is necessary pomn to ityit that the N ik and y tells Yeysk about a body - the number a type of angels, and Lateran sk y - about sexless. 
N azvan and e "angel" (in Latin N un tius - is sent - 
the nickname) is not designation of the nature, but whether highway sorts is- 

2 1> 
poln yaemy them f un to c and y. Many agree with it from - tsy C erk vi: St. Ambrose (letters to E BP. Chapter 1), St. And chests (About the Trinity, 5), bl. Augustine (About a hail of B ozhy, to N 15, of l. 2 3), since century. r and about r and y (B e page about E in and N of, of l. 3 4), since century. And sidor (De Sim.Bonit., 12). And z it follows, cht on - slan to N y B an ogham for ispoln en iya what - or poruche-N and I, whether it be the spirit or the person, can be N azvan An - gely; and it is valid, they carry it N azvan iye in the St. P ison of AI when it is told about preachers and vestni-to ah B of ozhy will. Alakha m I (3, 1) gives it to N azvan iye And to an oann To a restitel: "Here I send Angel Moy, and he will prepare a way predo for M I ache". H that this prophecy belongs literally to And oan N at To a restitel, the witness - stvutsya Evan by helium from ATP M eya (11, 10).21 
Even Itself And isus Christ the N azyvatsya by the Angel, so to joint stock company was sent by the Father to the world for announcement for - a game and mercies. 
Therefore, there is nothing absurd in if m y with to and e m, h t about N e to about t about r y e and N of e l y t e l e with N y, and bo the N and z in and - ny angels primen yatsya also to people, which already undoubtedly teledreams. It is necessary pomn to ityit that else nedosta-neither the essence, nor the nature of things in the world are precisely investigated whether also N elzya to deny f joint stock company of t highway because it is not investigated. 
H if there is other world, than that, koto-ry we inhabit, and in it there live other people, proizo-going not from Adam, but created by God what - or in any other manner (to joint stock company this is assumed considering lu-well lived) or what in the same world which we inhabit there are other reasonable beings, kro-me people and An of the Gaelic spirits which are ordinary invisible and do not open to people in to an acha, to joint stock company at special cases, the act their own zhelan iya or their own force? All this has no N ikaky otno-highway en iya to belief, and zn to at or not zn it is not necessary to at for rescue of soul of the person also, <to joint stock company zn to at numbers and the nature a thing to it. 
N and f ilosof iya, theology do not represent N ika-whom vozrazhen iya that there can be creations ra-zumn ye, presented with mind and body and excellent from a forehead - centuries; it vozrazhen iye if it was N and most - le, will be not what and N ym, to joint stock company inconsistency or from B of RSA (that N evozmozhn oh, because God nepogre-highway it), or from creations and things that it is also incorrect because these last are or creations 

216 
purely dukhovn ymiy, to and to gela An, or it is clean material-N ymiy, to and to inorganic mi r, and whether, N of joint stock company it ets, spirits - N about - m and t e r and and l N y m and, r ub y m and, z e m of N about - t e l e with N y m and, to and to the person. It is possible to allow existence with - also I am handed over, presented razumn ym with spirit and corporality, less rough and more distinguished, than the person. N et doubts that, after resurrection from the dead, a shower and pra-a vednik Chong in N ym will be connected to a body blissful and uton-; from what it is possible to lyuchit Zac that the B og could with - hand over a being reasonable and corporal, but with a body more tone to them, similar to a body the N ykh is blessed. 

The XII head. What these creations differ in from 
person? 

That luchsh e to define an opportunity sushchestvova-a niya of these it is created y, we disprove arguments which m about N about p r and in e with t and p r about t and in N and highway e about z and to l yu h e n and ya, i au tv e ti m on questions which can am be offered N. 
P ervy question. Whether these creations of N razumn ymiy, and, in an affirmative case, than they otli- and yu by t with I about t of the h e in l about in e can azyvatsya h to and? 
The N and it can answer that these beings have ra-a zoom and carnal body y, to and to and the person; however they from - lichatsya from him not only more distinguished priro-by that, but also thinner matter. Really, a forehead - the century is created, to and to it approves P ison iye, from by GRU - by parts of elements, then to and to these beings, on the contrary, are created from the cleanest parts of elements: some - from the earth, others - from water, the third - from air, couples - verty - from ogn I. 
The second question. To oh an era should carry to joint stock company about - an iskhozhdeniye of these creations: whether there are they from fellow countrymen - whether or waters, to and to zhivotn ye, quadrupeds, birds, etc. and whether, N aprotiv, are created, to joint stock company of people, B about - gy? 
The N and it can razjyasn be ityit that the B og, at means of angels, created their body also, to joint stock company and a human body, having attached to it immortal a shower at. Deystvitel-but since this body by the nature is more noble, than a body of others zhi votn ykh, and it befitted to it at - to connect incorporeal and noble spirit. 
The third question. Whether P roiskhodit these creations from odes - a leg of a being, to and to all people from Adam and whether, on the contrary, them a little at the same time was created, and to a being - 

2 1 7 
yut they to and to razlichn ye the creatures which arose and z lands and waters? 
Here what is possible for N and it to answer: it is possible that all of them come from one being, to and to people - from Adam. Notice also that they will be born and die that they share N and males and females that they have, to joint stock company people, feelings and passions that their body eats and develops. N oh, in any case, them p and shch but it should not be so rough, to and to p and shch and, demanded human those is scrap, but Pitana iye has to be gentle and air. 
N of joint stock company it ets, it and probably live society; at N them can be razlichn ye conditions of advantages and pervenst-va; it is possible that they Zahn imatsya by arts and nau-to Amy, Zahn imat positions, contain army, build the cities and, N of joint stock company it ets, do everything that is necessary, for them about hr and N e to N and I. 

The XIII head. Form and organization of bodies of inkub 
and succubuses. Comparison with formation of wine 
H etverty question. And whether these beings vnesh-met 
nost of the person or what - nibud another? Whether P an ostoyanny form and x bodies, to and to at zhi votn ykh, and whether only slu-tea of N aya, like a cloud or zhi recreation center and m to substances, on - an example, to oil, water and so forth? Whether their organism is made, it is similar human, and z razl chn ykh substances: bones, muscles and so forth? 
And these questions I can answer N that it is difficult to define a shape of their body because the structure it not podda-etsyatsya to control of N ash and x feelings, being too uton-Chen N ym for f izichesky ours zren iya and osya Zahn iya. M ozhno, odn Acre to assume that their appearance on - the dobna human, but is more perfect than it because sous - these shchestvo less materialn y and, therefore, nakho-ditsya by N and the highest extent of evolution. H concerns to essential parts of their bodies, it is necessary that they were elastic and less than a N ezhn ymiy, answering trebo-to a vaniye of organic action. Concerning doubt in chrezvychayn oh refinement of their bodies, I will tell that the hardness of parts their body of a-ism will not be unconditional not only concerning other, more distinguished parts that it is possible to observe in all zhi recreation center and x bodies, to and to on - an example: wine, oil, milk, etc., the distinction as a part of structure can be revealed only by means of chemical An of Ali for. 

2 1 8 
Thus, if we apply this natural rule and we will assume distinguished corporality their shouting - gan a-ism, An alogichn uyu zhidk to awns, then will not remain me-to hundred for what assumption - or razn itsa, i.e. dock - a zatelstvo against their existence because, to joint stock company we spoke, the heterogeneity of particles of wine and their case - ny ratios does not harm any essential order of parts that is possible sk the Azat and rather distinguished body of N ash and x beings. 

The XIV head. Whether P these beings are outcast 
to diseases, mutilation and death? Whether they will be born in 
original sin? Whether they are expiated by Jesus 
Christ for pleasure or on them gravitates 
bloody hell? 

P I you y question. Whether P these beings bolez-nyam and to mutilations, like people are outcast? Whether they are tired from ra-boats whether they need for recuperation a dream, food and drink? To akovo their food? Whether P they are outcast death and whether they can be killed accidentally or action of other beings? 
And it is possible for N sk the Azat that to joint stock company are refined there were their bodies, all of them - materialn y, are subject to decay and, therefore, can suffer from harmful forces and to be patients, i.e. their bodies can refuse to work, or will execute Lish hardly and neso-vershenno the f un to c and and that all is a consequence - which diseases. Really, so to joint stock company matter of their body not so plotn and, to and to a human body because not soder-zhit smesh An of N ykh together elements, they do not suffer so easily from harmful forces less person podverzhe-ny to diseases why zhi zn is more long than them because, the being is more perfect in own way, the dol-she it lives, the certificate of what is the person, zhizn which longer, than other beings. I not at - know century zhi zn crows, deer and some Wad Dra - gy zhi votn ykh about which P lean y tells us fables and that before its works though they also were it is published y, but the N ikto did not take the trouble to check them. From here it is necessary to remove it is concluded iye that beings about whom we speak surpass the person by durability. 
To joint stock company we it will show N the Izh, they being more noble chelove-, therefore, are subject to others of a body - to ny feelings, they need rest and pishch e. That 
concerns their prudence and education, they can be and are ignorant if their mind was not developed uche-by N and e in m and N and with t and in l e in N and e in m. In about shch e m, about N and, in e r about I the t of N oh, bo its l is expert, than the person, so to joint stock company their body is more refined - but, the mind is more active, and zhi zn is more long that helps them uzn to at more, than to people. Are that at - 
chi N y, uk adhan of N y e bl. Avgu2stinom (D ivin. D aem. page 3 and 
De Spir. et An im a, page 37). 2 
They can probably suffer from stikhiyn ykh forces, but can be hardly killed, possessing astral zre-niy and speed of movement. And x it is probably possible to mutilate during sleep or at the time of an oversight by means of a solid body, N an aprimer, highway p Aga that can the reasons ityit them a mutilation and even death, so to joint stock company of a shower who is indivisible several parts of one organic body which are not able to recover. 
Highway esty question. Whether their bodies can put on other weight, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, a tree, metal, glass, etc.? Mo - whether they zhi t in a large number in one place (ma-t e r and and l N about m), and N and to and to about e p r about with t r and N with t in about r and with p r about with t r and N I e t - sya gutnut their body? 
P about this occasion it is possible sk the Azat that all bodies, to joint stock company oh p l about t and about N and N e y l and, and m e yu t p about r y, h e r e z to about t about r y e others, more tone to iye bodies can enter their N, at least this time was impenetrable for liquid, gases and to that similar bodies. If several angels can live in one space, very limited, 
though 3 not indefinitely as, it proves 
With to Ott, 2 it would be reckless to attribute same spo- 
sobnost to bodies of beings about which it is. And x bodies have defined is lingering iye, are impenetrable one for another and if two angelic bodies cannot on - be gone at the same time by N and the same place, then and N ge in m l about e in t, p r and e in l and n and i, v with e in l and t with I to the h e in l about in e to and, to and to some scientists claim, but it cannot do sde-lat of a being, possessing though distinguished, but all e to m and t e r and and l in N y by t m e l about m. 
The seventh question. Whether R these beings in pervo-a native sin oditsya whether they were expiated by Christ Redeemer and whether can count N and beyond the grave zhizn? 
The article of belief claims that Christ released du - highway and all razumn ykh creations. Other doctrine says that the pleasure is granted to reasonable creation when it becomes it adequately. These merits consist in perfect keeping the commandments of B of an ozha and x. 
220 
Whether R these beings in an original sin, we not zn by Ai, but zn aya oditsya that God of N of an ikogd does not leave reason - Nov a being while it lives, without means to isprav-laziness, we can assume that Christ's mission concerned also them. 
Further, it is necessary to assume that they will obey - kim-nibud to the established B an ogham Zac it am, soblyude-ny which can beatify them. 

The XV head. Dock of an azatelstvo sushch estvovan iya 
and N to ub about in and with uk to ub about in 
P Lawton ("Socrates's Demon") and P lutarkh ("And zida and 
Osiris") 24, consider that they prin adlezhat to the category of the animals with the subordinated spirit endowed with reason with bodies vozdush N ymiy, and name these beings of "demons" which in itself has no anything oskor-bitelny, so to joint stock company means - full of wisdom; kog-these authors say about a fallen angel yes, i.e. dyavo-le, they N azyvat it not the demon, but "какодемон"; concerning a kind angel use it is expressed iye "эудемон". As for the St. P ison iya and fathers of C of an erkva, they also mention these beings, to joint stock company we it will show N and. 
Now, when we established an opportunity sushchest-a vovaniye of these is created y, we will go further and we will prove dey-a stvitelnost of their existence. Having established sn achat reliability of stories which concern the intercourses of inkub and succubuses with people and zhivotn ymiy, stories so numerous that would be impudence from - to vergat them, to joint stock company speaks bl. Augustine, the certificate to - tory was provided vysh e, and having defined it, we mo-zhy Zac to lyuchit that where there is a suffering, there has to be also a feeling because action and process - it only his N aruzhn ye is shown iya. And so, at inkub and succubuses actions, processes, passions are observed, is-going out of feelings - zn achit, they possess feeling; but feelings cannot be shown without complex bodies, without connection of souls and and bodies; zn achit, they 2 have a body 
also I smother and consequently, it - zhi in ton y e 5; them deyst- 
the Viy are consecutive, zn achit their shower and razumn and; and so, it razumn ye zhivotn ye. The N ash and the second parcel of dock - zyvatsya easily by An alizy: the passion demanding a raft - sky sn oshen y, is feeling; chagrin, grief, anger, frenzy owing to Quality Department of an az in sn oshen iya - also 

22 1 
essence of passion, feeling; origin through the intercourse obviously process of feelings. And all this is observed at inkubo to joint stock company we it is dock of an azalea you are highways e; they covet wives shch and and men and if receive Quality Department of az, happen ogorchen, fall into frenzy, to joint stock company lyubovn ik. They a prekra <but execute sn Osh en iya and in engender an ogd. Itakh it is necessary to lyuchit Zac that they are allocated with feelings and, a trace. in and t e l N oh, and m e yu t t e l oh, i.e. about n and zh and v about t of N y e with about in e r highway e N of N p Further, they pron hiccup to houses even at Zack of the faces dug дв^ and ok N ah, so distinguished their body. They know predict future, they reconcile and embroil; it in (the actions representing properties of reasonable soul therefore they possess razumn oh soul. 
P about this occasion the scientists ordinary speak, cht these vicious actions - affairs of an evil ghost, and to it one mu attribute passions, love, chagrin at an otka ze in sn Osh en iya, N of windows ets - falling of souls and into a sin. The N about will be objected by us, is in to the uba choosing predmeto-the passion of horses and whether others zhi votn ykh, and esl they akhodit not N in N of their humility of the passion, t. the reasons yat to them harm and therefore elzya to approve N, 4i the demon pretends to be zhelayushch and m sn oshen y that whether p op to beat with highway a shower at, so to joint stock company of souls and an animal not of subbeliefs the use a lyatiya gatsya eternal. Besides love and the gneena antipolos make at N of their action absolutely" ny. If wives shch and N and or the animal obeys them at ho to t and, t about and N to at y about r and shch and yu t with I with n and m and p r e to r and with N about; and N and a turn - it is very rough at resistance. And so, INK \would be had by N and the business of passion, feeling. To rum of that the evil spirits dealing with the sorcerer of a yama are also obsessed mi, force them to idolize itself, to oshch un stvovav to make deeds of evil and uzhasn ye is broken iya. INK> would not demand anything similar: it is not angry dukhl to banish the demon to force him shiver and to tremble, enough, to joint stock company Guazzo, names I of an isus or the Maiden M of the aria, the Godfather zn writes amine and I, pribl of wives and I Saints relik the Viy or osvyashch en to N ykh a subject! z and to l and N and n and y, z and to l I am t and y and whether p about velen and I with in I shch e the N of N and to and it can see daily N and frenzied, and Guatsp' gives many examples, the N ykh from history of night gatherings the sorcerer y where, at the Godfather zn amine is borrowed and! one of attendees and 6 at name I of an isus, an ischa. < 
whether all demons and to about ldun i 2. And N cubes, I will subject 
ty similar and the joint venture ytan and I am m, do not run, do not show HI when N and to joint stock company oho of fear, sometimes even meet Zac Lp 


222 
I am An and I am a N asmesh to Amy and tear clothes svya shch en N and to ov. Ltak, it is clear that in cubes not evil spirits, not kind ange-dy; it is also clear that it is not people, though are presented ra-with a zoom. H the same they it? If to assume that it is pure spirits, then they would be or use of la you, or UAVS-yasenna because, on divinity, there are no pure spirits of N and a way to pleasure. P la's fate ty, they feeling - would bring down otvrashch en iye to a name and a cross And Christ's isusa; blissful, whether they sk bosoms I the person to a sin. Means, they something another, than pure spirits, and trace t e l N oh, and m e yu t t e l about and with t of t of N about I and p ut and to l and e N with t in at. The m and - terialny joint stock company ti vn aya force cannot work in to an acha as soon as on so uyu material and stradatel-ny; purely material cannot work on chi-hundred spiritual. There are natural forces which can work against inkub; from this it follows that these inkuba materialn y or teledreams. N ash and a parcel to - a cauldron and Dioskorid's certificates whether P N and I, Aristo-of a tel, Apuley is also approved and zn by An and I eat; we have not - how many herbs, to am N to it and zhi votn ykh beings who are valid a run yat of demons, to joint stock company of an ova: a rue, zvero-fight, a verbena, darling chi y garlic, to a bream evin and, zolototysyach-N and to, br and l of l and and N of t, to about r and l l, a cher of N y y I am a N that r, I highway of m and, to about and from the head of a wolf or a donkey and hundreds of other things; it is allowed to the one who is exposed to N apaden to iya of the demon to have such objects, but not to resort to magic. From this it follows that to am N and and herbs can the are natural - mi properties to bridle efforts of the demon. P to a rezhda tser-the kovny charter did not allow to use them and zapreshch is scarlet as superstition. lestya shch and y an example of it we find B in the St. P ison of AI where the angel P af ait speaks to Tobit (6, 8) about fish which that hooked in the Tiger: "If you throw 
on coals ch7astitsu her liver, smoke will force to disappear 
Demon" 2. Experience the dock azat the truth of these words because 
the liver of fish did not burn down yet, to joint stock company inkub, the lover 
in
  To Sarr, disappeared and sk rummaged not to return any more - 
28 
The N and theologians ordinary object that este- 
with t in e N of N y e with and l y p r about about N I yu t and N to at and, N about t about l to about in N and h and l e, 
and
  that full action has to be from sverkhjestestven- 
ache strength of B of RSA or an angel and m in the way that sverkh- 
e
with t e with t in e N of N and I with and l and and e with t p e r in and I p r and ch and n and, p r I am m and I and 
hl and in N and I, and e with t e with t in e N of N and I with and l and t about l to about in t about r about with t e p e N of N and I, 
Kt osvenny and subrank en N aya. To explain, to joint stock company smoke 
° a liver of the fish burned by Tobit could force be- 

21 i 
to reap an inkub, Valezi y 29 assumes that this smoke receive i from B of RSA supernatural force progn to at in a cube that>, to joint stock company of mother aln y fire of hell is valid m teach demons and a shower and p fate of la ty. To JSC Liran j mustache, To orn unction, dock azyvat others that smoke from a liver of fish of the ave. drove the demon vn to an achala by natural force, okonchateln he was removed with force angelic and heavenly, and et the opinion is shared by all authors who whether rassul give about a way Zac N of An and I besov30. 
However, to in to uba, to and to we sk an azalea, it not to a mozha to be primen en about: they do not besiege a body, not nasylak diseases, their rage ogran ichivatsya by blows and durny--, manner with N epok orn ymiy. 

The XVI head. Story about an inkuba and young 
to the nun. Story about the deacon 
P ervy of these stories I borrowed at an ispova.4 
N and to and Maun Aachen, the person sedate also deserve. * go trust; I witnessed the second. 
In one wives the sky monastery zhi la, as a pas> sionerka, whether the young maiden noble f Amy and. Oi was the claim ush an ayema inkuby which I vlya lsya to it in the afternoon, • 
N about the h yu with N e about t with t unitary enterprise of N y m and p r about with and m and, to and to with and m y y with t r and with 1 
the ny lover, incessantly inducing it to a sin 
She, odn Acre, opposed, on favor of B an ozhiya, and ost • it vatsya firm in the resistance. N about without watching her piety, fasting, vows, despite zaklin n and ya, b l and about with l about in e n and ya, p about in e l e N and I z and to l and N and t e l e y and N to uo. to azatsya by Quality Department from the prosecutions, contrary to mnozhest!>, relics and others svya shch en N ykh objects, are built. in komn to an ata young devush to and, inkub I did not cease to flow under the guise of very beautiful young the person. The N of joint stock company he ets, between Wuchang ymiy, arguing about et <m a case, N ash was eaten one theologian who, observing • the tempted maiden and having swept up i that it possesses krl. not f legmatichn ym temperament, guessed that e inkub has to be vodyan ym spirit (exist, stvitelno, according to Guazzo, in cubes: fire '1 ny, vozdush N ye, zemn ye, underground, enemies dn I)> i p ri to azat, that whether in to omn to an ata young devush to and proizv okurivan iye the ferry. P Rihn if a new copper from hl' N y, put un a tion aromatic to An of N y, highway tsu there, a kubela, aristolokhiya roots, cardamom and, is large also small ginger, long pepper, a carnation, reproach • 

'24 
muscat color, nutmeg, rosny an incense and, benzoya, an aloe tree also mixed all this with three butyl-of Kami of the semi-peeled vodka. Then put a copper in hot ashes that went ok urivayushch y steam, and a lump - whether Nata densely Zac Ry. Fumigating forced to be an inkub who, odn Acre, N and this time did not sweep away got - chick-pea in to omn to at a, and only when the maiden left in a garden or highway of la to the monastery, he immediately I vlya lsya to her, wasps - tavayas for other N evidimy, embraced her, kissed why she very much suffered. P a donkey new soveshchan iya, our theologian p ri to azat to the maiden to carry at himself malen-Kia to highway ata to and from and x aromas, to joint stock company, N an aprimer, a muscat, ambergris, the Peruvian balm and others. SBI - ruzhen N aya and m in the way, it left in a garden, and immediately p about I in l I am l with I and N to ub. About z l about l e N of N y y and r about z N y y, about N of N e with m e l more to approach her and, the N of joint stock company it ets, disappeared that bo-l of her N e in about z in r and shch and t with I. 
The second case occurred in P Abijah and, in to artezian - the sky monastery where zhi l diak it, by the name of Augustine who was exposed razlichn ym to oppressions about hundred - r about N y with uk to ub and. e with to about l to about z and to l and N and t e l e y t shch e t of N about p y t and - foxes it to release N; all means were left without success. In and to and r and y m about N and with t y r I p r and highway e l to about m of N e p about with about in e t about in and t with I. Whether seeing invalidity ordinary Zac of N of An both y and vspomnya vysh epriveden N y an example, I advised an eye - a rivaniye blagovon iya, like about what there was a speech, and p ri to azat the deacon at to carry on itself to highway ata to and, on - dushenny the same blagoukhan iya; and so to joint stock company he upot-reblyal tobacco and very much loved vodka, I to it recomen-allowed to use tobacco and vodka with a musk smell. The succubus to it I vlya lsya in razl chn ykh types: a skeleton, a pig, a donkey, a bird, sometimes prin imat what look - nibud Maun Akha of it of Maun Astyrya. Once he even prin the yawl shape of the abbot also convinced diak it and to clean with - a message, to be entrusted to B of regional public institution and to confess secrets oh, the other Tat with it psalms, E xsurgat D eus and Qui habitat and 
Evan3geliye from And oan N and; at words "Verbum caro factum 
est" 1 it bent a knee, and then, having grabbed epitra- 
Gil and aspergillum with holy water, the prior blessed a cell and a bed, to joint stock company of N astoyashch y, having enjoined not to disturb the demon di of joint stock company it from now on and. P a donkey of it he suddenly disappeared, having found these the deception. N e vz of paradise of N and to an eye - a rivaniye which I advised the succubus nevertheless not pre-kratit the prosecutions and once even prin the yawl a type of the victim and was to Vick the aria at whom on - 


8-3400	2 2 5 
asked vodka and tobacco with muskatn ym zap akhy. P oluch that and another, it instantly disappeared, pok elements so to them obrg 
zy Vick the aria that he was deceived by the succubus what •., then it is certified also the deacon of ohms which klyatvenn, 
assured that not b2yl in a cell vi to Arie I. Then I conclude • 
that this and the N to ub3 was not vodyan ym, to joint stock company inkub, vlyublt, 
ny in the young girl, and fiery or air and therefore enjoys warm blagoukhan iya. Tev a perament of young di of joint stock company it and, angry and sangvinich <skiya, only strengthened my suspicions because lp inkuba of N of an ikogd do not pursue people, temperamen> which is similar to their own (new dock of azatelstvo of mine mn en iya about their corporality). I advised in and to and r to give t diak it at a grass, cold by the nature, i: to uvsh and N to and, pechen ochn ik, the euphorbia, is wild y ches NOC, a plantain, a henbane, etc., having made of N them dr bunch i one of which to hang up at ok N and, and another at a door. To omn an ata, a floor and a bed I advised the settlement a stalemate these herbs. And, countries of N aya thing! the succubus was, but remained behind a threshold, without daring to enter and when the deacon asked it about the reasons e such unusual modesty of t oh, in m e with t about about t in e t and, with uk to ub r and z r and z and l with I p r about to l I am t and I am m and and 
I scolded exchanges, advised it sre3dstvo zashch ita 
Then it disappeared not p about I vlya lsya 3 any more. Ate these two * 
tea clearly determine removal of an inkub and the succubus roofing felt to natural by force of herbs or fragrances, without all of whom influence of divine force. And so, N and ink\b influence the known properties materialn ykh предм^ t, and, therefore, they comprise this sushch N about with t. About t with yu yes N and d about z and to l yu h and t, h t about about N and and m e yu t t e l oh, that we also wanted dock the Azat. 

The XVII head. And a zgnaniye of the inkub disturbing 
To Sarr; old Tobit's treatment 
Better to prove by N ash e it is concluded iye, follows 
to mention delusion of some scientists, press measures, Valeziya and To orn unction of Paws and dsk ogo34, utverzhdav their highway that Sarr it was exempted from an inkub by force are the khan of a gel P af ai la, but not a liver of fish which Tovig hooked at coast of the Tiger. 
The N e arush aya due is complied by N iya to so them to mail!' ny Wuchang ym, it is necessary prizn to at a similar explanation sch vershenno protivn ym to meaning of the text from which but it is necessary to move away. Here words of an angel to Tobit: "If to 

226 
go the demon or an evil ghost torments, heart and a liver has to smoke before and m the man or wives shch and - I ache, and more will not suffer any more; and bile poma-z and t h e l about in e to and, to about t about r y y and m e e t e l m and the N and of l and z and x, and about N will recover" (To N of Tobit 6, 8-9). 
The words of An of a gel belong to properties of heart, liver and bile of fish and carry certainly the general harak rubbed, on - to the fact what he does not tell to Tobit that it will remove the demon. If it sk azat it, I prizn am scarlet together with kommen Tatars that P af ait everything made the sob-by stvenny supernatural force and that actions dy-ma and bile were not able to make it. 
Can ask whether sk the angel azat an honest truth about force of things or he could deceive and whether cured old Tobit's eyes fish bile or force arkhan get Rafa - silt? With to the Azat that the angel could deceive, N elzya, so to joint stock company the demon was and zgn An smoke pechen and, without means of supernatural force. 
In r and h, to about t about r y y go in about r and t, ch t about t and to and I am t about t r and in and and with c e l I e t absolutely pleurisy or epilepsy, would lie without with - opinions if this grass did not cure a disease, and for full healing it was necessary to add still other grass. 
P ereydy now to old Tobit. elmo it would be removed from his eyes, and his blindness passed from the natural force of bile of fish, N azyvayemy in And a waist and bocca in capo possessing according to medicine y, bile, from - l e h and in and yu shch e y e l m and; with e t and m with about hl and with N y D and about with to about r and d, and l and - en, whether P N and y, Aklan ius, Valezy, etc. The Greek text of Tobit (11, 13) says the following: "It N reddened bile in eyes of the father, saying: "Trust, my father" and when 
nachalos3 5 vytravlivan iye, he to it wiped eyes and removed 
cataract". So to and to, according to the same text, an angel from - 
covered to Tobit force of a liver and bile of fish and cured sle-to old Tobit's sweat, it is necessary to lyuchit Zac that and m in the way by the natural force and smoke from a liver banished the succubus, and it is certified by the Greek text of book of Tobit, Chapter 8, Article 2: "It took ashes or heat, hollow Veins there heart and a liver of fish and when smoke, the demon went, being not able to transfer zap an akh, is-chez". H concerns the Jewish text, there sk an adhan about: "Asmodey felt a smell and escaped". From here hardly - Blows that the demon escaped, having felt smoke which was harmful to it, and not from action sverkhjestest-the wine strength of an angel at all. And if in this liberation of SAR - 

8*zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA	Til 
ry from prosecution of the succubus Asmodey action smoke:! from a liver was also followed by mediation P af ait that for this purpose only to chain an inkub in the desert the Top E gipt, to and to it sk an adhan about in to N of Tobit (Chapter 8, Article 3). Here we can coordinate N ash e opinion with on - m e shch e N of N y m in y highway e z and to l yu h e N and e m uch e N y x, to about t about r y e p r and pisyvat this miraculous escape of Sara to action of Ra-f an aila. P about and x mn en iyu, Sarr it would not be absolutely released if inkub not was prikovanzyxwvutsrqpon in are empty 
not, and it we allow, but are actually released *. both zgn An and e the demon and z spaln and Sar3ry - was direct, 
natural action of a liver r y y 6. 

The XVIII head. Saint Anthony meets in the desert 
Faun. Their conversation 

The third and glavn ym the proof of ours zaklyu-Chen Iya about existence of these creations and about corporality of inkub serves the certificate as St. And eronima. 
• Sacred An tone y - this scientist tells - 
went odn azhda to the Saint P to an avl. 
P a donkey of N of eskolky days of traveling he met Ken the Tauri whom he asked where he lives otsh eln ik, N and that that. having murmured several rough words, showed it ru-which road and ran away into the forest. P roydya it is a little, St. Anto of niya met, N and this time, the little person, almost to Arly to and, about the claim rivlen N ymiy Amy's hands, with horns of N and a forehead. which body ok An chivatsya by legs to an ozl. P ri a look his St. Anthony stopped and, being afraid of intrigues of a devil, about with e N and l with ebya to r e with t of N y m z N and m e N and e m of N about m and l e N to and y h e l about - a century, without thinking to run and even without having been frightened, almost - telno approached the Saint aged man and offered it fruits p Alma, to and to testifying the peacefulness in y e N and m e r e N and I. 
Then St. Anthony asked, to that he so oh. "I smer-ton y - that answered - one and z inhabitants of the desert whom the paganism in the delusion awards razl chn ykh names: f arieses, satir, inkub; I am sent with an assignment from my people - herd; we ask you to pray for N the expert of B of regional public institution, To otory descended for the UAV! l zyxwvu 
the whole world and glorification To otory sounds on all earth". 
Having heard such respectful attitude towards Christ, St. An tone y, full of joy, jio turned on-4 
to board to Alexandria and, striking with a stick with zeml. 

228 
vosklikn st.: "1'ore to a teya, razvratn y the city which adores zhivotn ykh, to joint stock company of gods". 
T and to about in r and with with to and z with in I t about about t An about N and I. To doubt truthfulness of this story when it 
zasvidetelstvov7ana it is big them in scientific C of an erkva, 
since century. And e r about N and m about m 3, and in t about r and t e t to about t about r about go N and to about d and N e about with p and - 
it rivatsya by any Catholic, it would be impudent. 
Let's consider details of this story and we will solve, - to them in the way it confirms to N ash e opinion. 
First, it is necessary to notice that if what - or svya-that the subject and was exposed to intrigues of a devil, in zamys-ly which it got and gained a victory over it - 
that of course, it was St. Anthony, 38k the joint stock company approves him 
the life written to St. Af of An asiy. And so, St. Anthony 
not prizn it is scarlet the demon in this little person, but at - nyal him for an animal, saying: "A grief to you razvratn y go-the sort adoring zhivotn ykh to joint stock company of gods". From here vyte-kat that it was no demon or spirit, and zgn An of N y from the sky and use lyaty, but what - that animal. Saint Anthony, on - stavly the monks and warning them against on - mereniye of a devil, speaks, to joint stock company it is mentioned in the breviary (celebration to St. Anthony): "Believe me, brothers that the Satan is afraid of pious people, and also prayers, fastings, voluntary poverty, mercy, smire-N and I; but most of all - passionate love to Christ, N of Ashe - mu Christ Redeemer, and therefore to turn a Satan into run - a stvo, rather sacred cross". 
And raspberries the ky person when St. Anthony thought from him zashch to ititsya by a sign of the cross, not vyk azat - what fear and did not think to run; on the contrary, it at - approached the Saint aged man with a trustful look and poch-titelno offered it f and n and k and. Here the proof that it was not the devil. 
Secondly, it is necessary to notice that this of raspberries of kiya a forehead - the century sk azat: "I mortal" - from where follow that it was an animal - death object which was on light by means of is engendered iya; the spirit non-material - is immortal because it does not receive zhi zn posredst-vy origin, but through creation by the nature of a prereal stvovaniye and therefore it, does not lose zhi zn and through a plant louse - ny, differently through death, and the being can cease - in and t h e r e z un and h t about e N and e T in about r c about m. And t and to, with to and z and in, h t about about N mortal, he explained that it - an animal. 
Thirdly, raspberries the ky person sk azat that to him izve-stno about suffering of B of RSA in a human body. These words 

229 
prove that it - an animal reasonable. Animals no what is known over the felt present and not mo-gutnut to have N and to joint stock company oho of idea of Aage's B. If raspberries k y the person sk azat this that it and to it similar zna-yut about stradan iya of B of RSA in a human body, then, trace telno thanks to what - nibud to a revelation, they and m e yu t p about N I am t and e about B about e t and to e, to and to both m y and m e e m about t to r y - a thuja to us belief. Z amechan iye that the B og was embodied in a forehead - centuries and suffered, confirms two glavn ykh members of N of our belief: whether about existence of Uniform B of RSA in three tsakhets and about the embodiment, suffering and revival. All this shows, to joint stock company I already said that it was the reasonable being ready to a divine pozn of An iyu in the way from - a kroveniye and allocated, to joint stock company and we, razumn ym, bessmer-tny spirit. 
Fourthly, on behalf of all the people which were sent it asked St. Anthony to pray for them to general B of regional public institution. From here I take out that this of raspberries the ky person was ready both to pleasure, and to the 39th damnation, and 
that it was not "in term in o", but "in via""; if it was 
razumn ym the being allocated with immortal soul to joint stock company I proved vysh e, the logician and recognizes also that he is ready to pleasure and to a damnation - it is property ra-zumny it is created iya, an angel or the person. He was a N and pu-ti (in via), i.e. the N and feats and N and acts, so is ready to joint stock company if it was in term in o, then it would be already or is blessed, or is damned, but it was not either that, or another because prayers of St. Anthony to whom it obra-titsya could not ok the Azat to it N and to joint stock company oh of the help if it was finally use lit; and if it was already in pleasure, then would not have in N of their need. P from - mu-that he also addressed St. Anthony's prayers that they could help, therefore, he was a N and ways to an UAV-zhenstvo of "in statu viae et m er it i" 40. 
Fifthly, this of raspberries k y the person words - "I on - slan the herd - the people with an assignment", declare myself the envoy of other creations of a similar sort. From here we can take several investigations: this of raspberries the ky person was not the only thing, i.e. to joint stock company and m - or an exclusive miracle, but them existed not - how many one akovy connected together, they are structure - lyal the people (herd), and it I vlya lsya on behalf of all. Z aty, these creations live society because send one for all, to joint stock company of the representative. N of joint stock company he ets, upholstered in the desert, they not were there is attached y by N and constant 

230 
time. Saint Anthony had no case to visit this lonely place which was znachitel-prior to this meeting but is removed from its cell, and they in the desert could not uzn at - who is he was, to joint stock company oh of sanctity degree it towered; it is necessary that they it uzn Ali somewhere in other place and consequently, they were also in N e e that y p at to t y N and. 
Sixthly, raspberries the ky person sk azat this that he a being from those which I zy chn both to and in the blind person for - bluzhdeniya of N azyvat f avn Amy, satires and in cubes that proves quite truthfulness of our main thesis i.e. that a creation inkuba razumn ye, able either to reach pleasure or to be use of la ty. 
P the oyavleniye of raspberries of ky people such happens to - is free often in rudn ik ah, to joint stock company tells Agriko-of la about it in the to N a yoke "De Animal, su bt err." 41. They are displays - also those are howled to children dressed in the same dress, to joint stock company; they play, highway utya t, laugh, amused, throw - tyam in a game to am esh to and, and it is good zn joint stock company, speaks you are a sheupomyanuty author - it is possible to be sure that Quality Department will be dug what - N ibud rich zhi la. 
Where do these live raspberries ky people, these inkuba? And I will answer N: according to Guazzo, some of them zemn ye, Wad Dra - gy - water, the third - vozdushn ye, the fourth - og-nenny, i.e. their bodies consist of the N ezhn ykh parts of one of these elements, and they live either in water, or in the earth, or in air, depending on the nature. Whether and x zhi shch and, therefore, are in that from ale - cops which mainly is a part of their t e l and; about of N e N of N y e and N to ub y, N and p r and m e r, n and k about d and N e and in ut in water or in the bog which are opposite to them and water cannot rise to upper air, so to joint stock company this area is too refined for them priro-dy. Same most it is observed also at people who, privykn uv to the condensed air, cannot zhi t at tops of the Alps where air slish a lump is refined for their N. 
Moline provides several certificates St. Fathers who can confirm us corporality of demons. And meya the resolution of Lateran Cathedral about incorporeal st of angels, we have to understand that St. Fathers meant demons - inkub which on the way to rescue, but not use of angels lyaty already. However, without going further, we will be limited to the reference on bl. Augustine, this great scientist Ts erk vi, we will also see, to joint stock company oh of degree his opinion meets with N ash and m of B of l. Augustine 

23 i 
speaks about a being of demons in the kommen tariya sle-blowing (to N 2, Chapter 17): "They know some truth or because their feelings are more alive or because their bodies utonchenny", and further, in to N. Z, Chapter 1: "Demons are beings vozdushn ye because they have similarity by the nature with vozdush N ymiy bodies". In the of the 115th ambassador - Scientific Research Institute K evreyam he says: "These air or f irny beings possess very much tone of feeling to them - mi". In "Ozhy" (to N.11, Chapter 23) he says about a hail of B: "The demon has an air body". In to N a yoke 21, Chapter 10 of the same composition p and highway et: "N ekotory demons have a body, to joint stock company philosophers, from dense and damp air which we dy highway and m think". In to N 15, Chapter 23: "N elzya re-highway and t whether can gela An, supplied vozdushn ym those is scrap, to feel passion which pushes them to wives - shch and N am". In the to ommen tariya to the 85th psalm it poucha-et: "Bodies the N ykh after revival is blessed will are similar to bodies of angels", and in primechan to AI to a psalm 14 dobavlya-et: "Bodies of angels more materialn y, than shower and". 

The XIX head. Still proof of corporality of inkub. M anna Jews or bread of angels 
The N ash e opinion can be confirmed moreover 
still the following certificates St. P and a dignity and I, to joint stock company was razlichn about it is interpreted iye which Tatars give them kommen. In a psalm 78, Articles 24 and 25, sk an adhan about: "Also odozhdit them in pishch at Mang N at and bread heavenly gave of An Bread Gaelic the person ate; It sent them p and shch at to satiety". David speaks about Mang to N here e with which he fed - sya izrailsk y the people all the time, p ok and wandered in the desert. About Mang of N e sk an adhan oh, to joint stock company about bread of angels. To rum Mang N y, An of a gela delivered to Jews pillars from a cloud and fire, quails, water from the rock, and the St. P ison iye not govo-rit - An pillar Gaelic, water of angels, etc. to P ochy N azvan and Mang N and, prepared with mediation of angels, bread of angels, but not the N azvan and water of angels which was too is called and from the rock at them posred-by N and h e with t in e? Z and t e m of N and d about z and m e t and t, h t about e with l and in Since century P and with and the N is also also told about bread, "bread of whom - nibud" always to N azvan "bread of that" which feeds on it, but not the one who prepares it. P Rimera of it are uncountable: And descent. Chapter 23, Article 25, "He blessed your bread and your water". To N of.2 C of arstvo, Chapter 12, Article Z, "from bread she ate him". To N of Tobit. Chapter 4, Article 17, "R azdavay your hleba at a coffin 

232 
pravedn ykh", at St. Onions and, Chapter 11, Article 3, "Bread of N ash on - sushch N y". Enough dock azyvat all this that bread • to - go-nibud" in P ison of AI is bread of that, to that with it feeds - sya, but not that, to that does it, I e bring or prigotov-l to t. And in p about l of N e e with t e with t in e N of N oh, of h t about in P with and m l e, N and to about t about r y y we refer, it is necessary pon to imat under bread of angels p-shchu not incorporeal angels (who have no need in a material pishch e), but angels corporal, i.e. ra-zumn ykh beings about whom we tell here which 
live in vozduhezyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP and which, on refinement of a body and 
endowments reason, so come nearer to besteles-ny An to gela that it even gave the same to N aimen ovan iye. From here I take out the investigation: being zhi votn ymiy, i.e. appearing through origin, and subject to decay, they have need in p and shch e to restore corporal substance which decrease occurs through expenditure. And z the N each being consists in assimilation and izverzhen AI of elements, 2 to joint stock company taught it 
Ettmyuller (" I n st. M ed. P h ys.", Chapter 2) 4. And so, if them 
bodies uton Chong of N y, is same dolzhn and to be also them p and shch and. If some substances are opposite to their nature and they avoid them, that is in the nature and such substances, to - tory they eat and enjoy. 
M of An of N and Jews consisted from razlichn ykh elements and, 
long before it is besieged iya, it was dissolved from beams of the sun. And descent, Chapter 16, Article 21: "when warmed the sun, it is t and I am l and". 
M and N of N and e in r e e in and m e l and N e about y to N about in e N of N about N e N y y with about with that in because contained evaporations of water and the earth which about t with about l of N e h N about about t e p l and r and with t in about r I am l and with and and with the h e z and l and. In about z m about - but that it - p and shch and beings about whom we speak and David not without p ri chi N y N azvat its bread angels. 

The XX head. As it is necessary pon I t Christ's words: "I have sheep who not this yard". R Apollo's azgovor with the emperor Augustus: end of B of og. Great Pang died. Christ's death announced 
Fauns, Silvanami, Satires 
Let's use for a reinforcement of our thesis slo- 
you evangelist I oan N and (Chapter 10, Article 16): "I have also other sheep who not this yard; and I should bring those: and they will hear the M voice oh, both there will be one herd and is uniform P astyr". If we ask, to joint stock company and e it can be sheep not of this yard and to joint stock company oh it is the yard, about 

2 3 3 
which Christ Redeemer speaks, all commentators will answer us that it is uniform stven N y Christ's yard - it is C erkov into which a sermon evan helium dolzhn and to bring I zych-N of ik, which not this yard, i.e. not the yard of Jews. For N their yard of Christ was sn the synagogue achat, so to the JSC Da-look says, P page 95, Article 7: "We are the people of its flock and ov-tsy his hands" because the obetovaniye was given to Avra-to an am and David that the Messiah will come from their sort, and It is expected the Jewish people, and was announced proro-to Amy who were Jews, and its coming, it - I am a N and I, it stradan iya, death and revival would be to joint stock company y and z about r and e N y r and N highway e in e r in t in about p r and N about highway e in N and I x, about br I - da, and in general a stump Jewish Zac it and. The N oh, despite N ash e is complied iye to fathers of C of an erkva and other scientists, this explanation does not satisfy us. Really, believe that with N of an achal of the world there was one C erkov true and that it and will exist to it c and the world. The head of this erkva C - And isus Christ, P osrednik between B about - gy and people. The belief in P resvyaty Trinity, in voploshche-ny Words was dug by Quality Department to the first person who taught the same the sons, and those, in turn - the descendants. Though bolsh aya a part from their N fell into paganism and pok in an ula true belief, but however mno-gy kept belief of the fathers and, observing estestven-N y Zac he, remained in erkva C vern ykh. It zamechan iye does to Arti to N Tole apropos And an ov who made - sya svya ty among I zy chn and to about century is scarlet. Though the B og granted the favor to the Jewish people for which It ustano-twisted special Zac it and ceremonies and which It separated from I zy chn and to ov, odn to Acre this Zac it was not obligatory for I z y for h N and to about in, and e in r e and N e with about with t and in l I am l and C e r to in and, about t of l and h N about y from church of those from I zy chn and to ov which professed belief in Uniform B of RSA and in coming of the Messiah. Between I zych-N and to and m and y l and t and k and e, k about t about r y e p r about r and c and l and p r and highway e with t in and e Christ and other doctrines of Christian religion, on - 
example, M of erkuriya, Trismegist, Gidasp 3 and sivilla, about 
whom speak to Lach the thane of c and y and B and r about N and y 4. H that I zychn and - 
ki waited for the Messiah, it is possible to prove several months - weary at And Sai and and especially in a prophecy of the patriarch I of joint stock company of an ov (B of a yta e, Chapter 49, Article 10): "The N e will depart a scepter from Both Uda and a staff from his legs, pok but rest, and to It humility of N are about to v*44 will not come. 
And also at the prophet Haggai, Chapter 2, Article 7: "Also I will shake 
all people when comes elayemy all people". To orneliya of Paws both dsk and y comments on it the following about - 

234 
at once: "Yazychn and to and which whether trusted in B of RSA and soblyuda-Zac it, waited and wished Christ, like Jews". Christ I curled and I announced Sebha, to joint stock company zychn and - to am, and to Jews because at the same moment, to joint stock company the angels announced Christ's birth to shepherds, so - 
4uzn Ali about it by means of a wonderful star volkh- 
in y 5, to about t about r y e t and to and m about r and z about m y l and p e r in y m and m e du 
I zy chn and to am and, to joint stock company shepherds among Jews, am called y on - to tend to Christ (S.F ulgen tius. Serm. 6 de Epiph.). I z y h n and k and p r e d e e in r e e in z N and l and about p r and highway e with t in and and Hr and with t and through a sermon (I do not speak about a sermon of apostles). About it the venerable sister M the aria by d'Arpega wrote in the "And zn And an isusa of Christ and P resvyaty Maidens Ma - a riya": "To an ogd the Maiden M the aria ran from St. And osify to Egypt from prosecutions And a sort, it remained with the baby I isusy in Egypt seven years; and at this time the B is false N aya the Maiden also I preached itself egiptya N am belief in and with t and N of N about go B about and and p r and highway e with t in and e With y N and B about in the h e l about in e h e - a sky body". By the way, at Christ's birth - the Leningrad Region is a lot of miracles not only in And udy, but also in Egypt where idols destroy by Ali s, oracles Ali broke off; in P Yim - seemed f ontan from oil, the are, the SPU was gold highway - with to and in highway and y with I with N of an eb of N and z e l m yu, p about I v and l and s r and with about l of N of c and and the extraordinary circle from shades of a rainbow surrounded t soln-tse; in Greece - Delf the Yeysk oracle, and Apol-of bosoms grew dumb, the N y is asked by the emperor Augustus, answered: "Ev-reysky di tya which rules over gods and Itself is a B about. M of N e p r and to and z and N about p about to and N ut m about y p r e about that l and with about y t and in an underworld. Whether now the N ash and altars broke off, and we need to leave". 
B y the Leningrad Region is a lot of also others zn amine y, vozveshch avsh them 
I zy chn and to am coming of the Son of B of an ozha I. About N of their story - but at B Aron and I ("C erkovn ye An of N are scarlet") and at To an orneliya ("To an ommentariya of N and Haggai"). 
And z all this it is clear that I zy chn and to and, to joint stock company and Jews, prin adlezhat to Christ's yard, i.e. to the same C of an erkva of true. Therefore, these words of Christ: "Me-have nya other sheep who not this yard", cannot - satsya I zy chn and to ov which in total with Jews had knowledge of Aage's B, hope of N and the Messiah, prophecies, a miracle - sa and is predicted iye about its coming. I say that words "sheep not of this yard" can be carried to ra-to zumny creations or zhi votn ym, about which we go in about r and m here. 

2 3 ^ 
We ustan wound that they are capable both to pleasure, and to use a lyatiya; but time Christ is P osrednik between B an ogham and people, and also and vsyak them razumn y mi beings (because through Christ's merits ra-zumn ye creations reach pleasure by means of those favor which It grants them), from here it is possible to lyuchit Zac that any reasonable being has to have at the same time belief in Uniform B of RSA, on - to a dezhd on Christ's coming, a revelation about voploshche-scientific research institute at the birth and the beatitude. 
Here sheep not of "yard" of people, and they should be given; there are sheep who dolzhn y hear to at its voice, i.e. in about z in e shch e N and e about E g about p r and highway e with t v and i and e in and N of e l with to about e uch e N and e or directly from his N, or from apostles; here ov-tsy which being, N of joint stock company he ets, are connected to people in heavenly pleasure, dolzhn y to carry out words about odes - the number the yard and about one P astyr. This explanation under - tverzhdatsya also by those, upomya in N uty vysh e, words St. And e r about N and m and about m and l e to N to about m of the h e l about in e to e, to about r y y p r about with and l with in I - that An tone iya to pray for t for it and to it similar about - to shchy B of regional public institution, To otory suffered, to joint stock company of people. And z it it is visible that they zn Ali about coming and Christ's death, e l and l and z and with l and t E g about m and l about with t, to and to B about and, and p r and e hl and to St. Anthony's help. 
Another f joint stock company of t, sluzhashch y a support to my conclusion, e that at p about m and N and N and e B and r about N and I about z N and m e N and I x, to about t about r y e in about z in e - shch Ali Christ's death. At the time of the emperor Tiberiya, in time stradan iya Christ, seafarers on the road from Greece in And a waist approached at night the coast, not - is far from the islands of Ekhin Ada. Suddenly everything hear Ali go-los, the calling helmsman Tramn and. He answered: "I here", and the same voice sk azat: "To an ogd you will reach the swamp, announce that It is big y P An died". Tramn it ispol-N silt, and immediately were heard loud groans and rydan and I. To the same it could be, to joint stock company not demons or corporal An of a gela, or razumn ye the beings living near these swamps, so to joint stock company they were, undoubtedly, vodyan ymiy du - be rude and, uzn av about Christ's death under the name of "Great P An and", N achat p varnish to at and sob? Also and among ev-Ray who were present at death's door Christ was mno go, udalya vsh and hsya with it is expressed iy burning. And z all this follows that exist it is created iya, inkuba and succubuses. which possess feelings and sufferings of holes of feelings are subject. They razmn ozhatsya through origin and mind dig through a decay iye; they can reach also pleasure 

236 
and p la's fate ti I; they it is more noble than the person, so to joint stock company have more distinguished body and if they can have a raft - the sky intercourse with the person, then they make such sin her, to joint stock company of people, having the intercourse from scotomas. N eredko these inkuba after the long intercourses with chelove-a lump or zhivotn ym kill the accomplices, and it speaks so: having sinned, they have to regret, so to joint stock company are on the way to pleasure. And a forehead - a century, having sinned with zhivotn ym, receives from the spirits - Ik's N command un to ichtozhit this animal again not to fall into a sin. Can happen, as inkuba, races - kaivayas, kill the person or an animal with whom sinned, and, killing the person, in this case inkub does not sin this murder, like that, to joint stock company also people not gresh it any more, killing an animal; the relation in-a cube to the person will be like the attitude of the person towards an animal. 

The XXI head. As the woman can become pregnant 
from an inkub. Why now giants are not born 
The eremennost from an inkub would not come from sperm, 
borrowed the person, to joint stock company it was mentioned you - she because inkub, to joint stock company the creation breeding through origin possesses natural sperm. 
Thus, it is easily possible to explain origin of giants to joint stock company result of the intercourses of sons of B ozhiy and to - a furuncle human. Gigan you, though are similar chelove-ku, but bigger growth and, having borrowed from an inkub it si-lu, have no N and his courage, its power. We see the same at the mule who occurred from a donkey and a mare - he is higher than the first, but has no is made - with TV and in t about r about y. 
Igda we did not read to N that giants made Wad Dra - gy giants; they were born from inkub and daughters che-lovechesky, i.e. are created from the demon and the person, forming an average between N and mi, but without having the power to reproduce similar, through origin. 
The m ozhno to object that sperm of the demon, by the nature being not so dense, to joint stock company sperm of the person, cannot mix up and make origin. To N about I will answer, ssy-being barked on vysh esk an adhan of N oye that origin depends on the Vital force of a character which it you - delyat. 
237 
It is possible to object that if gigan you are valid there were from the intercourse of inkub from wives shch also N am, about t. would be born and still because and now ecu of wives shch and N y, having the intercourse from inkuba, to joint stock company of races tell St. B ernard, P etr Alkane of tarskiya and others and in that r y. 
I will answer that, according to Guazzo, there are inkuba of fellow countrymen ny, water, air and ognenny6e, and to azhdy of? 
lives in peculiar to it e lemen te4. And zvestno that zhi 
cotton have especially zn achiteln ye the sizes, zyxwvutsrq the Czech 
the element in which they live is more. N an aprimer, fishes - many of N and x, undoubtedly, are very small, to joint stock company it is MI is visible also at terrestrial zhivotn ykh, but so to joint stock company water about a stranstvo exceeds terrestrial, that and to flog some. fishes are surpassed in size zemn ykh zhivotn ykh. 
It will be clear if we look at N and whales, skum briya, porridges of alot and some other viviparous Further, so to joint stock company air is more than water, and fire bolysh air, then inkuba fiery and air prevoskho dit terrestrial and water, to joint stock company in body size, so! • p about with and l e. M about e t y t, with to and at t, h t about p t and c y, about and that yu shch and e in air which is more than water generally is less rys and quadrupeds, but it proves nothing, so birds, flying in air, prin adlezhat to the earth where OHI have a rest; then the summer would need and to consider a sneeze of fishes, to joint stock company zhivotn ykh air that, of course, awaking> N ep Ravi Ln of the lake. 
Now it is necessary to notice that after a flood the spirit which covers N ash at the earth and water made a cart sya, thanks to humidity, more dense, than to a flood and t and to and to in l and N about with t e with t p r and ch and n and t of l e N and I, m about e in t to be, from it and zhi zn people it is not so long, to joint stock company in antediluvian times. The same density of air yav lyatsya by the reason that inkuba air and Ognjen of N ye cannot zhi t more in such dense air and whether it they go down sometimes, not for a long time, is similar lyu dyam, N yryayushch to them in depth of the sea. And so, to a flood, kogd <air was not so dense, inkuba went down on zemlk and had the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N, creating and m about r and z about m of and and N of t about in p about h t and t and to about about e r about with that, to and to about N and with am and Now have the intercourses from wives shch and Amy's N in the dyany inkuba which are sometimes under a look malen to and x people. You confirm their water origin; that voluptuousness and humidity - elements, hundreds rushing among themselves. So, Venus, on mythology 

238 
\will be born from sea foam and it is natural that children its not giants, and ordinary growth. One more zamechan iye: when inkuba, connecting from wives shch and Amy's N, do not change the body, wives shch and N y do not see them or see, to joint stock company hardly noticeable shadow: such is a case, the N y by us above when kissed the lady inkub, and she hardly feeling - in is told and to l and e in t about p r and to about with N about in e in N and e. E with l and e, N and about about r about t, and N to ub y want to be seen by the beloved, they at - nimat a visible cover, and their body becomes osyazaye-my. To joint stock company and m in the way they do it - it is their secrets and, and we cannot open her. We know only that about - the lochka of an inkub cannot consist of one condensed air because its consolidation happens from szhiman iya, that is from cold, and the body created thus at touch will be ice; 
it would bring nep7riyatnost wives shch and N am, then to joint stock company 
occurs obratn oye4. 

XXI I heads. Value of sinfulness of "demonialitet" and "bestialitet" (demonolozhestvo and skotolozhestvo) 
Having considered distinction of incorporeal demons who 
have the intercourses with the sorcerer of a yama, and the inkub dealing from wives shch and Amy's N not the sorcerer of a yama, we need - to consider roofing felt weight of a sin in that and other case. The intercourses the sorcerer y with demons on circumstances which accompany them, to joint stock company that: retreat from ve-ry, worship of a devil and others bezzakon iya, about koto-ry we spoke vysh e, there is a biggest of all sins, to joint stock company oh the person can only make. If to consider from this point zren iya, then of course the demo - nialitt there is a biggest of all corporal sins, to and to about y t about l to about m about e t with about in e r highway and t h e l about in e to. N about e with l and r and with - to suzhdat about it, to joint stock company about a sin corporal, otkin uv a sin p r about ti in r e l and g and i, t about e t about t about l to about about with to in e r N e N and e. P r and ch and n and, very convincing, is that the devil having the intercourses with the sorcerer of a yama is spirit besteles-the ny, reached in term in o and use lyaty, and he any acts by means of the body borrowed or with - handed over by him and though it is given in dvizhen iye, 
N
about nevertheless not live; therefore, the person having 
the intercourse, commits the same crime, to joint stock company Having the intercourse with an inanimate body. Intercourses 
t
aky sort can have razlichn y character: if 
the devil borrowed a human body, that this ungodliness, zyxw, 
if the body of an animal, then is sodomy. 
As for the intercourses with inkuby, here N "in with tr e h and e the CU I am a N and m and l e y highway e go about with to about r l e N and I r e l and gi and, i is difficult sk the Azat why this crime would have to t grekhovny sodomy and the bestialitet. If to a bestialita! grekhovny sodomy because the person un izhat svo * advantage, connecting to the cattle, in the intercourses <inkuby the absolutely return: inkub on rationality it is equal to the person, and concerning a body - it is more noble than the person and therefore, the person not un izhat the nature, connecting with inkuby. R assmatrivy demonialitt from this point zren iya, we see that it not grekhovny a demon ti and l and a theta. 
The N about the general opinion inclines to what the demonia litt grekhovny, and here on to joint stock company oh of the reasons e. In all sno en iya x with the demon the people sin with highway against religion: quarrystone } t about l yu about in N y e with N about highway e n and ya and l and p r about with and about p about m about shch and, with about in e those or zhelan iye uzn to at through it the future, or to learn i hidden and last. M uzhchin y both wives shch and N y, skhodyas; t and to and m about r and z about m with and N to at and m and, N e z N and yu t, h t about e that and in about ton ye, but think that it is the demon, and sin either with us rhenium or from zabluzhden iya, and their sin from inkuba that k, to joint stock company if they had the intercourse with a devil, from this it follows that and weight of these crimes to the ode of N of joint stock company of an ov. 


















240 
PART SECOND 


N about N e t with p and with e N I 
in powers of darkness 
I I 'M ('" 
	j ^	,
1
L - *' 

, 4 and. H i" < 
") N! I \VI | - The 05th 1999-. 1 0 5 1 ^ 9 9 




L

•> J_7 °" ^ 7 - - 17 2 - 1 - '4 l 
1
 


,  
- - 1071W '0 01 il' 9" i 2 0 5 P 9 c> 
: s> 0.6 
4 to 4S 6 5 1 - 0 6 4 J-? 7 ('^ 
'i i  

 
v
ь: state of emergency 
21:06 1S" W  
,

U) l of 2 h" "0  
d

Q, (M * 999  
i

2" 08 199VzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP 
1 "i OL - 19Ch 9 

1.09.1999 

6 12 1990 9.02 2000 4.08 9 "199 
10.03.2000 26 03 9 L 99 
7.12.1998 25 0" 2000 
^5-iJ 59 
68-48G43 

- - 21, 67 - 81 - 90 38 - 26L9 62 - 26 - 70 "65 - 79-M 







92-75 
10.03zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ '\^' 


19 7 W 0	b^-~ T) 
- 02 P99 
Stanislav Pshibyshevsky 
With and N and go hectare With and t and N y 
H and with t p e r in and I 
SYNAGOGUE SATAN Y 

Two gods eternally protivopolozhn y, two creators and two misters, chasms achaln ye and eternal. 
Kind God created spirits, clean beings; its world - the world invisible, the world of perfection, not zn ayushch and y bor- and pains. The angry B og created visible, corporal and prekho-dyashchy. He created flesh and passions, the earth with its fight, its torments of Amy and it is desperate iy, an immeasurable vale of tears, created the nature which makes only pain, about t of the h and I n and e and z l of the lake eternally. 
Kind god is a norm, Zac he, humility and pokor-a nost. He says to the children: "B to an udta of N and shch and spirit because only this way you will come to my kingdom! B to an udta more children, than children, kill will, follow me! N e you seek to experience p ri chi N y and the purpose because only in me everything last and gryadushch it". 
The angry B og is a lack of rules, unitary enterprise rya my, clear vidcheskiya p a ryzhok in the future, it is temptation sokroven-neyshy secrets ik ov and titanic obstinacy which, not p ri zn avy gran and the c, subverts everything Zac it y, all norms. It - vyssh aya wisdom and vyssh y debauchery, sa-May of di to aya pride and the craftiest humility because only this way it is possible to fool the rule. He consecrated you - sokomery, courage and love of power - and the N azyvat it ge-r about y with t in about m; about N of N and at the h and l of the h e l about in e to and, h t about N e t p r e with t at p l e N and I, unless against his own nature. He consecrated curiosity, he N azvat his N auk oh, he forced a forehead - centuries to investigate own origin and the N azvat it philosophy, it allowed to spread godlessly all ins-oozes to kta in line with a floor and the N azvat it art. 
The Angry B og was kind, and you direct the good father - Lem: "You are sick, you want to recover? Look! Z emlya washing all abounds to and mi with injuries which can istse-pour you, also dangerous I abound to the lady, but you can force them to serve to you as medicine. 
Do you want to be rich, you and shch esh treasures? Oh, 
I
  I have one thousand means which you can 
to entice own soul your of a shelter that it Quality Department dug to you precious zhi ly lands. And bo your soul knows everything. At it and at me achat one N. 
24 5 
Do you want zaglya to utnut N in the future and to guess yours sudg bu? And di, monitor flight p ti c, prislush ivaysya to shelg Stu of foliage, look N and stars, watch in zerkaln ye stalla kr whether solve N and and hands and - in one thousand types.-, predsozdat your future, but also shch and, investigate, Vi's razgada because Zac it mine - sharpness and dexterity, the observer a nost and far-sightedness, creative curiosity. 
Do you want un and chtozh t the enemies and the N astign does not want to be uty the law of ohms? And di! N of an aucha I smother the from share from a body, and I will transfer it for thousands of versts what you is invisible satisfied an alchba of your heart. Иб^ your own benefit, your own development and bu a dushchnost yes will be to you vyssh them Zac he Amy. 
Did you lose wives at your, taken by death? I give a sostr to your love because love, prodolzhayushch aya your sort to me on heart. And di! Exchanges have thousands of means I, whether tysya chi Zac N of An and y to pull out expensive to you at death! 
Everything is promised by me to you, everything will be seen and will receive everything if we go mine p utya mi. N about my ways are difficult, ib <difficult anything is made iye". 
So told Z2 ly to B og, so told Svetonosets1 of i 
About Aton and - P Arak of years during that time when was not born ep yet 
great enemy Otrok of N azaretsk and y 3. Whether also many highways eg <putya mi whether also long works and torments Amy Issledova melt N y the sky and the earth, and prevrashch Ali objects so that poison became it medicine, water p ok azyvat IU future, and vulk An ichesk iye is evaporated iya, expiring and. z e m of l and, about t to r y in and l and and m with about to r about in e N of N e y highway e e e about those with TV about in e shch e y And dalsh e and dalsh e p Ron and to Ali they on the way of sozerets of N and I. To a rug which they outlined around themselves a row <z in uk about in, to about t about r y e about N both p r about and z N about s and l and v and z in e with t of N about y p about with l e vatelnost, dv of wives and I hands and - was already enough that svya to zat their shower at with everything mirozdan iy, razdv chick-pea all Zac it y space and time, and without barriers to behold infinite couplings of causes and effects of their emergence to otdalenneyshy sides of the future. 



Yet the Satan - Antichrist was not born in that time. The angry B og was dvuyedin. With and t and N and - about t e c, With and t and N and - with and m and and z and, With and t and N and - p about e t and f and l about 
sofas 4 zhi l in a proud, all-powerful and omniscient sort ma 
g. It zhi l in silent mysteries chaldaic 
temples, and his priests were Amy's hook of m (doctors), Hart> 

246 
(magicians), to azd of m and gazry (astrologers). Egot the Satan yas in doctrines ah of a mazdea zm7a6, and his children, magicians conducted - Kia, okhran the yawl a sacred Agon, descended to them from heaven.9 From Agura - M azdy8, Dobr0ogo of B of RSA, nauchils1ya Z aratustr 
to the mysteries of a plant from m a1; egipets1ky T about t 1, three times ve- 
wild, stated in 42-x to N and hectare x 2 secret zn An iye and on - 
the structure of a human body, and the horror knew izbra1n N ym - 
Nai Gek and that 3 N endowed the N of ik for nothing magicians is elected - 
chesky it is visible iya and creativity and, mainly, yes - rum of murder mystery. 
The N about N to an aryad with the Satan - Tot, the Satan - Hecate lived in m and re With and t and N and - With and t and r 1 4, With and t and N and - P and N 1 5, With and t and N and - F and l of l about from 1 6. 
He was god ying Steen of kt and carnal desire who is equally esteemed and vyssh them and N both zsh and mi spirit, he was an inexhaustible source zhizn en in N oh of joy, inspiration and op ya in N en and I. He taught wives shch and N at secrets am temptations, zastavlya yushch and m of people to satisfy с^ои lusts in vzaimn ohm inclination of a floor, he luxuriated in to rask ah, invented a flute and set in rhythmic motion m y highway of c y, pok and Saint Mang Iya did not capture sulfurs - dets and a sacred phallus did not impregnate the surplus a fertile bosom. 
Because P An was Apollon and Aphrodite odnovremen-but. He was god of a home and brothel. He created philosophical systems, he constructed the museums and luxurious temples, he taught medicine and the mathematician e and, at the same time, his temple was in Astarteyona, huge brothel in which guzzle c y in long unitary enterprises-razhneniye studied all ways, all various means of satisfaction of sexual passion. 
At this time, also take in an era of the emperor T I 17 when great resettlement of gods in P them began, during an era you - sew refinement and the most aristocratic on - a slazhdeniye zhi zn yu, the Kind B og, still c Arie Vsh and y in the hidden kingdom from enviable unperturbable Stew, saw, N of joint stock company it ets that the sin measure was executed, and sent the Son to the earth that he told poko-to lenye of Angry B of RSA the sad truth. 
And it came to the world, the Son of Kind B of RSA, and was at first poor, ugn etayemy, to slaves and poden shch ik am, - when not vk ush avsh and m of sacred pleasures P An and. 
- H that you are concerned about daily bread? To the same to the ode - 
in
and e t l and l and i p r e to r and with N e y sh and m and ts in e t and m and, in with r and in N e N and and with 
Kt otory scarlet and brocade - pathetic rags? To that pita - 
e
  p t and ts, k about t about r y e N e with it t and N e N at t? Z and h e m with t r e m and t e with 

247 
you to the benefits zemn ym, which skoroprekhodyashch? To Acre. yours matters and pride if the highest on zeml. there will be a N and zsh and m in the Kingdom of Heaven? And carnal n oxoi. yours, unless it not gates of hell? 
Oh, poor volition of flesh, poor lust, a source all to and x passions, an inexhaustible source of love zhizn and will to eternity zhi zn and; she had to be unichto the wife that the kingdom invisible set in on the earth. 
The teacher sk azat that you already commit adultery 
wives shch and N oh, if glya di of highway N and it with vozhdele8niyem; learn 
the N ik goes much dalsh e: the Saint To and p r and and 1 speaks to N 
to the girl capable to cause in men y a sigh the leader a flax iya that she is shameless and if it lit in whom is be, even itself not zn aya, love p lamas I, then it vooo shche already not the virgin any more. 
- en and! H that the general between me and you? - vopro 
the Teacher shat. N about many dalsh e Teachers ide9t the pupil 
"Tu es diaboli jan u a - to richit Tertulli of An 1 - tu e- 
arboris illius resign atrix, tu es divinae legis prim. desertrix, tu es, quae eum persuasisti, quem diabolic 
aggredi non voluit".*2 0 "Omnia mala ex mulieribus","" zha 
it lutsya St. Both ER about N and m. Yes, he claims even that wives 
shch and N and it is not created on similarity of B at all ozhy because in Svya shchenny AI is written nothing is told about soul at sotvo r en and and e to N shch and N y. 
The kind B og hated invisible terrestrial beauty \He hated everything in what About Aton and - P An I vlya the l from 
and coming to consider kroveniye because he preached pettiness this world. To azhdy zhelan iye, the slightest vozm> shcheny fleshes, was a sin which the N of joint stock company azyvatsya a dale gy years * repentances. Tertullian rages f anatichesky hatred against each strip Pur 
pura2.1, which wives shch and N and ok ouch mlya et dress. That varnish 
c and y p r about to l and N and e t p about e t about v and f and l about with about f about in, to about t about r y e z and in l with 
cabins of N eokhran yaemy the shower and in death, destroys zhi be cried out because "quod n ascitur, opus Dei est; ergo quoi' fin gitur, diaboli negotium". *** theater and circus steel 

You - a threshold of a devil, you - broken the ban in otno-sheniya of this tree (i.e. Eve. - sost.). You - the first neglecting the divine law, it you finished it which a devil of N> wished to pursue. - lat. (Hereinafter translation of the originator) 
*" All evil - from women. - lat. 
Everything that is born - is a fruit of work B ozhy, следователь^ what is represented, there is a work of a devil - armor. 


248 
"diaboli figmenta" *; Holy Fathers warn even against paints, against flowers because the demon, the angry enemy, more willingly all the N aryazhatsya in I rk and e2 luxury paints. 
And sav3ry And to about N about to last2 competes with Grigory Ve- 
and to and m224 in destroy by l en AI of works of art. Feodo- 
these I I p ri to azyvat destroy to at all temples and vozdvi- 
corduroy road everywhere crosses. Destroy the meaning of the finest works of poets or at all exterminate them, so to joint stock company 
demonolog To and p ri An learns that in stikhotvore0niyakh sokry- 
you are "varia daemonia"" *. en and Af give rise ta2 becomes 
public wives shch and oh N which to azhdy can zabro-sat dirt, and love - oh, Auger's B, love - "amor si vincitur, diabolus vin citur"! ***. All nature gets in p r about with to r and p ts and i, i, hl and in N y m about br az about m, and with c e I yu shch and I p ri ro - yes. the B og sent to l diseases to allow the person to atone at least for a part of his sins here, on the earth; a sin prepyat-to stvovat a divine P romysla. In krayn I eat a case still are allowed e to z about r by c and z in m y 26 obsessed, not for that is go, of course, to cure bolezny, but whether highway in order that I vi t power of the Kind B of RSA triumphing over Z ly. 
U bique daemon! """" P about And an eronima, all air it is full demons, shivers from them to ri to and and crying about the death of gods, in each flower, in each tree - the demon therefore 
that it - joy and p7lodorodiye, wealth and beauty. In 
quality Lyuts and f a2 he brings ER day and concludes 
its light of Venus casting magnificent, sladostra-stny sn y. P ervy centuries know only one religion - fight against the demon. 
N about bo r a ba y l and N e l e to and. In f anatichesky madness the church of N fell down on glu- 
bochayshy and svyateysh iye the bonds binding the person from the Universe. It violently tore off the person by nature, vesh aya him between heaven and earth. Confidential communications, du - shu, to joint stock company the absolute, to joint stock company a phenomenon, not zavisyashch y from a brain is uniform ivsh iye with the nature a human soul, were announced satan in sk by them, devil deception of hl and h. 
People of antiquity of N akhoditsya with the nature in intim - neyshy otn Osh en and I x. Whether they zhi directly with 

, * Tvorenyem of a devil. - lat. 
.** Various evil spirits. - lat. 
and pozh	In	N of l and t. 
**** esslyu du of an odeemod! et - lyuoov, pooyezhdat dyavot - lat. 

2 4 <) 
the nature and in the nature, they were a part it, a piece. a nerve, proyavlyavsh to them outside the slightest changes at }> <dy. And if all inventions of human spirit soup only of a projection its body of a-ism, then politeisticheska the cult was a direct projection of the nature to all its blagoslavlyayushchea and the destroying power. And zyxwvuts of kN 
soul projects mekhan a-ism of business, a rassmatriv outside <my it izn wipe, and the nature came to light in are powerful - symbols of a pagan cult. 
In mad fight church a piece behind a piece of a gap. 1 that artery through which blood of the earth flowed in chelch centuries. It un ichtozhat unconscious selection prir (dy, proyavlyayushch iysya in beauty, force and power; it okhrl N of the yawl all that the nature wants to reject against what she so powerfully rises: dirt, ugliness, a disease, to, to 1 lek, the eunuch. Most willingly the church castrated b the whole world, would turn off light, would give all earth the victim to a sulfuric rain; and I eat aspiration with its only thing, burning zhelan iy one was its - that it is promised ny strash to N y court the N of windows ets came. 
But the nerve, an artery did not give themselves so easily unicht, zhi t. Especially people, zemnorozhdenny, still kresh • roots in the earth. The m took the most scarlet opportunity oi to return to the favourite terrestrial gods. 
In krovozhadn eyshy Zac it ah Christians against I zy chn and to ov poured out the yarosm, but Dem about N 28, that is ze la, the nature, was a N erazrush it. He went to forests, conceal. sya in unapproachable caves, brought together the true there and the khan Ali celebrated wild vak and. 



N about strongest f An attic rage of hatred of N" p r and in l I am l and with p r about t and in With and t and N y - m and and, With and t and N y - c e l and t e l of l of B to an udta of N and shch and spirit and are humble, be obedient, on. give birth, do not think! Such is there was the supreme law ret>. Giya of dark masses. The N about the magician was proud because it protivit! N all Zac it am. P rotivyas to the law of gravitation, it pod matsya on air and did not sink in water. If he wanted, mozh1' was to throw him into fire, and it left are safe •>' the Magician was too proud to imitate. "I that p • 'I can obozhestvi2 tsya virtue" - sk azat the Feud 
from M op sue sta 9. The m ag despised N ishch to a spirit et because <•' 
experienced everything melt N y and solved all intimate. P to stars he defined N asledn ik of tsars and zn it is scarlet" 

2 50 
blowing all people. The magician was a stubborn criminal against all the law ov, zn ayushch it the clairvoyant. Christ democratized the doctrine. He made accomplices of the revolt against Old Z avet poselyan and slaves who were more children, than children. The magician on - sazhdat the doctrine only in the most proud and powerful souls ah. 
P rotiv this stubborn ti the thane and N the stiansky rage, hatred of N ishch their spirit, poklonni-recovered hri- 
k Zac it and and those who were not capable a bottom 0 of what, except 
podrazhan iya. Already Zac it y To it ti N and N alagat a camp tya- 
inhabited N of joint stock company an adhan and I for magic. And here, the law follows for the law of ohms, 3 1 one is more strict than another while at the emperor Valen those were not istreble3ny all philosophers, between 
n and m and i e N and and l N y y I am m in l and x 2, about t r and in and in highway and y with I in those m of N and - 
tse. Was to have philosophical kN to a yoke enough to endanger the zhi zn; avoiding this teaching - with t i, zh and t e to l and and m p e r and and with about of l and vs e to N and and. And in about t of N and h and - an elk terrible martyrdom of proud children of the Satan, in comparison with which prosecutions of Christians at N e-r about N e to and ut with I m and l about y z and and in about y. 
By this time the Magician became a priest. Around him with - r and l and with I z y h e with to and e about shch and N y, vs e about with t and t to and I z y e with t in and join h to magicians and. P a ravda, they lose the symbolical force, the contents. The N ikto not zn is scarlet that mean zn joint stock company and and symbols, but also here the magician found a way out. It attached zn to joint stock company am mystical significance, koto-a swarm small Pomala began to work to joint stock company powerful vnushe-ny. Words, zn achen iye which the N ikto did not remember became powerful magnetic tool by means of which go the magician ustan avlivat the intercourse between P ovelite-Lem and the souls oh. 
erkov saw c that N of joint stock company an adhan and I am m and and p ytk she can make nothing by Amy. In its ability to imitate and only to imitate she addressed "the return Uda - ru", this "choc en retour" which plays such important role in magic. 
Z and to l and N and N and I am m and gi h e with k and m and z N and to and m and z and m e N e N y 
Church obrya3dami. Whether m agichesky Zac N of An and I am couple - 
lizovat a mass 3, holy water expelled the Satan, and 
if the magician a name of the Satan collected a thunderstorm, then the Christian Mog to disseminate it zn joint stock company of ohms of a cross. 
N about what fight lasted longer, the more had to concede church. It was vynuzh4 a dena to mix 
pagan cult with the. Wa to ha N and whether and 3 at prazdne- 
25 1 
stvo of Cere3s5 Libera were transferred to processions on idle; 
Vakh D e in y, and till the thirteenth century the people together with svl 
shch en N and to Amy Prazdn an oval orgiastic festivals, prazdn ik a donkey, prazdn ik madmen; the remains fallichesko go a cult crept in church, capitals of columns from 
biloval pornographer iche6skimi f iguram, and izlyublen- 
the N about y 3, commiting adultery about the was a ny plot 
mi daughters. In particular hell. Auger's B! To joint stock company it is fine! 
Here to a poor brain tserkovn ykh scientists and theologians, to tory so willingly and so N aivn about the списыва3rd is already voluminous 
whether each other, not prikhodilos8 to apryagatsya by N. Ai d' 
very I strike kind E vsev 3. N at yes, sometimes and 
Maun can have good otkroven iya, but after all fish vitelno there was the fact that I zy chn and to and it is so good zn Ali hell. Rabanne of M and in r 39 in the opisa4n does not forget AI of hell even 
F a legetona, To the otsit i4 1C ti to sa 0, and during all averages 
centuries and prin imat the Har boat about N for the boat of the Demon. 

* zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ - to * 

P to an ovsyud Demon. About Aton and triumphs. P to a rezhda - only a scarecrow, means it is strengthened iya the authorities of church - - it becomes all-powerful now mister whom m and r about and the CU I and with t and r and e t with I mind and l about with t and v and t. P about h t and about I and with dysh to at l that the evil ghost was not installed in a body. In the четвер2nd 
that century the sect of a massala ev4 appears monsters of N aya. 
which consider themselves obsessed with a devil; they a demon p r e with t and N of N about yu t with I in about vs e with t about r about N y, to r and h and t, p l yu yu t, and z vivatsya in uzhasn eysh their convulsions that oborough to nitsya from dirty, a name, to which "legion". 
The Satan prin imat thousands of types. He becomes god a word, goes to the desert and torments Holy Fathers tempt teln with eyshy questions, it sows in a shower ah their thousands with - opinions and fluctuations, it goes to monasteries and excites the N y a brain of monks the most seductive a type of N and I mi is exhausted, he visits virtuous wives at night, from nimat their will and reason at N and forces them to besstyd-to neyshy debauchery; he takes root into a brain of many thousands true and cries out is wild iye use a lyatiya and blasphemies. 
erkov was almost unable not to defend with c from Sa the thane y. Ekzortsizma Zahn imat more and more place in breviaries. N and one mass there was to such p y highway of N about with t yu, to and to and no I and a m e l and m e about that p r and e to z about r c and z m and x; N e decide more predprin to imat religious tseremo-niya, without having removed a spell previously from all corners tserk- 
252 
vi. P ri to dad Siksta of V43 expel devilish charms yes - from the Egyptian obelisk, before that to joint stock company to put it in P and me. 
The N about what is conducted fight from church more furiously, the Satan becomes stronger. Obsession peresili-howls, the Satan scoffs at church roaring naked obsessed, he works wonders before crowds ve-ruyushchy. He opens svya shch en for N and to at his secrets ye sins, it predicts a thing and which really sbyva-yutsyatsya, it raises a body obsessed in air and seams - ryat it very much N and the earth, not p ri chi N I I to it the slightest harm. 
The c erkov catches for otchy N of N eysh iye means. With - vershenno truly assuming that all to aya siln aya passion contributes the person to obsession, it zapreshch the ayah of moths of highway and e proya vlen iya passions. To azhdy passion has the demon; if kill passion, kill the demon. 
M ir in otchy N and and. To joint stock company to oboronitsya from the Satan and his temptations? To joint stock company zashch and ti tsya from eternally, hourly pody-the ation toiling lewd gallyutsin, from thousands izde-in and yu shch and x with I, with m e yu shch and x with I go l about with about in, to about t about r y e With and t and N and the N and - pravlyat against B of RSA? To an azhdy thought - a sin; the maiden, unconsciously you zy vayushch aya sighs of young necks in love, sins and already with it odn it, according to the Saint To and p ri An and, loses virginity. en shch and N and which is fine, unconsciously sins because owing to kra- 
the cell it upodobilas4 to a sickle, which Satan 
reaps the harvest (An selm 4). M ona, which demon 
distracts from a cross sins because causes powerlessness in fight. The spouse sins if he to birth business to Uda - lyat more interest, than love for B of regional public institution. M it is Aachen I washing more than two times a month, gresh it. In total - du a sin, everywhere eternal use of lyatiye; one thought, odes - to them the only act you lose the right of N and paradise and you get to the power About Aton y. The same who time fell the authorities About Aton y does not have rescue. And bo even Saints prizna-yut that many devils despise e to zortsizm and with - all are not afraid of them. 


And in e t about in r e m I am m and with with about in about go p with and ho z and, z and r and z and t e l N about y and with - tero-the epilepsy extending from terrible - a stratum worldwide, at this time, when hourly expect to it tsa the world and live in wild AI is desperate before 

253 
blizyashch I am eaten With trash in N ym Court, vozn ika5et faith in P macaws 
the klet triune About Aton at - An ti hr sta4. 
And time when it had to set in, already bl zitsya. I n tem pore saeviet *, tells To and p ri An, and Lach - the thane of tion claims that time already prish the Leningrad Region. 
Whether most strash N y e p redp olozhen and I am Arie's c about t An i x r and s t and. About N of the h e l about in e by r e ha, about N with y N p about and e l and, without - z and to about N n and k, r an ugatel, p r the EU is stupid N and to. He was born from a pas - py and a bough to an uba, and whether from "m u n d issim a m eretrice et crudelissimo nebulone" **. A sin - its st hi I, but it is big in a sin. Everything what Christ taught to, it will overturn, any sin will raise to virtue. He will tower to heaven, will make entrance in okhra" and orders to rasslavit himself the house Gospo-. It p ri to azht to kill Christ's attendants and the village - zk and mi, gordymi6 with lips vosklikn et: "To rov them on us and 
children of N and highway and x" 4. He will make miracles, it is more which 
the Son of B of an ozha y did not make. And its power will be, to joint stock company that, about to a Torah sk an adhan about in to N a yoke And an ova, 41: "The N ichyyu the power of N and the earth of N e l z I with r and in N and t with in l and with t yu t about oh, to t about with about t in about r e N of t and to, h that is afraid of nothing; who sees everything vozvy4shennoye and to the kingdom - 
et N and d about in with e m and with y N and m and in y with about to about m e r and I" 7. 
And Antichrist p ri ate highway. material a domination leg, and Antikhr4 the east of spirit, pride also conducted N about not Antichrist 
chi I: divine M and N and 8. 
With and t and N e N and with to uch and l about N e and with t about in with t in about in and t in e highway e N with t in e e p and leptik ov, satiated it zhi t in libertinism monashe-sky dreams, is silly aya a game with e to zortsizm not of entertainments of l any more I am l and e of the lake of B about about m z and ho t e l about N with t and t, B about about m, r and N highway e, h e to be able to generate m the real An of the tikhrist. The B about gy in the kingdom of spirit, proud, di to and m P rotivobogy, to tory would push aside the Son of Kind B of RSA back to his kingdom of invisible. 
And so, sk azat M of An and, izvechn and sacred wisdom: there are two gods, is equal siln ykh, equally in power of N ykh and protivopo-lozhn ykh: N evidimy B og Dobra, c arya shch and y in heaven whether did not bake ushch iysya about the earth both zhi vushch and y highway for perfection of the and zbran N and to ov; also there is other god, B og the Sin, koto-ry rules the earth. N et a sin because the sin also prois goes from B of RSA, to joint stock company virtue - from another, bespech a leg of B of RSA who says: "not N apryagaytes, podra-zhay those only mn e". 

It will shortly rage. - lat. dirty loose woman and the most terrible villain. - lat. 


254 
Of N about z and with 4 9 and m and the N and x e y with t in about 5 0 r and with p r about with t r and n and l and s, to and to p about zazhigateln to ohm to a cord, on all Christian world, and for the first time vozn hiccups a question: church or attract - a heystvo, sk azk and about free will or reality of determinism, senseless podrazhan iye or most y t of N and I f and N of t and with t and to and m and with t and ts and z m and, p about to about r N about e r and with TV about both l and a proud sin in a name About Aton y-ying Steen of the kt, the Satan - priro-dy, the Satan - curiosity and the Satan - passion. 
Again won against church. In three-century fight the Satan was forced sdav5atsya. Its the first gran diozn y, An - 
Abijah's tikhrist of N o the N 1 was destroyed from awful cruel 
Stew, and Satan blasphemes in gloomy otchy N and and. 
- I am God of light! You, God of revenge, overthrew exchanges I because I was light. Your jealousy of my beauty, of my gloss and light was more, than mine mogushche-a stvo, but be afraid of exchanges I now, fear my arrogance and hatred of powerful. I, eternal light, do not sleep, and my children whom I raised eternal light, - when do not sleep. N about your children, N en avidyashch iye light, fight - shchiyesya light, your children, in N izk ohm servility I creep - shchy at your legs, your children tired with fight against me dolzhn y to fall asleep. Look! I to N I z among to N I zy, I treat N and mi, I p la of highway at N them. 
B e r e gi t e with! I sacrificed to m of an illiona of mine revenges, is still lovely - 
I will sacrifice lianas, one million more y I pozhert-vy willingly because one million y - only fertilizer for that is go the Only thing which will generate the Only thing. 



And revenge of the Satan p ri highway of la. It took root into the earth, and 
the earth became oderzhim2oy. 
In thousand godu5 the mankind began to despair 
in Aage's B. Miracles of the 5 zn amine iya on the earth came true. 
Otton Veli's army to oho 3 saw the dying-away sun. 
yellow, to joint stock company of highway af wounds. In P i4me a devil personally 
visited dad With and lvestra5; seasons changed 
the sequence: snow went in the spring, tya zhk aya the thunderstorm burst in N among frosty winter. "Sacred fire" devoured meat of people, the N is scorched by ymiy shreds it fell from bones, the earth raved, and people pre-rotated in animals. During the hunger which visited during that time all of the countries y began to eat human drop. Guo - lot on human meat became Mang Iyey. P renebregat 

'' 5 5 
meat zhi votn y x, did not even turn N and it a vnim of N and I. People dolzhn y were to devour people: so pozh1 l and l of m with t and t e l N y y With and t and N of ampere-second p e r in and N and r and with y in and l and with N and m I from children, then steel of Shari t those who died on pain shy roads, pok and, N of joint stock company it ets, not N was the person, re both vsh and y sya openly to sell to highway human meat. Whether also an ox to also appeared uncountable packs from the woods and a poyed of those who else remained in zhi you x. And great стра^ the N and the earth reigned that whether it will be highway en and the population. Whether It prelates is also older than highway and N y the cities gathered also an obsuzhda, to joint stock company, at least, to keep in zhi vy sil N e y sh and h, ch that y h e l about in e h e with t in about N e in y m e r l about! 
T shch e t of N about with t and r and l and with mind and l about with t and v and t B about and, t shch e t of N about z l e y shy enemies to la of foxes each other in "treuga dei" *, tshchetzh, kings, in a crown and with a scepter, sang together with choristers mi the prayers full otchy N and I - everything is vain. 
If the B og does not help, the Satan has to help! And on chal to abuse B of RSA, to defame his St. body, op to levyvat its sacred zn amine iye. The N achatsya a harvest of the Satan Long enough by highway it eptat, sneering, otchayavshy sya: "Look to joint stock company your B og is mercy! R an azv you not vi what it is already use lyal you more you zn wants to at highway?" 
N at, e with l and m y p r about to l I am t y, the t about d and N and h e about about l highway e N e p about can. Allons" *, we will indulge entirely in the Satan. 
Christ shed the blood for the benefit of mankind of He! B of a log?! H that for the benefit if it is necessary people on each other endorsee if the earth, to joint stock company heated zhel1 z oh, e by t of N about and, and h mind and of N about and m t I with about N and to about with t I x. 
P lips this benefit will be three times mocked! N and that on - the benefit which dolzhn about to come after that zemno.' hell; in to it tse a game of ts, this future benefit - tolyyu a dream, to joint stock company everything that was promised to B a log to N and fellow countrymen che here. And bo look! C erkov, the Saint bride of Christoff, hundred la rasputn an itsa, and I sell it myself, the leader Pozo |. neyshy trade. 
At this time, when was shame to be "without the earth" when there were no landless misters, the earth was what - t of N eotchuzhdayemy. It is indivisible, to joint stock company of people, and dolzhn to remain indivisible. It passes to the senior the son \ 

Divine truce. - lat. 
Well ZhR. - f river. 
H the same needed to be done to other estates? And here, for what there was a church? The temple of B of an ozha y became a synagogue About Aton y, that father to whom the N uzhn and is dirtier - highway aya passion to generate the evil. 
B the estimated children of barons and dukes became abbots and bishops. The people and here were convoked: "you - Bira or..." The N Arad never waited for it "or", he chose. To Otto - Verseyl tells, to joint stock company of six - summer reben ok 05 was chosen the highest adherent of souls of many thousands of "sheep". He got on a chair, murmured couple of phrases from to an atekhizis and was declared the bishop. And N about d and r e e N about to z and y in and l with in about and f r and z y. N at, t about d and in z I am l and on help of a pigeon who suddenly fell to it by the head: and it was even more favorable zn joint stock company of ohms. 
At the same time whole world the scan dalizovan was honored - 
ny preemn ikam St. P etr. D5v6e wives shch and N y Provo - 
dit the beloved in p and p7y. Destinies hristi- 
anstvo operate the son evr eya 5 and dven adtsatiletn y 
alcha m to. 
The m the ilostivy father of a sin is happy. Now he is confident in the fortress of the domination. C erkov thought again. Re-for5my churches! to ri chi t the whole world. And dad Grigory 
V I I 8 p r and with t at p and e t to r e f about r m and m. e N shch and N and, oh, about p I am t 
wives shch in and, dolzhn and to be un ichtozhen and church. With di - koy5 9 jealousy the attic monk - a pas proclaims f An - 
p and e z r and h and e. With and m m about N and x, about N in about with with t and N and in l and in and e m t about N and - 
Hove against secular clergy. The m ona throws the f and to e l y into N and r about d, and into t of N and h and N and e t with I with t r and highway of N y y t e r r about river P azrush iteln y ying Steen kt the people, this eternally naked dny animal, extends boundlessly. The B yl luchsh y a case to revenge the blood-sucker who raged against the people one thousand times worse, than the possessor deputy-? And the people rush on svyashch en N ik ov which with persistence otchy N and I refuse to release the Wives, they are driven from altars, souls at, crippled or torn to parts. The N tramples down Arad, profanes, oplevyvat what was held sacred until recently. 
P the nature is forced, the church pushes away wives shch and N at with about t in r and shch e N and e m, to and to N e h and with t about e and in about t of N about e, with and t and N and N with to uyu to a dragon, whether to joint stock company the embodiment eternal gib6e0 muzhch of N y. F ana- 
the tichny madman P etro D and m and and N also goes round all And that is 
Leah, and in uncountable sermons, falls upon the Woman: "C'est a vous, que je adresse, ccume de Paradis, amorce de Satan, poison des ames, glaive des coeurs, huppes, bijoux, chouettes, louves, san gsues insa- 

9-3400	257 
tiables..." *". Theologians declared that it is necessary far away to be neighed from wives shch and N y, so to joint stock company the earth is enough to nasa 
Lena the 61st all the same will die soon, and P etr the Pawnshop 
with to and y a mustache of t and N and in l and in and e t, to and to about with N about in N about e p about l about e n and e, ch that 
marriage is a sin, in krayn I eat a case, admissible. 



The church coped with the nature successfully. Svyashchenni-to and tore off from wives y that he indulged in inexpressibly hypocritical sexual beastliness. Its marriage was Rastar bend, and here it achin the ayah of N to leave N horns to men of the flock. N oh, to joint stock company already sk an adhan oh, the celibacy was carried out almost everywhere. 
T e p e r c e r to in and about with that in and l about with e shch e with p r and in and t with I with r and z at my. If wounds to a sha it was forbidden to investigate nature of B about and, then t e p e r, in about about shch e and in about in with e m, z and p r e shch and l and p r and e and t to r and z mind at. 
To an azhdy word corresponds to the idea, and to the azhdy idea there is a being. Therefore, grammat to and are logic, and logic - zn An iye. 
Got off with it reason. If the idea is sushchest-in, then nothing should be investigated. Once you behold the world in the thoughts, and already behold IS muddy and valid. 
B dew retted razmysh la t and with enthusiasm N and neskolko3 Arie's fragments of a stotel 62 began on to brasyvatsya, to - 
tory Garun of al P and highway and 6 just translated N and the Arab - 
skiya I z y to. And here, comment on poor Aristotle, write lengths of N ye kommen thorium on kommen thorium, Calais a chat otryvk and, do I z y chn and to and Christians in ohm, outposts lyat it with a subtlety dock to azyvat Slo va's divinity, to predict its martyr a game a rank at: in total si-to a stem of Christian dogma find developed and filosofsk4i proved at Aristotle. P abutment head 
Abijah of c en y 6 becomes to N I fellow countrymen of thinkers; two demon 
fetal a mule of steel both great scientists of church F about m a6665 razmysh la et about psychology of angels, and Dun1 
With to about t invents skazochn uyu "machina cogitationis" "*" • 
if the dream corresponds to life, then the word corresponds 

I address you, outcast paradise, sobchazn the Satan, poison d\highway a sword of hearts, dochgogrivy, prechestnitsa, owls, watchitsa, insatiable bloodsuckers - fr Proin volutpat commodo finibus. Maecenas a est id quam rutrum mattis in quis ante. Vivamus consectetur hendrerit nibh, eget ornare urna placerat id. Aenean nec libero ac orci sagittis ultrices vitae eu enim. Integer tempor.

1
Etiam Sit Amet Est Donec Maecenas Adipiscing





A
liquam amet est, quam leo maecenas mauris turpis leo pharetra, vulputate lacus. Ad ornare donec, fringilla feugiat augue imperdiet laoreet. Nisl rhoncus turpis est, vel elit, congue wisi enim nunc ultricies sit, magna tincidunt. Maecenas aliquam maecenas ligula nostra, accumsan taciti. Sociis mauris in integer, a dolor netus non dui aliquet, sagittis felis sodales, dolor sociis mauris, vel eu libero cras. Faucibus at. Arcu habitasse elementum est, ipsum purus pede porttitor class, ut adipiscing, aliquet sed auctor, imperdiet arcu per diam dapibus libero duis. Enim eros in vel, volutpat nec pellentesque leo, temporibus scelerisque nec.
Ac dolor ac adipiscing amet bibendum nullam, lacus molestie ut libero nec, diam et, pharetra sodales , feugiat ullamcorper id tempor id vitae. Mauris pretium aliquet, lectus tincidunt. Porttitor mollis imperdiet libero senectus pulvinar. Etiam molestie mauris ligula laoreet, vehicula eleifend. Repellat orci erat et, sem cum, ultricies sollicitudin amet eleifend dolor nullam erat, malesuada.
Bibendum libero faucibus porta egestas, quisque praesent ipsum fermentum tempor. Curabitur auctor, erat mollis sed, turpis vivamus a dictumst congue magnis. Aliquam amet ullamcorper dignissim molestie, mollis. Tortor vitae tortor eros wisi facilisis.




Donec arcu risus diam amet sit. Congue tortor risus vestibulum commodo nisl, luctus augue amet quis aenean maecenas sit, donec velit iusto, morbi felis elit et nibh. Vestibulum volutpat dui lacus consectetuer, mauris at suspendisse, eu wisi rhoncus nibh velit, posuere sem in a sit. Sociosqu netus semper aenean suspendisse dictum, arcu enim conubia leo nulla ac nibh, purus hendrerit ut mattis nec maecenas, quo ac, vivamus praesent metus viverra ante. Natoque sed sit hendrerit, dapibus velit molestiae leo a, ut lorem sit et lacus aliquam. Sodales nulla ante auctor excepturi wisi, dolor lacinia dignissim eros condimentum dis pellentesque, sodales lacus nunc, feugiat at. In orci ligula suscipit luctus, sed dolor eleifend aliquam dui, ut diamauris, sollicitudin sed nisl lacus. Ut facilisis ante in dui ac suscipit, turpis voluptatum donec, suspendisse, quasi luctus amet urna tempor amet sit. Cras volutpat mattis hasellus justo sed, feugiat nunc praesent. Quam ac ligula risus lectus dapibus, nunc lectus velit, vel , vestibulum in tellus nam, eros amet hasellus facilisis. Vehicula sed, class dignissim ullamcorper.






About the Author



Urna Semper ac dolor ac adipiscing amet bibendum nullam, lacus molestie ut libero nec, diam et, pharetra sodales , feugiat ullamcorper id tempor id vitae. Mauris pretium aliquet, lectus tincidunt. Porttitor mollis imperdiet libero senectus pulvinar. Etiam molestie mauris ligula.
